Her album "21" (XL/Columbia), released almost two years ago, was the top seller in 2012, as it was in 2011, marking the first time since Nielsen SoundScan began tracking music sales in 1991 that one album has reigned for two consecutive years. According to figures released Thursday "21" sold 4.4 million copies in the United States last year, after selling 5.8 million in 2011. Late last year "21" crossed the 10 million mark, becoming the 21st album to do so in the SoundScan era.The second-biggest album of 2012 was Taylor Swift's "Red" (Big Machine), with 3.1 million sales. It is also the top album on the latest weekly Billboard album chart, compiled from sales in the week that included Christmas, selling 241,000 copies in that period.The British boy band One Direction scored two slots in the year-end chart. "Up All Night," released in March, reached No. 3 with 1.6 million sales; "Take Me Home," from November, is No. 5 with 1.3 million. (Both were released by Syco/Columbia.) The fourth-biggest album of the year — and the only rock title in the Top 10 — was Mumford & Sons' "Babel" (Glassnote), with almost 1.5 million copies sold.The music industry had started off 2012 with a hopeful spring in its step, because it had seemingly broken a long losing streak for its most lucrative product — album sales. In 2011 — for only the second time in a decade — sales increased slightly (1.3 percent), leading some to wonder whether things were finally turning around. But in 2012, despite big numbers for a few top acts, the industry's familiar sales pattern returned: falling album sales, with the growth in downloads not enough to offset the rapid decline of the CD.A total of 316 million albums were sold in 2012, down 4 percent for the year. Sales of CD's were down by 13.5 percent, but full album downloads gained 14 percent, to a new high of 118 million. About 37 percent of albums are now bought digitally, while the CD continues to fade: its sales have declined 75 percent since 2000.One number that keeps going up, however, is song downloads, which in 2012 increased by 5 percent to reach 1.3 billion. Each of the three most popular tracks last year reached the mainstream through paths that were once unorthodox but are increasingly becoming the norm.No. 1 was "Somebody That I Used to Know" by the Belgian-Australian songwriter Gotye, which was downloaded 6.8 million times; Carly Rae Jepsen's "Call Me Maybe" was second with 6.5 million; and Fun.'s "We Are Young" reached No. 3 with nearly 6 million. Gotye and Ms. Jepsen's songs owed much of their success to clever videos that caught fire on social media. Fun.'s song was propelled by television, first in an episode of "Glee" and then in a commercial shown during the Super Bowl.Another bright spot, albeit a small one, is the continuing popularity of vinyl albums, whose sales rose 18 percent to 4.6 million, the biggest that SoundScan has recorded since 1991. The top record was Jack White's "Blunderbuss" (Third Man/Columbia), which sold 34,000 copies, bumping the Beatles' "Abbey Road" to No. 2 after a three-year run at the top.
One of 2012's ascendant hip-hop crews was Pro Era, the collection of rappers and producers who grew up with and around the young Brooklyn 1990s-revivalist Joey Badass. On his breakthrough single, "Survival Tactics," he was joined by his longtime friend Capital Steez, one of Pro Era's most nimble and carefree stylists. Capital Steez died on Dec. 24, just 19 years old. He'd released one mixtape, the warm and approachable "AmeriKKKan Korruption," in April, rereleasing it in November with bonus tracks, and he was a steadfastly affirming presence on Pro Era songs, including several from the just-released crew mixtape "Peep: The aPROcalypse." He tended toward lush, extra-musical production with dominant piano or whistles, and he rapped with a light touch, delving into slippery singsong melodies. Of the crew — reminiscent of early 1990s innovators like the Pharcyde and A Tribe Called Quest — he was the one most inclined to mysticism and government conspiracies in his lyrics, and also the most fluent in the free-associative style of that period: "I'm too high on my own supply of false ego/We flyer than bald eagles/Still incognito like, 'I think we lost Steelo.' ""Hear that, Helen? He's tearing it up, that fella. I'd love to get my hands on those acapellas." About 45 seconds into "Hit It" Mystikal takes on the voice of an older white woman who is watching him perform the song, which is a stunningly good update of vintage James Brown funk. He's catching feelings, riding the speedy beat, virtually speaking in tongues. He's in the song and then outside it, calling out instructions to the band — which includes the New Orleans musician Trombone Shorty, according to the Twitter feed of DJ Don Juan, who produced the song with KLC — and talking about all the instruments he's in charge of. His rasp is intact from his mid-1990s heyday, and his energy is stratospheric. The song is a leak; it may or may not appear on his coming album on Cash Money, his first in more than a decade, a span that included time in jail.Whatever happens, though, "Hit It" — or "Hit Me," depending on whose Twitter feed you believe — is either a late contender for best song of 2012, an early contender for best song of 2013 or proof that time travel to and from 1968 is possible and happening right before our ears.There's a tug-of-war going on inside the Departed. The moody "Adventus" (Underground Sound), its first album of originals following a covers album in 2011, is about evenly split between songs sung by Cody Canada, the former frontman of the Oklahoma country-rock outfit Cross Canadian Ragweed, and those sung by Seth James. They are very different propositions. Mr. Canada's voice is a bit emaciated, but strategically so, and he's a sinewy singer with real grit on songs like "Flagpole" and "Worth the Fight." His songs anchor the Departed to the distinctive Texas-Oklahoma country universe he's long been a part of, and it makes sense when the band dips into seductive 1970s boogie rock à la ZZ Top. Mr. James's songs, though, are transformative. He has a robust blues-thick voice that's not elegant, but is very meaty. When he's out front, as on "Demons," the Departed turns industrial strength. Best is the frustrated gospel-soul meditation "Burden," on which Mr. James groans over greasy guitars: "Oh how it must feel when it's right/But I'll never know 'cause your love is a stone/And your heart is a burden on mine."That the global bass music diaspora would eventually visit the music of American Indians is no surprise. That it has happened with such ferocity and compatibility in the music of A Tribe Called Red is welcome. This Canadian trio — Bear Witness, Dee Jay NDN and DJ Shub — specializes in a simple but effective hybrid of the more urgent end of electronic music with pow wow music, the traditional drumming and singing of various American Indian tribes. The hypnotic qualities of both make a slick pair. The group's new EP, "Trapline," like its self-titled debut album from 2012, is infectious, and available free on its SoundCloud page. The new songs are a bit more polished, lightly de-emphasizing the traditional source material in favor of more digital thump, as on "Unlimited Trap" or "No One Out Can Compete," which molds its hook from a KRS-One sample. The group also uses its music to advocate for indigenous peoples' rights, and occasionally repurposes samples from discriminatory film portrayals. It plays Jan. 13 at Webster Hall as part of GlobalFest.These two rappers, both Bay Area pioneers, have just about everything in common. Too Short is from Oakland, and E-40 from Vallejo, 25 miles to the north. Too Short has been releasing music since the early 1980s, E-40 since the late 1980s. Both spent their formative years on Jive Records, a major incubator that took regional sounds national.Where they diverge, though, is in the work. E-40 is one of the great technicians in hip-hop history, a bouncy, frenetic rapper with a nasal pinch in his voice and a gift for neologism; Too Short, on the other hand, is slow and sinisterly monochromatic. Maybe that's why they've barely collaborated until now, with a pair of albums, "History: Function Music" and "History: Mob Music" (Heavy on the Grind), a team-up as meaningful as any Jay-Z-Kanye West collaboration. "Mob Music" is Bay Area rap as it once was, mean and syrupy, but the two sound more ripe on "Function Music," a collection of jubilant post-hyphy tracks that are filthy and loose and hold their own against songs by area comers like Cousin Fik, Shady Nate and Iamsu!
In an unusual response to provisions in a new European copyright law, scheduled to take effect by 2014, Sony Music has released a compilation of early Bob Dylan recordings that is bound to become one of his most collectible albums. "The 50th Anniversary Collection," which carries a subtitle — "The Copyright Extension Collection, Vol. 1" — that explains its purpose, was rushed to only a handful of record shops in Germany, France, Sweden and Britain just after Christmas.Only about 100 copies of the four-CD set were produced, with sparse packaging and an insert listing the details of the set's 86 tracks, all previously unreleased studio outtakes and live recordings from 1962 and 1963.It also comes as a downloadable version, available through the singers's Web site, bobdylan.com, but only to fans who log on from France or Germany. (Prices for the CD set vary from country to country, from the equivalent of $39 to, in Britain, $138)American collectors are locked out, although for those desperate to have an original CD set, several have made their way to eBay, where bids have gone as high as about $1,450. (For collectors who want the recordings, but who don't care about having one of the 100 original CDs, the set has been turning up on file-sharing sites.)Two spokesmen for Sony confirmed that the set was legitimate, its bootleglike appearance notwithstanding. They explained that the point of the release was to keep the recordings under copyright protection in Europe, where the laws are in flux. Currently, recordings can be copyrighted in Europe for 50 years, a much shorter term than in the United States, where recordings made since 1978 will remain copyrighted until 70 years after the death of the last surviving author.In 2011 the European Union revised its copyright laws to extend copyright to 70 years. The change is not yet in effect but will be by 2014. And there's a catch, a "use it or lose it" provision: recordings cannot benefit from the 20-year extension unless they were published before the 50-year term expired. The recordings on "The 50th Anniversary Collection" were about to fall over that legal precipice.Because Sony has been considering some tracks on "The 50th Anniversary Collection" for its Bootleg Series, a program of archival releases that now encompasses nine multidisc sets, the company decided to throw a few dozen tracks onto the market, however tenuously, to ensure their ownership.There was another concern. In Europe smaller labels have been releasing recordings that have gone out of copyright as public domain compilations — so-called gray market discs — including some by Mr. Dylan. Typically, these companies have not had access to master tapes but have released material that has already appeared on bootlegs, often in superb but not master quality. Sony hopes to fight those labels with this release and any sequels."The 50th Anniversary Collection" is an idiosyncratic compilation, made up largely of recordings from the sessions for Mr. Dylan's second album, "The Freewheelin' Bob Dylan." Included are alternative takes of several songs from that record, including "Blowin' in the Wind," "Bob Dylan's Dream" and "I Shall Be Free," as well songs that didn't make the finished album, often in multiple versions.Among the highlights is a series of seven increasingly rollicking versions of "Mixed Up Confusion," which Mr. Dylan released as a single in 1962, and three takes — one on piano, two on guitar — of the Robert Johnson blues classic "Milkcow's Calf Blues."Some of the studio recordings, as well as live performances from the Gaslight Cafe, Carnegie Hall and the Finjan Club, in Montreal, are familiar to collectors of bootlegs, though the quality here is improved. In fact, the outtakes from the "Freewheelin' " sessions sound notably clearer than "Freewheelin'" itself.So far, few record labels have responded to the pending shift in European copyright protection by releasing copious amounts of archival material, although fans of bands like the Beatles and the Rolling Stones are hoping that such releases are in the offing.But Sony is not alone. Universal, which owns the Motown catalog, has released a series of jazz, gospel and rhythm and blues albums under the rubric "Motown Unreleased 1962," which makes a large body of its unissued archives eligible for the European copyright extension.
Richard Dare made a splash last year as an outspoken entrepreneur turned arts administrator and started work on Jan. 2 as the president and chief executive of the New Jersey Symphony , with the promise that his business acumen would bring it new luster.On Friday, nine days later, he resigned, citing a 1996 case in which he was charged with an "attempted lewd act upon" a 15-year-old girl, whom he later married. In a statement, Mr. Dare, 48, said he believed that "media attention to my family's personal life will harm the organization and musicians I cherish, as well as needlessly embarrass my wife."Stephen Sichak, the orchestra's co-chairman, said it knew about the charge when Mr. Dare was hired but that inquiries into the case from "friends of the symphony," not reporters, began coming in. "Concerns about the public perception of this subject matter" emerged, Mr. Sichak said. "The situation has become a distraction and is keeping us from being able to do what we do best," making music, so the board accepted Mr. Dare's resignation.The development came as a New York Times investigation into Mr. Dare's background raised questions about aspects of his résumé and business accomplishments. Former associates have suggested that he exaggerated the extent of his business dealings, and evidence to support some of his claims — like his having testified frequently before Congress — could not immediately be found.Mr. Dare declined to answer questions during a conference call with New Jersey Symphony officials but said that he would consider e-mailed queries. He did not respond to an e-mail sent late Friday afternoon, although his lawyer, Daniel N. Arshack, responded in the evening to several questions about his client's background.Mr. Dare pleaded no contest and was sentenced to 60 days in jail in the criminal case. He was placed on probation for three years and was registered as a sex offender in California, where the incident occurred, according to court documents. In his statement Mr. Dare called his actions "attempted misbehavior," said the charges were "completely dismissed, and the case was set aside." The court documents show that the case was dismissed in 1999 and his probation cut short by a year.According to reports at the time in The Press-Enterprise of Riverside, Calif., Mr. Dare had been a fifth-grade teacher at Loma Linda Academy before opening an alternative school in 1992 called Brightwater Academy. The victim — now his wife — had been a student there. Her mother came home one day to find Mr. Dare naked in the house with her daughter and called the police. Mr. Dare then lived in Grand Terrace, in San Bernardino County, east of Los Angeles.The prosecutor, Arthur Harrison, said in a telephone interview that the girl did not cooperate with police."As soon as she turned 18, he up and married her," said Mr. Harrison, now a state judge. "It was clearly a willing victim, but clearly under age as well."Mr. Dare said he had told New Jersey Symphony officials early on about his encounter with the law.Mr. Sichak, the co-chairman, confirmed that and said a "thorough background check was completed." Orchestra officials reviewed court documents. "We were satisfied with what we saw," he added. He declined to disclose Mr. Dare's salary, but the previous chief executive earned about $200,000 a year.Mr. Sichak said reference calls were also made to former business associates."We attempted to understand his capabilities, his management style, what he was good at, what areas he could improve in," Mr. Sichak said. "We did not assess nor, frankly, base our decision on business results and the accuracy thereof."Mr. Dare described his career this way in a television interview on NJTV: "I spent most of my career — the last say, 15, almost 20 years — building large companies."His major business venture was as founder of Pacific Rim Partners Inc., which acted as a go-between between Japanese and American businesses. It was founded in 2008 and ceased most operations after the March 2011 earthquake in Japan.
TAKING Bruckner to the people last month, the compact maestro arrived at a cultural center on the blue-collar outskirts of this city. The hall had the ambience of a glorified high school auditorium, with dust-dry acoustics and concrete walls. But the 400 seats were packed with families and couples and groups of retirement-age friends.That maestro, Yannick Nézet-Séguin, picked up a microphone and spoke to audience members, seamlessly switching from French to English, and reassured them about all the empty chairs onstage for the Bach suite opening the program. For Bruckner, he promised, "you will see all the chairs filled."So they did. And the standing ovation was immediate for shapely performances of Bach's Orchestral Suite No. 2 and Bruckner's Symphony No. 6.The listeners were clearly delighting in the presence of Mr. Nézet-Séguin, their native son, at the helm of the ensemble he had led for 12 years, the Orchestre Métropolitain of Montreal.The circumstances in December were a far holler from what Mr. Nézet-Séguin will experience on Thursday evening. The stage then will be Carnegie Hall and the musicians members of the storied Philadelphia Orchestra, which he took over as music director in the fall, after one of the roughest patches since its founding in 1900.Mr. Nézet-Séguin (pronounced nay-ZAY say-GHEN) has reached the top of the orchestra game. In addition to Philadelphia, he is music director of the Rotterdam Philharmonic in the Netherlands and principal guest conductor of the London Philharmonic Orchestra.Major orchestras around the world book him as a guest. Equally at home in the pit, he has a long-term relationship with the Metropolitan Opera, where he has been talked about as a credible successor to James Levine as music director.When asked about such speculation, Mr. Nézet-Séguin said he could see himself as the music director of a major opera house someday."It's too early now," he added. "I'm only 37. It's been going so wonderfully, I need to live for the moment." Mr. Nézet-Séguin is what the orchestra world is desperate for: a young, charismatic maestro who can win the respect, even affection, of grizzled orchestra veterans, the enthusiasm of audiences and the praise of critics, which has for him been pretty exalted.Partial to skinny jeans and tight V-neck sweaters, with a turtle tattoo on his right shoulder acquired while on vacation in Tahiti, Mr. Nézet-Séguin has the technical wherewithal and the musical knowledge of an established maestro. He also commands an almost supernatural amount of energy — the kind that drives him to turn score pages with a crack, the kind that keeps him ebullient even after long hours of rehearsal, picture-taking sessions, interviews and meetings with music industry operatives.He made a rousing Carnegie debut with the Philadelphians in October. The next day he was back in Philadelphia, rehearsing, offering suggestions to the composer of a work awaiting its premiere, doing detailed work on Brahms's Symphony No. 4. He was bouncing off his stool."I should be glued to that thing," he said.Mr. Nézet-Séguin sometimes seems not so much to conduct as to mold his gestures to the flow of the music. His motions are large, extending from his upper torso. Often his shoulders seem hunched, like those of a cougar waiting to pounce. At 5-foot-5 he has a powerful upper body from working out. (Mighty Mouse, the soprano Joyce DiDonato called him.)He is deft and sure in leading large forces and has a keen sense of climaxes and endings, making them seem inevitable yet often gripping. He draws an uncommon sweep and suppleness from orchestras. He also works well with singers."He's able to walk the line between accommodating the singer and keeping his vision as the conductor of the piece," said Ms. DiDonato, who sang Donna Elvira in a recent recording of Mozart's "Don Giovanni" conducted by Mr. Nézet-Séguin for Deutsche Grammophon. "He brought confidence and reassurance."It seems a dizzying rise for a former boy chorister who made his European conducting debut only in 2004 and his New York debut at Mostly Mozart in 2009.But before he came to international attention, Mr. Nézet-Séguin served a fruitful apprenticeship in Canada, conducting in places like Winnipeg, Manitoba; Kitchener, Ontario; and Victoria, British Columbia. Above all he was molded by an extraordinarily fertile classical music world in his native province, Quebec. Time spent with him, his family and his friends in Montreal, where he lives, made clear the powerful influence of his roots and his long tie with the Orchestre Métropolitain, founded in 1981 for the sake of Québécois musicians. It is with that orchestra that he "puts on his slippers," in the words of Lise Beauchamp, the orchestra's principal oboist for 20 years. "Here we are like family," she said.
A FEW hours before his debut show as a solo artist, the musician Christopher Owens was nervous — "good nervous," he clarified — and so he headed to the spot that is his regular escape: "The park," he said, "by my house."Mr. Owens knows Golden Gate Park intimately; he spends hours there nearly every day, walking the few blocks from his apartment in the Panhandle neighborhood here, with a pack of Marlboro menthols in his pocket."This is a cool little place," he said, entering the secluded AIDS Memorial Grove, financed by survivors. "It's one of the nicest little groves in the whole park," he said, giving a tour, "very manicured and small. I like the gardening."Onward he continued in a brisk stride that, he said, helps him think through his songwriting, past a lawn bowling court. (He's thinking of joining the players' league.) At a bench on Nancy Pelosi Drive, in a chilly spot near an amphitheater where concerts are held, he sat, lighted up and was ready to talk. Cults, drug use, sexual experimentation, millionaire benefactors: Mr. Owens has no shortage of rock 'n' roll subjects.He is best known as the frontman and songwriter of Girls, a lo-fi band of shifting pop harmonies that arrived on the indie scene around 2007 and, with two albums and one EP, quickly became a critical darling. Songs that married a vulnerable earnestness — "Oh, I wish I had a boyfriend," Mr. Owens sings in "Lust for Life," over playful guitar strums; "I wish I had a father, maybe then I would've turned out right" — with a louche house-party vibe earned the act a devoted fan base. But in July, Mr. Owens announced on his Twitter account that he was leaving the group, which he formed with the producer and bassist J R White, to pursue a solo career. "I need to do this in order to progress," he wrote.His debut CD as Christopher Owens, "Lysandre," a themed album charting the course of Girls' first tour and a love affair with a Frenchwoman named Lysandre, is due on Tuesday from Fat Possum Records. It is at once a departure from his previous work — the first track, "Lysandre's Theme," is 40 seconds of Renaissance-sounding melody, complete with flutes and classical guitar, that is folded into every subsequent song — and of a piece with Girls. There's romantic longing, veiled bad behavior and naked self-doubt, set to pleasingly throwback California pop-rock (with flute and saxophone). Composing the theme not long after he returned from the tour, Mr. Owens did all the instrumentation himself — whistling the flute parts in his demos — and in a feverish rush wrote nearly all the songs in one day, a year later."I want to be somebody who writes about his life, at his own pace and who can decide to make an album like this when he wants to," he said. He is 33, but dressed in an oversize cardigan and a San Francisco Giants cap, appeared far more boyish. With his tousled blond bob and occasionally androgynous style, he can also resemble a younger, (slightly) cleaner Kurt Cobain, a likeness that the designer Hedi Slimane highlighted in "rock diary" portraits of Mr. Owens. When Mr. Slimane took over as the designer for Yves Saint Laurent last year, he used Mr. Owens as the face and voice for his introductory video. Onstage in a boxy suit and white ankle socks that night at the Lodge, a medieval-looking hall near downtown, playing his guitar while seated, Mr. Owens looked less like a slick rock star than like a kid on class picture day. The sold-out performance, with his new touring band in front of an audience for the first time to play the entirety of "Lysandre," had formal programs — a theatrical touch courtesy of Mr. Owens's girlfriend, Hannah Hunt, who also sings backup. They live together, in a building that Ms. Hunt's mother owns. (She lives upstairs.) Mr. Owens has been part of the creative fabric of San Francisco for nine years, about as long as he has lived anywhere.His childhood is built for mythologizing. He was raised as a member of the Children of God cult, the 1970s sect that shunned Western medicine and education in favor of communal living and, by many accounts, abusive sexual behavior. His family shuttled around Europe and Asia. Mr. Owens had no formal schooling and little access to secular music, which left him craving American pop culture and youthful rites of passage."People talk about 'Clueless' the movie as their high school bible or something, and I just have no idea," he said. "I wish I knew. Basically, show me any American movie about the high school experience, and I become extremely jealous and sad that I didn't have that."His musical education was shaped by cult rituals, and by the tastes of members who occasionally slipped outside their world. "It was called fellowship, and we'd do it every day," he said. "We'd sing our Christian songs for that, but then some adult would show you how to play 'Stairway to Heaven' or something." Hungry for more, he recorded pop songs off the radio and studied them. "It just sounded so good. Our music was all very acoustic guitars and tambourines."The encore to his set at the Lodge — and to his next show, in New York — which earned him a standing ovation, included the first song he ever learned, Cat Stevens's "Wild World," and covers of others that he played as a teenager, like the Simon and Garfunkel anthem "The Boxer."Conflating singing with religion had a profound effect. "I of course hated all that for several years, but I know now that it gave me an ability to treat music in a different way, as a meditative thing, or an escape or to sort of take you to a different place inside," he said.
What are the hallmarks of great rapping in 2013? Lyrical imagination and complexity, sure — those are always on the list. But they're increasingly sharing space with things like texture, emotion, versatility, experimentation and confidence. Rap has always made room for innovation, eccentricity and dialect, but the range has never been wider.Arguments about what makes great rapping fail to grasp the beauty of the argument itself: there are so many options to choose from. Today's great rappers don't sound much like the ones they grew up on. Or sometimes they sound like everyone they grew up on, and then some.Meet ASAP Rocky, stylistic admixture supreme. A Harlem native with an expansive ear, he's become one of hip-hop's brightest new stars by interpreting the Internet-fueled melding of tastes and influences that's a given of modern life. And he's a peacock, doing it with flair and authority. He isn't an answer to old debates so much as a renunciation of them.So while some choices on "Long.Live.ASAP" (Polo Grounds/RCA), his major-label debut album, feel familiar, it's more as if they're reflected in a fun-house mirror. There is New York rap, and also Houston and Cleveland and Miami and Los Angeles. There is 2013, but also 1992 and 1988 and 2007.Throughout, ASAP Rocky is charismatic, full of sly wit and curiosity, a tweaker of orthodoxy while upholding it at the same time. "Yeah my mouth is full of gold and I'm a city boy/And my outfit was in Vogue, I'm a pretty boy," he raps on "Ghetto Symphony," a bonus track, and one of the album's highlights. On "1 Train," an update of the typical New York posse cut, he's compact:Down to my in-lawsThey outlaws with no lawsTypically ASAP Rocky likes how words sound more than what they say; this is an album light on narrative. But he writes tight little couplets that punch and swerve: "Pac gone but the 'Juice' back/ Get your popcorn, juice, snacks"; "Tell me what your name is/ I'ma tell it to my stainless"; "Put the chrome to your dome, make you sweat like Keith."That last line is from his breakthrough single, which has a title unprintable here — "Problems" for short — and is by far the most literal song on this album. Produced by 40 and Drake, and featuring Drake, Kendrick Lamar and 2 Chainz, it's a naked attempt to locate ASAP Rocky in the current hip-hop hierarchy. It succeeds but does him no favors because abstraction suits him best.Emphatic in his style, ASAP Rocky is an experimenter who doesn't operate at the margins. He has the attitude of a longtime hip-hop star and uses that currency to buy himself a large amount of wiggle room.Some of his most powerful songs are the cloudiest. "Hell" — produced by Clams Casino, the ambient-industrial maven who produced some of ASAP Rocky's most notable early songs — sounds like an orchestra being held hostage in an underground bunker with thinning oxygen. That's followed by "Pain," which sounds like Pharrell Williams being held hostage in an underground bunker with thinning oxygen. Even the album's first song, the title track, is dank and foreboding, the opposite of a warm embrace. But it also features some of ASAP Rocky's cockiest, sharpest rapping: "Strangers make me nervous/ Who's that peeking in my window/with a pistol to my curtains?"As loud an entrance as ASAP Rocky has made in the hip-hop world, he has made one just as impressive in the fashion world, though the overlap isn't always seamless. This album features the lamentable "Fashion Killa," a song that renders dull on record — by playing fashion Mad Libs with a couple dozen designer names — what his outfits and natural charisma render vivid in real life. He's set a fashion bar that more established artists are scrambling to reach — see the vintage Raf Simons sneakers/moon boots he wore on "Late Show With David Letterman" on Tuesday — and he's almost certainly the first rapper to insult someone by declaring, "You overaccessorize."For the most part ASAP Rocky doesn't overaccessorize. Almost everything has a place. Occasionally he's punished for not being a traditional New Yorker in terms of lyricism, which is wrong — there's a heavy Cam'ron influence on this album — and shortsighted. He's doing something that plenty of rappers from other regions have long done, and been lionized for.In a couple of spots on this album ASAP Rocky moves beyond these concerns altogether, opting for something postnarrative. On the second verse of "LVL" he raps with Big Pun dexterity, but prettier, moving effortlessly from words to onomatopoeic sounds, thickening the density of his flow the whole while until he's virtually speaking in tongues. He does the same on "Problems." That song is glossy, but he pushes against it in the latter half of his verse, which is mean, intricate and swings with attitude. He is pure flamboyance. Add that to the list.
THE singer José James' s cool and confident new album, "No Beginning No End," to be released by Blue Note next week, sounds like the result of the black-pop continuum, jazz and soul and hip-hop and R&B, slow-cooked for more than 50 years.It descends from a lot of things. First among them are the great neo-soul records of 2000, D'Angelo's "Voodoo" and Erykah Badu's "Mama's Gun." It's got the lagging relationships to the beat on the hip-hop records produced in the '90s and oughts by J Dilla; some of the ballad rumination in Stevie Wonder and Roberta Flack's records from the early and mid-'70s; the tempos of Sade, the vocal color of Gil Scott-Heron, the phrasing of Billie Holiday.Its parts don't have a clinically defined relationship, A + B + C. It's an evolved compound, and the album sounds evolved in other ways too. It definitely wants to be appreciated by adult women, with songs like "It's All Over Your Body" and "Come to My Door": the male soul singer representing sex and trust and ethics, sometimes in duets with calm, female voices — the French-Moroccan Hindi Zahra on "Sword + and Gun," the New Yorker Emily King on "Heaven on the Ground." It's likely to have a following among musicians, especially through tracks like "Vanguard," with the rhythm section of the pianist Robert Glasper, the bassist Pino Palladino and the drummer Chris Dave, who play an intricate Morse code of funk and negative space. (Mr. Palladino, one of the bassists and producers on "No Beginning No End," played on the D'Angelo and Badu records; the engineer Russell Elevado, who recorded this one, recorded those too.)Recorded in New York, Paris and London, the album is on a label famous for jazz, but this isn't jazz: no solos. It's got more live-band groove than most singer-songwriter music. It's a little too warm and inward to be considered R&B. It is not trendy music, but its stubborn nonchalance gives it a kind of originality."It doesn't feel like he's going for an older-singer kind of vibe," Mr. Glasper said. "He is jazz. He doesn't have to walk around proving it. And very naturally he's a child of hip-hop and R&B. He's just breathing."I first saw Mr. James, 34, at the Thelonious Monk Jazz Competition eight years ago. He was small and compact and still relatively young, but his voice seemed bigger, deeper and older. He sang "Every Day I Have the Blues," and he seemed to be referring to Joe Williams's sleek version from the mid-'50s. It was a centered and anxiety-free performance. His bearing implied that he didn't care whether you liked it or not. It killed the judges, including Jimmy Scott, who waved his hands in the air as if he were in church.Mr. James had come from Minneapolis, the only contestant in the competition who hadn't gone to music school. The actor Billy Dee Williams, one of the M.C.'s, told him backstage that he ought to, which irritated him. "I didn't have money to go to school," he told me a couple of weeks ago over lunch in Fort Greene, his Brooklyn neighborhood. "It wasn't a choice." He didn't win, but he did go to the New School the next year, staying on to work in the equipment room when he ran out of tuition money.Then things started to happen — a slowly unfolding series of events routing him through Europe, distant associations with hip-hop and house music, a false start on a once-great jazz label and his current rehabilitation on another one. He has been meticulous this time, financing the recording of "No Beginning No End," and presenting it to Blue Note as a fait accompli. "Nothing was touched," he said proudly.Mr. James grew up on the hip-hop and indie rock of the late '80s and early '90s: Ice Cube, Nirvana, the Pharcyde, Digable Planets. He is the son of a Panamanian jazz tenor saxophonist with the same name, though his father didn't raise him; he lived with his Irish-American mother in Duluth, Minn.; Seattle; and Minneapolis. He joined his Catholic-school choir at 14 when his voice changed, then dropped out of school and worked at odd jobs for a while. "I had really fractured teen years," he said. "It's hard to piece it all together."At 17 he moved back in with his mother and returned to school; his jobs gave him income to buy records. He did it methodically. First the basics, then a wide-angle understanding of the important labels, and then deep into single artists. (He spent $500 on Mosaic's 18-CD boxed set of the Nat King Cole Trio on Capitol Records, he said, and listened to nothing else for a month.) Around this time he wrote words to John Coltrane's solo on "Equinox," to be sung in the vocalese tradition of Eddie Jefferson and Jon Hendricks. He shared his experiments with older musicians, the saxophonist Douglas Ewart and the pianist Carie Thomas, in Minneapolis, who had connections with Chicago's avant-garde jazz scene of the 1960s; he started playing with them and forming ideas about the entire arc of jazz history.
IN a video posted on YouTube last summer the gifted violinist Jennifer Koh can be seen offering a poised, passionate account of the first movement from Paganini's Violin Concerto No. 1 with the Chicago Symphony Orchestra. The excellence of Ms. Koh's playing will surprise no one who knows the quality and integrity of her work. What is unusual is that Ms. Koh, who will play Lutoslawski's bracing "Chain 2" with the New York Philharmonic beginning Thursday, offered such a splashy showpiece in her Chicago Symphony debut.Give her a break: she was 11. The performance was filmed in 1988, when Ms. Koh, preternaturally dignified in her girlish white dress and ribbon belt, was a finalist in the orchestra's young soloists competition. She returned to win in 1992, and in 1994 she claimed a silver medal in the International Tchaikovsky Competition, sharing that accolade with another violinist, Anastasia Chebotareva, in a year when no first prize was awarded. (Clips from that performance are on YouTube too.)A possible future of further competitions, lucrative contracts and high-profile engagements beckoned. "Even at that age I knew that was not something I wanted," Ms. Koh, now 36, said during a leisurely interview recently in the airy Washington Heights apartment she shares with her husband, the pianist Benjamin Hochman."After the Tchaikovsky competition it was only Romantic war horses, and that was a route that I knew I didn't want," she said. "I also knew that I didn't want a full-throttle career right away. When I look back at it, I think it was a really scary decision to make. But at the time it just felt natural, and it felt like something I needed to do."Ms. Koh has not disowned her precocious past; after all, she posted that Paganini video. But in bypassing the prodigy's steep, slippery ascent in favor of a bookish life as an English literature major at Oberlin College, Ms. Koh took her first step on a quieter path, one in which renown came gradually, accrued through potent performances and unusually thoughtful recitals and recordings.In what could seem like a bifurcated career Ms. Koh emerged as a lucid advocate for contemporary works by composers like Kaija Saariaho, Esa-Pekka Salonen and John Zorn in New York, Los Angeles and Chicago, while offering penetrating accounts of canonical concertos elsewhere.Bach has become a fixture lately, in epic concerts of the unaccompanied sonatas and partitas, and in Bach and Beyond, a recital series in which Ms. Koh surrounds those works with other solo pieces and new commissions. Last year she took on the instrumental title role in Philip Glass and Robert Wilson's opera "Einstein on the Beach" in performances including a celebrated run at the Brooklyn Academy of Music.This week Ms. Koh's long road brings her back to the Philharmonic, with which she previously played in parks concerts and at the Bravo! Vail Valley Music Festival in Colorado. With Lorin Maazel, the orchestra's former music director, she will make her subscription-series debut in "Chain 2," a striking late work that bridges Lutoslawski's chance-infused style with more direct modes of bravura.The engagement is a token recognition of the Lutoslawski centenary this year. But for Ms. Koh the assignment is rife with personal bonds: to Mr. Salonen and Ms. Saariaho, who had their own connections to Lutoslawski; and to Mr. Maazel, at whose Castleton Festival in Virginia Ms. Koh has become a familiar face.Such links have been paramount in Ms. Koh's journey, which began as the only child of Korean parents in Glen Ellyn, Ill. Her mother, now a professor, fled North Korea with her family during the Korean War. "They wanted me to have everything that they didn't have," Ms. Koh said. "So they started me in everything: ballet, swimming, diving, gymnastics, rhythmic gymnastics, ice-skating."Avid subscribers to the Chicago Symphony and the Lyric Opera of Chicago, Ms. Koh's parents urged her to take up an instrument at a Suzuki-method school in Wheaton, Ill. Her teacher, Jo Davis, with whom she is still in touch, recognized her precocious talent and helped her find new teachers when her early training had run its course.Prodigious activities beckoned. Playing with the Detroit Symphony Orchestra at 14, Ms. Koh was noticed by Isaac Stern, who insisted that she study with Jaime Laredo at the Curtis Institute of Music in Philadelphia. Ms. Koh complied, but only after she had graduated from Oberlin and worked with Felix Galimir at the Marlboro Music School and Festival in Vermont. Galimir's personal recollections of Ravel, Schoenberg and Webern helped to inspire Ms. Koh's passion for collaborating with living composers."By the time she came to Curtis, she was pretty mature," Mr. Laredo said in a telephone interview from Miami. "She had her own voice. She had her own personality. She definitely had something to say that was very special." The challenge, he added, was in guiding Ms. Koh without stifling her creative freedom."There were times when she would do things that I would totally disagree with, completely," he said. "But I just thought: 'That's her. Let her do it her way.' "Now Ms. Koh is demonstrating her gratitude to Mr. Laredo in another new project: Two x Four, in which the two play double concertos by Bach and Mr. Glass, and commissioned pieces by Anna Clyne and David Ludwig. Ms. Koh handled the legwork for the initiative, arranging concert presenters and securing financing. When she and Mr. Laredo played Bach's Concerto for Two Violins and Ms. Clyne's ravishing "Prince of Clouds" with the Chicago Symphony in December, the union of their disparate sounds enhanced the emotional potency of the performances.Both of Ms. Koh's current projects are due soon in the New York performance spaces with which she is most closely linked. She will play the second installment of Bach and Beyond on March 2 and 3 at the 92nd Street Y, then present Two x Four with the Curtis Chamber Orchestra on March 13 at the Miller Theater.Fresh connections loom, including a new concerto by Andrew Norman for the 2014-15 season and a Beethoven-centered project just starting to percolate. But opportunities continue to arise through the personal bonds Ms. Koh has formed. A second project with Ms. Clyne is on the drawing board, and with a run of "Einstein on the Beach" coming up in October at the Los Angeles Opera, Ms. Koh and Mr. Wilson will collaborate in a staged version of Bach's sonatas and partitas in Paris next fall.It is to such relationships that Ms. Koh attributes her success."Even by the time I got to Curtis, after the Tchaikovsky competition and all of that, I still didn't know that I could make a career in music," she said. "I just feel lucky enough to have met so many people — like Jaime and like Felix, and even my first violin teacher back in Wheaton, Ill. — that really helped me along the way. I know that I would not be in this place if it weren't for so many people. At least for me it takes a village."
THE first thing John Patrick Shanley will tell you about the opera "Doubt" is that he did it out of guilt. He agreed to a meeting with the composer Douglas J. Cuomo intending to say no, he did not want to rewrite his Pulitzer Prize-winning play turned Oscar-nominated movie as an opera libretto. But then he forgot all about it and stood Mr. Cuomo up, not even checking his cellphone to see the politely insistent reminders.Over lunch recently in a restaurant near his home in Williamsburg, Brooklyn, Mr. Shanley recounted how he set up a second meeting. This time "I knew I was doomed," he said with a sly smile. "I knew I was going to have to say yes."Mr. Shanley is a playwright keenly attuned to human emotions magnified through the lens of Irish-Catholic morality, but he also likes to tell a good story. Whether this one is true is a matter of debate. Mr. Cuomo confirms the failed first meeting but has his, well, doubts as to its impact on Mr. Shanley's conscience and subsequent decision to collaborate on an opera.What is certain is that the resulting work will have its premiere at the Minnesota Opera this week, directed by Kevin Newbury and conducted by Christopher Franklin. The dramatic soprano Christine Brewer steps into the no-nonsense shoes of Sister Aloysius, the starchy principal of a Roman Catholic school in the Bronx whose suspicions regarding a priest's relationship with the school's first black student drive the action in this taut psychological whodunit set in 1964.In 2004, listing it among that year's best plays, Ben Brantley described it in The New York Times as "an inspired study in moral uncertainty with the compellingly certain structure of an old-fashioned detective drama." As such, it provides a rare subject for an opera at a time when an increasing number of new works are character portraits of individual women. Even rarer is that it is, at least in part, autobiographical, based on Mr. Shanley's rough childhood in the Bronx and the mixture of hierarchical rigidity and human kindness he encountered at his Catholic school. Most likely it was the opportunity to mine this material for new emotional layers that attracted Mr. Shanley to the idea of an opera."There's a lot of feelings that could not be expressed in the play because of its austerity," Mr. Shanley said, "But opera, even when it is austere, is as rich as chocolate cake. So that allowed me to go back and express a lot of things that I could not before and still tell the story."The play has only four characters: Sister Aloysius; the young idealistic Sister James; Father Flynn, the forward-looking priest suspected of transgressing boundaries with an altar boy; and the boy's mother. "It really is the thing itself," Mr. Newbury said. "It isn't just about doubt, it's doubt brought to life onstage. And it's a particularly American play with all the questions about class and race and religion rolled up into one."Yet even in the play the wider communities of the student body, the congregation and the Irish-Italian working-class neighborhood are always implied. When Mr. Shanley was invited to write and direct a film based on "Doubt" in 2008, with an all-star cast featuring Meryl Streep, Philip Seymour Hoffman, Amy Adams and Viola Davis, he "opened it up," in his words. He added scenes featuring the congregation and the children. Donald, the 12-year-old suspected victim, becomes a fully rounded, though ultimately enigmatic, character.The opera builds on the movie, using some of the material Mr. Shanley wrote for the screenplay. Since that material is owned under copyright law by Miramax, he said he had to contact the production company for permission to "lift certain things" from the film, "because, frankly, film companies don't return opera companies' phone calls."In addition to the four principal roles, the opera features a chorus and a children's chorus. In the pit Mr. Cuomo assembles a chamber orchestra supplemented by piano, saxophone and percussion. The period setting is defined by costumes reminiscent of the television series "Mad Men," but aside from a scene showing the children shuffling through a bossa nova dance class in school, the opera's music does not make a reference to a specific period, Mr. Cuomo said.Mr. Newbury, who regularly directs operas with a focus on new works, called Mr. Cuomo "an essentially American composer.""There are jazz rhythms, there's a saxophone, the strings are lush and gorgeous, but there's also an edge," he said. "One thing that surprised me was how much the orchestration brought it to life as a film noir, a Hitchcock mystery."In the opera members of the parish are for the first time given voices, as the chorus reacts to Father Flynn's opening sermon.
With its stately brownstones and trendy cafes, the Park Slope neighborhood in Brooklyn might seem an unlikely place to produce a Southern country-rock trio. But the members of the Lone Bellow are all transplants there from small Southern towns, and though they have made a life in Brooklyn, their stomping, acoustic sound seems rooted in the places they grew up, drawing on that region's country, soul, gospel and folk."I call it country-soul," said Kanene Pipkin, one of the members.That is a marketable mix these days, as Americana bands like Mumford & Sons and the Lumineers have had solid hits on the rock charts, racking up multiple Grammy nominations. Record producers are looking for the next band that can tap that audience, and executives at Descendant Records, a boutique division of Sony Music Entertainment, are placing their bets on the Lone Bellow."From a marketing point of view, that's the people we are targeting, people who are into great Americana with a rock edge to it," Jay Harren, a Descendant vice president, said. "It's a great time for this type of music right now."The band has recently attracted attention from NPR, which showcased its new, self-titled debut album on the influential "First Listen" Web page, and it has been highlighted as a band to watch in 2013 by Entertainment Weekly, Billboard and Paste magazine. WFUV, the Fordham University radio station that often breaks alternative bands in New York, has broadcast the Lone Bellow's live performances and has given its single "You Never Need Nobody" heavy airplay. On Tuesday the trio will release its debut in stores; last week the album was offered on iTunes, where one track was featured as single of the week.The heart of the Lone Bellow's appeal is its close harmonies: three singers whose timbres meld seamlessly even at full volume. Yet there is little about their music that recalls the Nashville pop-country trios in vogue like Lady Antebellum and the Band Perry. Theirs is more rough-edged, closer to the pounding, anthemic folk-rock that Mumford & Sons has popularized."On the surface they seem like a country or bluegrass band, but they understand the dynamics of rock," said Rita Houston, WFUV's music director. "This can translate into a big rock sound."The Lone Bellow is one of several Americana groups the club owner Ken Rockwood has nurtured at the Rockwood Music Hall on the Lower East Side. The band recorded its album in the club, persuading Charlie Peacock, the Nashville producer who produced the Civil Wars' gold album, "Barton Hollow," to work the soundboard."We had high hopes of trying to capture the moments that we had felt happen in this room over and over again," the frontman, Zach Williams, said after performing for a private party at Rockwood this month. "Our music is connected to the wood on this stage."Mr. Williams is a 31-year-old singer-songwriter from Acworth, Ga., who has been knocking around the New York folk circuit since 2006. But he attracted little label interest before he started the trio in the fall of 2010, recruiting his longtime friends Ms. Pipkin, a singer and mandolin player, and Brian Elmquist, a rockabilly singer and guitarist."He called me and said, 'Let's start a honky-tonk project,' " Mr. Elmquist recalled, laughing. "He didn't know what honky-tonk meant at all."The two are part of a tight-knit circle of friends who followed Mr. Williams to New York to pursue music careers. Mr. Elmquist had known Mr. Williams since they were college students together in Lynchburg, Va. Ms. Pipkin is the sister of another college friend of Mr. Williams's. Like most struggling musicians, they have day jobs: Ms. Pipkin is a pastry chef, Mr. Elmquist a waiter and Mr. Williams the music director for a small church.Mr. Williams said that songwriting had been a way to process the pain and bewilderment in his life. He started writing songs as a newlywed in 2005 in a hospital room after his wife, Stacy, broke her neck in a horseback-riding accident and was temporarily paralyzed. Singing helped him cope, and when, against the odds, she recovered, he kept writing. "These songs were written out of necessity," he said.
"THERE WAS THIS FEELING that 'You can't put a diva in a trunk,' " the director Michael Mayer is saying, eyes alight with triumph, during a break from rehearsals for his bold new production of "Rigoletto," which opens on Monday evening at the Metropolitan Opera .His excitement derived from the restoration of a wished-for element in the staging of the third act that had been abandoned as too difficult, or at least insufficiently respectful of the gentle handling that is a diva's due. Contrary to expectations Diana Damrau, who sings the ingénue Gilda, had expressed her willingness to climb into the open trunk of a fantail Cadillac onstage. Or rather be dragged into it, because at this point in the opera (spoiler alert) Gilda is dead, or at least dead in the way that female characters in operas are dead until they muster a few last, long breaths to pour forth some heart-wrenching music.Opera fans will by now have surmised that Mr. Mayer, a theater director best known for the Broadway rock musicals "Spring Awakening" and "American Idiot," has firmly departed from tradition in his presentation of Verdi's story of love, corruption and retribution. Gleaming gas guzzlers did not zoom through the streets of Mantua in the 16th century. Mr. Mayer's new production is set in Las Vegas in the 1960s, when the Rat Pack ruled the city, giving it a reputation for licentiousness and lawlessness that, Mr. Mayer persuasively asserts, tracks closely with the depiction of life at an Italian court in the opera."The power, the sex, the money, the raucous pranks, luck and fortune and superstition in the air," Mr. Mayer says. "I started to think about Las Vegas during the Rat Pack years. That world was very much about using women, in pretty corrosive ways, and discarding them when they were done. It all seemed to fit."In Mr. Mayer's conception the Duke becomes a Frank Sinatra-like performer, his palace a gaudy casino. Rigoletto, the humpbacked jester usually capering about in motley and a bell-trimmed hat, is modeled on aggressive comics like Don Rickles, who entertained Sinatra and his minions but sometimes took biting aim at them too in their routines, just as Rigoletto both fawns on the Duke's courtiers and bitterly reviles them.Peter Gelb, the general manager of the Met, has sometimes rankled traditionalists in his quest to revitalize opera at one of its most revered temples by encouraging directors to pursue new visions for works from the canon. There have been hits — Bartlett Sher's "Barbiere di Siviglia" and Richard Eyre's "Carmen," to name two — and there have been flops, perhaps most spectacularly Robert Lepage's "Ring" cycle, which made its debut last season to resoundingly negative reviews.The raspberries for Mr. Lepage's "Ring," which replaced a traditional Otto Schenk production, perhaps ratcheted up the stakes for Mr. Mayer's "Rigoletto," which is also replacing a traditional (if far less cherished) Schenk version. All productions at the Metropolitan Opera are big — the bowling-alley-size stage, the million-dollar budgets — but some productions loom larger than others, and Mr. Mayer's "Rigoletto" is one of them.And so, on the first day of rehearsals with his cast onstage, Mr. Mayer isn't just trying to put on a show; he is also starring in one. A miniature microphone is clipped to the lapel of his sleek black jacket to capture his every aside as he moves his performers around Christine Jones's striking set for the opera's third act, here taking place in a seedy club on the outskirts of Vegas, complete with a stripper pole."60 Minutes" is filming a long-planned segment on the Met, with the new production of "Rigoletto" providing a through line. As he watches the rehearsal the gentlemanly CBS correspondent Bob Simon takes time to coo over Ms. Damrau's 3-month-old baby, parked in a stroller in one of the aisles, attended by a nanny. When Mr. Mayer sprints down the aisles onto the stage to tweak a bit of business, he is trailed not just by a couple of staff directors with notebooks but often by a cameraman or two. A Japanese film crew has also been tailing him for its own documentary.This Rat Pack "Rigoletto" is being marketed more as a Broadway show than as a standard new production. Print advertisements avoid the Met's standard typefaces, and television ads, with the title in blue neon and a tag line drawn from poker lingo ("Are you in?"), are running on popular cable shows, like Bravo's "Top Chef."
Men have been having a tough time in Nashville for nearly a decade now, since Gretchen Wilson staked out "Redneck Woman" territory and took back women's claim on the genre's grit. For the last few years especially the masculinity crisis has been flaring up, leading to a spate of singers reduced to lightly felt songs thin on muscle.But it is not unmanly to feel deeply, which is often lost on the genre's simps and dullards, of which there have been many lately. They confuse the perceived need to display tenderness — whether for presumed radio play or presumed appeal to the opposite sex — with softening their edges. (Their voices are already soft. Not much you can do about that.)Even country's slight outliers have fallen victim to that fallacy, as seen in two singers with new albums and singles in the Top 10 on the Billboard country songs chart: Gary Allan and Randy Houser, neither of whom deserve this fate. Mr. Allan has just released his ninth studio album, "Set You Free" (MCA Nashville), and Mr. Houser his third, "How Country Feels" (Stoney Creek), both of which show how smooth exteriors can put complex interiors at risk.Mr. Allan has one of the great country voices of the last decade, a withered wail that moves up and down, side to side, with real flexibility that never sacrifices the heavy, pained tone at the center. Mr. Allan comes from California, not the South, and isn't given to romanticizing rural life in his music, a crutch others substitute for thoughtfulness.The first half of "Set You Free," especially, is vintage Allan, which is to say pretty deeply scarred. Two songs in a row specifically refer to an inner void deep within that needs filling. One of them, "It Ain't the Whiskey," is the best song here, capturing the intractability of deep suffering that Mr. Allan is so skilled at conveying. It takes place at a 12-step meeting, or something like it, with Mr. Allan undermining the very reason for his attendance:With last night on my breathI stood up and saidSo what do you got for this empty hole inside of me?'As usual his voice is raspy and drawn and resigned; he's a tough guy laying his insides bare. Same goes for "You Without Me," a devastating song about coming to terms with an ex who's moved on (a companion piece to one of his great old songs, "See if I Care"), and also "Bones," which adds anger to the mix. "Well, I been out here digging a hole," he sings, just as a harmonica crashes loudly into the mix, and then conspiratorially adds, "I'm gonna push you in nice and slow.""Tough Goodbye," which opens the album, continues the Allan tradition of confessing to being broken down and using that truth as a source of strength. After a difficult ending to an imbalanced relationship he confesses:I'm not quite ready yetTo settle down or even letSomeone get a hold of me'Cause I'm not done being freeIt's telling that the single from this album, though, is one of its brighter, more optimistic songs: "Every Storm (Runs Out of Rain)." It's one of the rare places where Mr. Allan sounds soothing and calm, and in the context of his catalog it feels like something of a lie, though not as much as some of the lighter fare that populates the second half of this album: the dull chilling-on-the-beach celebration "No Worries," the ersatz Chris Isaak lounge groove "Drop" and the album closer, "Good as New," about being restored, and perhaps in search of an "Extreme Makeover: Home Edition" episode to provide a soundtrack for.Cleaning up Mr. Allan may make him more broadly palatable, but his scars are what set him apart; hiding them is a crime. Mr. Houser's public grooming comes in different form, at least in part literally. A few years ago he was a shaggy-haired country singer without an iota of polish. But after a short major-label dalliance, he's now been streamlined, both in hair and in sound."How Country Feels" is a play for the center, which is fine to aim for when coming from the outside. And while it may be a platitudinous album, it's a competent one. Mr. Houser, who comes from small-town Mississippi, has enough ballast to steady this album even as he's sometimes undone by callow songwriting. The title track, which is the lead single, is textbook pro-rural, anti-city pablum. There's a song about killing time called "Absolutely Nothing" that feels as if it were written on a dare.But Mr. Houser has more than this inside him, darker corners to take shelter in. "The Singer" is one of the sharpest songs he's recorded. It's about the impossibility of loving someone who's famous and, by extension, the impossibility of being loved in return. "She loved the singer/She just couldn't live the song," he sings, and it stings.At the end of the album is "Route 3 Box 250 D," in which Mr. Houser sings about a rough childhood bruised by abuse: "Hollywood don't make no movies/ About a house up on wheels/ Down in dirt-road Mississippi." His voice here is almost wholly different, thicker and more throbbing, a caldron bubbling over. For a few minutes he's the singer Nashville won't let him be.
Years ago Atlanta took control of hip-hop's center, both geographically and sonically. But as the hub of the genre, it's been a steadily moving target, far more volatile than New York or Los Angeles ever were in their heyday. Trap music, snap music, strip club anthems: Atlanta can be almost anything it sets its mind to.Sometimes the city surprises itself. Certainly that's been the case with the rise of the rapper-singer Future, who two years ago was making street-oriented strip club anthems and has now become an auteur of digital voice processing, turning his breathy bark into something that melts, spreading out over beats, filling in all the crevices. He's something beyond mere rapping or even singing — he's an original. Call it the New Weird Atlanta.On his new mixtape, "Future Presents F.B.G. the Movie," Future — along with the members of his FreeBandz crew — put that style on full display. It's the fullest exposition of his sound, even more so than last year's excellent but transitional "Pluto."Here it's not what he says, but how. On "Ceelo" his voice is dragged out into taffylike stretches, and on "Karate Chop" he spits in terse phrases, just one or two syllables at a time.The digital effects are as mesmerizing as ever, making Future sound as if he were in agony and celebrating all at once. "Finessin" is exuberant, and "Chosen One" is melancholy, and the songs sound as if they came from the same miasma. It's an accomplishment.His virus is spreading. Future was part of the most emotionally affecting song ("Loveeeeeee Song") on Rihanna's most recent album, and he's a highlight on the new Juelz Santana mixtape. Superficially, his viral spread into the more conventional corners of R&B and hip-hop isn't dissimilar to the one executed by T-Pain in the 2007-8 era. But T-Pain was more of a literalist, and more directly indebted to the talkbox tradition of the funk innovator Roger Troutman. Future is far stranger, less emotionally reliable and more sonically novel.He's also building a team that's imbibing at least some of his lessons, as seen on "Street Lottery," the recent mixtape by the FreeBandz member Young Scooter. Topically, Young Scooter is more straightforward than the boss, but their collaborations here, like "Jugg Season" and "Julio," are strong, and elsewhere, Young Scooter takes Future's left-field approach and sandpapers off the rough edges, keeping the odd melodies and losing the digital afterburn.Future's style is also simpatico with the last couple of mixtapes by Young Thug, which take the same outlier ideas far past musicality into far spookier territory. And certainly others in Atlanta will pick up on Future's ideas soon.But there is a different strain of eccentricity threatening to shout that evolution down, as seen in Trinidad James, the city's fastest-rising star, who may or may not have enough helium to stay afloat beyond his born-of-the-Internet hit "All Gold Everything." In the video, one of the most striking of last year, Mr. James dresses flamboyantly, in flowy leopard-print shirt and velvet slippers, and marches around with some mean-looking friends.Mr. James is part of a different new Atlanta, although one that seems weird only from a distance. He performed at S.O.B.'s on Wednesday in the latest in a spate of New York shows that have followed the speedy crossover success of "All Gold Everything," which has become a hit on radio with uncommon speed, probably thanks to Mr. James's coining of hip-hop's late-2012 catchphrase: "Popped a molly, I'm sweatin'/Woooo!" (Molly is a version of Ecstasy known for its purity.)"All Gold Everything" appeared on Mr. James's debut mixtape, "Don't Be S.A.F.E.," which was released last July. Mr. James has a couple of ideas, but maybe only a couple. As a rapper, he's serviceable and deliberate, which means he's tentative. No recent hip-hop hit is as slow as "All Gold Everything," which, depending on how you look at it, is either a savvy aesthetic choice or the only one he has.Mr. James leans heavily on his catchphrases, but he's in on the joke, or at least wants to seem that he is. On Wednesday the rapper Problem released a song called "My Last Molly Song Ever, I Promise," which featured a verse from Mr. James.But mostly he's a walking anime character, an eccentric in presentation far more than in sound. The more telling video than "All Gold Everything" is the one for "Gold on My MacBook," in which a gentle-looking Mr. James regards himself in the mirror before slowly putting on all the accouterments of his new look — chunky gold rings and bracelets, gold fronts on his teeth, loud red sunglasses — as if he were dressing up as Big Gipp for Halloween.Which is to say, there is a human being underneath all those fireworks. To his credit, at S.O.B.'s even Mr. James appeared a little fatigued by himself in a slow-motion set that couldn't possibly match the rapid rise of "All Gold Everything" as a meme.Now that song's just a regular rap hit and soon it'll be a crutch: Mr. James repeatedly returned to the song's refrain throughout the half-hour set and performed the song in full twice to close the night. But he had more enthusiasm for his not-yet-hits with equally sticky catchphrases: "Females Welcomed" and "One More Molly."The next day he was back in Atlanta, filming the video for the "All Gold Everything" remix with a slew of Atlanta all-stars of various generations: T.I., Young Jeezy, 2 Chainz. It was Atlanta as it has been, not as it will be.
"All the Southerners think we're Yanks, and all the Yanks think we're Southerners, and all the Midwesterners think we're east," he said. "Everybody's always wrong about Louisville. That's kind of why I love it so much."Mr. James, 34, the frontman and songwriter for the rock band My Morning Jacket, and a frequent collaborator with other indie artists, defies expectations himself: an arena rocker who got there without radio play, a rootsy Bonnaroo festival mainstay who is comfortable shredding. His debut solo album of original material, "Regions of Light and Sound of God," out Tuesday from ATO Records, takes inspiration from "Gods' Man," a 1929 graphic novel (one of the earliest published in the United States, it used woodcuts) that he hopes to adapt into a film. "We're moving down the pipeline, we got a screenplay, and we're looking for a studio," he said. "The novel, when I saw it, it was a real, real strong déjà vu. I got obsessed with it and started writing music to it."When he's in his home studio he avoids other artists' music. "When people are recording and they're like, 'I want to get the drum sound of the Beatles,' I hate that." But otherwise he's into things on repeat. Lately that has meant vintage gospel. "The gospel funk soul era, that's what I'm obsessed with — pretty much all the '70s through early '80s," he said. "For me it's more powerful to hear people sing about God than love in most circumstances, because I've been hearing people sing about love for most of my life. I don't really believe in a God, like a white man with a beard in the sky. But most of the music that I enjoy, they do it with such passion, I know it doesn't really matter what they're calling God, because we're talking about the same thing."He spoke by phone with Melena Ryzik recently about ruthless tunes, transcendence, meditation and getting fired. These are excerpts from the conversation.Q. Have you worked on movies before?A. My relationship with Hollywood has been incredibly frustrating. I've gotten lots of offers to do things, and I've scored a couple films, but I've been fired from everything I've tried to do, for being too weird. One was for "The Beaver." Brian Reitzell — he's done Sofia Coppola's films, and he did "Friday Night Lights" — we got paired up because [the "Beaver" director] Jodie Foster for some reason wanted me to do it, and she wanted Brian. We were making "The Beaver" super [strange]. I think it was one of those cases where they wanted to edit the film into something more obvious, where they needed music to make the viewer feel sad or make the viewer feel happy. That film we got fired from. Then we regrouped to do this film called "Goats," and it was the exact same story.I'm waiting every day to get the call [for "Gods' Man"], once we find the studio: "Well, Jim, we like your music, but we've decided it just doesn't fit. We've decided to go with a more Mumford & Sons kind of sound. That's what's popular now."Meanwhile you're listening to music that's about doubt and spirituality, like Lula Collins's "Help Me."It's so ruthless, it almost reminds me of N.W.A. The rhythm of it, it's almost like "Straight Out of Compton." But it's positive, just the way the groove is, her voice. I love N.W.A. It's real. This is a different version of that. You get the positive mentality of "Please, Lord, help me," instead of taking that feeling out in violence. I feel like more people need to hear that because you can take everything out in a positive way. I'm tired of really violent music.Is there anything that you just jam out to?"Under the Hammer." Gil Scott-Heron is one of my biggest heroes and inspirations. He taught me a new way to be ruthless. The way the song is produced, I've never heard anything like it. It's a really crazy combo of funk and rock, but it sounds like it's out of a freezer or something. The guitar sounds like it's covered in ice cubes.He's influenced nearly everyone, like Roy Ayers, the jazz composer and vibraphonist, also one of the most sampled musicians. Have you sampled him?No, but I got into Roy Ayers because of that. This song "Searching," I feel like I'm always searching. That's my role in life. This song is constantly a soundtrack. It's super emotional, but it has a beautiful motion to it. It makes you want to move, instead of lying in your room and crying.Do you look to music for those moments of transcendence?I want my music to feel like it's useful. I'm not an unhappy person, because I have a lot of fun, but I'm definitely not a peaceful person, and I feel like that's what I'm looking for. Or music that's bizarre that I don't understand, like that Floating Action song ["Alpine Shadow"]. I don't know what he's singing about. When I hear the song, I feel like I see snow. I'm sitting in the Alps with, like, two snow leopards, and I'm resistant to the cold. He sings, "the calm and peace you bring me." I feel like it's one of the most beautiful lines I've ever heard. I feel like these bands are singing about things that people need to hear. They're singing about things that people need, like calm and peace.You own this CD set "The Inner Art of Meditation," by Jack Kornfield. Do you get the same thing from meditation and music?For me it's about how do I get lost, in a good way, over and over again. Meditation is about that. It's about disappearing into that space where you're alive but you're alive like a tree's alive or a butterfly's alive. It's the same way when you're playing music or writing. A lot of people think it sounds hippie-dippy, but you're deeply lost in playing a song, you're thinking about a song. You're not thinking about your job or your taxes. For me I feel like that is God, it is the essence of everything. If everyone took the time to reach that place, it would really change the world.
THE STANDARD LINE on Wayne Shorter is that he's the greatest living composer in jazz, and one of its greatest saxophonists. He would like you to forget all of that. Not the music, or his relationship to it, but rather the whole notion of pre-eminence, with its granite countenance and fixed coordinates. "We have to beware the trapdoors of the self," he said recently."You think you're the only one that has a mission," he went on, "and your mission is so unique, and you expound this missionary process over and over again with something you call a vocabulary, which in itself becomes old and decrepit." He laughed sharply.Mr. Shorter will turn 80 this year. Decrepitude hasn't had a chance to catch up to him. Last week he appeared at Carnegie Hall as a featured guest with the Orpheus Chamber Orchestra, which played several of his compositions. On Tuesday "Without a Net," easily the year's most anticipated jazz album, will become his first release on Blue Note in more than four decades. And next Saturday he'll be at the Walt Disney Concert Hall with the Los Angeles Philharmonic for the premiere of "Gaia," which he wrote as a showcase for the bassist and singer Esperanza Spalding.He hasn't accrued this late-inning momentum alone. The vehicle for most of Mr. Shorter's recent activity, including the orchestral work, is his superlative quartet with Danilo Pérez on piano, John Patitucci on bass and Brian Blade on drums. A band of spellbinding intuition, with an absolute commitment to the spirit of discovery, it has had an incalculable influence on the practice of jazz in the 21st century — and not necessarily for the same reasons that established Mr. Shorter's legend in the 20th.Since the emergence of the quartet, which released its first album on Verve in 2002, jazz's aesthetic center has moved perceptibly: away from the hotshot soloist and toward a more collectivist, band-driven ideal. There has also been an unusual amount of dialogue between jazz's tradition-minded base camp and its expeditionary outposts, where conventions exist to be challenged.Mr. Shorter's working band is far from the only one to embody these principles during the past decade, but it has been the most acclaimed and widely heard. Traces of its style can be detected in other groups, including those led by the saxophonist Chris Potter and the trumpeter Ambrose Akinmusire. Its slippery methodology has also taken root in the conservatory, and not just at the Berklee College of Music, where Mr. Pérez is on the faculty, or at the Thelonious Monk Institute of Jazz, where Mr. Shorter is a resident guru."The students are very familiar with that quartet," said Doug Weiss, who teaches a popular Wayne Shorter ensemble class at the New School for Jazz and Contemporary Music. "They come in having heard the way that band plays together, and a lot of them have no idea what's going on, and that's why they're there."So in addition to Mr. Shorter's body of work — his terse and insinuative compositions, which have been closely studied by jazz musicians for decades — this newer generation has also had the opportunity to grapple with his elusive philosophy of play.Once, in an interview, Mr. Shorter was asked to account for his pursuit of music above other art forms. He replied that music has an inherent sense of velocity and mystery. It would be hard to find a more concise distillation of his priorities as a bandleader."When we go out onstage we always start from nothing," said Mr. Patitucci by phone from Mr. Pérez's native Panama, where the quartet headlined a jazz festival last month. "So anybody can spin the wheels in a certain direction, and then we develop those themes."What follows isn't free jazz, exactly, though it uses some of the same tools. "It's spontaneous composition," Mr. Patitucci said, "with counterpoint and harmony and lyricism. All of those values are still there. It's just being pressurized into milliseconds."
NO one dominates the field of contenders for the Grammy Awards this year as Adele did a year ago. And so far there has been little drama leading up to Sunday night's ceremony that can rival the sudden death of Whitney Houston last year or Adele's much-talked-about return from vocal surgery.So does this year's show run the risk of being a snooze? Fear not, music fans, there are plenty of minidramas to watch for that could make the evening's proceedings, to be broadcast on CBS at 8 p.m. Eastern time from the Staples Center in Los Angeles, interesting.For starters the pop-rock trio Fun. is the first act since Amy Winehouse in 2007 to have a shot at sweeping all four of the prestigious general awards. This Brooklyn group, whose "Some Nights" album spun off the smash hit "We Are Young," is nominated for record, album and song of the year, as well as best new artist. The only artist in the 55-year history of the awards to win all four awards was Christopher Cross in 1980. (The feat seemed to be a kiss of death for Mr. Cross, whose career has sputtered since.)Can Fun. do it? "It seems like a long shot," said Nate Ruess, the band's frontman. The group faces stiff competition for record of the year (which is for a single) from Gotye's "Somebody That I Used to Know," the best-selling single of the year. In the contest for song of the year, an award for songwriters, Fun.'s "We Are Young" must outpoll the British newcomer Ed Sheeran, whose song about a drug-addicted prostitute, "The A Team," was a sleeper hit, and Carly Rae Jepsen's ubiquitous summer anthem "Call Me Maybe."Still, Fun. has a fighting chance to take the coveted album of the year award. That contest seems dominated by rock of various flavors — poppy, bluesy, folksy — and is notable more for what is not there than what is. There are no female artists, no pop divas, no rappers, no country crooners.Instead the category has groups heard frequently on alternative rock stations: Mumford & Sons, the Black Keys and Jack White. Mumford & Sons have yet to win a Grammy, even though their stomping folk style has spearheaded a revival of folk-rock. The Black Keys and Jack White both produced howling blues-rock records that typically do well with Grammy voters.The last contender is Frank Ocean, the R&B singer whose debut solo album, "Channel Orange," was on many critics' Top 10 lists for the year. Mr. Ocean gained importance as a public figure when he broke an unspoken code in the R&B world and announced before the album was released that his first love had been a man."Frank Ocean has become a really strong dark-horse pick," said Bill Werde, editorial director of Billboard. "He's a fashionable artist in the music business these days, because he has that great mix of critical respect and commercial appeal."Also nominated in the album and song of the year categories, Mr. Ocean will probably be Fun.'s closest rival in the best new artist category as well. Two of the other hopefuls for that prize are darlings of the alt-rock world: the folksy Lumineers and the R&B-inflected Alabama Shakes. Hunter Hayes, a country wunderkind, rounds out the list. "It's beyond flattering," Mr. Ruess said. "Win or lose it's just great and cool to be nominated with that group."Another closely watched artist will be Nas, the veteran New York rapper, who has never won a Grammy, despite nine previous nominations and six No. 1 albums that each sold more than a million copies, starting with the classic "Illmatic" back in 1994. This could be the year the National Academy of Recording Arts and Sciences, which bestows the Grammys, finally recognizes his contributions. He is nominated in every rap category — song, album, rap-sung collaboration (with Amy Winehouse) and performance — for his album "Life Is Good," which explored middle-age themes like fatherhood and divorce.
My sights are set on a swingin' girl, So hop on, baby, let's take that whirl!Yes, it sounds more like Dean Martin. But that couplet comes from Verdi, at least at the Metropolitan Opera these days. The lines are among the seat-back titles for the Met's current run of "Rigoletto," which has its next performance on Friday night.The director, Michael Mayer, has set the production in 1960 Las Vegas, transferring the thuggish morality of the court of 16th-century Mantua to the neon-lighted, satin-jacket world of Dino, Sammy and Frank.Setting operas from past centuries in recent times is a staple of opera direction today, especially in Europe, and it sparks feuds between traditionalists and updaters as regularly as the sun rises. But the Met production has a particularly unusual aspect: titles that go beyond the libretto, written by Francesco Maria Piave, to a degree rarely seen at the house.The liberties push the envelope on how an opera that had its premiere in 1851 Venice can be produced in 2013 New York. An examination of the titles also illuminates the delicate but obscure art of telegraphing an opera's libretto in brief flashes of two 38-character lines (an early form of tweeting, perhaps) without distracting the viewer from what is on the stage or straying too far from the meaning of the text.Take the quote above about swingin' girls, in which the Duke discusses his philosophy of seduction in the aria "Questa o quella." The Italian literally reads, "I would defy even the hundred eyes of Argus if a beautiful woman strikes me."The subtitles also use words and phrases like "yikes," "get a load of the new dupe," "jackpot," "pack of lousy, rotten rats," "home run" and "dreamboat," none of which, it is safe to say, would have been uttered by Verdi or Piave. The Count of Monterone, who appears in traditional Arab robes to deliver his curse, is called "Your Sheikness." "Signor" becomes "big shot," "bella" becomes "knockout," "fool" becomes "funnyman" or "jerk."At the dramatic climax, when Rigoletto thinks he is standing before the Duke's body (alas, it is that of his daughter, Gilda), he declares in Italian that his nemesis "lies at my feet." The Met title has Rigoletto say, "And now I'm the headliner!"The orchestra plays the notes as Verdi wrote them, and the singers sing Piave's original words. But the English-speaking audience member reading the titles gains a very different impression of Piave's language.The opera's creative team says the titles are simply an extension of the opera's updated setting."In terms of the tone, we wanted to capture some of that 'bada-bing,' that sort of swinging, Rat Pack 'Fly Me to the Moon' language," Mr. Mayer said. "Why not make it as fresh and relevant to what's happening visually as possible? The fewer disconnects the better."Peter Gelb, the Met's general manager, pointed out that titles have always been loosely rendered, omitting words or changing elements mentioned in the original libretto.The goal is clarity and coherent storytelling, he said, especially when an opera's setting has been so drastically changed. "You're obliged to have the titles go along," he said. "Otherwise you pull the rug out from under the change of setting."J. D. McClatchy, a poet, librettist and sometime Met title maker, said that once a director sets the course, there is no choice but to follow. "That's what makes me very nervous about directors," he said, speaking in general terms, "that they will change things to suit themselves, rather than the text they've been given to interpret."Paul Cremo, the Met dramaturge and the man who oversees the titles, said that updating 19th-century language was a delicate balancing act. Titles should not wander too far from "what's actually being said," he added, yet convey meaning quickly as the opera train rushes on, match the production's style and present the essential meaning of the text."It's an exercise in minimalism," he said.For "Rigoletto," Spanish and German versions are also available, as well as a straight Italian condensation reflecting the more archaic original. (Italian is now included for Italian operas, thanks to a request by the Italian consul, Mr. Gelb said.)New York City Opera introduced projected titles to the United States in 1983, showing them above the stage. Twelve years later the Met installed its seat-back system. Now, the vast majority of opera houses in the world have some sort of titling.At the Met, a cue caller watches monitors of the conductor and stage and follows along with an annotated score, signaling the moment for each title. A technician presses a button to activate it.Michael Panayos is the house's head title man. In the case of "Rigoletto," which runs through May 1, he and Mr. Cremo took an existing set of "Rigoletto" titles and rejiggered them to match as closely as possible Mr. Mayer's Rat Pack spirit. "It was like being in the writers' room of a TV show," Mr. Cremo said.In "Questa o quella," the Duke is a Sinatra-like figure delivering the aria as a lounge singer, holding a microphone and surrounded by showgirls. Mr. Cremo said he and Mr. Panayos read through the lyrics of Sinatra songs to find the right spirit.Of the "Hop on, baby" couplet, Mr. Cremo said: "I don't think it's that far off. It's a very hip, finger-snappy, Rat Pack way of saying it."Mr. Mayer said some tweaks were made after opening night, including cutting "Arab" from references to the curse to avoid distracting audiences from the general nature of the malediction.Mr. McClatchy said he liked the "Rigoletto" titles but could not resist suggesting some tweaking of his own. "I was surprised the titles didn't go a little further," he said. "I would have called him Duke, not the Duke."And he suggested naming the seedy bar run by the assassin Sparafucile and his seductive sister Maddalena the "S&M Club."
LOS ANGELES — Something was wrong with the video playing behind the R&B singer Frank Ocean as he rehearsed this week for Sunday's Grammy Awards. The video was projected on a screen behind Mr. Ocean and onto a three-sided box around the keyboard in front of him, creating the surreal illusion that he was running down a desert road while he sang. But the images were slightly out of sync with the recorded track over which Mr. Ocean vocalized: his torso and his legs didn't quite line up. Rather than dreamy, the effect was disjointed."It doesn't work," one producer growled, as Mr. Ocean ambled offstage to look at a playback. Ken Ehrlich, the executive producer, who was in front of the video monitors as Mr. Ocean sat down, said calmly, "We're about two-thirds of the way there."Over the next few minutes, Mr. Ehrlich had the keyboard moved over slightly, so that Mr. Ocean's torso would line up with his legs, and sent his staff scurrying to find a way to synchronize the sound and the images. Then he went over the performance shot by shot with Mr. Ocean; when Mr. Ocean complained that his face was not visible, Mr. Ehrlich led him to the master control room to talk to the director, Louis J. Horvitz, about working in more close-ups and other angles.The next run-through was exponentially better, and everyone breathed a sigh of relief. As Mr. Ocean was finishing up, an aide rushed up to Mr. Ehrlich to say that Bruno Mars and Rihanna had not yet arrived to rehearse the next segment. Rihanna was still 15 minutes away. "Is that a real 15 or a Rihanna 15?" Mr. Ehrlich asked with a smile.Mr. Ehrlich, 70, has been producing the Grammy Awards show for 33 years, and over that period he has become known for making the three-and-a-half-hour show into a forum for collaborations, historic reunions and spectacles that are perhaps unimaginable anywhere else. Sometimes these collaborations can help a band to rise. Two years ago Mr. Ehrlich put Mumford & Sons, who were then obscure, onstage with Bob Dylan, and this year that group is nominated for six Grammys.In recent years Mr. Ehrlich and the Recording Academy have reduced the number of awards presented and packed the show with more and more performances aimed at attracting viewers: big-name artists with new material, unusual collaborations, all-star tributes to deceased luminaries and pairings of emerging artists with veterans.This year is no exception. Justin Timberlake is slated to perform material from his first album in seven years. A tribute to Levon Helm will bring together the Zac Brown Band, Mavis Staples, T-Bone Burnett, Brittany Howard of Alabama Shakes and Mumford & Sons. Bruno Mars, Sting and Rihanna will collaborate with Damian Marley on a reggae segment. Elton John will perform a duet with Ed Sheeran, the wunderkind British singer-songwriter."I love the idea that I can bring young audiences to classic artists and an older audience to young artists, and I don't know any other show that can do that," Mr. Ehrlich said.His strategy of stepping up the number of unusual artist pair-ups, or "Grammy moments," as the Recording Academy president, Neil Portnow, likes to call them, seems to have reversed a decline in interest in the awards. Ratings have climbed steadily since 2008, when only 17 million tuned in. Last year's show drew nearly 40 million, the most since the mid-1980s, though that number was driven by the death of Whitney Houston the night before and by the return of Adele to the stage after throat surgery.Mr. Ehrlich is a small, stocky, intense man with a short beard who moves around the stage and arena with short, determined steps, talking constantly into a headset to the director, the lighting designer, the graphics wizards and the head stage manager. His colleagues say he has a knack for putting musicians at ease and translating their visions for television. He can be tough, even on divas.
"Light Up Gold" (What's Your Rupture?), the debut album by Parquet Courts, starts out jittery and never settles down. "I was walking through Ridgewood, Queens/I was flipping through magazines/I was so stoned and starving," Andrew Savage rambles on "Stoned and Starving," a dry-wit post-punk number that could almost pass for a novelty song. That careful balance is on display throughout this album, heavy with bubbling, bulbous guitars by way of Wire, the singing and songwriting mostly split between Austin Brown and Mr. Savage, who are astute enough to write taut, smart lyrics, and self-aware enough to arch an eyebrow while maintaining the pose. Sometimes Mr. Savage favors the declamatory style favored by James Murphy of LCD Soundsystem, too cool for melody. That pops up on "Borrowed Time" and "Careers in Combat," a laundry list of all the American dreams and life choices no longer available to an enterprising young person. All that's left is to rock.In dance music, scene was once the most important thing; be it the club, the city or the genre, fealty mattered. The Internet, of course, has upended all that, leading young producers to wonder why they should make one type of dance music when they can just as easily make all its types. From Toronto, Zeds Dead is the partnership of the producers DC and Hooks, who have been working together for nearly a decade, and have ingested influences widely: drum 'n' bass, grime, dubstep, hip-hop and more. They've released singles and EPs and albums that have become increasingly eclectic, and the duo's most recent EP, "Hot Sauce" (Mad Decent), is among its most accomplished. Each track is a different color, as if you had a channel changer in hand — the slinky vintage Chicago house on "Mr. Sub," the mild soca undertones of "Playa," the unabated glimmering synths of "Rave.""Al Borde de la Locura" (New Born) is the refreshing new album from NG2, the salsa duo from Puerto Rico made up of Norberto Vélez and Gerardo Rivas (whose father is Jerry Rivas, of the long-running salsa outfit El Gran Combo). The duo, which has been recording for about a decade, has an easy rapport on these songs, which are mainly written by Mr. Vélez, the highlights of which include the booming "Y Ahora Me Voy" and the confidently temperate "Siempre Has Sido Tu." On their own, the two are direct, smooth singers, and sometimes a little whimsical. But on a few songs here, they beef up their sound by inviting guests with bigger voices — Elvis Crespo on "Tenia Que Acabar," Rubby Perez on "Yo Se Que Es Mentira" and, very memorably, a swelteringly intense Luisito Carrion on "No Llorare."Four decades ago, blues-rock was one of the important building blocks for early incarnations of heavy metal. The Austin, Tex., band Ancient VVisdom is now getting down to business with the reverse engineering. "Deathlike" (Prosthetic) is the group's second album — following the striking "A Godlike Inferno" — and it's entrancingly powerful with a homemade air, full of churning, dark skeletal songs that move with the grace of an expertly driven bulldozer. There are nods to Metallica's late-career balladry, the folky grunge of Alice in Chains, Will Oldham on steroids and syrup, and, in terms of strategy, the DIY one-man black metal outfits of a few years past. The frontman, Nathan Opposition, sounds slightly unsteady singing his lyrics with Satanist overtones, but the songs manage a density that sustains him.Return of the No Limit RapperHere are some things Master P has been up to since he was last in the music spotlight: trying his hand at an inspirational reality-TV show, receiving the key to the city of Memphis, posing for at least one photograph alongside the Obamas and Oprah Winfrey at a fund-raiser in 2007, starting a label for profanity-free hip-hop. Master P, founder of the influential gangster rap label No Limit, was shoring up his good-neighbor bona fides. So much for all that, though. His new mixtape, "Al Capone," is surprisingly great, and unapologetically rough, in true No Limit fashion. Master P was never a technician, but he was emphatic, and he sounds just as raucous as in his prime, helped out by the coolly menacing Alley Boy, who appears on most of the songs here; Chief Keef; Fat Trel; and other guests happy to have a role model to get rowdy with.
DENVER — The Meadowlark isn't exactly the big time. It's a brick-and-stone-walled basement club, capacity 72, with a bar occupying half the room and a barely raised stage where three's a crowd. Sipping a $2 Bud Light during a happy hour in January, Wesley Schultz, the singer and guitarist in the Lumineers , fondly looked the place over.Not so long ago, in 2010, he recalled, the Lumineers would play the Meadowlark's open-mike night "every Tuesday religiously." At that point the Lumineers were the songwriting team of Mr. Schultz on guitar and the drummer Jeremiah Fraites, usually just shaking a tambourine. (Mr. Fraites had already begun wearing his trademark suspenders.)The Meadowlark was a gathering place for the musicians in Denver's close-knit music scene — a place where the Lumineers would run into local folk-pop heroes like the songwriter Nathaniel Rateliff and the band Paper Bird. And there, two songs at a time, the Lumineers were building the local following that would begin the band's momentum toward its current Top 10 single, "Ho Hey," and two nominations at Sunday's Grammy Awards, for best new artist and best Americana album.A few days later the Lumineers were in New York, rehearsing for "Saturday Night Live." At NBC's Studio 8H Mr. Fraites dismissed the band's chances at being named best new artist; the other nominees are Alabama Shakes, Fun., Frank Ocean and Hunter Hayes."We're not going to win," he said, though he was slightly more optimistic about the Americana nomination. "But the exposure will help sell more tickets to shows, and hopefully people will hear the whole album and give us a little bit more longevity in this business."With its folksy guitar and its foot-stamping, tambourine-driven beat "Ho Hey" arrived as a startling anomaly in the pop Top 10, where it's surrounded by Auto-Tuned voices and electronic beats. Mumford & Sons, the English band that decisively re-established folk-rock as a commercial force with their 2009 album "Sigh No More," didn't breach the pop Top 20 with that album's biggest hit, "The Cave." But "Ho Hey," with its chanted hos and heys and its deceptively upbeat chorus — Mr. Schultz wrote "I belong with you/You belong with me" in the unhappy aftermath of a breakup — has reclaimed pop radio for the acoustic and the hand played. It's one more hint of a pendulum swing back toward naturalism in pop."It's really short and catchy, and people can remember it after they've heard it once or twice," said John Ivey, senior vice president for programming at Clear Channel Media and Entertainment and program director of KIIS-FM in Los Angeles, which was among the first Top 40 stations to pick up "Ho Hey" after the song conquered the radio format called alternative. "We obviously do research, and it was a really popular record, and we felt like it was worth a shot just to see if it was palatable with our listeners. Top 40 has always come down to the song, and this is just a cool song."The Lumineers' self-titled debut album was released in April 2012, and over the last nine months the Lumineers — now a five-member band — have been almost continuously on tour as their gigs have grown from club dates to the opening slot at Dave Matthews's arena shows. When the Lumineers headlined the New Year's Eve show at the Ogden Theater here, the governor of Colorado, John Hickenlooper, was in the audience. "Wes Schultz had them completely in the palm of his hand," the governor said in a telephone interview.The Lumineers' success — their album has sold about 900,000 copies — leveraged Denver's cozy, supportive local scene with East Coast ambition. Until Mr. Schultz and Mr. Fraites picked up and moved to Denver, the Lumineers had been, in Mr. Schultz's blunt term, a "failure."Mr. Schultz and Mr. Fraites grew up in Ramsey, N.J. and have been writing together since 2005. Along the way, Mr. Schultz said, he changed from being a wordy singer-songwriter to prizing melody first."Your melodies make people want to hear what you're saying," he said. "They've got to be open to hearing it, almost hum it. And if they want to go deeper there is something there."Trying to get noticed they played open-mike nights in New York City and aspired, in vain, to move up to the small clubs on the Lower East Side. "We always wanted to play the Living Room, or Pianos, or the Mercury Lounge, but we never got anywhere close to that," Mr. Fraites said. "We thought that was like Madison Square Garden."
Everyone loves a good a mystery — even music journalists. Early last year they got one, when a band called Rhye began posting recordings on the Internet. Information about Rhye was scarce; the group's singles arrived online with alluring promotional photographs — a woman's bare back, a woman's bare torso — and meticulously produced videos, but no images of the musicians themselves.The music held its own mystery. The songs were a seductive blend of electronic pop, cocktail jazz and Quiet Storm soul, far plusher and sultrier than the sounds normally championed in the indie-rock blogosphere, with startlingly openhearted lyrics about love and sex. What really seized listeners' imaginations was the singer's voice — a contralto croon, cool on the top end, warm and radiant on the bottom, smoky around the edges and, in many songs, a dead ringer for the British-Nigerian superstar Sade. The singing, like Sade's, was sexy and vulnerable but remote, with an accent that couldn't be pinned down.Who was this singer? In the music press and on the Internet, critics raved and theorized. "The vocalist reminds us of Tracey Thorn — definitely a good thing!" the gossip blogger Perez Hilton wrote. In the online magazine Slate I included Rhye in a list of "young chanteuses" who were transforming pop. Reviewing the Rhye song "3 Days" Paul Lester, a critic for the British newspaper The Guardian, heard a "heroine," a battle-weary voice of experience: "The girl — female, really, she's a woman, she's lived a life, she's been hurt — sings in that hesitant, barely emoting way that suggests she's exhausted."Well, yes and no. There is indeed a hint of fatigue beneath the bounce of "3 Days," but the singer is neither girl nor woman. Rhye, it turns out, is two indie-music veterans, both male: Robin Hannibal, a Danish songwriter-producer, and Michael Milosh, a Canadian songwriter, multi-instrumentalist and a singer with an uncannily Sade-like timbre."My voice has been compared to Sade's tons in my career; it wasn't a shock that people said that," Mr. Milosh said in a joint interview with his band mate by telephone from Los Angeles, where the pair is now based. "The truth is, we didn't hide who we are. The answer was just one Google click away, and plenty of people figured it out. We just didn't want people to be focusing on us. We wanted people to really hear the music first, without any preconceived notions."Mr. Milosh and Mr. Hannibal are still acting shy, or coy. In the photo shoot for this article, their first as a band, they insisted on obscuring their faces.Soon, though, there will be a lot more Rhye music to hear. On March 5 the duo will release its debut album, with a title that Mr. Milosh and Mr. Hannibal insist isn't cheeky: "Woman" (Innovative Leisure/Loma Vista /Republic). It's a fine record, catchy, assured and often disarmingly pretty. It's a sign of the times, the latest example of an easy-listening revival that has been taking shape on the indie fringes and in the musical mainstream over the past couple of years. And even with all doubts dispelled about the singer's identity, "Woman" is a fascinating exercise in musical gender bending, an argument about sex and sex roles in contemporary pop, waged in dulcet tones.Mutual admiration, and cheap airfare, brought the members of Rhye together. Mr. Milosh was a fan of Quadron, the electronic soul duo Mr. Hannibal had founded with a fellow Dane, Coco Maja Hastrup Karshoj; Mr. Hannibal admired Mr. Milosh's solo records, released under the moniker Milosh, which likewise mixed electronic beats and silky R&B. In the summer of 2010 Mr. Hannibal, who was living in his native Copenhagen, contacted Mr. Milosh, a Torontonian who had moved to Berlin, about singing on a remix. The two musicians had never met, but Mr. Milosh agreed to spend a week in Mr. Hannibal's studio. "Berlin and Copenhagen are really close to each other," Mr. Milosh said. "Just 30 euros for the flight."It was money well spent. The weeklong session produced three songs and established an easy chemistry. "We really clicked," Mr. Hannibal said. "We had similar styles of songwriting and production and the same ideas about a marriage between electronic music and synthetic music, mixed with more classical songwriting. I don't want to be too precious about it, but we were striving to create music that has honest emotion."
Even though hip-hop has countless shades, colors, splinter wings and internal dissenters, it's still often spoken about as if it were an undifferentiated mass. Many consider it an outsider phenomenon, even though hip-hop has effectively become the center of pop music. This attitude partly stems from age, race and other things, but mainly from a refusal to see the world as it has become.This narrow understanding of hip-hop is even more surprising because part of the genre's brilliance is how it's moved away from the margins and seeped into the mainstream in unexpected places and ways — providing soundtracks for ads, shilling brands, giving teenagers new slang. Like oxygen, it belongs to everyone.And then, inevitably, the adopters and interlopers begin to succeed on their own terms, which leads to phenomena like Macklemore & Ryan Lewis's "Thrift Shop" and Baauer's "Harlem Shake." For the last few weeks "Thrift Shop" has been the No. 1 song in the country, according to the Billboard Hot 100, and since the beginning of February "Harlem Shake" — more specifically, the first 30 seconds of it — has been the soundtrack for the latest viral dance-video craze. Both songs have been hovering at or near the top of the iTunes sales chart.Depending on your lens, this reflects a tremendous cultural victory for hip-hop or the moment when hip-hop, as a construct, begins to lose meaning. What it really portends is hip-hop's centerless future, in which its elements and references will be widely up for grabs — even more so than they are now — and used in unanticipated ways, inevitably weakening the center, and maybe undoing it altogether.Undoubtedly, "Thrift Shop," which also features the singer Wanz, is a hip-hop song, though one that bears almost no connection to hip-hop as a living genre. It's a lighthearted song about the thrills of thrifting, though it's not quite the robust sendup of hip-hop-extravagance clichés that it aspires to be. (If white rappers pilfering the exuberant moods of late-1980s/early-1990s party rap is your thing, you'd do better with Mac Miller's "Party on Fifth Ave." from 2011.)Macklemore raps in a sleepy, casual tone, and while he's nimble at times, he's as often overreaching. The album from which "Thrift Shop" is drawn, "The Heist" (Macklemore Records), oozes lumpy sincerity. It opens with a number that refers to the writer Malcolm Gladwell and has thoughtful songs about sexual-orientation equality and Macklemore's own addiction struggles.As a rapper, he recalls most vividly the progressive independent hip-hop of the early 2000s, as if he had swallowed whole the early works of Atmosphere. That was an era when hip-hop was still filling out its margins, and a heavily white underground was exploring new thematic territory.The success of that scene also helped generate an audience for hip-hop that did not seek out or understand the genre from the inside out but rather from the other way. Macklemore may be a rapper — last year, prophetically, he was one of the 10 young rappers on the cover of XXL magazine's annual "Freshman Class" issue — but his audience is something else.In addition to topping the Billboard Hot 100, "Thrift Shop" has also topped the Billboard rap songs chart, despite limited play on hip-hop radio stations. This certainly has at least a little to do with Billboard's ever-broadening definition of what constitutes a rap song; Psy's K-pop novelty crossover, "Gangnam Style," also topped the rap songs chart recently. The weakening of this chart is just a symptom of what happens when decisions about nomenclature come from outside the genre.Macklemore's success is a reminder that in 2013 it is possible to consume hip-hop while remaining at a far remove from the center of the genre or, in some cases, from black culture altogether. That's not only because Macklemore is white — he sets off triggers that are different from those of Eminem, Yelawolf, Machine Gun Kelly, Action Bronson and any number of white rappers — or because his audience is mainstream. It's because on "Thrift Shop" the rapping is merely a tool to advance ideas that are not connected to hip-hop to an audience that doesn't mind receiving them under a veneer of hip-hop cool.This audience — hip-hop-aware but not hip-hop-exclusive — is huge, and its needs are being filled in several ways. You can see the audience in action, literally, in the recent "Harlem Shake" dance videos, which have been the dominant viral-video meme of the month, with tens of thousands of versions posted to YouTube featuring groups of people dancing, poorly, to the song's opening segment.Baauer's "Harlem Shake" isn't a hip-hop song, but it is hip-hop-influenced. (I recently heard about a minute of it played on Power 105.1 FM, one of New York's two hip-hop radio stations, during a mixshow, though it felt more like a novelty than like part of a strategy.) Baauer is at the forefront of trap, the lately emergent wing of dance music that takes its inspiration, and some of its samples, from the aggressive Southern hip-hop of the last few years. Also, the words in "Harlem Shake" are sampled from the clever art-rap obscurities Plastic Little (whose rapper, Jayson Musson, is now better known for his art-world sendups as Hennessy Youngman) and from a remix by the D.J. duo Philadelphyinz.The Harlem Shake is a real dance, though. The dance in the video, to the extent that it's a dance at all, isn't the actual Harlem Shake, which has been an uptown staple for more than a decade. (See most of the videos by the former Bad Boy rapper G. Dep for a tutorial.) The explosion of this song, and its accompanying videos, threatens to all but obliterate the original dance's claim on the name. (The "Harlem Shake" video done by the staff of the liberal political-comedy show "Totally Biased With W. Kamau Bell" winkingly concludes with someone doing the actual Harlem Shake.)And it serves Baauer well, the more videos that are made; according to Billboard, his label, Mad Decent, has been aggressively monetizing the videos that use his song, even as the samples in it have not been contractually cleared. But Baauer or someone on his team did have one version of the song removed: a remix made by the rapper Azealia Banks.Ms. Banks, a grade-A Internet troll, was doing something almost every rapper of note has done: take someone else's beat and rap over it. Baauer, for whatever reason, took umbrage at that, leading to a Twitter war of words. "You don't belong in hip-hop," she wrote. "You don't even know what a" — and here she added a colorful expletive — "Harlem Shake even is."After squabbling with Baauer she posted a video for her version of the song — one of her best songs, it should be said — and released what purported to be an e-mail of Baauer's in which he said he liked her version.Ms. Banks, a major-label signee more beloved of fashionistas than of hip-hop fans, has, at best, a tenuous relationship to hip-hop's center.She is, at a minimum, from Harlem, though that doesn't mean what it used to, either. But her beef with Baauer played out as one interloper shaming another: hip-hop's bold future.
The Rev. Gean West says he feels like Abraham, whom God made a father in his dotage. It's been 43 years since he and his brother Tommie formed the gospel group the Relatives in Dallas and 33 years since the band broke up after releasing a few funky singles but scoring no hits.Yet here the West brothers are, putting out their first full-length album, with several new songs and a few of their old numbers. At 75, Gean West is touring again, playing places like Lincoln Center, the Bell House in Brooklyn and Joe's Pub."This is a God-sent thing because of the way it came about, how everything fell in place," he said, sitting in a dressing room with the other original band members after a recent performance at the Greene Space, the performance site of WNYC radio. The drummer Earnest Tarkington, 66, nodded in agreement. "God kept us healthy for this occasion," he said. Tommie, 66, the lead singer, chimed in: "My congregation can't wait until the CD drops. Every one of them wants one."On Tuesday the Relatives released "The Electric Word" (Yep Roc), a collection of 10 gospel songs that the group recorded with the producer Jim Eno last year in Austin, Tex. These are not traditional church tracks. The Relatives sing a burning gospel refracted through the lens of psychedelic rock, heavy R&B and 1970s funk. Their riffs and drum grooves owe as much to Jimi Hendrix and Sly and the Family Stone as to the Rev. James Cleveland and Shirley Caesar. "Even back then people would tell us that we was ahead of our time," Gean said. "We always did our own thing."These days forgotten groups like the Relatives are being resurrected by young crate-digging producers at indie labels with some frequency, as musicians weaned in the era of Auto-Tuned voices and electronic drum tracks search for a rougher, handmade sound, an authenticity rooted in a place and a time."There has been a backlash against overproduced music, and I think these older cats have something to teach us about raw music," said Noel Waggener, the producer who rediscovered the Relatives.Others recently rescued from history's dustbin include Rodriguez, the Detroit songwriter who saw his long-dormant career revived over the last year by the documentary movie and album "Searching for Sugar Man" (Light in the Attic Records). Similarly, Bettye LaVette, the R&B singer, was saved from obscurity about 10 years ago, and Anti- records, home of bands like Calexico and Dr. Dog, gave her a deal in 2005. Bill Bragin, the director of public programming at Lincoln Center, said the trend was not unlike the folk revival of the 1960s, when young musicians in Greenwich Village sought out and recorded folk and blues masters like the Rev. Gary Davis and Mississippi John Hurt. "There is always this interest when you discover a great artist that somehow history never picked up on," Mr. Bragin said.For the Relatives the road back to making music started with a cracked 45 r.p.m. record that the mother of an Austin drummer, Mike Buck, found at a thrift shop more than seven years ago and gave to her son. It was one of the three singles the group had released in the early 1970s — the grooving "Don't Let Me Fall" and, on the flip side, a funk number, "Rap On." Mr. Buck, who also owns Antone's Record Shop in Austin, shared the recording with his friends, including Mr. Waggener, a founder of an archival record label, Heavy Light. "I was completely blown away," Mr. Waggener said.Mr. Waggener and his partner, Charisse Kelly, tracked down Gean (pronounced gene) at a ramshackle church in Dallas, where he was pastor over a dwindling flock. Surprised by the inquiry, he said there were about five unreleased Relatives songs that Phil York, the Dallas producer, had recorded in 1975. When Mr. Waggener and Ms. Kelly visited Mr. York, he not only remembered the recording session but made them a copy of the master, which he had called "The Electric Word" because he didn't know the group's name.Heavy Light reissued these recordings as an album, "Don't Let Me Fall," in 2009, which received good reviews. Gean West, who had a successful career in the 1960s with influential gospel groups like the Mighty Golden Voices and the Southernaires, reassembled a band to begin touring again."I didn't believe it," Mr. Tarkington recalled. "I thought he was crazy." Since only three of the original lineup of seven were healthy enough to perform, Gean recruited two younger singers — Tony Corbitt and Tyron Edwards — to fill out the sound.Starting with a 2009 reunion concert at the Continental Club in Austin the band spent the next three years barnstorming festivals with its four-part harmonies and funky grooves. The group blew away a crowd at the Ponderosa Stomp in New Orleans in September 2010, and that success led to appearances at Austin City Limits and the Bonnaroo festivals. Mr. Bragin engaged them to open for Mavis Staples at Lincoln Center Out of Doors in the summer of 2011 and brought them back to headline a show this year.
In the world of opera, when directors update repertory works to contemporary settings, they almost always remain true to the original music and libretto. This is in effect the bargain that production teams strike with passionate opera buffs, especially the more tradition-bound members of the audience.Wagner's Wotan may be reconceived as the chief executive of the Valhalla Corporation. "La Sonnambula" may be presented as the story of a modern-day opera company in rehearsal for a traditional staging of this Bellini masterpiece. But with rare exceptions, no matter how updated the concept, every note and word of the original score is performed faithfully.But what about the translations of the texts as seen in the various titling systems used in almost every opera house? Should the titles also be faithful to the libretto?This contentious question has been raised by the Metropolitan Opera's new production of Verdi's "Rigoletto," which opened last month, the "Rat Pack Rigoletto," as everyone is calling it. In his first try at opera the director Michael Mayer, a Tony Award winner for his Broadway production of the musical "Spring Awakening," has shifted the setting of "Rigoletto" from 16th-century Italy, where the licentious Duke of Mantua rules his domain like an absolute monarch, to gaudy 1960s Las Vegas, where the Duke becomes a Sinatra-like superstar, a man so wealthy and successful that he is in effect the king of Las Vegas, indulging himself with easy women, gambling and booze.On opening night, when the tenor Piotr Beczala broke into the Duke's jaunty aria "Questa o quella," in which he says that any woman, this one or that, will do just fine when he is in the mood, Mr. Beczala sang every note and word as written. But on the Met Titles seat-back screens the audience saw, "This girl or that girl/I'll give any girl a whirl!" In the titles the aria ends with the kicker "My sights are set on a swingin' girl,/So hop on, baby, let's take that whirl!"Has the Met crossed a line with its titles for "Rigoletto," which were written by Paul Cremo, the company's dramaturge, and Michael Panayos, the Met Titles supervisor, in conjunction with Mr. Mayer? I found the "Rat Pack" titles at worst harmless and at best kind of enjoyable, if sometimes self-consciously hip. Generalizing about the efficacy of rendering titles into vernacular is like generalizing about the use of updating as a directorial technique. It depends on how it's done. Countless opera fans have had to endure gimmicky or gratuitously radical productions. But done right, an updated production can be a revelation. The director Jonathan Miller's 1982 production of "Rigoletto" for the English National Opera, for example, was set in the 1950s in the Little Italy of New York, where the Duke was the head of the local Mafia and Rigoletto, a court jester in the opera's original setting, was the bartender at the hotel where the Duke and his men hung out.Originalists who object in principle to titles that stray far from the text have to accept that composers of the past implicitly endorsed the concept. In the 19th century performing opera in translation was standard practice. Verdi fully expected that when one of his operas was performed outside Italy the libretto would be translated into the language of the audience. Performing opera in translation is an honorable practice that still thrives at some companies, like the English National Opera.But it takes major meddling with the text of a libretto to produce a performing version in a different language. Since the pitches and rhythms of the vocal lines are fixed, the words have to be freely adapted, especially if the translator is trying to retain rhyme schemes and the like.A favorite example is the opening line of Mozart's "Così Fan Tutte," sung by Ferrando. Defending his girlfriend's virtue, he sings: "La mia Dorabella capace non è, capace non è; fedel quanto bella il cielo la fè." It translates, roughly, as "My Dorabella is incapable of such a thing; heaven created her as faithful as she is beautiful."In the English version by Ruth and Thomas Martin, used by the Met in its landmark 1951 production, the line is charmingly rendered: "To doubt Dorabella is simply absurd, completely absurd; She'll always be faithful and true to her word."So no image of heaven; no equating of Dorabella's beauty with her faithfulness. But Ferrando's words, as transformed here, fit the music and the sentiment beautifully.
Now that R&B is rediscovering its experimental fringe, with songwriters like Frank Ocean, Miguel and the Weeknd, the time may be opportune for Bilal, a songwriter from Philadelphia who has been on that fringe since the neosoul boom of the 1990s, when he began extrapolating from Stevie Wonder and Prince. His voice needs no studio aid; it's a full-fledged soul baritone extending toward a supple falsetto. "A Love Surreal" (eOne) is a cycle of slow-burning songs about love — from infatuation and romance through estrangement, loneliness and renewal, from seduction and longing to philosophical serenity. With lush, glimmering keyboards and electronics, lean indie-rock guitars or Robert Glasper's limpid jazz piano the songs tease and insinuate. Their meanderings lead somewhere.The syllables fly fast and relentless from the Underachievers, the Brooklyn hip-hop duo of the rappers Issa Dash and Ak, on their free mixtape "Indigoism" (Brainfeeder). So does a pharmacopoeia of drug references — not toting up sales or merely getting high, but also seeking "peace and love, of course knowledge" and the mystical revelations they regularly refer to as the "third eye." One song explains, "What we got to say is the conscious way with a little bit of ig'nant/word to my pigment." The speedy delivery is a matter of local New York City pride. The Underachievers disdain the slow, easy pop catchphrases of more commercial Southern and West Coast hip-hop, instead touting a resurgence of the "Beast Coast." Unlike many mixtapes "Indigoism" doesn't latch onto familiar beats; various producers back the Underachievers with woozy, floating keyboards or scruffy rock guitars. There's not much breathing room or pop outreach on "Indigoism," but it's an impressive opening salvo.Jazz-rock was still a molten concept when the vibraphonist Monty Stark put together the Stark Reality in the late 1960s: a thoroughly psychedelic jazz ensemble connected to Boston's public-television station, WGBH. At first the Stark Reality performed Mr. Stark's adventurous arrangements for big band. Eventually the lineup was distilled to a quartet. In the group's music giddily distorted vibraphone and guitar (from John Abercrombie, who would go on to a celebrated jazz career) might ride a funky backbeat, sprint into a briskly swinging jazz wilderness of dissonance and polytonality or accompany Mr. Stark singing thoughts like "Red yellow moonbeams/Are you what you seem?" The beats and piquantly analog textures got the Stark Reality sampled by Black Eyed Peas and Cut Chemist. Now the three-CD compilation "Acting Thinking Feeling" (Now-Again) collects the Stark Reality's complete recordings from 1968 to 1970, when the quartet released a double album of children's songs by Hoagy Carmichael. The songs were radically and virtuosically warped and yet, in those heady days, approved by Carmichael himself.Mark Oliver Everett, the songwriter behind Eels, tends to shift idioms with each album. "Wonderful, Glorious" (Vagrant), the 10th Eels album, favors fuzz-toned yet uncluttered garage-rock, with each instrument making its own smeared impact. That's the result, perhaps, of Mr. Everett enlisting his touring band as songwriting collaborators and often — though not always — summoning the sound of a band in a room. Through the years Mr. Everett has applied his scratchy, blown-out voice to a full spectrum of sorrows, desperation, alienated insight and slightly disbelieving hope. This time he's battered but combative: "I'm not knocked out but I'm on the ropes," he allows. It's less confessional, less bleakly vulnerable than he has been on past albums — the difference, perhaps, between writing in isolation and male bonding with the band."I got here on crowded trains/With old guitars and a famous name," Holly Williams sings on her third album, "The Highway" (Georgiana). But that's about all the fuss she makes about being Hank Williams's granddaughter and the daughter of Hank Williams Jr. She doesn't bother with vintage-country affectations or with name dropping, and when she sings about family, it's in lyrics that are character studies, not autobiography. Her narrators can be women or men, like the husband who chronicles a lifelong love in "Waiting on June." Her music is roots-rock with an Appalachian foundation, in arrangements that rise alongside her forthright alto or let it hold its own nearly unaccompanied. Ms. Williams wrote most of the songs herself and collaborated on the rest, and she's often closer to songwriters like John Prine or Bruce Springsteen than to the smiley Nashville mainstream. Songs like "Drinkin' " and "Giving Up" don't have happy endings. And a heartache song like "Happy" doesn't gloss over "That night I broke your heart/And the day you cursed my name."Nearly every note sounds overdriven on Dan Friel's first solo album, "Total Folklore" (Thrill Jockey). Mr. Friel, formerly with the Brooklyn band Parts & Labor, used an old computer, an older keyboard — a 1984 Yamaha Portasound with flutey tones that are still sometimes recognizable — and a slew of pedals and effects to make his pullulating electronic tracks. They're not electronic dance music; they are marches and rockers, with melodies running at speeds from processional to punk while whizzing, crashing, sliding, beeping, chirping sounds ricochet all over. The key is that the melodies are hearty ones in cheerful major keys. They could almost be Celtic pipe tunes, if they weren't set on stun. It's a merry onslaught.
It's so hard to say goodbye to yesterday. No, honestly — it's practically impossible, especially in an age of cyclical nostalgia and Internet-assisted memories. Old musical acts have always gone on comeback tours, but these days the disappearances are getting shorter and nostalgia is fully taking its place alongside discovery as a valid aesthetic-appreciation strategy. Why listen to the new bands that sound like the old bands when the old bands will be back before you know it?New Kids on the Block are returning, again, just in time to glower at One Direction and the Wanted and to make a play for the parents of those groups' fans. The New Kids have a new album, "10," due out in April, but that violates one of the core rules of comebacks: Don't dilute the memories. The group should know better. It's been through a couple of comebacks already. To sweeten the New Kids' forthcoming tour — menacingly called "The Package" — it will be joined by 98 Degrees, a boy band it clearly fathered, and Boyz II Men, a post-boy band that it predated but probably aspired to be. The three groups invade Nassau Coliseum in Uniondale, N.Y., on June 1; the Izod Center in East Rutherford, N.J., on June 13; and the Barclays Center in Brooklyn on June 16.Whatever intra-group conflicts the New Kids may have had to overcome in order to hit the road successfully and shake down long-loyal fans, they pale in comparison with what's driven Fleetwood Mac to ruin time and again. Its reunion shows can be prickly affairs, depending on whether Stevie and Lindsey are on amenable terms or only barely able to share airspace. Every few years the band members huddle back up to test the waters and themselves; this time there's a juicy deluxe edition of "Rumours" to flog. Feel the old tensions, and maybe some new ones, at Madison Square Garden on April 8; the Prudential Center in Newark on April 24; and the Nikon at Jones Beach Theater in Wantagh, N.Y., on June 22Fleetwood Mac and New Kids on the Block are both like party guests you see walk out the door and who then hide out in your garage, waiting to surprise you with their unexpected permanence. Swedish House Mafia, a cobbled-together supergroup of arena-dance heroes, is insisting on a different ending. The trio — Axwell, Steve Angello, Sebastian Ingrosso — is splitting after a few years of reshaping the scale of the global dance music takeover to return to their modest lives as individual dance-music superstars. "One Last Tour" this jaunt is called. It plays the Hammerstein Ballroom on Feb. 28 (a charity event called "The Black Tie Rave"); Madison Square Garden on March 1; and then three nights, March 2 to 4, at the Barclays Center. After that a few more dates in Los Angeles and Miami and then, they swear, the end. As if.
In indie rock, it seems, everyone has a side project: a break from the other band members, a chance to toy with different genres and recording methods, a fling with no long-term commitment.And every so often side projects have synergistic results. That's what happened to two outfits regrouping for spring tours: the Postal Service, celebrating the 10th anniversary reissue of its lone album, "Give Up," and the Breeders, who have regrouped for the 20th anniversary of their album "Last Splash." The spring also brings a new collaboration by the songwriter Sufjan Stevens, the guitarist Bryce Dessner from the National and the composer Nico Muhly: a song cycle called "Planetarium."The Postal Service united Ben Gibbard, usually the lead singer of Death Cab for Cutie, and Jimmy Tamborello, the electronic-music producer who primarily records as Dntel. Mr. Tamborello programmed tracks and mailed them (postally) to Mr. Gibbard, who edited them and added melodies, guitar, lyrics and vocals; Jenny Lewis, from Rilo Kiley, provided additional vocals. The resulting songs merged perky, pointillistic arrangements with reflections on loneliness, mortality and science. "Give Up" has sold more than a million copies, and sounds contemporary a decade later alongside the electronic pop of groups like Passion Pit. That gives the Postal Service a chance to regroup for shows at major festivals (including Coachella) and arenas, including the Barclays Center in Brooklyn on June 14 and 15.The Breeders started when two New England bands, the Pixies and Throwing Muses, shared a 1988 tour. Kim Deal, the Pixies' bassist, and the guitarist Tanya Donelly from Throwing Muses worked up songs that turned into the Breeders' 1990 debut album. By 1993, when the Pixies disbanded, Ms. Donelly had been replaced in the Breeders by Ms. Deal's twin sister, Kelley, and the Breeders moved from side project to full-time band, with music that brought its own wry twists to the explosive guitar dynamics of the Pixies. The Breeders lineup that made "Last Splash" starts its American tour on March 29 at the Bell House in Brooklyn.Sufjan Stevens likes high-concept projects, like a projected series — now set aside — of albums about each of the 50 states. The solar system proved more manageable. Working with Mr. Muhly and Mr. Dessner, whose careers have both straddled classical music and rock, Mr. Stevens wrote songs about the sun and planets, including the recently disenfranchised Pluto. A string quartet opens the program with pieces by each of the three collaborators, to be joined by the composers and an ensemble of drums and seven trombones as Mr. Stevens sings "Planetarium," March 21 to 24, at the Brooklyn Academy of Music. Gustav Holst, watch your back.
In only its third season Spring for Music has already reached its autumn.The festival was founded in 2008 by three idealistic veterans of the music business — David V. Foster, the president of the management firm Opus 3 Artists; Thomas W. Morris, a consultant and the artistic director of the Ojai Festival in California; and Mary Lou Falcone, a public-relations consultant — to encourage and present adventurous programming by North American orchestras of various shapes and sizes. It had its first outing in 2011, its second in 2012. Both added welcome color and quirkiness to the New York season and drew attention to ensembles in some cases little known nationally, and both were warmly greeted by critics.But in September the festival announced that the 2014 event, already programmed, would be the last. The organizers said they could not raise the money for another season or find another presenter to see to the festival's survival.This was sad news indeed, but two seasons of celebration still lie ahead. From May 6 to 11 orchestras from five cities will take over Carnegie Hall, accompanied by many of their hometown followers brandishing color-coded handkerchiefs in a refreshing display of unabashed boosterism and sheer enthusiasm.This festival was to have featured the return of the ensemble that scored the biggest hit in 2011, the Oregon Symphony, with its program "Music for a Time of War." But that ensemble had to withdraw for lack of funds. (The festival pays a fee to each orchestra and covers the hall rental, promotion and ticket sales, but orchestras must see to their own travel and lodging.)The Oregon concert will be replaced by a second one from the Detroit Symphony Orchestra, which had gained entry with an ambitious program of Ives's four symphonies (not counting the unfinished "Universe," performed at Spring for Music 2012 by the Nashville Symphony). Leonard Slatkin, Detroit's music director, will conduct both programs, the second offering works of Rachmaninoff, Weill and Ravel.Another of the 2011 orchestras, the Albany Symphony, returns with a program of Gershwin, Morton Gould and John Harbison, led by David Alan Miller. In addition Marin Alsop conducts the Baltimore Symphony Orchestra; JoAnn Falletta, the Buffalo Philharmonic; and Christoph Eschenbach, the National Symphony Orchestra.Next year the festival's swan song will be sung by the New York Philharmonic and the leading orchestras of Cincinnati; Pittsburgh; Seattle; Rochester; and Winnipeg, Manitoba.
It should be chiseled above the doors of every symphony hall: What an orchestra plays matters as much as how it plays, if not more so.By that measure a strong case can be made that the Los Angeles Philharmonic, which is coming to Avery Fisher Hall on March 27 and 28, is the most important orchestra in the country. Its programming spends a daring amount of time in the modern and contemporary repertories.The Philharmonic's programs at Lincoln Center, conducted by its charismatic music director, Gustavo Dudamel, set classics of the early 20th century by Debussy ("La Mer," 1903-5) and Stravinsky (the complete "Firebird," 1909-10) alongside two more recent works. Preceding the Debussy and Stravinsky on March 28 is Claude Vivier's "Zipangu," from 1980, which sends a string chamber ensemble through a gamut of textures, from shimmery translucence to dense intensity.The March 27 concert is given over to John Adams's capacious, seething "Gospel According to the Other Mary," a take on a Bach-style Passion, which the Philharmonic presented in the work's premiere in Los Angeles last year. It arrives in New York in a newly staged version directed by Peter Sellars, the co-librettist and Mr. Adams's regular collaborator.Its score showed the composer finding new possibilities within his distinctive style. And the staging retains last year's marvelous central trio of singers: the mezzo-sopranos Kelley O'Connor and Tamara Mumford and the tenor Russell Thomas. Mr. Adams's "Gospel" is not the tightest evening, but it is often mesmerizing.The work is also an example of the Philharmonic's recent ambitions to lay claim to music drama in addition to the symphonic repertory. With the Los Angeles Opera floundering, the orchestra has swooped in with a schedule of staged and concert performances that should be the envy of every American opera company.It is already the envy of every American orchestra. The Philharmonic's tradition of innovation began with the conductor Otto Klemperer in 1930s and continued through the decades-long reign of the administrator Ernest Fleischmann and its exhilarating years under Esa-Pekka Salonen, its music director from 1992 to 2009.The orchestra's 10-year-old Walt Disney Concert Hall is a model for 21st-century music spaces that was guided into existence by its tireless, fearless executive director, Deborah Borda. At 32 Mr. Dudamel adroitly balances building his experience in the standard repertory with expanding his and his orchestra's horizons.Their New York visit reminds us that in 2013 every orchestra requires a welcoming home and the ambitions to match it.
Attendance is down this season at the Metropolitan Opera, and officials there acknowledge that the fault is their own. They made going to the opera too expensive.So in a rarity in the rarefied world of the performing arts, the Met said it would reduce ticket prices next season. The average cost of admission will drop by 10 percent, or to $156 from $174, Peter Gelb, the general manager, said in a recent interview.The lower ticket prices will come in a 2013-14 season that includes the return of the music director James Levine to the pit after a two-year absence; an unusual appearance by a female conductor, Jane Glover; and, surprisingly, the first time Anna Netrebko, the Russian diva, will tackle one of the most famous Russian roles at the Met.Experiencing those moments will still not be cheap, but the new ticket pricing will ease sticker shock. For example, an orchestra aisle seat that is $360 this season will be $330, and a grand tier box seat will go to $180 from $195. In all, more than 2,000 seats for each performance will cost less, the Met said. One exception will be the $20 seats in the rear of the family circle, which will rise by $5. The Met will continue its rush-ticket and free open-rehearsal programs."We think that is going to increase attendance," Mr. Gelb said of the price cuts, noting that more ticket sales would compensate for any lost revenue because of lower prices. "At least it better," he added.Mr. Gelb said prices this year were "raised dramatically," by about 10 percent. "We did not feel it was as successful as it might have been," he said of the increase.He also blamed falling attendance on a "cannibalization" of the audience by the Met's high-definition movie theater broadcasts. Attendance this season is projected to be, on average, 81 percent of capacity, compared with 84 percent last season. Ticket revenue is projected to be $4 million less than last season's $94.4 million; canceled performances caused by Hurricane Sandy are responsible for half that shortfall, with the rest attributed to a donor's reduced support for rush tickets.The Met also released details of next year's program. It includes six productions new to the house, among them Borodin's "Prince Igor," which was last heard at the Met in 1917 and is famous for its Polovtsian Dances; Tchaikovsky's "Eugene Onegin," starring Ms. Netrebko as Tatiana, her first Russian role at the house since her debut there in Prokofiev's "War and Peace" in 2002; an English-language "Die Fledermaus," with freshly written lyrics by Jeremy Sams; and Massenet's "Werther," with Jonas Kaufmann in the title role.Deborah Warner will direct "Onegin" in her Met debut. The cast includes Mariusz Kwiecien and Piotr Beczala, Met regulars. Marina Poplavskaya will take over for Ms. Netrebko later in the run. Valery Gergiev, who used to hold the title of principal guest conductor at the Met, will conduct. He last appeared there in the 2010-11 season. The first performance will be the opening-night gala on Sept. 23.Dmitri Tcherniakov will also direct his first opera at the Met with "Prince Igor." The production, Mr. Gelb said, would strip away the usual medieval pageantry and send Igor on a "psychological journey.""Die Fledermaus" will open on New Year's Eve, a return to an opera world tradition. Mr. Sams, who also wrote the text for the Met's Baroque pastiche opera "The Enchanted Island," will direct "Die Fledermaus." His lyrics will follow the story but will be written from scratch; Douglas Carter Beane, a Broadway playwright, has written the dialogue."It's an operetta," Mr. Gelb said. "You can take liberties. You wouldn't do it with Wagner."The Met's abbreviated English-language holiday production of "The Magic Flute" has been entrusted to Ms. Glover, who a Met spokesman said would be only the third woman to conduct a Met opera, and the first since 1998, when Simone Young led Offenbach's "Contes d'Hoffmann." The first female conductor at the Met, Sarah Caldwell, made her debut with Verdi's "Traviata" in 1976.As previously announced, next season's premieres  will include Nico Muhly's opera "Two Boys," a Met commission about duplicity and identity on the Internet. The opera has been "fleshed out," Mr. Gelb said, since its run at the English National Opera in 2011.The other new production is the first of Verdi's "Falstaff" since Franco Zeffirelli's oft-revived 1964 version. Directed by Robert Carsen, it will be the first of the three operas led next season by Mr. Levine, who has not conducted at the Met since May 2011 because of health problems. His first foray before an orchestra comes on May 19, when he leads the Met musicians in a concert at Carnegie Hall.Mr. Levine is also conducting revivals of Mozart's "Così Fan Tutte" and Berg's "Wozzeck," with two veteran stars taking on the main roles in "Wozzeck" for the first time: Deborah Voigt and Thomas Hampson.Mr. Levine, who announced his comeback in October, has been recuperating from damage to his spinal cord and from back surgery and is beginning to walk again, he said, "laboriously and slowly.""I'm just always doing better," he said in an interview. "I'm making progress in the therapy all the time. The nerve return in this kind of thing is slow."Mr. Levine said he expected that the very act of conducting an orchestra would help him get better."I came from having no idea when or if I'd be going back to work, and now I'm able to do this," he added. "The time is nearly here."
A trio including the drummer and singer Guillermo E. Brown (he played in David S. Ware's quartet for most of the oughts), the bassist Keith Witty and the French saxophonist Christophe Panzani, collectively called Thiefs, is looking for new ways to extend jazz sound and, to some extent, jazz vocabulary. It combines the sound of trap-set and digital percussion; R&B vocals and squelchy voice-related samples; splintered dance music; and contemporary, calm, serious melodic improvisation.This record, the band's first, on the Melamine Harmonique label, is cooperatively made, but it bears some connections to what Mr. Brown has been doing recently with his band Pegasus Warning. It is a promisingly strange album: broad enough that it can't be described as X plus Y. The best you can do is X plus Y plus Z: a collision of the jazz trio Fly, the hip-hop group Antipop Consortium and Frank Ocean. It keeps changing the frame, making a startling mash of natural and synthetic, resonant and fractured.Self-produced and self-released by the jazz pianist Shamie Royston, "Portraits," available on cdbaby.com, is a first album that probably would have been a second or third one 10 years ago. (I'm coming to it late. It slipped out last year with minimal recognition.) From Colorado, now living in the New York City area, Ms. Royston comes from a musical family. Her sister is the saxophonist Tia Fuller, and her husband is the drummer Rudy Royston, who plays on the album, alongside the bassist Ivan Taylor.This is confident and elegant piano-trio music that's sometimes rhythmically vanguardist and sometimes spare or balladlike, organized into hymns and fantasias, channeled through some of the key pianists in jazz during the early 1990s. Ultimately this is music inspired by Kenny Kirkland and Geri Allen, and descended from Ahmad Jamal and McCoy Tyner. In a moment when traditions in jazz mean less and less, this is of squarely from one, and strong because of it.The trombonist and guitarist Curtis Hasselbring's new album, "Number Stations" (Cuneiform), is inspired by the system of anonymous shortwave radio transmissions — typically strings of numbers, read by a female voice — that have existed without proper explanation since the cold war and are thought to be coded messages used for espionage. According to information provided by the record label there is some codelike logic going on in this bright, complex music: group members sending messages to one another through repeated strings of notes. (The band is Mr. Hasselbring's septet, the New Mellow Edwards, with Mary Halvorson on guitar, Chris Speed on tenor saxophone and clarinet, Matt Moran on vibraphone, Trevor Dunn on bass, and Ches Smith and Satoshi Takeishi both on drums.) But I'm glad it doesn't sound only or explicitly like that.This is one of the best extensions of '90s downtown New York jazz I've heard in a while, done partly with musicians from that time and partly with younger ones who have hungrily absorbed their lessons. The tunes burst with character even when their melodic content approaches code. They suggest rough and rocking reflections on film music (Mancini and Herrman), the Mothers of Invention and the Art Ensemble of Chicago, among other things.'Bottom of the World' "Bottom of the World" (TLA), the first album in 14 years by the Texas-raised, New Mexico-resident visual artist and singer-songwriter Terry Allen, isn't nearly as self-contained as his concept album "Juarez," from 1975, and his character-sketch album "Lubbock (On Everything)," from 1979, the standards he'll likely be held to. Those are poetic manifestoes of perception and history told through country music. This one holds together mostly by virtue of the fact that Mr. Allen wrote everything, but that's still valuable. He's pretty close to a master lyricist.The group sound, as usual, is spare, almost demo quality. Mr. Allen plays a mellow electric keyboard as he sings; Lloyd Maines (a producer not only of Mr. Allen's extremely coltish, small-release records but also of the Dixie Chicks' six-times-platinum "Home") sometimes chimes in with acoustic or pedal-steel guitar, and that's generally about it.But Mr. Allen's magic strength is that he can keep two or more big ideas in the air at once, juxtaposing them without explicitly merging them until they kind of belong together: sex and real estate, love and colonization, greed and guilt, or as in "Wake of the Red Witch," film history and personal consciousness. I tell you this, and it sounds tidy, but this is how he tells it:while Roman soldiers shoot dice for his clothes in the biblical epic
LOS ANGELES — In 2010 Raul and Mexia Hernández set up a camera and a keyboard in their living room in San Jose, Calif., to sing a song about immigrant rights. Mexia rapped about cooks and domestic workers and Latinos being "on the rise like blood pressure." Raul crooned the Spanish-language hook ("I just want to succeed/And now they want to deport me"). Their brother, Giovanni, played a beat on a trash can. They called the song "Todos Somos Arizona" ("We Are All Arizona") and uploaded the video to YouTube as a direct response to the state's passage of a strict anti-immigrant law. The song quickly racked up thousands of views and earned the siblings a publicist.This was more than just another amateur video gone viral, however. For those who knew the brothers' biography, the song and video represented the passing of a musical torch. Their father, Hernán Hernández, is the bassist for Los Tigres del Norte, the towering legends of Mexican norteño music who are so synonymous with Spanish-speaking immigrants throughout the United States that they're known as "los idolos del pueblo," the idols of the people. Over the course of four decades and nearly 50 albums Los Tigres have used their music, and their immense stardom, to give voice to everyday stories of struggle, triumph, and loss and to comment on everything from Border Patrol abuses to the United States-Mexico drug war.Yet on "Arriba y Lejos" ( "Up and Away"), the recent debut album from the brothers, billed as Raul y Mexia, protest anthems take a back seat to well-chiseled party beats and nightclub valentines with sticky hooks. "We decided that in order to make a name for ourselves we couldn't piggy back on the political music Los Tigres have done for so long," said Mexia (pronounced mex-EYE-uh), who wrote a song about the Dream Act for the album but left it on the studio floor."Arriba y Lejos" is definitely not Los Tigres 2.0. The Hernández brothers may have grown up with their father's music on repeat and with classic Mexican acts like Los Temerarios and Los Humildes dropping by the house to hang out, but their musical leanings mostly reflect their upbringing as middle-class kids in the tony bedroom suburbs of San Jose (where both brothers still live, now in homes of their own). Their phones are loaded with songs by Nas, Alicia Keys and Swedish House Mafia."When people find out who our dad is, they want to know why our music doesn't sound like his," said Raul, 25, sitting with his brother at a conference table here in the offices of their label, Nacional Records, which is best known for releasing cutting-edge Latin Alternative music. "They're like where's your tejana," felt cowboy hat, "your boots, your accordion?"That disconnect hasn't prevented "Arriba y Lejos" from being accepted by the Spanish-language media titans Univision and Telemundo and magazines like People en Español. The brothers have been careful to connect themselves to the Tigres legacy while simultaneously breaking away from it. In the video for their first single, "Las Escondidas," set at a quinceañera party where they're the hired entertainment, they alternate between slick blazers and electric-blue fringe jackets with tiger-skin shoulder patches — a nod to the cowboy chic for which Los Tigres del Norte are famous."I was a skater and into rock music and totally not into what my parents maybe expected me to be into," said Mexia, 33, who eventually gravitated to hip-hop, memorizing Luke Skyywalker and Gucci Crew records. "My dad would come home from tour speaking Spanish, and I would only want to speak English. He'd be like, 'Mijo, come over here, let me teach you how to play this song, let me tell you about Mexico,' and I was like, 'Aw come on, Dad.' I just wanted to be out on the streets with my friends."As much as their father tried to pass on the musical traditions he was raised on in the Mexican state of Sinaloa, he eventually accepted that they belonged to different worlds."They are U.S. kids," Hernán Hernández said, switching between Spanish and English by phone from his home in San Jose. "They grew up in a much more diverse world than I did. They have some Mexican friends, but they also have friends who are Asian, black and European. They have to express themselves in a way that's authentic to how they grew up."The elder Hernández — who has posted his own YouTube video in support of his sons' new album — has been living and making music in California since he was a teenager in the late 1960s, when he and his cousins first crossed the border to play a San Jose music festival. He spends much of every year on the road throughout the United States, Mexico, and Central America, surrounded by the working-class people who see themselves mirrored in Los Tigres del Norte's songbook.
On his latest release, "Mala," the hippie-redux singer-songwriter Devendra Banhart can still be as loopy as he was on his first albums a decade ago. He calls himself a "low-bottom bottle-fed baby" and sings about a nun who quits an abbey to work as a V.J. (For those who don't recall when MTV played videos, that abbreviation stands for "videodisc jockey.") Reflecting his mother's Venezuelan background and his time spent there as a child, Mr. Banhart croons two songs in Spanish.Yet other trademarks of his previous work are absent. No warbling falsetto or ramshackle arrangements. Fewer song fragments that barely make it past a minute in length. In other words, Mr. Banhart, one of the leading proponents of a loose-knit style once named freak folk, has grown up — and, it turns out, so has the proudly idiosyncratic genre itself.If any genre desperately needed to evolve, it was freak folk, a media-generated label for a group of eclectic and willfully left-field musicians who rose up in the early '00s. They included the singing harp player Joanna Newsom, the inscrutable Baltimore noise-rock band Animal Collective, the Brooklyn avant-folk ensemble Grizzly Bear and eccentric and almost childlike balladeers like Sufjan Stevens and Kimya Dawson, among others.The term freak folk has never been particularly popular with this crowd; the members of Animal Collective declined to comment for this article partly for that reason. Others, like Mr. Banhart, shrug when they hear the phrase. "Then, like now, I don't understand it," he said recently from his New York apartment, where he moved last year after an extended stay in Los Angeles. "I certainly can't say I'm fond of it. I don't think it's an apt descriptive label. Their musical tastes are so far-reaching."Fair enough, but those acts did share several traits, especially during their formative years. Mr. Banhart and Ms. Newsom were friends, and Mr. Banhart and Animal Collective shared a bill a few times at Tonic, the defunct downtown New York club that encouraged experimentation.These acts also shared a collective love of weirdness, of avoiding music that returned rock to its garage-band roots (as the White Stripes and the Strokes were doing during that same period). Instead, whether using acoustic or sometimes electronic instruments, freak folk aimed to take indie rock into esoteric places that hadn't been heard in rock since the late-'60s heyday of acts as eclectic as Donovan, the Holy Modal Rounders and the Incredible String Band.In its quest to be as peculiar and anti-mainstream as possible, however, early freak-folk music bordered on exasperating. Animal Collective's "Sung Tongs" and Grizzly Bear's "Horn of Plenty," both released in 2004, reveled in distorted wind-tunnel vocals, staccato rhythms and verbal mumblings set to stray acoustic rhythms. Ms. Newsom's debut, "The Milk-Eyed Mender," also out that year, felt like a campfire singalong led by a counselor who'd inhaled nitrous oxide. Mr. Banhart's first few releases, which showcased lo-fi production, a nasally voice and precious lyrics about subjects like pumpkin seeds, felt equally coy.Then something unexpected occurred: maturity. In certain types of pop, progress can be cruel or depressing, especially after 10 years. Consider how less vital '70s singer-songwriters or punk founders sounded in the '80s, or how less inventive techno acts of the '90s came across a decade later. But in the case of freak folk, proficiency has proved to be a boon, resulting in some of the most beguiling releases — in any genre — of the last few years.Ms. Newsom's 2007 landmark, "Ys," benefited greatly from wuthering-heights orchestration that imbued her songs with tension and sorrow. On her ambitious 2010 triple album, "Have One on Me," her voice and songwriting took on a forceful, neurotic intensity closer to that of Fiona Apple rather than freak-folk ancestors like the cult British balladeer Vashti Bunyan. Ms. Newsom's feathery voice and harp pluckings are still very much part of her sound, but her music also grew a backbone, resulting in songs like "Good Intentions Paving Company," a hypnotic track from "Have One on Me" that grapples with romantic commitment.Animal Collective still loves noises that go bump in the night — or on your sound system of choice — but it too gradually began making warmer, more welcoming music. "Merriweather Post Pavilion," its 2009 album, had moments of nearly blissful psychedelia; "Guys Eyes" sounded like Brian Wilson on even more hallucinogenic drugs. The band's 2012 album, "Centipede Hz," included "Moonjock," which blended the band's jarring beats with the jumpy energy of '60s bubble gum pop.Grizzly Bear, also known for a certain sonic fuzziness, has sharpened its musical attack. Its 2012 release, "Shields," injected a bracing, shattered-glass intensity into its music. Grizzly Bear has become such a standard-bearer of the indie-folk-rock song form that one of its members, the percussionist Chris Bear, worked with Paul Simon on Mr. Simon's most recent studio album, "So Beautiful or So What."
On the closing track of their new album, "Small Constructions," Ben Wendel and Dan Tepfer switch instruments, improvising a dialogue from scratch. That exercise in uncertainty revealed something essential about the personalities of Mr. Tepfer, a pianist by training, and Mr. Wendel, usually a saxophonist."Ben seeks stability," Mr. Tepfer said, "and really since I've been a tiny kid I seek instability."That difference plays out subtly on the album, their first as a duo, due out on Tuesday on Sunnyside Records. They laughed a little nervously about the "Odd Couple" implications for their tour, which will bring them to the Rubin Museum of Art in Chelsea on Wednesday.Mr. Wendel, 37, near right, trained at the Eastman School of Music, where he met most of his partners in Kneebody, a band of new-breed fusionistas. He has worked in hip-hop and pop, and released two albums of his own exacting chamber jazz, playing not only saxophones but also bassoon and melodica, as he does on the new album.Mr. Tepfer, 31, began studying classical piano at 6 but received a degree in astrophysics before seeking out formal jazz training. He has played often in a duo with the saxophonist Lee Konitz, but earned even wider acclaim for "Goldberg Variations/Variations," a 2011 solo album featuring that Bach work interpreted both classically and with improvisational flair."Small Constructions" is a breakthrough for both its musicians. It features three elegant originals apiece, along with a songbook standard, a Handel variation and choice material by Lennie Tristano and Thelonious Monk.Both musicians said that they had made their album with a freedom specific to their jazz generation. "We're in this position of just trying to make music we like to listen to," Mr. Tepfer said.They spoke with Nate Chinen about their opera moms, getting along on tour and the permeability of jazz in our time. These are excerpts from the conversation.Q. So you guys live in the same building in Brooklyn?A. Ben Wendel Yes, as of September. I moved to New York three years ago from L.A., and Dan was one of the first people I met. My mom is a former opera singer, and she has an opera singer friend who is friends with Dan's opera singer mom.What does that shared classical background bring?Dan Tepfer We often have a similar idea about what's coming next.Wendel There's this flow and logic that seems to have gotten infused in the way we improvise together.You both belong to a loose coalition of players who have this total fluidity with style.Wendel Someone recently defined jazz as the music that jazz musicians play at the time that they're living. That's us. We love Radiohead and Bon Iver, and we love Mussorgsky, and we love Duke Ellington. Hopefully that's all going to be expressed through what we create.As you get into playing night after night, what do you think is going to happen?Tepfer [Laughs] We're entering into some couple vibe. This morning we left the building together to go to a radio interview. I'm compulsively late, and Ben was like, "If you keep doing this on the tour, I'm going to start getting very passive-aggressive with you."Wendel Duo playing is really intense. You don't get to lean on anybody. There's no rhythm section. Usually when we get done with a concert I'm literally sweating and my heart is pounding from the exertion of that much playing, that much ——Wendel You do not get to snooze.Tepfer The duo format has the most potential for transformation. The bigger the group, I think, the more set things become. In our case whatever can happen on a tour like this probably will.
Heliogabalus was a third-century teenage Roman emperor who dressed in women's clothes and prostituted himself in the imperial palace, appointed an all-female senate and put a dancer in charge of the praetorian guard. According to the historian Lampridius, he traveled with 600 chariots "full of his male prostitutes, bawds, harlots and lusty partners in depravity" and referred to one blond charioteer, Hierocles, as his husband. He also married and divorced five women. When he was 18 and had ruled for nearly four years, he was murdered by his own guard.The Box is a nightclub on the Lower East Side of Manhattan designed to look like a 19th-century vaudeville theater, where waitresses in skimpy white togas deliver Champagne bottles topped with fireworks to patrons who crowd around the small stage for live shows, which begin at 1:30 a.m. On a recent Sunday morning the lineup included a dancer dressed as a music-box ballerina who came to life after snorting cocaine from the blade of her winding key, an acrobat who lifted pieces of furniture with her teeth while stripping and masturbating, and a dancing vagina wielding a sparkly cardboard tongue. An aerialist in black stockings gyrated inside a large hoop suspended above the bar."It seems like a wholly appropriate setting," said Neal Goren, the artistic director of Gotham Chamber Opera, in a recent telephone interview. "If Heliogabalus were alive today, he would either frequent the place or buy it."Mr. Goren's company is putting on a production of Francesco Cavalli's 1667 opera "Eliogabalo" about this most flamboyant of Roman emperors inside this most flamboyant of New York nightspots. Simon Hammerstein, owner of the Box and grandson of the lyricist Oscar Hammerstein II, said he is always looking to create a theatrical experience "where, when the curtain goes down on an act, you have no idea what is coming up next." Beginning on Friday — at the unusually early hour of 8 p.m. — that next thing is Baroque opera."Eliogabalo" is Cavalli's last surviving work for the stage. He wrote it with his longtime librettist Aurelio Aureli for the Venetian carnival season of 1668. The plot focuses on the final stages of the emperor's life, without any reference to his bisexuality. Instead, Cavalli's Eliogabalo is a proto-Don Giovanni, whose rapacious sexual appetite threatens the opera's two virtuous couples. In one scene the emperor, dressed in women's clothes, addresses the prostitutes in his newly appointed senate and leads them in a game of blindfolded groping that is designed to determine their cabinet positions. The opera ends with Eliogabalo's offstage murder and the felicitous reunion of the couples he had threatened to break up.Little wonder, then, that Cavalli's opera was never performed during his lifetime. (It received its first performance in 1999 in Crema, Italy, the composer's birthplace.) Ellen Rosand, a professor of music at Yale and a specialist in early Venetian opera, said that contemporary audiences would have understood it as an indictment of the corruption of Venice's own senate."I think that was something you could not make fun of in Venice," Ms. Rosand said, "because their senate was their pride and joy, and there was a large participation of the populace in it."Mauro Calcagno, an associate professor of music at Stony Brook University, who prepared the critical edition of "Eliogabalo" used by Gotham Chamber Opera, traces the censorship back to the owners of the theater for which Cavalli worked, the brothers Giovanni Carlo and Vincenzo Grimani, two teenage noblemen. (In 1642, when it was owned by their uncle, Giovanni Grimani, their theater, Santi Giovanni e Paolo, had hosted the premiere of Monteverdi's "Incoronazione di Poppea." )  Mr. Calcagno said he suspects that it was their last-minute intervention that led to Cavalli's dismissal; the firing of the theater's impresario, Marco Faustini; and the hasty rewriting of the libretto. "Eliogabalo" was staged in 1668 with new music by Giovanni Antonio Boretti, a 27-year-old Roman composer, and a plot with a drastically shortened and sanitized senate scene and a new ending, in which the emperor survives the assassination attempt by the guard, repents and continues to rule with the help of virtuous counsel."There was the practice of the broglio at the period, of selling political appointments for money," Mr. Calcagno said. "For the Venetians to see that, to see senators as prostitutes, especially for the Grimani family, it was too much. To modern audiences, he added, the opera's appeal lies in the way the sexual and the political mix, and in the resulting psychological turmoil."Cavalli writes wonderful music for these couples who are under this constant threat of rape, finding themselves in the opportunity of being close to this powerful guy," Mr. Calcagno said. "You can really hear what it is like to be under that kind of harassment."Musically Cavalli's "Eliogabalo" belongs to a tradition of recitative-heavy music drama that was then already falling out of fashion. That factor too, Ms. Rosand said, might have led to Cavalli's replacement by a younger composer who wrote a greater number of fashionable arias into the score. And questions of vice and virtue aside, the opera's sardonic view of history might have rankled not just noblemen but the wider audience of fun-seeking Venetians."In other Venetian operas the comedy is there for delight," Ms. Rosand said, "and this is perverted. It's like an anticarnival."A perfect fit for the Box, then, where live acts test the balance between the titillating and the repulsive. Gotham Chamber Opera's production of "Eliogabalo," directed by James Marvel and conducted by Grant Herreid, will use one of the Box's aerialists to impersonate an ominous owl. Audience members will be greeted by a live D.J. and a dance performance by members of Company XIV, which its choreographer, Austin McCormick, describes as "androgenous Baroque burlesque."The costumes, designed by Mattie Ullrich, will, Mr. Goren said, be "amazing and very sexy.""It's sort of David Bowie with ancient Imperial Roman overtones," he added. "It's not a toga production. It's sexy glam rock."
On " The Stars (Are Out Tonight) ," the new single from David Bowie's comeback album, "The Next Day," one line jumps out: "We will never be rid of these stars." In the video Mr. Bowie and the actress Tilda Swinton play an elderly couple persecuted by a pair of vampiric stars, who stalk them, invade their house and manipulate them like marionettes. But the song itself is less literal. It portrays celebrities as members of an overlord class who "burn you with their radiant smiles" but also as faintly pitiable creatures, jealous of the quiet, grounded lives of ordinary folk. "But I hope they live forever," Mr. Bowie sings, a nod to the notion of fame as immortality, a compensation for all the damage and delusion that comes with the territory.Fame and death are closely braided themes shadowing "The Next Day," which is receiving acclaim as Mr. Bowie's strongest album in decades. Imagery of decay, debility and dejection pervade the record: "Here am I/Not quite dead/My body left to rot in a hollow tree," Mr. Bowie sings on the title track. For most of the 21st century Mr. Bowie had disappeared from view, even as the glam theatricality and gender-bending he pioneered was dominating pop through figures like Lady Gaga. Most assumed that he'd effectively retired, physically exhausted after a major heart attack and surgery in 2004, creatively spent after four decades of self-reinvention. But in a brilliantly organized stealth attack he returned without warning in January with the wistful single "Where Are We Now?," the herald for "The Next Day," which is out on Columbia on Tuesday.The album, his first in a decade, asserts Mr. Bowie's continued relevance as a musician and songwriter. Dark in theme and surprisingly harsh sounding, "The Next Day" nods to high points in his past, notably "Lodger," from 1979, but the lyrics are unusually direct and unflinching for an artist who has often hidden behind masks or wrapped bleakness in obliqueness. Meanwhile Mr. Bowie's stature in pop history as the performer who most convincingly bridged the gap between art and rock is being shored up by "David Bowie Is," a retrospective opening March 23 at the Victoria and Albert Museum in London, a celebration of his mastery of all the nonaudio aspects of pop, including clothes, stage sets, record artwork and video.With "The Stars," a superstar's critique of celebrity culture could be taken as somewhat hypocritical of course. Mr. Bowie has always had an ambivalent attitude toward fame. His biggest American hit of the 1970s, "Fame," was a harrowing dispatch from inside the paranoid bubble of stardom. He's often returned to the subject, as with his 1999 album " 'Hours ...,'" an exploration of "fame as injury," in the words of the Bowieologist Nick Stevenson, and the new album's "(You Will) Set the Earth on Fire," the sales pitch of a Svengali to a potential protégé. Mr. Bowie's career has been governed by a bipolar rhythm, alternating between relentless pursuit of the limelight and shattered retreat from it. Now, after his longest musical break ever, this 66-year old Englishman and New York resident is back for what could well be his last blast, the supernova of his stardom.Yet while Mr. Bowie himself receded for the past decade, the Bowie-esque has been omnipresent. After the '90s, a period dominated by the grit and authenticity of grunge and gangsta rap, the 2000s saw the return of artifice and glitter. The things that Mr. Bowie explored to the hilt, alongside his fellow glam rockers like Roxy Music and Alice Cooper, during the early '70s — over-the-top theatricality and staging, extremist fashion and sexual androgyny — became defining principles of 21st-century pop. Lady Gaga is the most visible of his inheritors, with her freaky costumes and her gender games (the male alter ego Jo Calderone; the artfully concocted rumor that she's a hermaphrodite).  Adam Lambert, the "American Idol" graduate, called his first major tour Glam Nation. Beyoncé made a Ziggy Stardust-like gambit by creating the persona Sasha Fierce as a vehicle for her walk-on-the-wild-side impulses. Above all there's Nicki Minaj, whose guises include the gay male Roman Zolanski and the ultrafeminine cartoon she calls Barbie. While it's unlikely that Ms. Minaj is directly influenced by Mr. Bowie, the parallels between his serial personas and her constant image changes are clear. As a host on the music channel Fuse put it, "She says she's just being herself, but who she is changes every day."Among Mr. Bowie's most famous pronouncements early in his career were "I feel like an actor when I'm onstage, rather than a rock artist," and "If anything, maybe I've helped establish that rock 'n' roll is a pose." Before Mr. Bowie came along, rock defined itself against showbiz and Hollywood. There was supposed to be a more-or-less direct correspondence between the performer and his real-life personality. But Mr. Bowie talked about playing characters, such as the rock god Ziggy Stardust, or the cold, remote Thin White Duke. Like a movie star taking on different roles that refract a fundamental, unchanging charisma, Mr. Bowie, in his heyday, was paradoxically the same and yet different each time he came before the public with a new album and tour.Mr. Bowie embraced metamorphosis from the start. In the mid-'60s he hopped through five bands and many styles and looks before connecting with the public around 1969. Once his career took off, the shape shifting took on a new urgency. Popular taste is fickle, but Mr. Bowie circumvented pop's cruel turnover by turning himself into the New Thing, again and again. As he said in 1977: "My policy has been that as soon as a system or process works, it's out of date. I move on to another area." Perhaps the fashion world has so lionized Mr. Bowie (Gucci is a sponsor of the London exhibition) because he has so thoroughly assimilated fashion's own logic of remorseless supercession.But there's more to Mr. Bowie's compulsive changeability than a career strategy. What he was really developing during the '70s was a new postmodern psychology based around flux and mutability. His great precursor and influence here was Warhol, the inspiration for his 1971 song "Andy Warhol" and a role Mr. Bowie would actually play in the 1996 biopic "Basquiat."  Analyzing Warhol, the art critic Donald Kuspit wrote of "the protean artist-self with no core" — a description that could also fit Mr. Bowie.
Hector Delgado gave up being a reggaetón artist five years ago to become an evangelical preacher in Puerto Rico. So it was something of a surprise when his former manager, Javier Gómez, called him three weeks ago and said his voice could be clearly heard on "Harlem Shake," a song that had gone viral on the Internet and then climbed to the top of the pop chart.He wasn't alone. Jayson Musson, a rapper from Philadelphia, received an excited call from another member of the former rap collective Plastic Little, who told him that his voice could be heard on the hit song as well, yelling out the key phrase "Do the Harlem Shake!"Neither gave permission to the song's producer and writer, Harry Bauer Rodrigues, who records under the name Baauer, to use snippets of their records, they said. "It's almost like they came on my land and built a house," Mr. Delgado said.Both Mr. Musson and Mr. Delgado are seeking compensation from Mad Decent Records, which put out the single last year. The label and Mr. Rodrigues declined to comment. But the tale of how an obscure dance track containing possible copyright violations rose to the top of pop charts illustrates not only the free-for-all nature of underground dance music but also the power of an Internet fad to create a sudden hit outside the major-label system.Obtaining licenses to use samples has become standard practice in the music industry, and in most cases a license is needed from both the music publisher and the record label that made the master recording. Courts have held that even a short sample entitles the sampled artist to royalties; the amount is negotiable.But small labels, like Mad Decent, sometimes lack the resources to have lawyers vet releases and instead rely on producers to make sure recordings are free of copyright problems. These labels frequently have little to do with the production of the tracks, especially in electronic dance music."You don't have the same checks and balances that you would if it were done by a corporation with a legal department," said David Israelite, the president and chief executive of the National Music Publishers Association."Harlem Shake" has been at the top of the Billboard 100 pop chart for three weeks and as of Friday had sold 816,000 digital downloads, according to Nielsen SoundScan. It benefited from a recent change in Billboard's methodology to include YouTube views along with radio airplay and singles sales in its ranking.The song was released last May on Jeffrees, a sublabel of Mad Decent that lets producers release dance tracks without signing a contract giving the label exclusive rights to the song, label executives told Billboard magazine. The label initially offered "Harlem Shake" as a free download, then began charging for it in June as part of EP.But sales of the song did not shoot up until last month, when it became the soundtrack for a YouTube dance craze. The fad involved people posting wacky videos of themselves dancing convulsively in absurd costumes to the first 30 seconds of the track, which begins with Mr. Delgado, whose stage name was Hector El Father, singing, "Con los terroristas" ("With the terrorists"). Mr. Musson sings "Do the Harlem shake" 15 seconds into the track, a cue for the dancers to thrash around wildly.As thousands of people uploaded videos, demand for the original track spiraled, and Baauer became an overnight star, appearing on the cover of Billboard.The track has roots in Philadelphia's dance and hip-hop scene, where Mr. Rodrigues, 23, of Brooklyn, has worked as a disc jockey under the name Cap'n Harry. Mr. Rodrigues told The Daily Beast that he found the recording of Mr. Delgado online. "The dude in the beginning I got off the Internet, I don't even know where," he said.The sample can be traced back to a remix of Mr. Delgado's 2006 single "Maldades" from the album "The Bad Boy," released on Machete records, on which it was a refrain. He used it on other songs as well. "It's like a trademark of Hector's," Mr. Gómez, the former manager, said.In 2010 two Philadelphia disc jockeys — Skinny Friedman and DJ Apt One — borrowed the recording of the line to spice up a remix of another dance track by Gregor Salto called "Con Alegría," which they released on their own Young Robots label on the album "Moombhaton de Acero." They also included the snippet on a 2011 collection of beats for disc jockeys, "T&A Breaks 3: Moombahton Loops and Samples."Mr. Delgado has yet to take legal action against the Philadelphia producers, whose remix was not a hit, Mr. Gómez said.The recording of Mr. Musson's exhortation to "do the Harlem Shake" comes from "Miller Time," a 2001 rap by the Philadelphia group Plastic Little. In an e-mail Mr. Musson, who lives in New York and works under the name Hennessy Youngman, said he found out that Mr. Baauer had used his vocal line in late February, when a former member of the group, Kurt Hunte, pointed it out.Mr. Musson said he called Mr. Rodrigues and thanked him for "doing something useful with our annoying music" Still, he said that he was negotiating with Mad Decent over compensation and that, though no agreement had been reached, the discussions had been friendly."Mad Decent have been more than cooperative during this," he added in an e-mail. He declined to give details. Mr. Gómez said the founder of Mad Decent, the disc jockey Thomas Pentz, who records under the name Diplo, telephoned Mr. Delgado and his former manager, last month. Mr. Gómez said Mr. Pentz had told Mr. Delgado that he was unaware the single contained the vocal line from "The Bad Boy" when the single was released. Mr. Pentz declined a request to be interviewed.Since that call, Mr. Gómez said, lawyers for Machete Music, which is owned by Universal Music Group, have been negotiating with Mad Decent over payment for the sample."Hector will get what he deserves," he said. "We can turn around and stop that song. That's a clear breaking of intellectual property rights."
Peter Gelb, the general manager of the Metropolitan Opera, now says that it was not the most fortunate choice of words when he recently attributed a decline in attendance at the house to the "cannibalization" of the audience by the company's high-definition broadcasts.Yet that comment gained attention because it taps into some reservations that many opera buffs and critics have had since Mr. Gelb began the Met's pioneering venture of bringing live performances to movie theaters with HD screening capacity.In many ways the project, which started in 2006, has been an indisputable success. The Feb. 16 broadcast of the Met's wildly colorful new production of Verdi's "Rigoletto," updated to Las Vegas in the early 1960s, grossed $2.6 million in North American movie theaters alone, with an estimated audience of 113,000 in more than 800 outlets, according to the Met. An additional 125,000 saw the broadcast on 900 screens in 30 countries throughout Europe, the Middle East, Russia and Latin America.The recent broadcast of Wagner's "Parsifal" grossed $1.6 million in North America. It is hard to imagine the broadcast of a 1914 Italian rarity, Riccardo Zandonai's "Francesca da Rimini," on Saturday, doing that well. But you never know.Still, if opera fans in the greater New York area get used to the convenience and affordability of seeing performances in their local movie houses, will they eventually stop coming to the Met? And will live video performances, with close-up camerawork, vivid sound systems and intermission interviews, become more appealing to some than seeing an opera from a top balcony seat in a big house?Mr. Gelb made his "cannibalization" comment late last month when the Met announced a slight reduction in ticket prices for the 2013-14 season as an inducement to operagoers. In a recent phone interview Mr. Gelb said that in describing the impact of the HD broadcasts on attendance at the house he had meant to emphasize the positive.Looked at in context, he said, "we have quadrupled our paying audience." The decline of ticket-buyers at the house is just a couple of percentage points, he explained. The total "paying audience" is slightly over three million, which includes up to 800,000 attendees at the Met each season.Who is going to the HD broadcasts, especially in the New York area? The Met has done some surveying, Mr. Gelb said. The results suggest that most attendees are already interested in opera. Whether the HD venture will convert new audiences into operagoers is another question.For decades the Met's live Saturday matinee radio broadcasts were incalculably beneficial to the growth of opera. Countless famous singers and conductors grew up listening to those broadcasts. Especially in the days before opera on television or on video became more common, there was something magical about those broadcasts. It was almost like being there, even though you had to envision the sets, the costumes, the action. You imagined what Birgit Nilsson as Turandot or Joan Sutherland as Lucia looked like as you listened enthralled to their vocal artistry.That was certainly my experience. Living in the New York area, I was able to attend quite a few operas at the Met through my high school years. But on Saturday afternoons, when I did not have a track meet at school or was practicing the piano, I was tuned in to the Met. And it was not just hearing the legends like Franco Corelli and Jon Vickers that excited me. There were many surprises, singers of less renown who proved unexpectedly amazing. Like the day in 1982 (by then I was teaching in Boston) when the soprano Ruth Welting in Offenbach's "Tales of Hoffmann" absolutely nailed the mechanical-doll Olympia's showpiece aria: here was a tour de force of brilliant, effortless coloratura singing and comic delivery. The audience went crazy.My point is that the live radio broadcasts were (and for many people remain) the next best thing to being at the Met.But the HD broadcasts are like an alternative opera experience, with sophisticated camerawork, high-quality sound systems and the ambience that comes from being part of an audience in a movie theater. The broadcasts are invaluable, of course, and the sophistication of the directing is beyond what would seem possible to accomplish live.Somehow, though, the HD broadcasts do not stoke your desire to see the production in person, as the radio broadcasts did in the old days. Many critics and fans have felt, and I often agree, that some of the Met's recent productions come across better on HD than in the house — Robert Lepage's staging of Wagner's "Ring," for one.Those young people who see their first operas in HD broadcasts might easily conclude that they get what opera is all about. It might be a hard sell to convince these newcomers that no matter what they thought about seeing "Parsifal" in a movie theater, opera is not opera unless you hear those amazing voices live in a house with splendid natural acoustics, like the Met.I remember as an adolescent sitting in the stratosphere of the Met where the beautiful sound of Leontyne Price's pianissimo high notes as Aida would float up and surround me. You cannot have such an experience in a cinema.It makes sense that a majority of those attending HD broadcasts are already hooked on opera. They know how to enjoy the special qualities of the video broadcasts because they know what the real thing is. And, as Mr. Gelb said in the phone interview, the Met can rightly take pride that broadcasts have "extended the operagoing life of older customers," those people who have become too frail to make as many trips to Lincoln Center as they used to.Surveys have shown that the decline in the Met's audience has come from "outlying areas of New York," Mr. Gelb said, with people who used to visit the Met now simply finding it easier to stop by the local movie house on Saturday.The Met's statistics on the project are impressive. Consider this: In Austria and Germany alone, some 39,000 people went to movie theaters to attend the HD broadcast of "Rigoletto." But the questions linger over the long-term effects of this success.
Judging by the old rules and metrics, the boy band has been severely debased in the last couple of years. Gone are the song-and-dance extravaganza groups of decades past. What we have now are the Wanted and One Direction, British imports whose nonchalance can feel like an undermining commentary on the traditional model.Change is good, of course, but this evolution leaves a huge gap at the classicist end of the boy-band spectrum, which is why the un-self-conscious Los Angeles foursome Mindless Behavior — with its extreme outfits, its buoyant dancing and its, um, wide range of vocal skill — is so refreshing.The enjoyable, breathless "All Around the World" (Streamline/Conjunction/Interscope) is the second Mindless Behavior album, following "#1 Girl," from 2011, and it demonstrates both how much energy still goes into making teen-oriented music and also how easy it can be to overlook strong music when it comes out of the mouths of babes.Mindless Behavior has four members: Prodigy, Princeton, Ray Ray and Roc Royal, all in their midteens and all younger than their British counterparts. Prodigy does most of the heavy vocal lifting, though the work is now slightly better distributed than it was on the group's debut album. The songs travel well-worn territory: learning about love, pining for love, etc. But this is an age of accelerated youth, and the way these young men want to build relationships is modern.Their universe is one of retweets and Twitpics, hotel rooms and video chats. It's maybe not surprising that the most affecting song on this album is the one about the ending of a relationship between two stars who shine so brightly they can't occupy the same space anymore. "I guess it's official, you don't wanna kick it with a five-star stunna like me," goes one line in the song, "Used to Be." "We used to be like Jay and Beyoncé, Brad and Angelina," goes another.These are songs beyond the members' age. Others touch on the magical properties of older women ("Pretty Girl") and the utility of the recorded image in courtship ("Video"). "Keep Her on the Low" makes knowing references to Menudo and the Jackson 5. (In the documentary "Mindless Behavior: All Around the World," which was released on Friday, the group members are shown making a pilgrimage to the house in Gary, Ind., where the Jacksons grew up.)The music, largely produced by Walter W. Millsap III and Candice C. Nelson, neatly intertwines most of the pop gestures of the last few years — some dance-music stuttering, some paper-thin soul, some pop maximalism. With its high-energy dance-R&B, Mindless Behavior recalls decadent, late-period 'NSync more than any other boy band of the current era. The Wanted is more blatantly European, leaning on four-on-the-floor dance music structures, and One Direction would prefer to not be coordinated in any way, as evidenced by its lack of dance moves and music that borrows widely from outside teenage pop.It's notable, also, that the members of Mindless Behavior are, unlike those of the Wanted or One Direction, African-American. As a result the group is not often mentioned in the same breath as its boy-band brethren. It's also experienced a different level and type of success: it's had hits on the R&B chart but has barely made a dent on the pop chart.That's partly because pop has steadily absorbed black styles; many of the things Mindless Behavior is good at already exist elsewhere. It's a shift from the 1980s, when New Edition had significant pop success, even as its sound was polished up and repackaged by New Kids on the Block. (New Edition's members also went on to significant post-group careers.) When B2K arrived in the early 2000s, it caught some of the tail wind of 'NSync's boy band success, but it faded quickly. And as hip-hop became pop's real crossover engine, R&B began to resegregate, at least until the recent dance-R&B crossover moment.Mindless Behavior may have a trick up its sleeve, though. Near the end of the new album is "Forever," and it's a curveball: a slow, guitar-driven ballad. Though it has some keyboard swells and some digital enhancement, it remains straightforward throughout. In concert, it'll require stools to sit on, not exuberant dance moves. It sounds a lot like a One Direction song. Watch out.
AUSTIN, Tex. — When the South by Southwest music festival started here 26 years ago, it was known as a place to discover new bands, a fertile hunting ground for booking agents and scouts for labels. These days indie labels and booking agents generally use the festival to promote the artists they have already signed, like vendors at a trade show. The major labels do too, often booking several shows for musicians they have just signed to contracts in hopes of generating excitement for debut albums. Every year a few major stars who have new releases out also make appearances.But with 2,200 bands doing shows, there are still dozens of unsigned and obscure groups in search of a booking agent or a record deal, and on the fringes there are still hungry booking agents scouring Austin for new talent. And that is why John Bohannon, 25, an agent for Panache Booking in Brooklyn, was pushing his way into the beery air of Hotel Vegas on Tuesday night to see Holy Wave, a psychedelic band from El Paso."They keep popping up on bills with bands I like," he said. "I checked them out and I like it but I have no idea what they are like live."The barroom started to fill, as Holy Wave, a five-piece rock outfit, started to play long, loud wall-of-sound songs built around two or three chords and simple introspective refrains, mixing surf rock with bubbling psychedelia. The band had an old-fashioned 1960s light show, using two overhead projectors, stencils and drops of food color in a glass dish. Soon the room was full of people bopping and dancing, a fact Mr. Bohannon noted with a nod."Obviously I'm not the only one," he said.But as the set wound down, he slipped out without talking to the group, moving on to another show. He said the process of deciding to make an offer to a band was tricky, driven by gut instincts and word-of-mouth recommendations from other musicians he likes. Sometimes, he said, it pays to wait awhile before committing, even if you have a good first impression."I want something exciting and that is going to excite other people as well," he said. "Sometimes I know that within the first 10 minutes of seeing a band. Sometimes I know it within a year."I don't want to pick something up that's just getting a lot of buzz," he went on. "I want to get something that I'm going to be passionate about for many years. It's more than just a client to me."Tuesday night ended for Mr. Bohannon without his running into another noteworthy band, but on Wednesday night he was at the Main, a club on Sixth Street with a half-open roof, where the League of Extraordinary Gz, an Austin rap collective, was doing a raucous set for a crowd of mostly local fans — many of whom wore the band's T-shirts and waved giant foam hands with its logo.Mr. Bohannon said he had had informal talks with some members of the collective and with an Austin promoter about developing a Southern rap show in New York and other cities, though the project was in its early stages."This is something that's very regional," he said. "The goal is to take it to other regions and make it successful as a whole."The eight members of the group were a high-energy bunch, rapping with distinctive Texas twang and pogo dancing nonstop. During a rap about being arrested for smoking marijuana, they threw joints into the crowd and insulted the police in graphic terms.Mr. Bohannon grew up in Louisville, Ky., and said hip-hop was the first music to inspire him, though he later became fascinated with heavy metal, then migrated to experimental electronic music. (He dabbles as a musician himself, making experimental recordings under the name Ancient Ocean.) Currently Mr. Bohannon represents 25 musicians, including rappers, folk singers, electronic musicians, punk rock acts and alternative rockers.Panache is a little agency, mostly booking independent musicians for tours of small and medium-size clubs. "I would always much rather see a packed small room than a half-empty bigger room," Mr. Bohannon said.When the League of Extraordinary Gz finished, Mr. Bohannon moved quickly out the door and navigated the crowds along Sixth Street, making his way to Friends bar toward his main quarry for the evening: Eagulls, a British punk band from Leeds. It was the first time the Eagulls had played in the United States, but Mr. Bohannon said he had been tracking the band's progress in Britain for months.Entering the bar, he headed over to the Eagulls' manager, Dan McEvoy, and commenced schmoozing. Beers were consumed, jokes were told, favorite musicians were compared. As the band took the stage, Mr. Bohannon glanced around and said: "There are a couple of other agents in this room and that's fine. That's just part of it."Influenced by post-punk bands like Magazine and Siouxsie and the Banshees, the Eagulls hammered out melodic chord riffs over a propulsive punk beat. They are five working-class boys in their early 20s, who had to take leave from their jobs as stock clerks and barmen to go to Austin.The lead singer, George Mitchell, a lanky 25-year-old with good looks and a Cramps T-shirt, belted out his shrill lyrics with refrains like "I'm possessed" and "I'm molting." He performed with a dazed look, staggering drunkenly with a beer in his hand. (He was sober, playing a part.)When they had finished, Mr. Bohannon turned up his casual charm, bantering with each of the band members individually and buying drinks for an hour after the set. The drummer, Tom Kelly, swore loudly when he heard that Mr. Bohannon had seen Iggy Pop earlier in the evening, a show the band members had been unable to get into because of long lines."You work with me, and I will get you into shows like that," Mr. Bohannon said with a smile.The group had been contacted by at least four agents, Mr. McEvoy said. Mr. Kelly, the drummer, said the band members had yet to decide on a booking agent for the United States. "We are out for what's good for us," he said. "Know what I mean?"As Mr. Bohannon left the bar, he declined to say whether he had made a formal offer to the band. "I get a good energy off of them," he said. "I see the potential in what they are doing. I see something in that band that you don't see every day."
Like a man writing his own obituary Dmitri Shostakovich composed his String Quartet No. 8 as a requiem for himself, weaving it together with an autobiographical motif consisting of the letters D-S-C-H.These letters — the first four of D. Schostakowitsch, the German spelling of his name — are translated to musical notes as D, E flat, C and B. The quartet opens with the cello playing the funereal sequence, which is then mournfully intoned by the other strings. A solo lament unfolds over a low drone before the other voices join in the plaintive dialogue. The piece includes multiple autobiographical references to previous works, including quotations from his First and Fifth Symphonies in the first movement.The Jerusalem Quartet will perform the work on Tuesday evening, alongside the 4th, 10th and 11th Quartets. The ensemble's series of four concerts featuring Shostakovich's complete cycle of 15 string quartets begins on Sunday afternoon at Alice Tully Hall, presented by the Chamber Music Society of Lincoln Center.Shostakovich wrote the Eighth Quartet in 1960, while visiting the ruins of Dresden, which was destroyed by an Allied bombing raid in 1945. He was on assignment to write a score for "Five Days, Five Nights," a film about the bombardment. While in Germany he completed the quartet in three days.There is a duality to much of Shostakovich's music, an outer veneer that broadcasts one message and an interior that conveys another, with censors and audiences at the time interpreting the scores according to their own predispositions.The published score of the Eighth Quartet included the subtitle "To the Victims of Fascism and War," although some scholars, and Shostakovich's children, have maintained that he didn't write the subtitle himself. On one level the Eighth can be heard as a narrative of Soviet repression and wartime destruction. "But even this public piece that deals with something collective is a very personal piece, in a way the 'Leningrad' Symphony is not," said Ori Kam, the Jerusalem's violist."The quartets in general are a window into Shostakovich's soul," he added.Along with many other artists at the time Shostakovich faced constant censorship and scrutiny, his music denounced as "formalist" by the Soviet authorities and banned on several occasions. Even a listener knowing nothing of the historical background of the works might well assume they were written in a climate of fear, discernible from the frequent evocations of paranoid shadows and scurrying footsteps anxiously woven through many of his works. Much of his music attains panic-inducing climaxes, as the Eighth Quartet does in the second movement.This section is trademark Shostakovich. Frantic repeated motifs escalate with nerve-shattering intensity, reflecting the mind-set of a man who in 1948, when expecting to be arrested, slept by the elevator in his apartment building so his family wouldn't be startled by a knock on the door in the night. Shostakovich often wove Jewish themes and folk songs into his music, an increasingly dangerous interest during Stalin's anti-Semitic campaigns during the 1940s and '50s. In the second movement of the Eighth Quartet he quotes a Jewish theme from his Piano Trio No. 2.Sardonic waltzes, like the eerie one that unfolds in the third movement, are another Shostakovich trademark, this one based on the D-S-C-H motif. He also refers to a cello concerto written the previous year for Rostropovich.The three urgent fortissimo chords that open the fourth movement against a low drone and resurface later in the section evoke the bombing of Dresden, a plaintive melody later unfolding like a requiem for the dead. Shostakovich refers to the revolutionary song "Tormented by Harsh Captivity" and an aria from his opera "Lady Macbeth of the Mtsensk District," which had been withdrawn from the stage after its denunciation by Stalin.The five movements are played without pause, "a beautiful arc that encompasses the depth of the human experience," Mr. Kam said. The final movement echoes the first, using the D-S-C-H motif in a somber fugue.The work's accessible and communicative language has helped render it the most popular of the 15 quartets, with stark emotional qualities as shattering as those of the late Beethoven quartets. Listening to them is certainly an intense experience, but Mr. Kam, who has performed the complete cycle with the Jerusalem Quartet on several occasions, said that while he thought the audience might want to hear a "nice Haydn or Mozart" quartet afterward, "that by the second concert the music communicates to the audience in a way it couldn't when just one quartet is programmed.""The Sixth Quartet is probably the only one I could say is optimistic," Mr. Kam said. "But I don't see the Eighth as depressing. I see it as very charged. It goes very deep into a person, into his inner world."According to Mr. Kam — who is of Russian descent but is the only member of the Jerusalem Quartet not born in the former Soviet Union — "the palettes of expression in Russian culture are more multifaceted than what we are used to in the West."He continued: "We think of sad as a negative thing, but for Russians there is a beautiful sad that is also cathartic. Every emotion is more multilayered in its meaning.""You leave these concerts feeling like you know the man," Mr. Kam added. "It sounds like a good sales pitch, but it is amazing. I saw the music differently after doing a cycle. No other composer embodies the period and place he lived in like Shostakovich. The Eighth Quartet is a piece of art that expresses that moment."
AUSTIN, Tex. — Two images linger from this year's South by Southwest Music festival, which ended Sunday after five nights and days with hundreds of performances. One has been the major part of SXSW for all of its 27 years: sharing the crowded sidewalks with sleep-deprived but bright-eyed musicians toting their own equipment to the next gig. The other is more recent: a 62-foot-high outdoor stage built to resemble a snack-chip vending machine that turned into a six-story video billboard when it wasn't showing live performances.It's the mixture of the venerable SXSW of baby bands looking to advance — to find an agent, manager, tour mates, licensing deal or label — and the newer SXSW of sponsorship, of branding and of marketing spring releases by well-known headliners. They're almost, but not quite, two different festivals, since many of the baby bands would be delighted to profit from the kind of commercial exploitation they can see all around them.SXSW, which also runs a film festival and a tech-oriented "interactive" festival in the days before SXSW Music, serves and reflects the businesses it convenes. And it is now thoroughly geared to the music business as disrupted by the Internet: where sales of recordings have fallen but avenues of exposure have multiplied, where selling a song for a commercial or soundtrack can be a rare windfall for an unknown band, and where all acts, new or established, are constantly scrambling for attention. A band at South by Southwest can perform literally day and night, from an eye-rubbing morning radio show broadcast to a midnight club show; all that effort lingers in shows archived online by sponsors, radio stations and stray YouTube contributors.But about that vending machine. A previous version of it arrived at last year's SXSW and was roundly reviled as the most obnoxiously commercial manifestation of the festival. The sponsor obviously doubled down, with an added fillip. The stage's prime lineup this year was a gathering of longtime hip-hop luminaries: LL Cool J, Doug E. Fresh, Public Enemy and Ice Cube. In the 1980s Public Enemy and Ice Cube made their reputations with angry, socially conscious lyrics that showed hip-hop how to be political. Now, cashing in on chips, they seemed to prove that absolutely everything is for sale.That was one thread of SXSW: big names and big productions with corporate tie-ins. There were also large sponsored shows — secret until nearly the last minute — by Prince and Justin Timberlake. And there were official SXSW showcases for well-known acts introducing new material or riding current hits, among them Green Day, Depeche Mode, Iggy Pop, Iron and Wine, Vampire Weekend, Nick Cave, Richard Thompson, Macklemore & Ryan Lewis, the Mexican band Café Tacvba (performing for thousands of fans on the outdoor Auditorium Shores stage), Natalie Maines (of the Dixie Chicks, going solo) and the duo of Emmylou Harris and Rodney Crowell.Disc jockeys from the upper echelons of electronic dance music were willing to play smaller rooms and shorter sets than usual to make a SXSW appearance. Rappers brought their posses on their coattails, as did Trae tha Truth, or expanded their solo ambitions, as Earl Sweatshirt from Odd Future did. Musicians can also pick up improbable collaborators at SXSW: The R&B singer Usher appeared halfway through an afternoon set by the Afghan Whigs, an indie-rock band fascinated by romantic strife, and suavely proved that his croon could sail over churning rock versions of his songs.Yet there were also more than 2,000 lesser-known acts struggling to get noticed — and for me they are the core of SXSW. They offer glimpses of whatever ideas are spreading across pop — which, this year, meant more electronics. In my very limited sampling it was clear that the big pomp-rock anthem, anchored by a march beat, is still thriving; some baby bands are seeking arena-scale sounds. Electronic dance music is also slipping into rock in both obvious and subtle ways. Synthesizers and programmed drumbeats percolate through the introspection and tentative self-affirmation of songs by Indians, from Copenhagen. Even with guitar-centered bands (like Girls Names, from Belfast, Northern Ireland), I heard longer instrumental passages that pushed songs toward the length and hypnotic repetition of dance tracks. The abstract blips and throbs of dance music are also making inroads in hip-hop for rappers like Mykki Blanco and Earl Sweatshirt.
Carnegie Hall will remain dark on this Wednesday and Thursday evenings. Ditto the New Jersey Performing Arts Center in Newark on Friday and the Kennedy Center Concert Hall in Washington on Saturday.The inactivity is not of their choosing. The San Francisco Symphony, which was to have filled those slots, canceled its East Coast tour on Sunday, when its management and musicians failed to reach an agreement on a new contract during a players' strike, then four days old.The strike was declared last Wednesday, just a week before the first scheduled Carnegie concert, and it was clear that the tour had become a major bargaining chip. This kind of brinkmanship, long a standard ploy in the negotiations of major American orchestras, often works.Not this time. And the implications for the institutions involved, financial and otherwise, are widespread."There are financial implications in all directions," said Clive Gillinson, the executive and artistic director of Carnegie Hall, "but we can only assess them after the fact. We've spent a lot on promotion, and we have to refund tickets for a house going on sold out. On the other hand, we don't have to pay the fee. I couldn't tell you at the moment where it will all land. We'll be behind, but not by a huge amount."Mr. Gillinson expressed concern mainly for the disappointed patrons. In this he was joined by Jonathan Kerr, the director of marketing and communications for the Washington Performing Arts Society, which was to present the Kennedy Center concert. The society, which was "on track for a sold-out performance," he said, is offering refunds or exchanging tickets for other concerts.It has presented performances by the San Francisco Symphony, one of its most popular attractions, over some 33 years, Mr. Kerr said."We look forward to having them back as soon as possible," he added.But of course the institution most affected is the orchestra itself. Like Mr. Gillinson, Brent Assink, the executive director of the San Francisco Symphony, said on Tuesday that it was too early to gauge the financial hit. But it will be big."We are in discussions with the airlines, the hotel, Amtrak, the trucking company," Mr. Assink said. "It shows the complexity of touring these days, how many people are involved."As for the larger implications for the orchestra's reputation, Mr. Assink lamented the loss of this exposure for the ensemble, with its music director, Michael Tilson Thomas, in standard repertory: Mahler's Ninth Symphony, Brahms's First and Beethoven's Piano Concerto No. 4.The programs, he said, are "carefully planned to showcase the development of the orchestra and its unique artistic profile." In their last Carnegie visit, a year ago, Mr. Thomas and the orchestra went all quirky with programs in their trademark series American Mavericks.The lost concerts were meant to show another side of their profile: the Mahler in particular. "These musicians," Mr. Assink said, "have inhabited Mahler." Over the last decade Mr. Thomas has recorded all the Mahler symphonies with them on the orchestra's own label, SFS Media.Mr. Assink also lamented the loss of exposure for Samuel Carl Adams, son of the noted California composer John Adams. The younger Mr. Adams's "Drift and Providence" was to have received its New York premiere, nestled amid those European classics. But Mr. Assink hinted strongly that this loss might be made good when the orchestra — the strike gods willing — returns to Carnegie Hall for two concerts in November (this time with Mahler's Third Symphony).There are big issues to be resolved first. The main sticking point in the dispute is salary. The players now start from a base salary of $141,700 a year. With additional media fees, overtime and supplements for key players, the average salary is $165,000.This, the players point out, places them third, after the musicians of the Chicago Symphony Orchestra and the Los Angeles Philharmonic. But they are also ahead of the New York Philharmonic, the Boston Symphony Orchestra and the Cleveland Orchestra.Benefits include 10 weeks' annual paid vacation. They also include options of health care at no cost to the musicians, though management is asking for increased premiums on one of the four health care plans offered, the one most sought after. This is the other main issue in the strike.The orchestra, which showed an $800,000 deficit on a $79.2 million budget for its 2011-12 fiscal year (a lower deficit than in the years immediately preceding), initially asked the players to accept a wage freeze for the first year of a new contract, with a 1 percent raise in each of the next two years. The latest proposal, turned down by the players, was for a 26-month agreement, with a salary increase of 1 percent during the first year and 2 percent during the second, for a new base salary of $145,979 by the end of the agreement.A spokesman for the players did not immediately respond to a telephone message.On their Web site the players point to more than $10 million spent on the orchestra's centennial celebration last year, though Mr. Assink disputes the figure and says that the cost was mostly underwritten by dedicated contributions. The musicians also point to plans for an expansion of the orchestra's home, the Louise M. Davies Symphony Hall, at a cost of half a billion dollars, though Mr. Assink says a project of that magnitude is still a dream, one arrived at by the board and management with the participation of players and likely to be scaled down considerably.In a separate statement on the players' site, David Gaudry, a violist and the chairman of the musicians' negotiating committee, cites "enormous bonuses and compensation to top executives and consultants." Mr. Assink's salary is currently frozen at $477,000 annually, which places him at the low end of his profession among top orchestras. He was awarded a one-time bonus of about half that amount for his long service. (He became the orchestra's general manager in 1990, its executive director in 1999.)With all that in play, talks continue, though at a slower pace, now that the time pressure of the tour has been lifted.
Lauren Mayberry has a few different voices: saccharine and heavily processed, sinewy and direct, proud and triumphant. On "Recover," the new single from the Glasgow band Chvrches, she uses them all. And yet they're all masks of a sort. At the core of this song, the title track of the new Chvrches EP (on Glassnote), is fear, maybe even weakness. "If I recover," she pleads, "will you be my comfort?" It's not even close to clear that the answer will be yes. "You take what you need/And you know you don't need me," she concludes at the end of the chorus, delivering heartbreaking news in a resilient tone.With Ms. Mayberry out front — the band also includes Iain Cook and Martin Doherty — Chvrches makes prickly early-'80s synth-pop that recalls fellow revivalists Robyn and La Roux, especially on "Now Is Not the Time," another song that delivers hard truths underneath the most sparkling exterior.The Kansas City label Strange Music has become one of the most prominent homes for hip-hop misfits, artists who — like the label founder Tech N9ne, who delivers high-energy performances in face paint but still maintains a sense of gravity — satisfy no typical checklist. Brotha Lynch Hung, who for two decades has been making grotesqueries about cannibalism and more, is a recent Strange signing, and a well-matched one. "Mannibalector" is his third album for the label, and it's as single-mindedly unsqueamish as his best past work.The less likely Strange signing, though, is Ces Cru, the strong duo of Godemis and Ubiquitous, who on "Constant Energy Struggles" revive late-'90s underground hip-hop, highly intricate and mildly abstract with some rough edges still extant. It's more traditional than the rest of what's on the label, but in this era, it's an equally unlikely choice.Two minutes into "Fake Heat," the second song on "Wyoming" (Big Legal Mess/Fat Possum), the second album by Water Liars, comes the first jolt: The band members Justin Kinkel-Schuster and Andrew Bryant singing, in strained, nasal, disruptive tandem, "Oh how hungrily/Oh how desperately/She looks at me." There's truth in it, and maybe a little wishful thinking, too. That's how the songs on this album operate, leavening revelation with wry self-assessment. This duo's dark, lonely, roots-minded indie rock is affecting, all the more for its sparseness. If too much was going on, Mr. Kinkel-Schuster's agonizing wouldn't be as clear as it is on "Linens" or "How Will I Call You." On these songs, he's the sort who knows he lets others down, and then in turn lets himself down, the sort of impossible conundrum captured in the excellent title "You Work Days I Work Nights.""Here's my worship," Tasha Cobbs sings tenderly at the beginning of "Smile," and it sounds like a humble enough offer. She implores the crowd to follow her lead. They do, and the sound swells. Within two minutes, it's a full-scale tempest, with guitars snarling, keys jabbing and Ms. Cobbs at the top, yowling but in firm control. "Grace" (EMI Gospel), the live album on which this song appears, is Ms. Cobbs's debut, and at its best it creates raging fires that begin as whispers. That's the case with her hit, "Break Every Chain," and with the elegant "For Your Glory," on which — with echoes of Oleta Adams's "Get Here" — Ms. Cobbs builds to a plea of devotion that she wears like defiance: "I will do anything/Just to see you/To behold you as my king."At the beginning of "Gangsta" (Vested in Culture/Epic), the new single by Kat Dahlia, there's the sound of rain and thunder, heavy-handed piano that's a first cousin to Tori Amos's and a taunting opening line stolen from 50 Cent: "You say you a gangsta." Ms. Dahlia then closes the thought tartly: "That don't impress me none." Ms. Dahlia, it turns out, is the tough one on this rough recitation of struggle — "My mommy started working days at the church/Finding faith in God 'cause the real world hurts" — and self-empowerment sung in a pulpy, brooding voice."Gangsta" is part of a three-song EP full of gestures — the husky, dark singing, the distinct Caribbean influence on the mystifying "Money Party" — that are familiar and modern. That's because Ms. Dahlia is the first identifiably post-Rihanna R&B aspirant or, depending on your charity level, the first to so aggressively pilfer Rihanna. Her grit, though, is tactile, whether it's earned or just worn well.
WAGNER AND VERDI are destined to be linked forever, however awkwardly, since they were both born in 1813: Wagner in Leipzig, Germany, on May 22; Verdi in little Roncole, Italy, in the Duchy of Parma, on Oct. 9 or 10. (The records are not clear.)They never met and had little good to say about each other. Wagner tended to be circumspect on the subject of Verdi. But in an 1899 interview with a German newspaper Verdi, then 86, called Wagner "one of the greatest geniuses" who left treasures of "immortal worth." Verdi added that as an Italian, he could not claim to "understand everything" in Wagner. But before "Tristan und Isolde," he declared, "I stand in wonder and terror."Yeah, sure. The scholar Richard Taruskin, in his magnum opus, "The Oxford History of Western Music," persuasively suggests that though some of Verdi's praise may have been sincere, there is "sufficient evidence of leg pulling" in the old man's answer to a fawning German interviewer.For the most part Wagner and Verdi existed as titans in their separate realms. By midcentury Verdi had become the Italian opera composer best known and most performed in Europe. Commissions even came to him from St. Petersburg ("La Forza del Destino") and Cairo ("Aida"). He was a colossus who expanded on and experimented with the Italian tradition but never really moved beyond it.Wagner, on the other hand, was seen as the herald for the music of the future after Liszt conducted the premiere of "Lohengrin" in Weimar in 1850. The enduring power of Wagnerism first struck me when I was an impressionable music major at Yale and took a course on the history of 19th-century music. On the first day the professor, Robert Bailey, a respected Wagner scholar, divided the century into three periods: pre-Wagner, Wagner and post-Wagner. Poor Verdi barely rated a mention.During this year of parallel celebrations of the Verdi and Wagner bicentennials, opera companies everywhere are presenting their works. The Metropolitan Opera has already weighed in with adventurous new productions of Verdi's "Rigoletto" (the "Rat Pack Rigoletto," updated to 1960s Las Vegas) and Wagner's "Parsifal" (a postapocalyptic vision of this drama of spiritual questing). Recently Deutsche Grammophon issued a commemorative boxed set of the complete Wagner operas (43 CDs). Then Decca weighed in with the complete Verdi works in a limited special edition (75 discs).While it is tempting to try to find links in the composers' work, such efforts usually seem strained. But for me one thing they had in common illuminates certain aspects of their achievements: Both were devotees of Beethoven.Beethoven, who wrote music of stunning dramatic intensity, was no natural at opera. It took him three tries to get "Fidelio," his one completed project, right. Despite awkward dramaturgy the opera is musically stupendous and deeply moving. Yet in Beethoven's symphonic and instrumental works Verdi (to some degree) and Wagner (decidedly) found a pathway to musical drama. The generation of symphonic composers that followed Beethoven was in awe of him. They struggled to channel the Romantic fervor of the age, along with its advancing harmonic vocabulary, into symphonic and sonata forms held over from the Classical era. You could argue that Verdi and Wagner did better at honoring the Beethoven tradition by adapting his techniques to opera.This was especially true of Wagner. In a thick edition of Wagner's letters, the scholars Stewart Spencer and Barry Millington describe the creative dilemma he faced in the early 1850s. Having laid down his new principles of music drama Wagner had to grapple with a big challenge: how, the scholars write, "as an inheritor of the classical symphonic tradition reaching its apogee in Beethoven, but as one whose inspirations were fundamentally literary and dramatic, he was to find a vehicle appropriate for those inspirations."At 15 Wagner had finished writing a grand tragic drama. His determination to compose incidental music for the play in the manner of Beethoven's "Egmont" prodded him to begin studies in harmony.At 17 he wrote to the Schott publishing house trying to sell his solo piano arrangement of Beethoven's Ninth Symphony, a project he said he undertook in the hope of making this "misunderstood" masterpiece "more readily accessible." Schott took a pass. Two years later Wagner resubmitted his arrangement, offering it free, if only the firm would send him some recent Beethoven publications, including the Opus 127 and 131 String Quartets. It is revealing that the young Wagner was drawn to these late, visionary quartets, astounding works that mystified most musicians, let alone the public, at the time.
Lil Wayne has long been one of hip-hop's loosest cannons, but his narrative changed dramatically in 2010 after his release from Rikers Island jail, where he spent eight months on a weapons charge. For three years at least, sobriety was to be his sidekick. As part of a plea agreement in a separate drug possession case, he consented to regular drug tests .That fate hung over him like a cloud. He spoke about it not as an addict reformed but as someone wrongly separated from his tonic. "I wish I could be back on it," he told GQ in 2011, when asked about syrup, the promethazine-codeine concoction. "I was on something that the doctor prescribed. I was ill, and that was helping me."This month, when TMZ reported that Lil Wayne had been hospitalized for seizures related to excessive syrup consumption, it wasn't hard to believe. (His team insisted the reports were untrue.) But a few days later, at least, all seemed to be fine. He posted a video in which he seemed lucid and giddy, and invited doubters to "kiss my fist."That's an allusion to a lyric on a song — "Beat" for short; the rest is unprintable — on his new album, "I Am Not a Human Being II" (Cash Money). Art isn't proof of sobriety, or of anything really, but this album is consistent with the rest of the music from Lil Wayne's sober period: literal, conventional, spotty. He may or may not be struggling with drugs, but his music sounds almost nothing like drug-era Lil Wayne. It's less manic, less experimental, less unpredictable and, oddly, less consistent."I Am Not a Human Being II" is slapdash, a mix of blustering boasts, spiteful sex, warm sex, inside jokes, puerile snickering and flashes of self-realization. At times he is rapping with ferocity; at others, with swing; at others, with just the barest of attention. He still radiates exuberance and ecstasy and rebelliousness, the hallmarks of his rise to hip-hop's creative and commercial peaks. But the words he puts together don't shock the way they once did.Lil Wayne's sober era also coincides with the height of his celebrity. No longer is he a mixtape warrior building a fan base by samizdat flood. He's now one of the three or four most vivid personalities in the genre. And he's confident: even though he's not at his lyrical peak, he collaborates with artists who are.Gunplay, on "Beat," is sneering and direct, and Gudda Gudda, on "Gunwalk," sprinkles a little dry, dark wit: "The nose on the pistol 'bout as long as Scottie Pippen's." And 2 Chainz is impressive on "Rich" — again, that's the abbreviated, printable version of the title — hitting hard without being as overt as he typically is.What Lil Wayne has left as a rapper is a fluidity of style, which he changes from song to song, to mixed effect. On "Curtains" he's merely declaiming clunkily, but on "Gunwalk" he's rapping fast and sharp. "No Worries," the first hit from this album, is almost goofy, but "Rich" is focused and tart.The hit "Love Me" blends all these instincts together; it feels tossed off, but also comfortable. It features Future and Drake, the artists who have done the most remolding of mainstream hip-hop in the past couple of years, and Lil Wayne, flexible himself, more or less keeps up. It's also the most modern song here, not counting the excellent bonus track, "Lay It Down," basically a remix of "Easy Easy" by TNGHT, the electronic music duo of Lunice and Hudson Mohawke.But modernity has never been a primary concern of Lil Wayne. Even at his peak he felt detached from hip-hop's sonic center. On his new album he's still indulging his vestigial rock urges on the thrashing, semi-successful "Hello," and the surprisingly sprightly pop-punk of "Hot Revolver" (another bonus track), which nods to Green Day's "Basket Case" and features Lil Wayne at his froggy, cheerful best. These are songs without an obvious home, except in Lil Wayne's fun house.More familiar are the drug references, which are spare by comparison to, say, his 2007 work, but are sprinkled across this album like winks from an old lover. "I got Xanax, Percocet, promethazine with codeine," he raps on "Rich." On "Trigger Finger" he coos, "Ain't nothing sweet but the codeine."Unsurprisingly one of the songs on which he sounds the most coherent here is the one that's uncomplicatedly about the joys of drugs. "Trippy," which features Juicy J, is as close to vintage Lil Wayne as this album gets. "My skin crawl and my walls talk/and the pictures in here looking at me," he raps, with a convincing nervous edge. Later he flirts with some of the unexpected free association that made his old songs so entrancing: "I'm stoned, Mick Jagger, I can run around Saturn/Eyes rolling back and keep blinking like hazards."At one point he boasts, "I graduated to better drugs/My cap and gown on." So, high on life, then?
Plenty of unknown musicians start arguments over online piracy. Few get the chance to do so on a 15,000-square-foot video billboard overlooking Times Square.For the last week a mysterious ad has flashed on the LED billboard above the American Eagle Outfitters store at Broadway and 46th Street, just over the bronze shoulder of George M. Cohan. Variably positing piracy as "criminal," "progress" and "the future," it asks the observer to "pick a side" on Twitter, as #artistsforpiracy or #artistsagainstpiracy.The display runs for just 30 seconds, four times an hour, alternating with images of tourists and scantily clad models. But the discussion it has stirred shows that unauthorized file sharing still touches a nerve in the music industry. The campaign asks artists to make what can be a torturous choice: Is it better to charge for music and probably limit your audience, or embrace all the ways music can spread online, without permission or remuneration?The party behind the billboard and its related Web site, ArtistsVsArtists.com, is Ghost Beach, a two-man Brooklyn band whose profile is low even by indie Brooklyn standards: about 8,800 Facebook likes and zero Pitchfork hits. Ghost Beach was approached by American Eagle, which wanted to license the band's song "Miracle" for an online ad. As it has done with a few other bands the retailer offered a fee as well as access to the billboard.The ArtistsVsArtists billboard has been booked for two weeks, ending on Sunday. The group's use of the billboard is worth $50,000, an American Eagle spokeswoman said."When we were offered the space on the billboard, we were perplexed about what to do with it," said Josh Ocean, 27, the band's lead singer. "Since we started we've given away all our music for free, so just telling people to purchase our music somewhere didn't seem natural for us. So we said, 'What if we take advantage of this and open up a discussion about the new music industry?' "The band's manager, Will Suter, has a background in advertising, and approached some agencies. "I said, 'Our budget is zero, but we have this wonderful canvas,' " he recalled.TBWA\Chiat\Day New York, one of the world's leading advertising agencies, took the account as a pro bono project and devised a stark, text-heavy design in black, red and white.So far the #artistsforpiracy hashtag has been used far more than #artistsagainstpiracy: 2,802 versus 93 on Tuesday afternoon. But comments by artists (and others) show it is not so easy for them simply to pick a team. One blog writer, identified as a guitar student in Milwaukee, struggled with the idea and concluded, "So, if anyone wants to support me as a musician, come to my shows, listen to what I have to say, or let me crash on your couch."The effect of piracy continues to be intensely debated in the entertainment industry. Many studies have shown that it negatively affects sales, but they have not been unanimous. Last week a European Commission report found that piracy did not hurt digital sales, but music industry groups immediately blasted it as flawed.The ArtistsVsArtists site offers another choice, ostensibly about piracy: pay $5 to download a Ghost Beach EP from iTunes, or get it free from the band.David Lowery of the bands Camper Van Beethoven and Cracker, who has been an outspoken advocate for artists' rights in the digital age, said the site misrepresented piracy. (He was quick to add, though, that he could not blame a struggling band for some clever self-promotion.)"This conflates piracy and giving music away for free," Mr. Lowery said. "Piracy is eliminating your rights as artists, whereas if you are for copyright, you have the choice to sell your work or give it away."Some music industry bloggers were alarmed at the involvement of TBWA\Chiat\Day, which is part of the TBWA Worldwide division of the Omnicom Group. The agency's other clients include the Grammy Awards, and the recording industry's official stance on piracy has always been strongly negative. A Grammy spokeswoman had no comment on Tuesday.Ghost Beach's own position is absent from the campaign. In an interview Mr. Ocean and his band mate, Eric Mendelsohn, 26, said they opposed piracy. But they also expressed a pragmatic view of piracy that is widely shared by musicians of their generation: If you can't fight it, at least try to use it."We are against piracy in the sense that we are for new technologies and using the Internet in a way that wins over it by us giving away our music directly to fans," Mr. Ocean said. "That way we know where the music is going and can establish that connection directly with fans.""We never want to promote blatantly going out and stealing music," he added. "What we do want to do is offer choices that we think are right."
There is no parental advisory warning label on the new Blake Shelton album, "Based on a True Story," no special Walmart clean edition.For most country albums this wouldn't be a surprise — the genre is nothing if not scrubbed clean, content with winks and allusions over actual grit.But on "Boys 'Round Here," the album's first song, Mr. Shelton gets a little naughty. Over a guitar line that subtly echoes Lou Reed's "Walk on the Wild Side," Mr. Shelton toasts tough country men, with a bit of wry humor. "Backwoods legit," he calls them, followed with the directive, "Chew tobacco, chew tobacco, chew tobacco, spit." In between those lines, there's an emphatic exhortation about what a country boy won't take that can't be printed here, and is normally not found on a major-label country album.Mr. Shelton, though, is a gentleman of the genre, and also a bit of a trickster figure. More than many of his peers, he can stare the usual authorities in the face, tell them what they don't want to hear and emerge unscathed. In country music the victories are often subtle, cloaked under the veneer of fealty. Mr. Shelton is the king of wool pulled over ears."Based on a True Story" (Warner Brothers Nashville) is his seventh album in just over a decade, and also one of his strongest, largely for Mr. Shelton's ability to appear to be adhering to country's core values and subverting them all at once."Sure Be Cool If You Did" is vintage in structure but modern in content. "I Still Got a Finger" is Mr. Shelton's update of "Take This Job and Shove It," on which he complains about "hillbilly pay" for hard labor, and tells the boss's son:Ain't a part of me that doesn't hurtHey, but lucky for me you can easily seeI still got a finger that works.There are plenty of treacly love songs ("Mine Would Be You") and soapy seductions ("My Eyes"), but Mr. Shelton is in one of the most prominent two-star marriages in all of pop — his wife is the country star Miranda Lambert — and cheeky intimacy has long been one of his strengths."Small Town Big Time" is meaty, tough country, but the song also hints at Mr. Shelton's other life, as a part-time Los Angeles resident and mentor on "The Voice," which began its fourth season on NBC this week. It's a testament to reconciling two worlds that could only come from the person also delivering "Country on the Radio," a spirited defense of down-home values: "Sayin' we ain't got nothin' on a big town/I bet they'd come around if they came on down."Given that, Mr. Shelton's recent kerfuffle with the Country Music Hall of Famer Ray Price came as a surprise, a collision of agendas.Mr. Shelton, who is the reigning Country Music Association male vocalist of the year — itself a bit of a shock — made a loose comment about generational divides in the genre, defending younger artists from the overly traditional desires of Nashville's older crowd. (At 36, Mr. Shelton is not an upstart, but he's only barely part of the firmament.) Mr. Price, an 87-year-old legend of the genre, took umbrage at the sentiment, though it was clear he wasn't protesting Mr. Shelton so much as the tides of change as a whole.The two have reconciled, but it remains surprising that Mr. Shelton would come to be seen as the interloper, especially when there are squeakier wheels like, say, Eric Church, demanding attention.Mr. Shelton is also a vessel for good will toward country in the rest of the world. Through "The Voice" he's become one of the most prominent mouthpieces for the genre in the mainstream, even as he is the least globally famous of the show's mentor-judges, except perhaps for Cee-Lo Green. (One of Mr. Shelton's artists has won two out of the show's three seasons.)This week, when someone tried to call Taylor Swift more of a pop artist than a country singer, Mr. Shelton jumped to the defense of the genre: "We take ownership of Taylor Swift in country music." He's also loyal — "My Eyes," from the new album, features Gwen Sebastian, who was a member of his team on the second season of "The Voice."The first album Mr. Shelton released under his new fame from "The Voice" was "Red River Blue," in 2011, a surprisingly conservative and sluggish album that suggested that he was recoiling from the spotlight a bit, or at least looking to be on good behavior lest he be scolded for misrepresenting the family.But Mr. Shelton's looseness is a boon for country. He's exceedingly comfortable on television — this week on "The Voice," during the first episodes of the new season, he was an appealing loudmouth, happily scheming against the other judges, and at one point mussing his hair in a deadpan comedic routine to win over a singer who was also a model. (It didn't work.)It's easy to imagine, a decade from now, Mr. Shelton's playing Bill Clinton on a made-for-TV biopic, or at least his becoming the longtime host of the CMA Awards.Albums like "Based on a True Story" are what will keep him straddling worlds. To a purist Mr. Shelton is a savvy student of tradition. To a would-be outlaw he's forever adding a wink. He's a star who is only as explicit as you want him to be.
There was a time not too long ago when Gerald Clayton and Aaron Diehl might have seemed like brilliant young jazz pianists cut from the same cloth. Each came to the fore with striking subtleties of touch and a foothold in the music's bedrock traditions.They were contemporary exponents of a legacy of African-American pianists stretching back to the music's origins, and including masters of refinement like Duke Ellington, Art Tatum and Ahmad Jamal. They led small groups that seemed rigorously prepared, exploring a repertory that felt carefully considered. They were artists you could point to as a reassurance for anyone fretting over jazz's stewardship in the near future.All of which is still true, or true enough. But in other important respects Mr. Clayton, 28, and Mr. Diehl, 27, have lately been pulling in separate directions. The contrast can conveniently be made with a pair of very fine new albums: "The Bespoke Man's Narrative," Mr. Diehl's studio debut, released two weeks ago on the Mack Avenue label; and "Life Forum," Mr. Clayton's latest, just out on Concord Jazz. And what that contrast reflects is a core uncertainty about the job description for elite young jazz pianists today.To be clear, a lot of other musicians fit that characterization; "uncertainty," in the right context, is another word for "opportunity." You could limit the survey to pianists within the same late-20s age group who also have albums arriving this month, and you'd come up with Eldar Djangirov and Bobby Avey, each a force in his own right. What's illuminating about the pairing of Mr. Clayton and Mr. Diehl is the precise way their paths have diverged.Mr. Clayton has had a head start, and his is the more developed talent. Born into a prominent jazz family — his father is the bassist John Clayton, and his uncle the saxophonist Jeff Clayton — he received his formative training in Los Angeles. (He was born in the Netherlands, where his father had been working with the Amsterdam Philharmonic Orchestra, but he grew up in Southern California.)Precocious upper-level jazz talent no longer develops in regional isolation, so Mr. Clayton was already known in some circles when he appeared in the 2006 Thelonious Monk International Jazz Piano Competition, at 22. He had a breakout performance there, and almost a winning one. The consensus afterward was that Mr. Clayton had finished second (to Tigran Hamasyan) primarily because he took too few risks, rumbling happily along familiar terrain. It's a lesson he seems to have taken to heart.Mr. Diehl, who grew up in Columbus, Ohio, has likewise been tested in competition. In 2011 he won the Cole Porter Fellowship from the American Pianists Association. I was one of five judges, and discretion prevents further disclosure, but it's safe to note that Mr. Diehl was an outlier among contenders who favored a more avowedly contemporary style. It's possible that his take-away from the competitive experience was the opposite of Mr. Clayton's.Then again, Mr. Diehl had already toured with Wynton Marsalis and graduated from the Juilliard School. His aesthetic coordinates were well established: melodic precision, harmonic erudition and elegant restraint, after the example set by his most direct influence, John Lewis. (One project he took on while at Juilliard was helping Mr. Lewis's widow, Mirjana, organize his manuscripts, recordings and other archival materials.)"The Bespoke Man's Narrative" is almost too perfect a manifestation of Mr. Diehl's interests, starting with the title and its suggestion of custom tailoring. The album is a showcase for the group that Mr. Diehl has patterned after the Modern Jazz Quartet, Mr. Lewis's long-running ensemble, which bolstered jazz's acceptance in concert halls around the world.It's mildly disorienting to hear a young musician working that angle so assiduously now, as if the battle hadn't been won a long time ago. But Mr. Diehl brings such an un-self-conscious clarity to the task — smoothly abetted by his band mates, the vibraphonist Warren Wolf, the bassist David Wong and the drummer Rodney Green — that he makes it seem only natural. The album features sparkling work on ballads by Ellington and Gershwin and a relaxed take on a tune by Milt Jackson of the Modern Jazz Quartet; its most brightly effervescent track is a version of "Moonlight in Vermont."Mr. Diehl's sure-footed but altogether playful solo on that track is a good argument for his continued work along these lines. So too is the articulate ease of his original compositions on the album, including "Blue Nude," a slow rhapsody; "Stop and Go," a quicksilver jaunt; and "Generation Y," an episodic piece whose only misstep is the title.
Just as the Christmas season in New York belongs to Handel, with "Messiah," the Easter season belongs to Bach. Among other things — this year The Bach Variations , the current festival of the New York Philharmonic — you can generally count on hearing the two big Passions in some inscrutably shifting balance.Last year the "St. John Passion" predominated. This year the "St. Matthew" took over, after an early "St. John" by Dennis Keene and the Voices of Ascension on Feb. 28. Mr. Keene's chorus performed in typically splendid fashion at the Church of the Ascension; the orchestra, less so.John Scott and the St. Thomas Choir of Men and Boys opened a run of "St. Matthew" performances on March 21, Bach's 328th birthday, at St. Thomas Church Fifth Avenue, and Julian Wachner and the Choir of Trinity Wall Street and Trinity Baroque Orchestra added another three days later at Trinity Church. Regular followers of the New York choral and early-music scenes knew what to expect from those excellent ensembles, and it mostly came to pass.The wild card was a performance by the Orchestra of St. Luke's on Thursday evening at Carnegie Hall featuring the Musica Sacra chorus and conducted by Ivan Fischer. Mr. Fischer, a maestro rightly celebrated for his work in the standard repertory — especially with his Budapest Festival Orchestra but also with St. Luke's, which played beautifully for him here — has revealed himself in New York as an inveterate tinkerer and imaginative experimenter. His appearances have included a survey of the Beethoven symphonies, some on period instruments, some on modern, in 2010; an acclaimed "staged concert" presentation of Mozart's "Don Giovanni" in 2011; and a Mozart Requiem in 2012 in which he strewed choristers among the instrumentalists to give the players a more vivid sense of the text.In general Mr. Fischer's interventions have sought to heighten the works' inherent drama, whether abstract or concrete. And since the trend with the Bach Passions in recent years has been to bring out their theatrical potential, as in extraordinary staged productions of the "St. Matthew" by Jonathan Miller at the Brooklyn Academy of Music and Peter Sellars with the Berlin Philharmonic, you could imagine that Mr. Fischer would offer ideas of his own along these lines.He had ideas, all right, but many of them appeared wrongheaded, even perverse, undercutting rather than supporting the drama. The central problem was his seemingly haphazard distribution of voices.The key figures in the Passion, almost by definition, are the Evangelist and Jesus, and most performances today strive to create markedly individual and consistent characterizations of those roles. This tendency has been enhanced by the emergence of a number of tenors who sing the part of the Evangelist — high and excitable, long and draining — with real beauty and distinction rather than simply as a character role.Among the most notable of those is Rufus Müller, who sang in the St. Thomas performance. A veteran of the Jonathan Miller staging, Mr. Müller sings the part of St. Matthew (and St. John) from memory. Actually he does not so much sing the role as inhabit it. Even when he is not singing he is a participant, closely observing others and offering subtle commentary through facial expressions, registering irony, for example, with a twist of the lip but without mugging.Seemingly under the weather on this occasion and struggling vocally through the second part, Mr. Müller nevertheless gave a typically compelling characterization. He had a worthy foil in the strong Jesus of Douglas Williams, who also sang from memory.The Trinity pair, William Hite as the Evangelist and Stephen Salters as Jesus, were also excellent. Mr. Hite, in fine voice, remained content to describe the action rather than live it, a legitimate, time-honored approach. Like Mr. Williams, Mr. Salters put a premium on power, over the warmth that some bring to Jesus. The two were made more distinctive by their placement in Mr. Wachner's conception: Mr. Hite in the pulpit, Mr. Salters on a thronelike chair atop a platform thrust into the aisle, amid audience members.Similarly, if more modestly, Mr. Fischer placed his Jesus — Hanno Müller-Brachmann — on a low platform onstage alongside the Evangelist, John Tessier, at Carnegie Hall. But whatever symbolism may have been achieved there was smashed when Mr. Müller-Brachmann also sang Judas and Pilate from the same perch.And why was he singing these minor roles, often allotted to chorus members, in the first place? Jesus in dialogue with Judas or with Pilate in the same person?It's pretty hard to pick up the dramatic pieces after that, and Mr. Fischer made no attempt to do so. Although he had tenor, baritone and bass soloists on hand for most of the arias, he enlisted Mr. Tessier for one and Mr. Müller-Brachmann (now off the platform) for two others. It was a Babel of voices.None of which should be taken to detract from the terrific performances of Mr. Tessier, who sang vividly in the descriptive mode, or Mr. Müller-Brachmann, who finally brought warmth to Jesus but also faded vocally toward the end, partly, perhaps, because of the overwork of the added arias.The two church performances, at least, did not disappoint. Mr. Wachner and Mr. Scott routinely work wonders with their disparate choruses: Mr. Scott's with the soft core of boys' voices, Mr. Wachner's with a solid, vibrant center.But there was nothing disparate about the orchestras, both drawn from the growing pool of period-instrument players in New York, fed lately by the historical performance program of the Juilliard School. Almost half the players were common to both orchestras, with more veterans in James Richman's Concert Royal at St. Thomas, more newcomers in Mr. Wachner's Trinity Baroque Orchestra. It was amusing to see the concertmasters of the divided orchestras switch chairs and big solos: Cynthia Roberts, concertmaster of Orchestra I at St. Thomas, Orchestra II at Trinity; Robert Mealy, the opposite.Both performances gave vivid evidence of a newly thriving early-music scene in New York. At long last.
It started out as an inside joke and quickly became an international art project, linked to a charitable cause.Nick Didkovsky, a guitarist and composer, and Charles O'Meara, the guitarist in the eclectic rock trio Forever Einstein, were in the habit of scanning eBay for used instruments, and e-mailing each other links to the ones they considered interesting. Usually, their finds were expensive vintage guitars — say, a Gibson SG from 1961, the first year of its production — or exotic pieces that were also priced out of reach.But one day in 2010 Mr. O'Meara stumbled on a beat-up, no-name red, white and black electric guitar — a starter instrument for a kid in a 1960s garage band — priced at $100."He sent me this e-mail called 'The guitar of my dreams,' " Mr. Didkovsky said in a recent interview. "It was so generic. It had no brand on it. It was a mystery, with super retro vibes. One of the pickups was missing, and the other looked truly ancient — like a radio in a black-and-white movie, with electric bolts coming out of the speaker. It was like a generic token, the kind of electric guitars you drew in notebooks when you were 8 years old. And the price was just a magic number. One hundred has a culturally interesting meaning."Mr. Didkovsky and Mr. O'Meara decided to go halves on it, and even before they heard back from the seller, they had a plan: for their $100 Guitar Project, as they called it, they would invite some of their composing and guitar-playing friends to take the guitar for a week and write and record a new, original work using the instrument. Each would then autograph the guitar and send it on (or personally hand it over) to the next musician on the list. The new works would be collected, with the vague idea of assembling a CD.Within 12 hours, 20 musicians had signed up, and word of the project spread beyond the original invitation list. Mr. Didkovsky set up a Web page and a Facebook page for the participants, who sent photos and videos along with their recordings. Eventually, the guitar crisscrossed the continental United States and made stops in Hawaii and in a couple of European countries, as dozens of guitarists of all stripes — rockers and classical recitalists, avant-gardists and country pickers, the famous and the unknown — submitted pieces.Mr. Didkovsky and Mr. O'Meara compiled 69 of them, in just about every style imaginable (though with heavily distorted rock and several forms of experimentalism dominating) on "The $100 Guitar Project," a two-CD set recently released by Bridge Records.Alex Skolnick, the lead guitarist of the thrash-metal band Testament, said that he was "immediately intrigued, inspired and amused" by the project, and recorded a crunchy, multi-tracked two-minute piece, "$100 Guitar Blues," with echoes of early Led Zeppelin, although he traces the work's roots back further."The guitar presented a few challenges, mainly in tuning and intonation," he said. "I wouldn't be able to use it for my main gigs. Still, it played surprisingly well for a $100 instrument. I decided to be as spontaneous as possible, capturing the first ideas that came to mind — blues variations, inspired by Link Wray, John Lee Hooker and others — with no additional instruments and minimal effects."Nels Cline, of Wilco, took a slightly quirkier approach in "Seared Beard," a riffy meditation punctuated by a single cymbal crash and a hint of laughter."To be honest," Mr. Cline wrote in an e-mail, "the guitar isn't all that unusual — at least not to me. I have played and continue to play many 'cheap' or, as I call them, 'ugly duckling' guitars. I find that I seek out and enjoy their unique sound potential, and many times the tones that they can produce are only achievable on such instruments because guitar tastes and accouterments have changed over time. The '$100 Guitar' is much like my first couple of guitars that I owned in the late '60s-early '70s. That said, I don't think the guitar itself had much to do with the form or vibe of the piece I ended up doing. In fact, I have no clue as to why I went the direction I did. Mood swing? Desperation?"Fred Frith, the experimental rock guitarist and film-score composer, went against the temptation to mine the instrument's hard-rock potential. His "Light Erases the Thought" is a clear-toned meditation, and at six minutes is the longest piece on the set.He recorded the piece in his living room, he said, with "no writing or any other conceptual process other than the idea that this would be as spontaneous an experience as possible, with the simplest setup I could imagine." He added that he was drawn to the guitar's resonance and its "clear, ringing sound," and that he therefore abstained from using pedals or effects.Once the collection had grown to a couple of CDs worth of material, Mr. Didkovsky began thinking about how to release it. He did not have to look far. David Starobin, a classical guitarist who had contributed the colorful, mildly dissonant "Berceuse Bas de Gamme" ("Cheap Lullaby"), and who runs Bridge Records, offered to release the set.It is an unusual addition to the Bridge catalog, which is best known for its expansive traversals of works by Elliott Carter and George Crumb, as well as recordings by Mr. Starobin and a highly regarded Beethoven cycle by the pianist Garrick Ohlsson."But this is exactly what we do," Mr. Starobin said. "We take projects that are out of left field, and we try to market them sensibly."What made the project particularly appealing to Mr. Starobin was that all the players had agreed to devote their royalties to CARE, a group that fights global poverty. The label is donating 50 percent of its proceeds to the charity as well."We were looking for a charity," Mr. Starobin said, "and there was a lot of talk about finding a musical one. But we wanted something very solid, and CARE seemed the most solid and far-reaching."At the moment Mr. Didkovsky is thinking about the project's afterlife. The filmmaker and photographer Emon Hassan is making a movie about the venture, and there is talk of a concert, which may include pieces that did not find their way onto the CD set. The notion of a second volume has been raised.But if another set of pieces is to be recorded, Mr. Didkovsky and company will probably have to find another guitar. Once pictures of the guitar began appearing on the Internet, a specialist in Japanese guitars identified it as a Fujigen Gakki EJ-2, probably produced in 1964. So it has lost its anonymity, which was part of its original charm. And now that it sports more than 60 autographs, it is worth a good deal more than $100.
The visionary architect Frank Gehry remains committed to designing the performing arts center at the site of the former World Trade Center. But what exactly has Mr. Gehry been asked to design? What is it for? Which institutions, ensembles or companies will perform in the complex? Who will be its artistic leader?These basic questions seem more open than ever with the recent announcement that the Joyce Theater, the last remaining cultural organization of the four that were to be part of the arts complex at ground zero, will not anchor the center after all. The Joyce was hoping to make a vibrant home for dance at the site, the International Dance Center. Instead the complex will be a multidisciplinary space for theater, music, film and dance, according to Maggie Boepple, its president. The Joyce will have a more modest role.Interdisciplinary is often the word invoked when an arts center lacks focus and a mission: think of arts complex as rental space. One thing institutions should have learned by now from a history of sorry experiences is that when an arts building is designed to be adaptable to everything, it can wind up being not especially good for anything.But the main lesson this venture is in danger of ignoring is that in the conception of an arts complex, form should follow function, a principle Mr. Gehry has put into practice throughout his remarkable career.We music lovers have appreciated that Mr. Gehry is one of us, someone who understands the needs of musicians and audiences. But his triumphs have come by meeting the requirements of the institutions that hired him.There is the Walt Disney Concert Hall, the home of the Los Angeles Philharmonic, which opened in 2003. Mr. Gehry managed to design a modern 2,265-seat hall that feels warm and intimate. The orchestra plays amid the audience on a raised stage, with rows of seats in back, available for choristers when needed. Disney Hall has become a template for all orchestras looking to build or renovate a hall, including the New York Philharmonic.Then there is Mr. Gehry's recent masterpiece, the New World Center in Miami Beach, the home of the New World Symphony, the excellent training orchestra directed by Michael Tilson Thomas. This inviting center, which opened in 2011, is also an exciting public arts complex. The centerpiece is a 756-seat concert hall, with seats bunched in groups throughout the airy auditorium. Outside the hall is a roomy park, designed by the Dutch firm West 8, where people can watch live video broadcasts of concerts projected on a huge side wall of the building, with the best outdoor sound system I have ever heard.Contrast this center's $154 million price with the projected cost of the arts center at ground zero, which ranges from $300 to $700 million. And no one yet knows what it will be or what it is for.Such complexes succeed best when built for, and run by, an institution with a clear identity. It has been sad yet telling to see the plans for the performing arts at ground zero fall apart in recent years. I keep wondering what might have been had Paul Kellogg, the former general and artistic director of New York City Opera, realized his vision of moving that company to a new house at the development site.Mr. Kellogg had long been convinced that the main problem facing City Opera was its home at Lincoln Center: the New York State Theater (now the David H. Koch Theater). The company was forced to perform in an acoustically dull auditorium that had been built for the needs of its major tenant: New York City Ballet. And it was hard for City Opera to assert itself while literally in the shadow of the Metropolitan Opera House.Mr. Kellogg's proposal to move City Opera to ground zero was a bold idea, some said foolhardy. The area had no history as a destination point for culture. Mr. Kellogg figured that he would lose some uptown subscribers. But he was convinced that new audiences could be drawn from the area, including Brooklyn and New Jersey. What that complex needed, Mr. Kellogg argued, was an institution with a proven record and a clear mission. City Opera, the "people's opera," as it had long been called, was up to the job.Mr. Kellogg had plans to increase the number of productions, present more musicals, add more matinees to the schedule and bring in other presenters. It became clear that the space could probably not accommodate a theater big enough to serve an opera company's needs. But what really undermined the plan was the discouraging attitude from members of neighborhood organizations and civic officials that opera was too specialized or, to put it bluntly, too elitist an art form to anchor an arts complex at ground zero.In time, the attitudes of government and civic officials about what kinds of arts were appropriate to the site proved the undoing of two institutions selected to be part of it. The International Freedom Center, a museum that was to focus on human rights, was scuttled by fears that it would be controversial. The Drawing Center was effectively pushed from the site after being stung by criticism that some of the art it displayed was anti-American. The Signature Theater was game to move, but the city decided that the needs of a theater would be too expensive. The company built a new home on Theater Row in Clinton and seems to be thriving.Since Mr. Kellogg retired in 2007, City Opera has gone through several crises. Under its current leader, George Steel, the company did leave Lincoln Center in 2011, not for a new home but to become New York's roving opera company. It has been offering interesting productions, but in recent seasons, just four of them.Would things have turned out differently for City Opera, and the entire arts complex, had the company moved to ground zero? It's hard to say, but I thought it was a great idea.It sounds pretty good now, when what we stand to get is not much. In a recent interview Linda Shelton, the executive director of the Joyce Theater, while expressing disappointment that the performing arts complex is not going to be all dance all the time, said, "I want to be there with whatever it is."
There are so many ways to be young: ignore responsibility, look wide-eyed at the world, rile up elders, don't deliver on promises, make fun of the incomprehensible, avoid feeling, believe in yourself over all others. It's part liability, part opportunity. Sometimes it's a fixed condition, sometimes it's a choice."Wolf" is the third album from Tyler, the Creator, and it shows him, at 22, trying to figure out exactly which types of youth he still wants to hold onto. It's not just one. It may be all. Maybe the only other artist as resistant to growing up is Taylor Swift.For the last three or so years he's been one of hip-hop's true originals, a skateboarding foul mouth with an ear for soft jazz and an eye for infectious iconography. Odd Future — the Los Angeles crew, the record label, the clothing company, the TV show — has essentially been built on his back. The stoic R&B sensualist Frank Ocean is part of Odd Future, the mesmerizing rapper Earl Sweatshirt is part of Odd Future, and so are many others, but without Tyler's grab bag of reference points as glue the center wouldn't hold.Until now he's been burning off energy at a high rate and volume, making for some brilliant songs and tempestuous live shows, but "Wolf" (Odd Future) marks a transition to a place where knee-jerk reactions aren't always his endpoint. He's more measured, more reflective and couches even his most volatile thoughts in a layer of reserve.He's smoothed out his rough edges in part because he's comfortable; "Wolf" is the first of his albums to be released via a distribution partnership between Odd Future and Sony. Money is a recurring trope here — how he has it and how it's altered his perspective. At least three songs mention his new four-story home.On "Rusty" he says, "Hated the popular ones, now I'm the popular one/Also hated homes too 'til I start coppin' me some." His version of wealth isn't typical, though. On "Whoa," the new Earl Sweatshirt single, Tyler raps, "50K for the last check/But the dollar menu still be on deck." He's not boasting about frugality but rather relatability.The small distances among Tyler, his peers and his listeners is an integral part of the Odd Future experience. At his show at the Music Hall of Williamsburg in Brooklyn last month, part of his first solo tour, fans brought him vinyl albums that he'd mentioned wanting on Twitter. Not once did he stage dive, as he did frequently during the early days of Odd Future, leaving that to the crew members who loiter onstage. (Earl Sweatshirt is serving as his hypeman, more or less.) But he does high-five almost everyone in the front row and looks genuinely moved when a couple of fans present him with Tyler-theme art they've made for him.That aw-shucks accessibility makes Tyler's transformation into the sort of rapper who raps about his house (even if from an awe-struck perspective) and gripes about his fans even more jarring. Another consistent thread on "Wolf" is how he navigates interacting with the gaggle of outsiders who have found solace in his music and place him, a former outsider, on less familiar turf."Colossus" is his version of Eminem's "Stan," more or less, documenting an awkward interaction with a fan who doesn't know when to stop. Tyler plays both roles, inspiration and inspired, but saves his best lines for the fan, with whom he has more in common than he'd care to admit: "In school I was the one that was thinking outside boxes/So everybody in them would say that I got problems"; "I heard that first piano chord and it drew me in like predators carrying treats." (The mild sexual undertone Tyler gives the conversation cheapens the song's power but doesn't completely undermine it.)Few rappers are more plain-spoken about their feelings than Tyler is, and luckily success hasn't dampened that. He's still acerbic about his absent father, especially on "Answer," which marries a plaintive, deceptively vulnerable hook with exceedingly dark, malicious verses. On "Lone" he raps about the death of his grandmother: "The doc said she only had a week for us to speak/before she deceased/'cause cancer was just eating her cheeks up."As before though, his candor can veer into uncomfortable, eyebrow-raising territory. "IFHY" is a typical Tyler love song, which is to say it's hostile and abrasive and unlikely to result in actual love. In it he veers between bliss and threats to a woman he wants and her new man: "Make sure you never meet again like goddamn vegans/'cause when I hear your name I cannot stop cheesing." The video is deeply unsettling too: Tyler in heavy facial makeup as a doll, moving in mechanical, tenacious fashion as he fixes on the woman he desires.
One dance club, Pacha, has dominated the Spanish party paradise of Ibiza since the 1970s. Built on former marshland, this island disco and its all-night parties have become global symbols of hedonistic glamour, and the business has expanded to Buenos Aires, New York and beyond.Lately Pacha's profits have soared along with the growing popularity of electronic dance music. But so have the fees demanded by the top D.J.'s, to the annoyance of Ricardo Urgell, the 75-year-old Pacha patriarch who runs the club as a family business. Last year he decided that enough was enough.He fired his longtime music director, Danny Whittle, and did not renew the contract for Erick Morillo, a Pacha regular for more than a decade, one of a chain of departures by other headliners like Tiësto, Luciano and Pete Tong. Only one big name, David Guetta, will return this summer, largely to protect his brand, which he built at the club."The D.J.'s wanted more money to play less," said José Urgell, known as Piti, who is Mr. Urgell's 65-year-old brother. "It was an abuse. We had to come up with a new plan because the old one was going to explode." The Urgells' move to shake up their D.J. lineup reflects a growing friction in the dance subculture as the music goes mainstream. The budgets behind the dance business are ballooning, with superstar D.J.'s now commanding hundreds of thousands of dollars a night in the megaclubs of Ibiza and Las Vegas, where they once spun anonymously in the dark.Tiësto, perhaps the world's most popular D.J., is skipping Ibiza altogether this summer. Instead his world tour includes Hakkasan Las Vegas, an 80,000-square-foot megaclub set to open this month at a reported cost of $100 million."I've played in Ibiza every summer for the last 10 summers, and I felt like it was time for a change," Tiësto said through his publicist. "Las Vegas is an amazing place, and I'm incredibly excited about my residencies at Hakkasan and Wet Republic."The Urgells chafed at the growing power of celebrity D.J.'s and their handlers and said they longed to return to simpler times when the club wasn't ruled by money.Ricardo Urgell, the son of a Barcelona engineer, built Pacha in the early 1970s on a desolate half-acre he bought for about $14,000. After its opening in 1973 the club came to represent ultracool debauchery and an escape from the conservative moral code of Francisco Franco, the Spanish dictator. Native Ibicencos mixed with artists, hippies, thieves on the lam and those whose bronzed bodies were all the clothing they required.But as the scene grew, the elder Urgells eventually became disenchanted by the music that made them millionaires."It's monotonous sound and volume; it's bodies squeezed together, it's a little masochistic," Ricardo Urgell said in a 2011 interview. "The great defect of this music," he added, "is that it has to be accompanied by drugs. I took Ecstasy just one time in my life and found that out for myself."Electronic music, Piti Urgell said last month, "hasn't evolved in 20 years and is for idiots."The Urgells say that things began to change after 1999, when Ricardo Urgell's oldest son, Hugo, hired Mr. Whittle, a former British firefighter and rave organizer. Mr. Whittle charted a new strategy for the club, introducing a record label and a magazine, and signed top D.J.'s like Mr. Guetta and Fatboy Slim.The changes raised Pacha's profile, but the Urgells grew annoyed at how Mr. Whittle indulged the whims of top acts, like redesigning the D.J. booth last year to accommodate Tiësto and finding the Swedish House Mafia trio extra Champagne at island supermarkets. They also clashed when Mr. Whittle began allowing Pacha D.J.'s to spin at the Ushuaïa Beach Hotel, which put on afternoon pool parties, taking its cue from Miami and Las Vegas."I told them two years ago not to look at Ushuaïa as competition, look at Vegas," Mr. Whittle said. "The question is, 'What is attracting people away from Ibiza?' and that is Vegas."In just a few years Las Vegas has become a center of gravity for the dance world. Big D.J.'s are booked for long and lucrative residencies at casino nightclubs, and new competition has inflated fees. Along with Hakkasan Las Vegas this month also brings the arrival of Light, which will combine dance music with the acrobatics of Cirque du Soleil."D.J.'s doing well in the U.S. market will be increasingly torn between the two locations," Mr. Tong said. "The zeitgeist moment for Ibiza has arrived. It's no longer the only game in town."But the Urgells waited a long time to take a stand, and the economics of Big Dance are hard to ignore. Pacha Ibiza, with a capacity of about 3,000, grossed more than 30 million euros (about $40 million) last summer, compared with 7 million euros in 1999, Mr. Whittle said. Pacha paid some acts more than 100,000 euros (roughly $130,000) a night, he said, but all of those D.J.'s generated three times that amount in revenue for the club.Recent business deals have attached values to dance properties that were once unimaginable. SFX Entertainment, controlled by the media investor Robert F. X. Sillerman, paid $50 million for Beatport, a music download store, and $102 million for a majority share of ID&T, a European festival company.Some in the dance world criticize the Urgells for firing Mr. Whittle and say that they misread the market for top D.J. talent."This is going to cost them a fortune," Mr. Whittle said of Pacha's new direction. "I am either dealing with madness or genius, and it's just about to come out in the wash."Mr. Whittle could become potential competition. He said the billionaire Ronald Burkle was backing his new D.J. promotions and management agency, and Mr. Whittle, 50, is programming the music for the Cipriani restaurant just down the road in Ibiza, having already signed three Pacha defectors: Luciano, Mr. Morillo and Defected in the House.Amy Thomson, the manager of Swedish House Mafia, who used Pacha to catapult that act in 2009, said the Urgells "just assumed we were the bad guys, when in actual fact the whole business model created around Pacha was one of the most phenomenal of our time." (She is also the music director at Light in Las Vegas.)In the end the Urgells may not care anymore. They want to recapture the spirit of Ibiza's yesteryear, when Ricardo Urgell would throw the light switches, and the club would spring to life each night. This summer they plan to make their monthly "Flower Power" party, in which Piti Urgell spins classic rock 'n' roll, a weekly event. And they are bringing in more underground acts, like the Israeli D.J. Guy Gerber, 38, who has never received $100,000 for a gig.Last month the Urgells met in Miami with Mr. Gerber, who is taking over for Mr. Morillo on Wednesdays, to hear his vision for his weekly show, "Wisdom of the Glove." He promised to feature indie bands, magicians, fortunetelling machines, maybe a puppeteer."I was trying to create a night to bring back Ibiza like it used to be 30 years ago," he said last week. "I want to freak people out."Days after spending time with Mr. Gerber, Iria Urgell, 26, sent an e-mail to her father, Ricardo Urgell. "We have the best D.J. in the world," she said, "and a new sense of a family."
The Tennessee pop-punk band Paramore, fronted by Hayley Williams, is attempting a reintroduction. It has to. Its self-titled fourth album, just released on Fueled by Ramen, follows two years of turmoil in which the brothers Josh and Zac Farro, the nine-year-old band's founding guitarist and drummer, quit. On his blog Josh Farro called Paramore "a manufactured product of a major label" and accused Ms. Williams of hogging the spotlight. She stood up for her band and its authenticity on MTV . (Zac Farro later said his brother had regrets about the post.)Now the remaining members — Ms. Williams, the Tang-haired singer and songwriter; the guitarist and songwriter Taylor York; and the bassist Jeremy Davis — have regrouped as a trio, working with the producer Justin Meldal-Johnsen, who has recorded with Beck and M83. "He let us be the band that we needed to be, and kind of weather our own storms," Ms. Williams said. "And we found when we pushed ourselves and were a little bit less afraid of our influences as musicians, the boundaries were a lot farther.""If you haven't heard any Paramore albums," she added, "start with this one and not the first one."In the last year Ms. Williams, 24, also moved away from home in Nashville, renting an apartment in Los Angeles, partly so she can be closer to her boyfriend, Chad Gilbert, guitarist of the rock band New Found Glory. But she's eager to be on the road again, even on the smaller stages where she began."Obviously it wasn't roses going in a van for a lot of years; it was hard work," she said. "I remember my butt just being numb all the time from just sitting in the van. But I'm a supernostalgic person. It's an old energy that's really great to feel."She spoke with Melena Ryzik from a tour stop in London, about the near-split and a family run-in with Elvis Presley. These are excerpts from the conversation.Q. How was writing without Josh and Zac?A. We started writing, and we were doing things that we had done before, and it was so boring. There was no inspiration. I remember bringing Taylor a random melody that I had saved in my voice memos, and we turned it into this song called "True." And it was like, this kind of sounds like Paramore. We had 23 songs that all sounded like they came from different parents. We're two men down, and something unpredicted [had to happen].What do you listen to for inspiration?I usually like a lot of older music. If I'm listening to a new hit band, it's because of Taylor. I'm not really a Pitchfork [the music Web site] sort of gal. I was listening to the Shirelles and the Angels, who are my favorites, and even Blondie and the Ramones and that period of punk rock. They were writing pop songs, but they were played by punk bands. Every day in the car it was like, why can't I play "Heart of Glass"? We finally wrote a song called "Daydreaming," which is a total rip of "Dreaming" by Blondie, because I couldn't think of a better title.How did you deal with the band splintering?I was trying superhard to deny it for a while. The first song we demo'd was "Proof," a love song. I just wanted to go completely away from the situation. I realized that all three of us were dealing with it. We realized very quickly that we each needed each other to pull through. I was trying to be intentional about not being bitter and not being angry, but using the hope that I felt that we did have a future, as a fuel, and to light me up from the inside.Did you grow up a lot in this period?It catapulted me into adulthood. Everything that happened, starting with those guys leaving the band. It was the final break from that "Goonies" theme that I had as a kid: We were going to be a band, it was going to be called Paramore, and we were going to go out in the world and take it over. I related to that story line of the Lost Boys. I look back on it now, and it's like, would I ever have grown up if I were following this broken-down dream that I had? I look at pictures of us from three months after the split happened, and I'm like, we look like babies. And now I look at pictures, and I'm like, Taylor looks like a man. I don't know if I look older, but I feel older. You have a choice: You let it make you bitter and tarnish you, or it polishes you into something more refined.You have a powerful style as a frontwoman. Do you have any performance role models?Growing up watching a lot of heavier bands play, some hardcore bands and some metal-y bands, I liked that energy — singers like Josh Scogin of Norma Jean. Now I look at people like Freddie Mercury, and I'm like, how can one person do that? Karen O I think is rad. I'm very inspired by even Elvis. I kind of grew up on him. My granddad, his aunt or great-aunt, she took Elvis in when his mom died. My granddad was completely obsessed. He has a whole curio of Elvis memorabilia. I remember YouTubing Elvis and Johnny Cash when I couldn't sleep. How cool would it have been to play shows like that? It takes a lot to grow up in a time where people aren't shaking their hips on TV and then have the audacity to do it.What do you think of being called emo?At 16, 17, I hated it. Now I'm 24, I'm trying to bring it back. Emo for me, growing up, was bands like Sunny Day Real Estate. Most of those bands were gone by the time I got ahold of their records. I just think of it as emotional, and I want to write emotional music. I say, let's bring it back.
This week the first new music in almost 40 years will arrive from Shuggie Otis, one of the more enigmatic figures in pop music history. The album, "Wings of Love" (Epic/Legacy), with 14 previously unreleased tracks, is being packaged alongside a reissue of his previous and most celebrated recording, "Inspiration Information," from 1974.In the years between these records his ethereal, psychedelic-tinged funk influenced artists like Prince and D'Angelo and has been sampled by OutKast and Beyoncé. Yet as the decades passed he released nothing and seldom performed, even as his reputation as a brilliant recluse — an R&B Brian Wilson or Syd Barrett — steadily grew. "I never hid," Mr. Otis said. "There's a misconception that I actually quit, but I always wanted to work."Dressed in a suit, fedora and scarf, all grays and off-whites, at a recent interview at his record label's office in Manhattan, Mr. Otis, 59, was personable and talkative for a legendary loner. He was still excited about his show the previous night at the Highline Ballroom. "It was overwhelming," he said. "I never played New York on this level, as far as Shuggie Otis being presented like a star. Last night was one of my all-time favorites."Mr. Otis's vocals during his hourlong performance were sometimes wobbly, but he was rock-solid playing the blues with which he first made his name. A rippling solo on "Freedom Flight Part 2" demonstrated that Mr. Otis, a onetime teenage guitar prodigy, still had virtuoso skills. (He is scheduled to appear at B. B. King Blues Club and Grill on Thursday and at the Music Hall of Williamsburg the next night.)The show, and now the album's release, are the latest chapter in a long, fragile return to the spotlight after an extended and unexpected silence. "I always knew deep down inside that something would happen and I would get back," he said.Shuggie Otis was born Johnny Alexander Veliotes Jr., the son of the Rock and Roll Hall of Famer Johnny Otis. The elder Otis was a hugely influential figure in the Los Angeles R&B scene as a performer, D.J. and record company executive. He worked with artists like Jackie Wilson, Little Willie John and Etta James, and had many Top 10 R&B hits, including 1958's "Willie and the Hand Jive." Though his parents were Greek immigrants, Johnny Otis (who died last year at 90) called himself "black by persuasion," and was married for 70 years to Phyllis Walker, who is black and Filipino.Shuggie (a nickname derived from "Sugar" that was given to him by his mother) began playing the guitar at 11; by the next year he was playing in clubs with his father's band and, soon after, in studio sessions for the likes of Louis Jordan, T-Bone Walker and Big Joe Turner. "My dad was pretty hard to work for at times," he said, "and being my father, we would get into it. One day we wouldn't get along, the next day we were best friends."In 1969, at 16, Shuggie released his debut, "Here Comes Shuggie Otis." B. B. King called him his "favorite new guitarist," and The Los Angeles Times named him "Shuggie Otis, teen blues king."The "Freedom Flight" album that followed in 1971 was Mr. Otis's biggest commercial success. Black artists like Sly Stone and Stevie Wonder were asserting more control over their production, and the impact of genre-blurring guitarists like Jimi Hendrix and Arthur Lee was still strong. Mr. Otis's music reflected these changes, as he moved from a more blues-based sound to a softer, dreamier style, even hinting occasionally at the classical music he had studied."I didn't want to be pigeonholed as being a bluesman," he said.Still a few months shy of 18 Mr. Otis began working on his third album, but sessions were interrupted by tours with the Johnny Otis Show in Japan, Spain and England. By then he was recording all the parts other than strings and horns by himself, and it took almost three years to complete the hypnotic "Inspiration Information." But after all the buildup the album failed to reach the charts, and Epic Records dropped him from its roster.The shadow influence of "Inspiration Information," though, began to spread over the years, and the tastemaker David Byrne gave it his seal of approval when his Luaka Bop label reissued the record in 2001. Shuggie Otis "is a great example of an artist that erases the borders between genres," Lenny Kravitz said recently by e-mail, "and his sweet voice paints intoxicating pictures full of vivid imagery."Ahmir Thompson, the Roots drummer better known as Questlove, recently said that "his music is so potent that it only blossomed 30 years after it was first released."Mr. Otis performed a few wildly uneven concerts around the reissue (one review of his San Francisco show said, "There was an underlying sadness to a performance so bad it was comical at times"), then retreated to the sidelines. Every few minutes during the interview the conversation returned to why Epic let Mr. Otis go, and why no other labels would sign him. "I tried to get a record deal for years and years," he said. "I just always got the thumbs down."He suggested that he angered Epic by objecting to the album cover; that the label dropped all of its blues and jazz artists after a change in executives.
At the end of the second movement of Charles Ives's Symphony No. 4 a tender melody suddenly erupts into bawdy cacophony, like a marching band lurching through a carnival fun house.Alan Gilbert, who will conduct the New York Philharmonic in four performances of the work beginning on Wednesday at Avery Fisher Hall, enjoys this moment, he said, "when the second movement goes into overdrive.""It's so crazy and so hysterical that it's amusing," he added. "How could music sound this way? It's a real organized chaos."Organized chaos is integral to much music of Ives, who wove American folk songs, ballads, marches and hymns into daringly experimental works. Hints of jazz or riffs on Beethoven often peek through dense canvases rich in polytonality, rhythmic complexity and thematic layering.Ives's father, George Ives, who had been a bandmaster in the Civil War and led a marching band in his hometown, Danbury, Conn., taught his son music theory and encouraged him to experiment.Charles Ives studied music at Yale but left the professional music world at 28 and soon after became a successful insurance executive. Since he did not have to compose for a salary and had no deadlines to meet or commissioners to please, he had freedom to experiment. He could avoid writing what he disdainfully described as "nice" music of the sort aimed at "old ladies of both sexes.""Money may travel faster than sound in some directions, but not in the direction of musical experimentation or extension," he wrote in his notes accompanying the symphony.Ives composed his Fourth Symphony, a four-movement work that Mr. Gilbert described as his "most far-reaching" piece, from 1910 to 1925. Three movements were performed before his death in 1954, but the piece was not performed in its entirety until 1965, when Leopold Stokowski conducted it with the American Symphony Orchestra at Carnegie Hall.Reviewing that concert in The New York Times, Harold C. Schonberg wrote of "the defiant dissonance, often for the sake of defiance." But the symphony is a masterpiece, he concluded, that "sings the simplest of songs" and has "clumps of tonalities that clash like army against army, Whitmanesque yawps and — suddenly — the quiet of a New England church."The piece features a large chorus, a huge percussion battery and a prominent piano part, and is so unwieldy that two conductors usually lead different sections, like multiple traffic wardens standing at a particularly dangerous intersection. Up to four separate ensembles play music of different meter and tempo, variously synchronized or not. The hymns emerge like reassuring guideposts in a dense fog.Mr. Gilbert, who will be assisted by a second conductor, said that "part of the challenge is getting rid of the usual modalities of conducting." Instead of trying to hear and control everything, the conductor must tune out some of the disparate elements that unfold at the same time."So many things are going on simultaneously with no regard for other things happening, which makes it exciting to listen to," Mr. Gilbert added. "Even when it doesn't sound like things are together, they have to work together."Ives recycled fragments of 15 of his earlier works and explored philosophical issues in the Fourth Symphony, as he did in pieces like "The Unanswered Question." He once described the aesthetic program of the Fourth Symphony as "that of the searching questions of 'What?' and 'Why?' which the spirit of man asks of life.""This is particularly the sense of the Prelude," he continued. "The three succeeding movements are the diverse answers in which existence replies."The short Prelude opens with a dramatic passage for orchestra and piano before a "distant choir" of violins and harp plays a snippet of the hymn "Bethany" ("Nearer My God to Thee"). Ives also quotes the gospel song "In the Sweet By and By" and the hymn "Watchman."The raucous second movement was inspired by Nathaniel Hawthorne's satirical short story "The Celestial Railroad" and incorporates music from the "Hawthorne" movement of Ives's "Concord" Piano Sonata. Rowdy popular tunes are juxtaposed with slow sections of somber hymns, evoking the contrast between the pious Pilgrims and their decadent counterparts.Ives's penchant for writing fugues with each voice beginning in a different key led Horatio Parker, his teacher at Yale, to say that he shouldn't be "hogging all the keys at once." But Ives commits no improprieties in the Fourth Symphony's restrained and tonal third-movement fugue, which Mr. Gilbert described as "simple and heartfelt and sincere, so American in a way." The movement, which quotes the hymns "All Hail the Power of Jesus' Name" and "From Greenland's Icy Mountains," unfolds in well-behaved contrast to the mayhem of the preceding movement."The twilight zone of the fourth movement," as Mr. Gilbert describes it, features the "distant choir" of the opening prelude. The second conductor is necessary for this section, in which the orchestra is subdivided into mini-ensembles playing in different meters and tempos.It is exhilarating music. Extraordinarily dense, pulsing waves of sound suddenly dissipate into an otherworldly chorus, underpinned by twinkling darts of orchestral color. The chorus softly and wordlessly intones the tune of "Bethany."Ives described this as "an apotheosis of preceding content, in terms that have something to do with the reality of existence and its religious experience."Mr. Gilbert said: "It's unlike any music I know. It still sounds novel and out there today. I'm not sure what the message is, but it feels cosmic and true, and people seem to be moved by it. It's a piece that has to be experienced live."
INDIO, Calif. — At the Coachella Valley Music and Arts Festival, which descends upon the Empire Polo Field here each April, there are two large outdoor stages, three almost as big stages under gargantuan tents and one enclosed nightclub-esque structure. All together, they played host to about 190 acts from Friday to Sunday, ranging from global superstars to promising indie bands that may never rise beyond that level.In the middle of it all is something called the Do Lab, a sort of temporary autonomous zone, an open-air space surrounded by conical installation art that rises 40 or so feet into the sky. During Coachella it operates continuously, from the beginning of the day to the end, unlike most of the stages, and while a couple of well-known D.J.'s play there — their names weren't advertised on the official Coachella lineup announcement — the mood is a little less festival and a little more Burning Man. At any given time, a few hundred people gathered there who, like the other 90,000 or so people in attendance, had paid to get in, but weren't seeing any of the bands.Which makes you wonder: Is Coachella a festival to be seen or an experience to be had? Tickets — for both this past weekend, and the next, when the bill repeats — sold out almost instantly. So perhaps it doesn't matter to the attendees of this destination festival — plenty dressed in hippie drag, with face paint and flower headbands — that this year's Coachella had the least inspired lineup in years, dominated by nostalgia. Or that where it was once the essential American music festival, it has ceded at least part of that title to Bonnaroo, to Pitchfork, to Electric Daisy Carnival, to post-Coachella regional contenders like Outside Lands, the Governors Ball and Sasquatch!Where Coachella lives is at the intersection of grand ambition and aesthetic seriousness, with artists likely to be embraced both by connoisseurs and casual fans. It is also increasingly a repository of pop memory, with lineups that tend toward older, more established and, in several cases, defunct.That explained the one-two punch of Blur and the Stone Roses on Friday night, both reunited British bands with passionate followings, though the headliner, Stone Roses, a little loose, played to a crowd roughly one-fifth the size of the one that watched Blur, which was strong.Sunday night featured a different sort of heritage: Red Hot Chili Peppers vacillated between inert and sublime, its California blend of funk and hard rock Botoxed out over the years. That seemed especially true, given that the band followed Nick Cave and the Bad Seeds, who were caustic and dark, and overlapped a bit with Wu-Tang Clan, which performed with a small orchestra but was still rowdy.Save for the Yeah Yeah Yeahs, who made a brilliant squall, this year's bigger names tended toward rock that's precise and too soft, like Hot Chip, the reunited Postal Service, Airborne Toxic Event and also the Saturday night headliner Phoenix, an eminently average band in cool-kid clothes, though it did bring out R. Kelly, who sang "Ignition (Remix)," an unexpected detour.Vampire Weekend, also precise and often soft, showed how those don't have to be liabilities in its main-stage set, one of the weekend's highlights, at least partly because it matched the festival's breezy temperament. The same was true of Tanlines, whose tropical pop was a natural here. But Kurt Vile, who has a strong new album, played a backboneless set that practically evaporated before reaching anyone's ears, and the noodly Tame Impala was meandering.The festival standout, though, was Grimes — the Canadian dance-pop singer-producer Claire Boucher — who brought a tour de force of future pop, teeming with distortion and neon-bright melody. She was followed by James Blake, the British stoic, who used similar tools to drastically different effect, hushing the crowd after Grimes's exuberance.
Caroline Shaw , the winner of the 2013 Pulitzer Prize in Music , isn't quite ready to own up to what she does."I don't really call myself a composer," she said, laughing, in an interview in her sunny studio apartment in Chelsea. "That's what's awkward about this whole thing: that's not really what I call myself."Ms. Shaw would prefer to be known simply as a musician. And it was largely as a musician, a busy freelancer in New York, that she was known before Monday's announcement that she had, at 30, become the award's youngest winner, for "Partita for Eight Voices," her dazzling, emotionally generous take on a Baroque dance suite.Audiences had heard her as an incisive violinist with the American Contemporary Music Ensemble. She also appeared as a pure-voiced alto in ensembles like Trinity Choir and Roomful of Teeth, the adventurous vocal octet for which she composed "Partita" and which recorded it as part of a sensually stunning debut album for New Amsterdam Records last year.But Ms. Shaw's small, meticulous and searching body of writing — including rewritings of old bluegrass and gospel songs and a work for flowerpots, vibes and marimba for the group So Percussion — flew under the radar even after she started the doctoral program in composition at Princeton University in 2010."Just last week," she said, "someone was like, 'I didn't know you write music.' "It seems safe to say that few people will make that mistake again. On Monday she was walking in Hudson River Park when she began getting e-mails and calls from friends telling her that she had gotten a Pulitzer. "I briefly thought that I was having a psychotic break," she said. She finally called her father, who went on the Internet and told her that she had actually won.The award citation praised "Partita" as "a highly polished and inventive a cappella work uniquely embracing speech, whispers, sighs, murmurs, wordless melodies and novel vocal effects."Jeremy Geffen, the director of artistic planning at Carnegie Hall and the chairman of this year's Pulitzer jury, recalled: "We kept listening because we were required to. But also because none of us could see what was around the next corner."She changes gears so quickly and so easily, and every turn is so unexpected and so full of joy. And it's in such a convincing and cohesive manner that you could never doubt the sense of architecture and the sense of premeditation."Ms. Shaw wrote the work over three successive summers, starting in 2009, during which Roomful of Teeth was in residence at the Massachusetts Museum of Contemporary Art. The new ensemble wanted to explore nontraditional vocal techniques and was focusing on Tuvan throat singing, yodeling and belting, all of which found their way into "Partita."The group's founder, Brad Wells, a member of the voice faculty at Williams College, announced the first summer that there was room in the final concert if any member wanted to write something. Ms. Shaw volunteered, and the result was "Passacaglia," which eventually became the fourth and final section of "Partita.""We'd been trying all these sounds and making these different kinds of music and I'd just spent a year playing all this thorny contemporary music," she recalled. "And I remember thinking, 'All I want to hear is just one chord.' So that was the beginning of the piece, how to make that one thing I wanted to hear."The finished "Passacaglia" radiates that focus in its quiet beginning and in the rapturous keenings that follow. Rounded tones abruptly end in swallowed grunts; medieval harmonies hover behind the sound of a man reciting the instructions for Sol LeWitt's conceptual "Wall Drawing 305," on display at the museum. A babble of spoken voices reconstitutes with a great groan into a celebratory wail, then vanishes in a final hush tinged with the metallic twang of throat singing."We'd rehearse all day," Ms. Shaw said. "And then I'd usually get Brad's key and go 10 minutes down the road to Williams and just play the piano until 3 or 4 in the morning and write stuff and bring in pages the next day.""Courante," the third section of the suite, emerged the following summer, when the group was working with two Inuit throat singers from northern Quebec. It begins with soft, breathless gasps that break into a gentle version of the hymn "The Shining Shore" before building to a delirious, swaying swirl of voices.The summer of 2011 brought the grandly vibrating aura of the suite's opener, "Allemande," and the otherworldly "Sarabande." Though the four sections have not yet been performed live as a unit, listening to them in sequence gives a moving sense of old and new coming together, as if Gregorian monks and those throat-singing Inuits had joined for some Baroque dances at a country jamboree.
Among iTunes's top classical albums are plenty by Yo-Yo Ma and Glenn Gould. But the list is also filled with budget compilations, like "The 50 Most Essential Pieces of Classical Music" and "Beethoven: 100 Supreme Classical Masterpieces," that pack in dozens of "1812" Overtures and "Für Elises" for as little as $6.One label dominates these collections: X5 Music Group, a 10-year-old Swedish company that has built a $14 million business applying the strategies of online marketing to classical music. Its success has spawned numerous imitators and led to a new deal that allows it to exploit the classical and jazz catalogs of the Universal Music Group, the world's largest record company.X5 began in 2003, the year Apple opened its iTunes store. The three founders, including Johan Lagerlof, a former dance-music producer, spotted an opportunity for an online-only label and began approaching record companies to license their digital rights. Its first deals were with small classical labels in Europe, even though the founders had no experience with Brahms and Mozart."We were pop guys, and maybe that was good," said Mr. Lagerlof, a soft-spoken 42-year-old, in a recent interview at the company's New York office, on the 75th floor of the Empire State Building. "We weren't experts. We created products that we could easily find in stores and easily understand."Just 2.4 percent of album sales in the United States last year were classical, according to Nielsen SoundScan, and the genre's prestige lies in "core" releases by marquee artists. X5 wants to expand the audience far beyond the connoisseurs through the same techniques that are used to get people to buy a book on Amazon or a pair of jeans from the Gap online.To attract classical neophytes, X5's collections have search-engine-friendly titles and simple, self-explanatory cover art meant to stand out to a consumer scanning through dozens of postage-stamp album covers on iTunes or Amazon. "The 50 Darkest Pieces of Classical Music" features a crow and a spooky, blue-tinged moon. The Sturm und Drang art for X5's "Rise of the Masters" series has models posed as Bach, Chopin and so on — one scowling X5 employee is immortalized as Beethoven.The company has churned out thousands of compilations, often tailoring them to the quirks of different online stores and tweaking them bit by bit to find what sells, something rarely done by traditional record companies. For example, "50 Darkest" works on iTunes, but Amazon customers prefer "99 Darkest."In online commerce, touches like these can mean the difference between a sale and a lost click. "Online, there is not even the luxury of three seconds to pick it up and look at the back cover," said Scott Ambrose Reilly, a former Amazon digital music executive who runs X5's North American operations.X5's techniques are now widely imitated, and its profit margins are the envy of any record label. "The 50 Most Essential Pieces," one of its evergreen titles, cost about $150 to make and has had $3.4 million in sales, said Mr. Lagerlof, the chief executive. The company says it has sold more than 230 million downloads around the world."They were not the only company doing 50-track compilations at budget prices," said Andy Doe, a label consultant and the former head of classical music at iTunes. "Somebody was going to get lucky, and X5 did. But then they were smart enough to figure out what it was that was working, and run with it."After years of licensing music from small labels and making its own recordings, X5 has started U5, a joint venture with Universal that will give the company access to at least 50,000 of Universal's classical tracks, and another 50,000 jazz and blues songs from the Blue Note and Verve catalogs, which Universal owns.Ross Foster, Universal's senior vice president of commercial affairs, said his company decided to make a deal with X5 after seeing their rapid ascent."A few years ago we were flipping through the charts and we said, 'My God, who are these guys?' " Mr. Foster said. "What they're doing is disruptive, so we decided to partner with them and innovate rather than fight them."The first major U5 releases have been coming out over the last few weeks, including "The 50 Greatest Violin Pieces by Joshua Bell" and "The 50 Greatest Piano Pieces by Lang Lang," each for $10 — high by X5's standards.X5 has also struck licensing deals with the blues label Alligator Records as well as the Welk Music Group, whose labels include Vanguard and Sugar Hill. The company's April release calendar has 80 titles, with "Mozart Meditations" alongside "Texas Blues Nuggets" and "True American Country Heartbreakers." Next month, X5 will also introduce Spotify apps for world music, blues and jazz, in addition to the one it already has for classical music.The markets for jazz, blues and world music all have their quirks, but like classical they are niche fields for which record executives are always searching for new ways to reach mainstream audiences. X5 wants to do in those genres what it already has done in classical music."It's not rocket science," Mr. Lagerlof said. "But you have to start thinking about it. How can we get the concept so clear that people will click on it and not be disappointed?""How can we make people click on that product," he added, squeezing his right index and forefinger to the size of an icon on a screen, "when it's this big?"
Record Store Day, the annual retail promotion started in 2008 to help struggling independent stores, depends on musicians and labels providing retail outlets a slew of releases not available anywhere else, most of them on vinyl.On Saturday, record collectors will crowd into 700 stores around the country to snap up the limited pressings, making it one of the biggest sales day of the year for many such stores."It's a huge day for us," said Josh Madell, a co-owner of Other Music at 15 East Fourth Street, in the East Village. "We practically do a week's worth of business in one day."This year's big draws are likely to include David Bowie's new single, "The Stars (Are Out Tonight)," on 7-inch vinyl; a new 10-inch live recording from Mumford & Sons, "Live at Bull Moose"; a reissue of the 1964 Rolling Stones EP "Five by Five"; and a 12-inch repressing of "Maybe I'm Amazed" by Paul McCartney and Wings that includes alternative versions of the song.Other highlights include a limited edition, two-album set of the White Stripes' Grammy-winning "Elephant," made of colored vinyl, and the Grateful Dead's "Rare Cuts & Oddities 1966," offered for the first time on vinyl. A full list of special releases is available at the Record Store Day Web site.There will be a few performances at New York stores as well. Anthrax is scheduled to appear at J & R Music World at 23 Park Row. Sharon Van Etten and members of the band Parquet Courts will spin their favorite records at Other Music.Though the yearly promotion has given record stores a lift, it has not been able to stop the decline in album sales over the last decade, which has driven many stores out of business. On Monday, Bleecker Bob's Records in the West Village closed its doors after 46 years.
Encountering Steve Martin at a party can be an uncertain proposition. Maybe you'll end up talking to him about developments in art, politics or the weather. Or maybe he'll ask if you want to add lyrics to some banjo tunes he's been playing around with, an invitation that leads to your making a record together and solidifies a creative union between the two of you.That may sound like the more unlikely outcome, but it is in fact how Edie Brickell, the singer-songwriter, ended up working with Mr. Martin, the cultural multihyphenate and sometime bluegrass musician, on "Love Has Come for You," a new album that Rounder Records is to release on Tuesday.Like its origin story, the whole project can seem a little improbable: two performers with seemingly not much in common, collaborating on music that doesn't quite sound like anything either has made before.It is mystifying to its creators, too, but also satisfying in a way that they hope listeners will appreciate. As Mr. Martin described his partnership with Ms. Brickell a few weeks ago, "The whole thing was a giant accident that, in our view, turned out to be very rewarding to us."On a March morning, they were sitting a few seats apart in the otherwise empty house of Town Hall in Manhattan. Mr. Martin, 67, who has lately applied his well-honed banjo skills to two bluegrass albums, "The Crow" and "Rare Bird Alert," the latter recorded with the Steep Canyon Rangers, was playfully professorial, wearing glasses and striped socks that poked out from his pants.Ms. Brickell, 47, best known for her work with the alternative rock band New Bohemians, was dressed in a scarf and tall boots, and spoke in a gentle, ethereal voice. Though the two had been working together for several months, there was a sense that they were still getting to know each other, and Ms. Brickell said she was sometimes intimidated by Mr. Martin's range of abilities, from comedy to essays to playwriting."I was shy around him," she said. "When I first started singing in front of him, I didn't want to sing anything that he didn't like. And I didn't know what he liked."Their arrangement arose from casual conversations in which Ms. Brickell had complimented Mr. Martin on his bluegrass records, and he offered her a melody he'd composed but for which he had been unable to write lyrics.Listening to Mr. Martin's slow string plucking, Ms. Brickell began to improvise the opening lines — "Lonely, broken feeling/Lonely, to my soul" — that became the duo's first song, "Sun's Gonna Shine."In the beginning, Ms. Brickell said she was afraid to tell Mr. Martin exactly what she was singing. "I was looking at a tadpole of a song," she explained, "and needed to let it grow into a hoppy little number before I shared its essence."But Mr. Martin was satisfied with this initial effort, and he gave Ms. Brickell another tune, faster and rhythmic, which she played at home while she was cooking and for which, she said, the lyrics "flowed out instantly":When you get to AshevilleTell me how you're doin'When Mr. Martin heard her lyrics, for "When You Get to Asheville," which became the leadoff track of "Love Has Come for You," he said, "I thought: 'Oh! Good.' We're not writing old-fashioned pretend songs. We're writing contemporary songs with sort of an old flavor. The banjo is evocative of something in the past, and these lyrics are evocative of something new."As he and Ms. Brickell were fine-tuning their demo tracks and passing them back and forth electronically, Mr. Martin played them for a friend, the musician Peter Asher, at another party.Mr. Asher, who was one half of the British pop duo Peter and Gordon and has worked as a manager, producer and record-label executive with artists like James Taylor and Linda Ronstadt, suggested to Mr. Martin that these songs could make for an unorthodox album."You didn't have to restrict yourself to the bluegrass palette, which is a relatively formal one," Mr. Asher recalled in a telephone interview. "It's like if you're writing Baroque chamber music, you only have a certain number of instruments to choose between. You don't think, what about a few electronic parts? What about a Fender Rhodes keyboard sound? Or what, indeed, about a drummer?"One e-mail exchange later with Mr. Martin, Mr. Asher found himself the producer of "Love Has Come for You."On close inspection, the album reveals ways in which Mr. Martin and Ms. Brickell are not entirely dissimilar. In addition to their overlapping social circle (Ms. Brickell is married to Paul Simon, a longtime friend of Mr. Martin's), they both were born in Texas. While Mr. Martin moved away from Waco at a young age, Ms. Brickell was strongly influenced by her upbringing in the Oak Cliff neighborhood of Dallas.
"Chants," due out on ECM on Tuesday, is the extraordinary new record by Craig Taborn, a pianist of cryptic insights and galactic interests. It's an acoustic piano trio album, with Thomas Morgan on bass and Gerald Cleaver on drums, and at times it can evoke other abstract rhapsodists in that format, like Paul Bley. But "Chants" is also a product of alert indeterminacy: it lands on a recognizable style the way a dragonfly alights on a reed. You might hear the shadow influence of second-wave Detroit techno on "Speak the Name" and "Beat the Ground" in their asymmetrical pulse patterns — but you don't notice any insistence behind the allusion. Likewise with flickers of Duke Ellington ("Silver Days or Love") and Herbie Nichols ("Hot Blood").Mr. Taborn, 43, has worked far more extensively in other people's bands than with his own; he isn't in a hurry. But the album, recorded a couple of months after this trio's Village Vanguard debut last year, confirms his standing as an inspired bandleader-composer, one of the smartest and slipperiest in his peer group. On Friday the trio begins a nine-city tour at the Walker Art Center in his hometown, Minneapolis. It appears at Roulette in Brooklyn on May 6.The same air of mystery, willful and unplaceable, that Mr. Taborn generates also underpins "Grace" (Savant), the latest post-bop dispatch from the tenor saxophonist J. D. Allen. It comes from an unexpected source: the pianist Eldar Djangirov, a former child prodigy whose own music tends to exude certainty and closure. Mr. Allen hasn't featured a pianist of any sort on his albums over the last five years, so Mr. Djangirov's mere presence is one surprise here; that it works so marvelously, with such intriguing elasticity, is another."Grace" divides into two acts, intended to frame a dramatic arc, but Mr. Allen doesn't push the concept: he's more interested in what he can physically achieve with his knockabout rhythm section, which also features the bassist Dezron Douglas and the drummer Jonathan Barber. His sound on tenor, soulful and centered, still suggests the John Coltrane of, say, "Crescent," but he has internalized that sound so fully that it feels like his own, even on a Coltrane-ish ballad like "Selah (My Refuge)." This is what a dynamic young jazz group can sound like when history's burden is carried lightly but honestly.Two weeks ago Eric Church won album of the year at the Academy of Country Music Awards for "Chief," his 2011 album on EMI Nashville. "Caught in the Act: Live," released on the same label shortly after the ceremony, should continue his hot streak: it's the better album, for starters, the one that truly captures his knack for rugged country formalism.Recorded last October at the Tivoli Theater in Chattanooga, Tenn., it's a batch of 17 songs played with hungry enthusiasm. (A limited vinyl edition, just released for Record Store Day, has four additional tracks.) Mr. Church is a stout, unflappable singer, and his band, driven hard by the drummer Craig Wright, does its best to turn each chorus into a powder keg. What a live setting does for Mr. Church's honky-tonkier songs, like "Drink in My Hand," "I'm Gettin' Stoned" or "Jack Daniels" (you may notice a theme here), is purely invigorating. Take in this version of "Smoke a Little Smoke," with its casual heave, its crowd singalong and its swerve into a Black Sabbath cover — and you'll have no cause to hear it any other way again.A flutist and tenor saxophonist in her late 20s, Anna Webber has an impressive new album, "Percussive Mechanics" (Pirouet), that taps the useful frictions between contemporary classical music and modern jazz. Recorded in Berlin with European musicians — including the pianist Elias Stemeseder, the vibraphonist Julius Heise and the drummer Martin Kruemmling — it hits many of the same marks as recent work by the percussionist John Hollenbeck, with whom Ms. Webber has studied and performed. (Originally from British Columbia, she now lives in Brooklyn.) At heart it's a study in contrapuntal systems, with compositions full of whirring gears. The title track layers overlapping parts for marimba, flute, clarinet and piano, before bass and drums kick in; "Dan:Ce" features an angular line played on flute, against the surge of a spring-loaded rhythm section.This is intricately plotted music, but Ms. Webber gives herself plenty of room to breathe. One track, wryly titled "Histrionics," involves a chantlike melody assigned only to tenor saxophone, toms and bass drum."Pull yourself together/And draw the line," murmurs José González at a memorable juncture on "Junip" (Mute), the self-titled second album by this Swedish indie-folk band. That injunction arrives in "Your Life Your Call," one of a handful of songs that offer an exasperated sort of counsel. ("Baton," another one of those, begins: "Whoa, now — pass the baton/You've been holding, holding, holding it for too long.")As in his successful solo career, Mr. González manages here to entertain some fairly puckered thoughts under cover of hazy beauty. The music is a little rougher around the edges, though: Junip, which also has Tobias Winterkorn on keyboards and Elias Araya on drums, mixes analog drones and fuzz with its usual blend of Krautrock and psychedelic folk. "Walking Lightly," the album's centerpiece (and possibly its mantra) suggests a retrofit West African groove from the '70s. "Let these moments last," Mr. González sings sweetly, before adding a touch of fatalism: "Could be gone so fast."
Last spring, reflecting on the completion of New York City Opera's first season as an itinerant company bringing productions to the people in theaters throughout the city, George Steel, its general and artistic director, defended his decision to abandon Lincoln Center and argued that things were going well."We are playing to our strengths," Mr. Steel said in an interview. Looking ahead to the 2012-13 season, he said that City Opera would be "out in the city with four brand-new productions of unusual works." That, he asserted, "is what our audiences are interested in."Maybe so. On Saturday night at City Center, the company presents the final performance of its fourth and last production of the 2012-13 season: the director Christopher Alden's zany, slightly surreal and exhilarating staging of Offenbach's operetta "La Périchole." Say what you will about today's City Opera being only a remnant of its former self, artistically Mr. Steel has delivered on his promise. This season he presented bold productions of four unusual works. At least three, including "La Périchole," have been must-see events for operagoers in New York."La Périchole" was the second consecutive production at City Center, the company's birthplace, which it left in 1965 to take up residence in Lincoln Center, in what was then the New York State Theater (now the David H. Koch Theater). It felt like a homecoming to see the company on the City Center stage. The renovated City Center is now much more inviting and comfortable. And whatever they did to that theater improved the acoustics. It might make sense, and would certainly simplify things, for City Opera to move back there. Many challenges would be met if the company had a home.The season began in February at the Brooklyn Academy of Music with the director Jay Scheib's dazzling staging of "Powder Her Face," the 1995 debut opera by the audacious British composer Thomas Adès about the real-life sex scandal involving the Duchess of Argyll. Much of the buzz concerned the scene in which the mezzo-soprano Allison Cook, playing the Duchess, reflected on her sexcapades while some two dozen fully naked men casually strolled by. But the production also involved an inventive use of live videos, with a camera following characters to back rooms. For a week "Powder Her Face" was the most daring theatrical event in New York.The following week, also at the academy, was Britten's "Turn of the Screw" in an updated production by the director Sam Buntrock, who gave a "Poltergeist" twist to this 19th-century tale of a governess who comes to the haunted house of two orphaned children under the care of an absent uncle. If this was the least adventurous offering, it was still a novel take on the opera, and the cast was terrific.The company's return to City Center happened this month with a Rossini rarity, "Moses in Egypt," a stirring biblical drama, in a production by Michael Counts that used arresting videos to depict night skies, desert landscapes and, in the final scene, the parting of the Red Sea. The opera world has been talking about the potential of video to make possible a new kind of old-fashioned spectacle. This production pointed a way.And now there is Mr. Alden's manic "Périchole," Offenbach's comedy about a couple, struggling street singers in Peru, who become entangled with the country's daffy viceroy. As played by the dynamic bass Kevin Burdette in this production, the viceroy is a demented, jittery and sex-crazed ruler in some vaguely modern realm that could be Miami Beach as much as Lima.So where does this leave City Opera for the future? Mr. Steel made inspired choices of works and directors. All four shows were artistically strong. But because City Opera must rent space and build each production to order, it had to crowd its offerings into concentrated periods of two weeks each: the first two at the academy in February; the second two at City Center this month, for a total of just 16 performances.This now seems to be the template for City Opera: to offer four productions each season with the hope of expanding in the future. To his credit, as Mr. Steel explained in a phone interview, for the first time in a decade City Opera has balanced its books. Its operating budget of about $12 million may not be much. But it pays the bills. When might the company extend its season?"As soon as we have the money," Mr. Steel said, an answer that should reassure his board and patrons.Unlike any opera company that maintains a home, City Opera has no chance to coast, in a good sense, by regularly bringing back successful past productions. I am not just talking the distant past. What about productions Mr. Steel has presented since taking charge in 2009? I long to see again Mr. Alden's revelatory production of Bernstein's opera "A Quiet Place."The time has come to end the debate over whether Mr. Steel's decision to abandon Lincoln Center was a visionary move or an act of desperation. The old City Opera is no more. Those who do not remember the company from its days of decades ago can read about it in the conductor Julius Rudel's new memoir, "First and Lasting Impressions," written with Rebecca Paller. Mr. Rudel recounts his 22 years as City Opera's director, not just the triumphs and adventures, but also the follies and backstage contretemps.It is amazing, though, to look at the archives of City Opera and see how many productions the company offered at its height. For example, during the 1969-70 season (the combined two-month fall and two-month spring seasons), the company presented 21 productions, not just lots of standard repertory, but things like Shostakovich's "Katerina Ismailova" and Ginastera's "Bomarzo," for a total of 145 performances.During the interview Mr. Steel spoke of the company as having two main bases: the Brooklyn Academy and City Center. Yet each will be used only once next season. Mark-Anthony Turnage's outrageous yet moving opera "Anna Nicole" will have its American premiere at the academy in September; Mr. Alden's new production of Mozart's "Marriage of Figaro" will play City Center in April 2014.Mr. Steel, who has a keen interest in overlooked 18th-century operas, will offer a true rarity, Johann Christian Bach's "Endimione" in its American premiere at El Museo del Barrio in East Harlem, an intimate space ideal for Baroque works. And City Opera will present a co-production of Bartok's "Bluebeard's Castle" with St. Ann's Warehouse in Brooklyn that will utilize the warehouse's entire 13,000-square-foot space.All enticing. Yet as long as City Opera remains a roving company presenting a handful of productions in various theaters, it is going to be harder to cultivate a strong profile and build loyal audiences. Mr. Steel has a tenacious commitment to his vision of a traveling opera company. The truth is he may not see other options.If Mr. Steel and his board would like to settle down somewhere — and there are compelling arguments to do so — the place seems obvious: City Center, where "the people's opera" opened its doors in 1944.
The Beach Boys have won an eight-year legal battle over a collection of their memorabilia, including more than 50 handwritten scores for hits like "Good Vibrations" and "Surfin' U.S.A." But it is a partial victory, as binding arbitration has forced the band to agree to sell the memorabilia and split the money with other investors, lawyers and corporate entities who say they have a legal claim to it, court records show.The memorabilia was put up for sale at a London auction house, the Fame Bureau, this month in a sealed-bid auction that ends on May 15. With more than 2,000 documents, the collection has been appraised, conservatively, at $6 million to $8 million. It contains photos, letters, notes, signed contracts, lyric sheets and handwritten scores by Brian Wilson for major hits and a few unpublished songs. It even includes what appears to be the band's first royalty check — for $990."It's a historical collection," said Ted Owen, chief executive of the Fame Bureau. "It's one of those things you cannot put a price on, because there is no precedent."The story of how the collection finally came to market, court records show, is a convoluted tale involving allegations of theft and a failed real-estate company in Florida that used the Beach Boys memorabilia as collateral for loans. In the end, a half-dozen people who have no connection to the Beach Boys have a stake in the auction, among them a Florida investment banker and a firefighter's widow in Yonkers.At the center of the tale is Roy A. Sciacca, a tour manager and former musician who has a history of starting media companies. Mr. Sciacca, who has been largely left out of the final settlement, said he bought 28 boxes of memorabilia from the Beach Boys at a warehouse sale in Los Angeles in the 1980s, when he was a struggling Sunset Strip guitarist. He said that he heard about the sale from a flier and that the Beach Boys tour manager, Elliott Lott, supervised it, a claim Mr. Lott has denied."I bought so much stuff that the manager of my band at the time went and rented a Ryder truck," Mr. Sciacca said in an interview this week.Later, he said, he found that two boxes contained a cache of scores, lead sheets, signed contracts and other valuable documents; other boxes contained less lofty items like guitar cases, lighting equipment and a set of Stetson hats the band had worn onstage."What I found was, at the end of the day, I had everything from 'Help Me, Rhonda' to 'God Only Knows,' " Mr. Sciacca said. "All their sheet music. All their scoring."In 2005 Mr. Sciacca, who had moved to Fort Lauderdale, Fla., tried to sell part of the collection, about 100 items, through Mr. Owen, who at the time had an auction house in London called Cooper Owen. The Beach Boys sued in federal court in Los Angeles to stop the sale, accusing Mr. Sciacca of conspiring with a North Hollywood warehouse owner, Allan D. Gaba, who was his friend, to take the memorabilia without permission.In April 2007 a federal judge threw out the suit, ruling that there was no evidence that Mr. Sciacca and Mr. Gaba had stolen the boxes. But the decision was overturned on appeal, and a trial date was set for December 2008. Just before trial, however, Mr. Sciacca and Brother Records — the Beach Boys' corporate entity — agreed to work out a settlement and to go to binding arbitration, if necessary.Court records show, however, that other business partners of Mr. Sciacca's had a claim to the collection. While the appeal was pending, Mr. Sciacca had entered into an agreement to sell the memorabilia to Global Realty Development Corporation, a company with plans to build pachinko parlors in Japan, in return for stock. The company, in turn, had used the memorabilia as collateral to obtain $2.2 million in loans from five investors, among them Baruch Halpern, a venture capitalist in Aventura, Fla.
Fitz and the Tantrums, the kinetic Los Angeles sextet led by Michael Fitzpatrick, emerged in 2009 and was almost immediately lumped into a neo-soul scene with acts like Sharon Jones and the Dap-Kings.Their sharply tailored, lounge-chic look and Motown-meets-Silver Lake sound — colored by bright blasts of saxophone, rolling bass lines and belted he-said, she-said vocals by Mr. Fitzpatrick, 42, and Noelle Scaggs, 33 — had something to do with it. But the band came home after more than three years on the road supporting its 2010 debut album, "Pickin' Up the Pieces" (Dangerbird Records), determined to move out of the retro box with its next record, its major-label debut."We didn't know what" it would be, Mr. Fitzpatrick said. "The only thing I knew was, there were going to be elements that unequivocally said that this was a record from today and not a record from 1960."On "More Than Just a Dream," due out on May 7 on Elektra, the vintage organs and saxophone have receded in favor of thick walls of synthesizers and club-ready beats. Ms. Scaggs, whose charged interplay with Mr. Fitzpatrick fuels the band's energetic live shows, is a more prominent presence on the new album. And Mr. Fitzpatrick's vocals, which once elicited Daryl Hall comparisons from Mr. Hall's own mother, have soared into an even more lustrous, androgynous register.There's even some guitar, a reversal of sorts for a band that used to reject the instrument pointedly. "When we were making this record, one rule was, nobody was allowed to say 'That doesn't sound like us,' " Mr. Fitzpatrick said.The band was in New York recently to promote the album and warm up for a summer tour with Bruno Mars. It also has performances coming up on the Jimmy Kimmel and David Letterman shows. Over lunch at a Midtown Manhattan hotel with Jeremy Egner, Mr. Fitzpatrick and Ms. Scaggs shared an easy rapport, trading lines as smoothly as they do onstage, discussing YouTube focus groups and going big. Here are excerpts from the conversation.Q. Why was it such a priority to move beyond the retro label?A. Michael Fitzpatrick We got tired of people pigeonholing us. And I think we kind of came back with, "Oh, you think we're just that?" Because sometimes it felt almost dismissive.Noelle Scaggs We don't want people to think we hated that title. But we didn't think it was such a big part of our makeup that we couldn't do anything else.There's more of a dance music element now.Scaggs Yeah, like "[The] Walker," for instance, has a really cool four-on-the-floor movement beat to it. We were focused on making it a fun record, making it as great as possible when we're performing it live. I know for a lot of the songs we were like,"Let's go anthem, boom!" "How big can we make that chorus?"There's also guitar now, and didn't you have —Fitzpatrick The rule against it? We never wanted the rule to hinder us. You have to serve the song, and there were instances where it just felt like, harmonically, it needed that. So we let ourselves go there.Scaggs No, it did not blow up. We just didn't add a guitar player to the band.Did you worry about alienating fans?Fitzpatrick I was like, are we going too far? And what I've gotten more than often from anybody is: "This feels like a healthy step and a half forward. It still feels like you." When we premiered "Out of My League" on YouTube, there was a whole debate going on with our fans. How lucky is it that anyone even gives a [expletive] about something we made? Because in 2013, with how much stuff there is, to have anybody pay attention or care about whether your sound evolved — it's a very, very blessed place to be.
PALO ALTO, CALIF. — The performance space of the Center for Computer Research in Music and Acoustics at Stanford University was filled to capacity on a recent Saturday morning, the blinds drawn against the optimistic California sunshine. Sets of loudspeakers positioned on either side of the room emitted a repetitive pattern of phonemes that were so short as to resemble brief electronic bleeps. After a few seconds, a voice with zero inflection but crisp diction seemed to emerge out of the bleeps, barking at me, "Wake up — wake up — wake up — wake up," over and over, steady as a metronome. Then it changed tack: "Window — window — where's the window — where's the rainbow — where's the rainbow."These seemed like fair questions to ask. Except not only was there no rainbow, but the recorded sounds that had entered my ears also contained none of the words I was "hearing" so clearly. Diana Deutsch, the psychologist who had designed this aural brainteaser and used it to open her talk here at a symposium, Hearing Voices, had recorded merely the words "high" and "low," playing them from the two speakers offset, so that the left emits one word and the right, the other.When she plays them to large groups of students at the University of California at San Diego, where she teaches, and asks them to record what they hear, she said, a lot can be told about what's going on in their lives. Before exams many are likely to hear "no brain." Numbers of female students report hearing the words "love" and "Diet Coke."Ms. Deutsch was the first speaker at a one-day symposium on auditory hallucinations, and already I was hearing things that weren't there. The night before, many of us had attended the premiere of "Visitations," a double bill of one-act operas about auditory hallucinations by Jonathan Berger, a composer and Stanford professor, at the university's Bing Concert Hall.Mr. Berger convened the Hearing Voices symposium as part of a series of annual conferences he hosts at the center, known as Ccrma (and pronounced "karma"), on music and the brain. Speakers this year investigated auditory hallucinations in a variety of contexts and offered many different — and for the most part, tentative — explanations.Shaili Jain, a psychiatrist at the Veterans Affairs Palo Alto Health Care System, found auditory hallucinations among the symptoms of post-traumatic stress disorder in war veterans. Judith Ford, a psychiatrist from the University of California, San Francisco, presented brain scans of schizophrenic patients, which showed a lack of communication between Broca's area, the part of the brain responsible for processing speech, and the auditory cortex. This could explain the lack of function common to many schizophrenics and the failure of those hearing voices to tag inner speech as coming from the self.Tanya Marie Luhrmann is an anthropologist and the author of "When God Talks Back" (Knopf, 2012), a book describing her work with evangelical Christians who report hearing the voice of God with astonishing frequency. In her paper she pointed out the degree to which training — regular practice of sensory-rich meditation — could precipitate such visions. More recently, she said, she has been investigating cultural environment as a factor that determines the nature of auditory hallucinations in schizophrenic patients. While American subjects were overwhelmingly likely to hear negative and threatening voices, patients in Ghana more often reported hearing the voice of God or of a benign authority figure; Indian schizophrenics heard nagging relatives.Cultural context also seems to determine a phenomenon Ms. Deutsch has been studying for the last decade: musical hallucinations. "They often occur hand in hand with hearing loss and dementia," she said. "And virtually all sufferers are professional or amateur musicians."The music they hear is typically loud, polyphonic and annoying. Where the inner playlist is recognized as an existing piece of music, it is often religious or patriotic in nature."People can hallucinate music they don't like," Ms. Deutsch said. "One composer of avant-garde contemporary music hallucinated 1950s music hall."Richard Warp, a composer and sound designer based in the San Francisco Bay Area who frequently travels between Britain and California, experiences musical hallucinations whenever he is jet-lagged, he said during a question-and-answer session after Ms. Deutsch's talk. The music that comes to him unbidden is loud, clear and detailed, he added, and "best described as symphonic speed jazz."Elaborating in a later telephone interview, Mr. Warp said: "I'm not really a jazz man, but it's got something frenetic and polyphonous about it that's akin to jazz improvisation. What I'm surprised by is the scale and detail. There are many instruments playing, and it makes sense. Every so often a solo will come out that will be played by the oboe, and I'll just go with it, too tired to write anything down. It's this track that's playing in my head, and it is constantly evolving."
When the Global Poverty Project staged a benefit concert with Neil Young, the Black Keys and Foo Fighters in Central Park last fall, skeptics wondered if that nonprofit's attempt to generate pressure on world leaders to help the poor would fade as soon as the amplifiers and guitars were put away.But this week the charity proved it had won converts, at least within the music industry. More than 70 artists, among them Jay-Z, Beyoncé, Bruce Springsteen, Pearl Jam and Bruno Mars, have pledged to give the project two tickets from each of their concerts over the next year, creating a pool of more than 20,000 tickets.The tickets will be used as prizes to encourage people to become involved in causes like fighting poverty in the third world, eradicating polio, building schools and ending famine. To win the tickets, fans are asked to earn points by taking action through a related Web site, globalcitizen.org. They can sign petitions, pledge to volunteer their time as aid workers, write elected leaders or donate money to aid organizations. "It provides us with an opportunity to get really powerful activism worldwide," said Hugh Evans, the chief executive of the Global Poverty Project.The tickets will be distributed through the site starting on Thursday, and Mr. Evans expects that dozens of concerts will be listed immediately. The site will offer users two ways to get tickets: by entering a lottery after earning a low number of points, or by saving up more points to redeem for tickets directly.Over the last nine months, Mr. Evans persuaded many of the biggest players in the music industry to back the idea, including the three major talent agencies, the two largest concert promoters, dozens of band managers and some of the biggest music festivals.The program was the brainchild of Kelly Curtis, the manager for Pearl Jam, who came up with the plan last year after Mr. Evans asked his band to play in the Central Park concert. It caught on quickly with artists and managers because giving up two tickets for each concert is a small sacrifice — and because the causes the project supports tend not to generate controversy or alienate fans.One artist who signed on, Dierks Bentley, said, "As a country singer, I really do try to avoid any sort of political involvement" that might "throw my fans for a loop.""But when it comes to poverty man, shoot," he said. "There are so many people in this country who are struggling, and a whole other level of struggle outside our borders, and I've had a chance to see part of that."Grace Potter, the indie-rock singer from Vermont, said she and her band did not hesitate to participate. "Through the grapevine you hear about things, and sometimes you are like, 'No thanks,' and other times you're like, 'How could we not be a part of this?' " she said. "This was certainly one of those."After the Sept. 29 Central Park concert, Mr. Curtis and Michele Anthony, a former executive at Sony Music who had been instrumental in putting on the event, formed a committee of music industry heavyweights to steer the two-tickets program. The committee included Marsha Vlasic from ICM Partners, Marc Geiger from William Morris Endeavor, Rob Light from Creative Artists Agency and Mark Campana from Live Nation. They held a series of town-hall-style meetings for managers in New York and Los Angeles, persuading dozens to sign on."The hard part was getting this down to one page to explain to people what it is," said Mr. Curtis, the Pearl Jam manager. "But once we got it down, it became easy."Among the other acts taking part are Kings of Leon, Kesha, Kanye West, Depeche Mode, My Morning Jacket, John Mayer and Mr. Young. A few indie acts have joined in, including Edward Sharpe and the Magnetic Zeroes and Grizzly Bear. The Coachella and Bonnaroo festivals have also pledged tickets.Mr. Evans said some managers had pledged to donate tickets to each of their bands' shows over the next three years, and a few had said they would provide more than two tickets for each show. He said that the alliance of the talent agencies and concert promoters gave the effort influence with major artists."It's been an industry-led initiative," he said.
NASHVILLE — Fans began gathering outside the Grand Ole Opry House at noon on Wednesday, almost 24 hours before the funeral of the country singer George Jones, who died at 81 last Friday. By 8 a.m. Thursday, two hours before the service was scheduled to start, the throng had snaked its way through Opry Plaza onto the sidewalk to the Gaylord Opryland hotel, extending the equivalent of two to three blocks.Soon some 3,000 admirers, including some of the biggest names in country music, crowded into the Opry House to pay tribute to Mr. Jones, one of the giants of the genre, at a public funeral. Featured speakers at the service included former Gov. Mike Huckabee of Arkansas; the country singers Kenny Chesney and Barbara Mandrell; CBS News' chief Washington correspondent, Bob Schieffer; and the former first lady Laura Bush. The funeral was broadcast by eight television stations, two radio networks and streamed live by WSMonline.com.Greeted by a standing ovation, Mrs. Bush injected some levity into the proceedings recalling how on more than one occasion she passed by the exercise room in the White House and heard Mr. Jones's "White Lightning" playing while her husband was working out on the treadmill. George W. listening to George J., she called it.Charlie Daniels, Kid Rock, Alan Jackson, Brad Paisley and Ronnie Milsap were among the dozen or so musicians who performed, a cloud of witnesses that testified to the stylistic and intergenerational reach of Mr. Jones's inimitable voice and music.Most of the songs they sang were Southern gospel standards, including a spine-tingling a cappella take of "Farther Along" by the Oak Ridge Boys and a soaring duet version of "Go Rest High on that Mountain" by Patty Loveless and Vince Gill. Midway through the latter Mr. Gill got so emotional that he couldn't sing his lines, opting instead to transmit his feelings for his late friend and mentor through his fingertips. The blistering acoustic guitar solo that ensued had the crowd on its feet.Kid Rock introduced his number with the story of how, when he went to visit him in the hospital last week, Mr. Jones pulled off his oxygen mask so that he could give him a kiss.Not surprisingly, much of the testimony about Mr. Jones, one of the last links to country music's rural pre-homogenized past, centered on his perseverance amid adversity and hardship — everything from growing up dirt-poor with an abusive father to battling inner demons like crippling addiction and self-doubt."George Jones was more than just a country singer," Mr. Schieffer said at the funeral, which lasted two and a half hours. "He was a country song, and it never was an easy song."Norman Wright, a retired 69-year-old Texas transplant and a fan of Mr. Jones's music since the mid-1950s, had only been in line for a couple of hours. Nevertheless he knew what it was like to wait for the singer, having once bought a ticket for a show for which Mr. Jones failed to appear because he was drunk or otherwise incapacitated. Mr. Wright, who wore a greased-back mop of steel gray hair in the style worn by Mr. Jones in the 1950s, said he had been disappointed by the cancellation, but "I got over it quickly, but only because I really loved the guy and his music."At a private visitation for Mr. Jones's family and friends on Wednesday evening, Mr. Schieffer had recalled a conversation with Mr. Jones about his reputation for canceling shows. "He said the thing he could never forgive himself for was realizing those people had saved all their money to come see him, and that most of them were poor," Mr. Schieffer said.The singer Brenda Lee, 68, who first toured with Mr. Jones when she was 10, recalled at Wednesday's visitation how poignant one of his songs, "Who's Gonna Fill Their Shoes" now seemed. "I've lost a great friend," she said. "The world has lost a great voice. It will not be forgotten."
Spring for Music , the annual weeklong festival of North American orchestras at Carnegie Hall, has in its two previous outings felt like a grand celebration. And it undoubtedly will again, beginning on Monday: a celebration of artistic ambition and achievement, of civic spirit and generosity. But this year there are also melancholy undercurrents. The festival has already announced that, having failed to secure sponsorship to continue its financing beyond next year, it will end after the 2014 season.What's more, the Oregon Symphony, the consensus favorite of the 2011 festival with its war-themed program, had to withdraw this year for financial reasons. (The festival pays a fee to each orchestra and covers the hall rental, promotion and ticket sales, but the orchestras have to pay for travel and lodging.)The festival chooses orchestras mainly on the strength of the programs they propose: the adventurousness of the repertory, the way the works are combined and contextualized, and the extent to which the program reflects the orchestra's specific mission. In this case, the Oregon Symphony had built a program around Kurt Weill's "Seven Deadly Sins." The Detroit Symphony, which had already been selected to perform its program of Charles Ives's four symphonies, was quickly able to assemble another program built around "Deadly Sins," a mix of Rachmaninoff, Ravel and Weill.With Oregon's withdrawal, too, the Albany Symphony becomes the lone ensemble to make a repeat appearance in the festival, on Tuesday (until, that is, Detroit plays its second program, on Friday). The Baltimore Symphony and the Buffalo Philharmonic fill out the week.As always, all tickets are $25. Expect a dollop of boosterism in the audience, as busloads or planeloads of hometown loyalists cheer on their heroes. And in the end, when the fans start waving color-coded handkerchiefs provided by the festival and the orchestras start playing, those melancholy notes should be forgotten, at least for a week. Let the celebration begin.It is a hopeful sign that two of the festival's five conductors this year are women, although Marin Alsop's ascent to the Baltimore Symphony Orchestra's podium in 2007 was not without incident. By now, the marriage seems a happy and fruitful one, having yielded numerous recordings and a continuing history of visits by the orchestra to Carnegie Hall, most recently in 2011. Still, there's always room for more."Any concert at Carnegie Hall is important," said Paul Meecham, the orchestra's president and chief executive. Spring for Music's push for accessibility, he added, especially in its ticket pricing, jibes with the orchestra's own mission to expand audiences along those lines.The Carnegie program reflects Ms. Alsop's predilections, combining works by Americans whose music she has fostered, John Adams's "Shaker Loops" and Jennifer Higdon's "Concerto 4-3," with a relatively unknown symphony by a 20th-century master, Prokofiev's Fourth.Joining the orchestra in Ms. Higdon's work will be Time for Three, the unconventional string trio (two violins and double bass) for which it was written.The Albany Symphony and David Alan Miller, its music director since 1992, have developed a specialty in American music. Their 2011 festival program was built around spirituals. Now they offer jazz-tinged Americana: a suite from John Harbison's "Great Gatsby," which had its premiere at the Metropolitan Opera in 1999; George Gershwin's "Second Rhapsody," which lives quietly in the shadow of "Rhapsody in Blue" (with Kevin Cole as the piano soloist); and Morton Gould's Third Symphony.Gould, born in Queens 100 years ago, won a Pulitzer Prize in 1995 for his "Stringmusic," written for another festival representative, the National Symphony, but he remains best known for his works in a popular vein, for Broadway, film and television. The Symphony No. 3 (1946), which Mr. Miller and the orchestra have recorded, is big, complex and something of a cult item."It is a holy grail piece for American music fanatics," Mr. Miller said. "I won't claim that it's a hidden world masterpiece, but it is a formidable piece by an immensely talented young composer."The New York Philharmonic gave the work's premiere in 1948, but with a substitute finale requested by the conductor, Dimitri Mitropoulos. The Albany performance is said to be the New York premiere of the original version.
In search of some live Brazilian music a few months ago, I found my way to Dizzy's Club Coca-Cola, in the Time Warner Center, where the Brazilian percussionist Duduka Da Fonseca was leading a quintet. I can't say I knew much about Mr. Da Fonseca before I heard his band that night, and among the things I didn't know was that his quintet's regular reed player was a 38-year-old Israeli woman named Anat Cohen , who has lived in New York since 1999.On the first few tunes of the set — mostly the kind of fast-paced, Brazilian-tinged jazz I've always loved — Ms. Cohen played the reed instrument most closely associated with postwar jazz: the tenor saxophone. It was immediately apparent that she was a terrific musician, fluid, full-throated, with a knack for creating beautifully crafted, even eloquent solos. Around the fifth song, however, the quintet began playing "Chorinho pra Ele," a simple, infectious samba by Hermeto Pascoal, the great Brazilian multi-instrumentalist. And that's when Ms. Cohen did something you rarely see a jazz reed player do these days. She took out her clarinet.As good as her saxophone playing was, Ms. Cohen on the clarinet was a revelation. Using the clarinet's upper register, she could evoke infectious joy. In the lower register, her playing could conjure a deep, soulful melancholy. On up-tempo numbers, her improvisations weren't just bebop fast; they had a clarity and deep intelligence that is really quite rare. She made it look effortless, even as she was playing the most technically difficult of all the reed instruments. She only played a handful of songs on the clarinet that night, but every time she did, she took my breath away.I suppose I could say that I'd never heard anyone play the clarinet quite like that, which would be true enough. (As I later learned, she's been the Jazz Journalists Association's clarinetist of the year for the last six years.) But let's be honest here: like many jazz fans, I have rarely heard anyone play live jazz clarinet.A dominant instrument in jazz's early years, the clarinet faded into obscurity as the saxophone became the reed instrument of choice once Charlie Parker and his alto sax helped birth the bebop movement. When you think of jazz clarinetists, only a handful of names spring to mind, including Benny Goodman and Artie Shaw, whose heyday was the 1930s, and Woody Allen, whose playing will never cause anyone to forget that he makes his living as a filmmaker.Watching Ms. Cohen that night, I thought of another clarinet player: myself. All through grade school, I took lessons, but in high school, as I became captivated by jazz, I tossed the clarinet aside and took up the saxophone and flute. In the little high school group I played in, I don't think I ever once trotted out my clarinet. In high school jam sessions, every reed player was a saxophonist. The clarinet was just, well, uncool. ("Highly mediocre" would be a generous way to describe my playing.)I could imagine Ms. Cohen having those same feelings as a teenager. I could picture her abandoning her clarinet in favor of the hipper, harder-edge tenor sax. What I wound up wondering was what led Ms. Cohen back to the clarinet? And what did her re-embrace of it say not only about her, but about the clarinet's potential to become a mainstream jazz instrument again?"I wanted to be John Coltrane," Ms. Cohen said with a laugh a few days later, when we met in her small East Village office. The second of three children, Ms. Cohen grew up surrounded by music; her brothers were also aspiring jazz musicians. (Indeed, all three Cohens are musicians today: older brother, Yuval, plays the soprano saxophone, while younger brother, Avishai, is a trumpeter. They often play together as the 3 Cohens.) By the time they were in their early teens, the Cohens were all enrolled in a music conservatory in Tel Aviv.Ms. Cohen took up the clarinet because the conservatory needed clarinet players, and she was amenable. The instrument fit well with her first introduction to jazz: the conservatory's Dixieland band, which she joined. "I discovered that I loved the music of New Orleans," she said. The clarinet, of course, was an important instrument in early New Orleans jazz.But as her tastes broadened, Ms. Cohen fell under the sway of Coltrane, the great 1960s tenor saxophonist. In high school, a teacher told her that her clarinet really didn't fit with the modern jazz she liked. "I kind of put a cap on my clarinet without really thinking about it," she recalled.By the time she enrolled in Berklee College of Music in Boston in 1996, she was a committed tenor saxophonist, wanting nothing so much as to emulate the "sheets of sound" that Coltrane made so famous.At Berklee, she occasionally picked up the clarinet — "whenever they needed a clarinet player, they called me" — and remembers one of her professors telling her that she "really had a sound on the clarinet." But she let the remark pass. By 1999, she had moved to New York, and was making her way as a professional musician. She was the tenor saxophonist in an all-female jazz ensemble called the Diva Jazz Orchestra. Her friend, the Brazilian saxophonist Daniela Spielmann, recalled that when she first met Ms. Cohen, "all she ever played was the saxophone."
AUSTIN, TEX. — The Central Presbyterian Church here turns into a concert hall during the annual South By Southwest Music festival, and on a Friday afternoon in mid-March, Natalie Maines of the Dixie Chicks was doing her soundcheck there for a midnight show. It was an early steppingstone for her new solo career, a preview of songs from her debut album, "Mother" (Columbia), which is due for release this week.With "Mother," Ms. Maines puts a clear distance between herself and the buoyant, bluegrassy songs that made the Dixie Chicks far and away the best-selling female group in country music. As a member of the Dixie Chicks since she joined the group's founding members, Martie Maguire and Emily Robison, in 1995, Ms. Maines has sold some 30 million albums in the United States alone.But after lying low in recent years, Ms. Maines, 38, makes her own statement with "Mother." She recorded it with the band led by Ben Harper, a bluesy, socially conscious songwriter and slide guitarist, and it's darker and more pensive than her sassy public image would have foretold.At the church, Ms. Maines' parents and a handful of onlookers watched as Mr. Harper and the band set up on an altar crowded with instruments and amps. One musician pointed toward the pulpit and joshingly asked Ms. Maines, "Wouldn't you be more comfortable there?""You've already done that," Tina Maines, Natalie's mother, immediately chimed in.Ms. Maines flashed a rueful grin and agreed. "I've already done that," she said.The image of Ms. Maines preaching from a pulpit seemed to flash back to the remark that changed her life. On March 10, 2003, shortly before the invasion of Iraq, the Dixie Chicks were performing in London when Ms. Maines spoke against the impending war and added, "Just so you know, we're ashamed that the president of the United States is from Texas."Within days, conservative media outlets branded the Chicks as treasonous, and fearful country radio stations took their music off the air. Although the Dixie Chicks continued to tour, threats and protests met their concerts. The group eventually responded with its 2006 album, "Taking the Long Way," which included the defiant Top 10 single, "Not Ready to Make Nice," and was showered with Grammy awards.The Dixie Chicks have continued to tour on and off and will be appearing at Canadian festivals this summer. Ms. Maines has said she was reluctant to do this year's shows but was "outvoted" by the rest of the band and its management. Yet the Dixie Chicks have not made a new studio album since 2006, and Ms. Maguire and Ms. Robison now write songs for their own duo, the Courtyard Hounds. Relations are amicable; on May 16, the Courtyard Hounds, Ms. Maines and the Dixie Chicks are all performing at a benefit concert for the Austin public television station KLRU.Since Ms. Maguire plays fiddle and Ms. Robison plays banjo, the Courtyard Hounds have stayed close to country music. But with "Mother," Ms. Maines has decisively left country behind."There's a pressure of wanting to please other people and not let Martie and Emily down in particular," Ms. Maines said in an interview at an Austin hotel. "But there's a point of feeling like I'm almost 40 and I'm just not going to do anything I don't want to do any more."She was dressed in chicly understated graphite gray and has let her hair return from the blond of the Dixie Chicks' heyday to its natural light brown; her short and upswept haircut, she said with a chuckle, is a lot like Justin Bieber's. She laughed easily, but her blue eyes flashed as she recalled decade-old wounds."There's just no trust as far as the industry we were in, the country music industry," she said. "To do country music right now would feel like too big a compromise — I just can't do it. It took a lot of years for me to admit that to myself and definitely to admit it to them."Between Dixie Chicks tours, Ms. Maines became a homebody, gardening and raising her two sons (with her husband, the actor Adrian Pasdar). Her public presence was largely limited to studio duets (with Tony Bennett and Neil Diamond), appearances on satellite radio and the television show of her friend Howard Stern, and her unvarnished personal Twitter feed, where she wisecracks, offers stray daily details and sometimes snaps back at the political hostility she still receives.That Twitter account, she said, "is going to get me in trouble." She deliberately hasn't had Twitter verify it as hers: "I can say, 'That's not me. I don't know who that crazy girl is saying those horrible things.' " She laughed and added: "It really probably is people getting to see the truest part, the part that usually only people close really hear or see. I feel free to spit it out there."On March 10, she tweeted, "Good thing I'm not a told ya so kind of person or I might point out that 10 years ago today I said GWB was full of bull and I was right." Clearly, she is unrepentant."I would never take it back," she said. "I'm so glad it happened. I feel like it sort of freed me in a lot of ways. I didn't know people were misinterpreting who I was as a person, or making all of these assumptions because of the kind of music I played. I have no problem being a pro-gay, pro-choice, pro-woman, pro-free speech kind of a person, and I have no shame in that or apology or embarrassment. I think I just felt very rebellious about it all. Yeah, this is me. Like it or hate it, I'm not doing anything wrong."She was in no hurry to make her own album. "I caught up on a lot of just domestic normal everyday stuff," she said, "and grew up a lot, and went to therapy, and did a lot of contemplating and figuring things out. I needed to just strip everything away and figure out who I am and get to know myself, as cheesy as that sounds."
Next Sunday at Carnegie Hall, Mr. Levine conducts the Met Orchestra in what should be a revealing and rewarding program: the Prelude to Act I of Wagner's "Lohengrin"; Beethoven's Fourth Piano Concerto, with the pianist Evgeny Kissin, who has given some of his most penetrating performances with Mr. Levine; and Schubert's magisterial Symphony No. 9 in C.This will be Mr. Levine's first performance in over two years. On May 14, 2011, the last day of the Metropolitan Opera's season, he conducted Wagner's "Walküre" in the new production by Robert Lepage, which had recently been introduced, and it seemed possible that he might rebound from years of spinal problems, shoulder injuries and surgeries. But in August of that year, when he fell during a vacation and suffered another serious back injury, his countless admirers wondered whether he would ever conduct again.Now he is finally ready, as he anticipated he would be in an interview last fall. At Carnegie Hall, Mr. Levine, who turns 70 next month, will use the motorized wheelchair he has been relying on of late. The Met's tech crew has constructed a special podium with a lift for the chair.This is a time to cheer the return of a musician who has been the most influential American conductor on the international scene since Leonard Bernstein, an artist who for more than 40 years has made the Met his home base and, well, made the Met the Met.But significant artistic questions hover over the company right now. And even if Mr. Levine's Carnegie performance is a triumph, it will not resolve those issues.Music lovers everywhere surely hope Mr. Levine will continue to conduct often. But is he fulfilling all the duties of a music director at the Met? From all reports, he works regularly with singers in the company's young artist development program, an essential training initiative he created in 1980; he also hears auditions and participates in artistic planning sessions.Naturally, much of what an esteemed maestro contributes to an opera company takes place behind closed doors. But in the past, when Mr. Levine was working at full capacity, he redefined the role of music director in a public way that sent clear signals to operagoers and patrons. Indeed, for many years his title was artistic director, until 2004, when he began his tenure as music director of the Boston Symphony Orchestra and Joseph Volpe, then the Met's general manager, notched down Mr. Levine's title to music director: an indication that Mr. Levine, understandably, would not be quite as involved as before.In his glory days, Mr. Levine took a holistic approach to overseeing artistic matters at the Met. Not only did he rehearse and conduct operas, he cultivated singers, coached the young artists, took the Met Orchestra to Carnegie Hall for a popular series of concerts beginning in 1991 and, seven years later, inaugurated the Met Chamber Ensemble, which presented challenging programs of new and old music, mostly at Weill Recital Hall.Look, for example, at the 2000-1 season, not an uncommonly busy one for Mr. Levine. He conducted sizable runs of eight operas, including new productions of Beethoven's "Fidelio" and Verdi's "Nabucco," as well as Levine specialties, like Debussy's "Pelléas et Mélisande," Berg's "Lulu" and Wagner's "Parsifal." In addition, with the Met Chamber Ensemble he played the piano in works by Mozart and Beethoven and conducted challenging scores by Schoenberg, Stravinsky, Xenakis, Cage and Ligeti.Here were terrific players from the Metropolitan Opera Orchestra, along with their conductor, developing the musical intimacy that naturally flows from chamber music. And in those days Mr. Levine was quite a pianist.That season he also made time for a concert with the orchestra at the opera house featuring singers from the young artist program. Late that spring he took the Met Orchestra, the chorus and star soloists to Carnegie for a one-two punch of programs: Verdi's Requiem, followed a week later by Schoenberg's "Gurrelieder." I have not heard a more insightful and exciting performance of either work since. And right after the season ended, he took the Met on a long tour to Japan.No one expects Mr. Levine to have comparable reach and stamina today. You can understand why the Met wants to keep this master musician working in any capacity for as long as he can. But it is one thing to dispense wisdom and give exceptional performances; it is another to run the Met's artistic affairs.
"Are we symmetrical?" asked Rostam Batmanglij. It was the kind of question — concise, mathematical, a little nerdy, a little tense — that might be expected from the keyboardist of Vampire Weekend , a band that packs complex ideas into twisted pop songs.On the last Sunday in April, the band was shooting the video for "Ya Hey" from its third album, "Modern Vampires of the City" (XL), due for release this week. They didn't have much time: sunset was nearing and they were supposed to be onstage at Roseland for a webcast concert soon."Modern Vampires of the City" is an album as taut and meticulous as its two predecessors, "Vampire Weekend" (2008) and "Contra" (2010), which have each sold half a million copies.The band was formed while its members were students at Columbia University, and it arrived with an improbable but chipper kind of pop: a bouncing, galloping mixture of new wave, Baroque keyboard figures, ska, Afro-pop guitars, allusion-laden lyrics and impossibly perky choruses. Head-bobbing and head-scratching were equally appropriate responses for a song like "Horchata," which opened the "Contra" album and rhymed the words horchata, balaclava, Aranciata and Masada. The music's cleverness and momentum made it an immediate favorite on college radio, but its sheer buoyancy carried it to other constituencies; band members are regularly told that Vampire Weekend is also a favorite among toddlers.The actor and director Steve Buscemi, who directed the Roseland webcast, said, "What I love about them is that you can either just get off on the musicality of it or go deeper."The new album often turns Vampire Weekend's music inside out: from manic and crammed to anxious and spacious, from guitars to keyboards, from self-involved and cryptic to, at times, straightforwardly metaphysical, opening up the band's ingenious constructions to uncertainty and longing. "It was important for us to shed a little skin," Mr. Batmanglij said. It's also Vampire Weekend's first album devoted, in both lyrics and atmosphere, to the band's home, New York City.That evening, they had the skyline over their shoulders. A chilly wind blew as the four band members positioned themselves — symmetrically — by a railing on the roof of the MetLife Building, atop Grand Central Station. The Art Deco spire of the Chrysler Building loomed between two pairs of band members: the singer and guitarist Ezra Koenig, the drummer Chris Tomson, Mr. Batmanglij and the bassist Chris Baio.They were holding Champagne bottles — actually, for budget purposes, cheap sparkling wine — that they were about to shake up and spritz all over. They shook and sprayed, once, twice, and the daylight was gone. But they got the shot.With plenty of foaming bottles, a dozen people in togas, two young boys dancing and the Chrysler and Empire State Buildings as backdrops, the video for "Ya Hey" is urban and enigmatic. Yet the song is both immediately catchy, hinting at ska and Baroque music, and fairly direct about an atypical subject for pop. Most of its lyrics come across as a conversation with God: "Through the fire and through the flames/You won't even say your name/Only I am that I am."Vampire Weekend's first two albums were full of tales of privileged youth — breezing through collegiate intrigues on "Vampire Weekend" and globe-hopping to pleasure and trouble spots on "Contra." But the characters on "Modern Vampires of the City" lead less-charmed lives: adult responsibilities are closing in, and they find themselves more reflective and far more conscious of the passing of time.A few days before the video shoot, over a quick lunch of a Mediterranean omelet at the venerable Ukrainian diner Veselka on the Lower East Side, Mr. Koenig said he had come to see the three albums as a trilogy."It reminded me of 'Brideshead Revisited,' " said Mr. Koenig, who writes the band's lyrics. "The naïve joyous school days in the beginning. Then the expansion of the world, travel, seeing other places, learning a little bit more about how people live. And then the end is a little bit of growing up, starting to think more seriously about your life and your faith. If people could look at our three albums as a bildungsroman, I'd be O.K. with that."Two songs released in advance of the album reveal the band's new breadth. "Diane Young" — a pun on "dying young" — is a speedy, quick-changing joy ride, instantly recognizable as Vampire Weekend, that extrapolates rockabilly vocal hiccups into a pitch-shifting digital fun house. "Step" — although it grew out of a line in a hip-hop track by Souls of Mischief — is measured, with stately harpsichord and churchy organ, supporting sober thoughts like "Wisdom's a gift but you'd trade it for youth/Age is an honor — it's still not the truth."With other song titles like "Unbelievers," "Worship You" and "Everlasting Arms" (which echoes a hymn, "Leaning on the Everlasting Arms"), faith and mortality are two recurring themes in the songs on "Modern Vampires of the City" — much to the surprise, initially, of Mr. Koenig.
Spring for Music — the annual festival of North American orchestras at Carnegie Hall, created in the main to foster imaginative and ambitious programming — did itself proud over the weekend in the last three concerts of its third season . Leonard Slatkin conducted the Detroit Symphony Orchestra on Thursday and Friday, and Christoph Eschenbach led the National Symphony Orchestra on Saturday.As expected, the high point came on Friday evening with Detroit's audacious presentation of an "Ives Immersion": all four of Charles Ives's numbered symphonies in chronological order. Obvious in retrospect (though not likely to be repeated often, given its strenuous demands on performers and listeners alike), the program made for an extraordinary journey, from the relatively conventional sensibility of a prodigious student composer in the First Symphony to the unfettered one of an indomitable master in the Fourth.In remarks from the stage, Vivian Perlis, a historian of American music, rightly pointed to a Dvorakian character in the First Symphony, begun in 1898; indeed, the English horn solo in the Adagio molto clearly takes its cue from the Largo of Dvorak's "New World" Symphony (1893). Thereafter, Ives became strictly his own man, however widely he may have drawn from musical Americana.Taken together, the four symphonies could almost be read as individual movements of a gigantic whole, so natural and compelling was the flow. After that First Symphony — first movement, as it were — the Second came as a sort of scherzo, gamboling through old folk and hymn tunes, with "Columbia, the Gem of the Ocean" as anchor. The Third Symphony, relatively restrained and more focused in its borrowing, seemed a calming slow movement before the all-out radicalization of the Fourth.Mr. Slatkin preceded his performance of the Fourth Symphony with a brief, brilliant demonstration of the work's complexities.He had the orchestra play a four-measure mashup of tunes and rhythms from the second movement, then had the various sections play individual layers. And what should appear but "Turkey in the Straw" in the violins, scarcely to be heard behind the blaring trumpets and under the accumulated weight of other instruments when everything was put back together. In similar fashion, Mr. Slatkin showed why a second conductor (Teddy Abrams) was needed in parts of the second and fourth movements, dismantling, then remantling the conflicting meters.Mr. Slatkin, who became music director of the Detroit Symphony in 2008, said before the festival that he was eager to show "how far the orchestra has come in a very short time," since its six-month strike in the 2010-11 season. It performed nobly through the long haul of the Ives, and it had been given another chance to strut its stuff in the festival when the Oregon Symphony, unable to cover the costs of travel and lodging, had to cancel its appearance.Detroit, on Thursday night, adopted half of the whopper of a program for which Oregon had been selected: "The Seven Deadly Sins" of Kurt Weill and Bertolt Brecht, with the soprano Storm Large, and "La Valse" by Ravel. But Mr. Slatkin, hewing to a theme of colorful works by composers trying to come to grips with the 20th century, replaced the rest of the program (Narong Prangcharoen's "Phenomenon," Schoenberg's "Accompaniment to a Film Scene" and Schubert's "Unfinished" Symphony) with pieces by Rachmaninoff, whose music he and the orchestra are now recording for Naxos: the "Capriccio Bohémien" and "Isle of the Dead.""Isle of the Dead" ranks — with Mendelssohn's concert overture "The Hebrides" and Britten's "Four Sea Interludes" from the opera "Peter Grimes" — among the great sea pieces, and Mr. Slatkin's atmospheric reading was especially evocative of surging waves. The death angle enters with variants on the Dies Irae tune from the Roman Catholic Requiem, which fascinated Rachmaninoff through much of his career.The orchestra shone throughout, but with "The Seven Deadly Sins," Detroit inherited that show stealer Ms. Large, who is best known for her popsier work with Pink Martini and other bands. She was sensational in a Brecht-Weill experiment of dipping country innocence serially into urban decadence and seeing what comes out. What came out here was personality plus (the tattoo across Ms. Large's back, for those who couldn't make it out, read, "Lover"), and her voice came through the subtle miking fetchingly. The other singers — Jorge Garza, Carl Moe, Anton Belov and Richard Zeller — injected character of their own, but though they were also miked, many of their words were lost in a jumble; printed texts would have helped.The National Symphony program on Saturday, "A Tribute to Slava," was another beauty. Dedicated to the cellist and conductor Mstislav Rostropovich, the orchestra's music director from 1977 to 1994, the concert began with the New York premiere of Rodion Shchedrin's "Slava, Slava (A Festive Ringing of Bells)." Anyone familiar with the coronation scene of Mussorgsky's "Boris Godunov" will know that "slava," in addition to being a nickname, means glory in Russian and that bells are the accompaniment of choice.The program also included Alfred Schnittke's Viola Concerto, which Rostropovich conducted with the National Symphony in 1992 with Yuri Bashmet, the violist for whom it was written, and Shostakovich's Fifth Symphony, which Rostropovich conducted often and recorded twice with the orchestra. This time David Aaron Carpenter was the excellent soloist in the concerto.Mr. Eschenbach completed his generous tribute to a predecessor with a Shostakovich reading much in the Rostropovich manner. A close friend of the composer's, Rostropovich insisted that the sense of triumph ostensibly conveyed in the Fifth Symphony's clamorous ending was actually intended sarcastically, and that he slowed the tempo to make each of the pounding, stabbing A's seem like the hammering of a nail in a coffin.Capitalizing on the orchestra's collective memory of Rostropovich performances, Mr. Eschenbach made this interpretation work, rounding out a well-shaped performance. If he occasionally gave in to a predilection for sheer loudness, it was nothing compared with the volume Rostropovich could produce in Shostakovich.The orchestra sounded in good shape, with particularly fine work from the woodwinds in the Shostakovich slow movement.
For old-timers who still go to record stores, flip through bins, buy albums and dig into the liner notes, the experience of streaming songs on a service like Spotify or Rhapsody can be dismaying. Listen, say, to Michael Jackson's "Off the Wall," and you see only a track listing and a link to a cursory biography of the King of Pop.There is no mention of Quincy Jones, who produced the record and has 27 Grammys to his credit, nor of the two studios in Los Angeles where it was recorded. Nothing tells the listener that John Robinson played those incredibly funky drums, with Louis Johnson on bass (except on "Rock With You," when it was Bobby Watson). Nor does the service mention that one song, "Girlfriend," was written by the ex-Beatle Paul McCartney, and that three were written by another British songwriter, Rod Temperton."This is the one place on the Internet where the consumer is getting less information than in the physical world," said Daryl P. Friedman, the chief lobbyist in Washington for the National Academy of Recording Arts and Sciences.Since last year, the Recording Academy, in Los Angeles, has been strongly urging the streaming services to give credit where credit is due. And last week Rhapsody became the first of those companies to commit to providing what amounts to liner-note-style credits for every track in its catalog of 17 million songs: producers, engineers, session players, sidemen, backup singers, songwriters.Barbara Dehgan, a spokeswoman for the Academy, said, "We are hoping other streaming services will catch on."Rhapsody's decision was welcome news to music fans who miss the days when they could pore over CD booklets, or even prehistoric record jackets, for nuggets that might lead them to other recordings.But providing complete credits, known in the industry as metadata, for millions of tracks in the databases of services like Spotify, Rhapsody, Rdio and Slacker is no mean feat. Some of the data has been collected by Web sites like Allmusic, while in many cases the information resides with scores of record labels.Jon Maples, Rhapsody's vice president for products and content strategy, said he hopes to provide a simple list of credits for each track in the service's collection within three months, what he called "the simplest viable product." But the plan is to go further and make each name on a list — every percussionist, horn player or co-producer — a button that would call up the other tracks that person has worked on. That effort could take a year."I'm not recreating liner notes," Mr. Maples said. "We need to re-envision what liner notes can be."He gave an example. "You click a button and get 35 tracks delivered to your phone, based on the fact you liked an Odd Future production," he said, referring to the Los Angeles hip-hop collective.The Recording Academy, the influential nonprofit group made up of producers, engineers, songwriters and musicians that sponsors the Grammy Awards, began lobbying the streaming services last fall with a campaign called "Give Fans the Credit."Officials in the Academy have had meetings with executives of the services, trying to sell them on the idea that providing metadata could help their customers explore new music. A complete set of data for every track would improve on the past, audiophiles say. Even in the heyday of vinyl albums, there was no general rule about what should be included in credits; not all labels listed producers, engineers and session players, forcing music lovers who cared about such details to play detective.Most of the services favor the academy's proposal in principle but have balked at the costs, Academy officials say. Rhapsody's decision to invest money and labor in providing credits is seen as an icebreaker that will give the company a competitive advantage and force others to follow suit.Henrik Landgren, the vice president for analytics for Spotify, said his company has been working on a similar project for three years and expects to roll it out eventually, though it has not made the same public commitment as Rhapsody. Spotify has 20 million tracks in its database, and there are technical hurdles to adding credits to each track. The data must be imported from companies like Rovi Corporation, which owns Allmusic, or acquired from myriad record labels. Just determining which credits belong with different renditions of the same song creates headaches. Then you must weed out duplicates.Music aficionados, naturally, support the idea of making credits more available. Brian Turner, the music director for WFMU, an independent radio station in Jersey City, and a lifelong record collector and D.J., said music fanatics who care about the largely unsung heroes involved in creating a good record are becoming scarcer in an age in which young people increasingly discover music on YouTube or a streaming service.The information can be dug up, Mr. Turner pointed out, on Wikipedia, Allmusic and other Web sites like AlbumLinerNotes, but that does not compare to attaching it to each track, approximating what old-fashioned physical albums provided fans.In his view nothing can replace a vinyl album with complete liner notes as an artifact documenting an artist's music. For that reason WFMU still has a large vinyl library, often with D.J. notes scrawled on the covers. Even the cover art is important, Mr. Turner said."For me, when I look at a record, say an early-'70s Elektra folk record, I get an idea of the mind-set of the artist just by holding it in my hand," he said.Credit information is also important to artists, said Jim Anderson, a producer and sound engineer who has won nine Grammys and teaches at New York University."People worked very hard to create these things, both musically and technically," he said. "Credits were the only way you got credit, and the way you got work."
On Wednesday, 30 pianists from 13 countries will gather at a hotel ballroom in downtown Fort Worth for a drawing of names, a tradition that will establish the performance schedule for the Van Cliburn International Piano Competition.Two days later, the recitals and concerts will begin at Bass Performance Hall before a 13-member jury. The competition, held once every four years, mixes a little bit of "American Idol" with a whole lot of Liszt and Rachmaninoff. It will end on June 9 with the awarding of the victory medals.This year's Cliburn, its 14th iteration, will be different from previous competitions in one critical respect: Van Cliburn, the concert pianist for whom it is named, will be absent. Mr. Cliburn died in February of bone cancer.His death came as the competition, which was established in 1962 to honor Mr. Cliburn's 1958 victory at the International Tchaikovsky Competition in Moscow, had reached a crossroads. In recent years, other piano competitions have eclipsed it, and some suggest that such events in general have outlived their usefulness, especially in an age of reality television competitions, when audiences, rather than elite judges, often decide which performers rise to the top.The question now is whether the Cliburn can survive without Van Cliburn."I think it may have coasted too long on the founder's name and failed to keep up with global developments," said Norman Lebrecht, the author of "Who Killed Classical Music?" and "The Maestro Myth.""The piano competition as a spectacle was turned around by the last International Tchaikovsky Competition in Moscow in 2011, where every stage was viewable online and Daniil Trifonov emerged as a world star," he added. "Nothing at the Cliburn has come close to such excitement in many years."The Cliburn began streaming audio of the competition online in 1997, and in 2009 offered extensive online video coverage of performances and rehearsals. The 2011 Tchaikovsky upped the ante, with innovations like four simultaneous video streams and audience voting.The famously courtly Mr. Cliburn was never involved in the operation or judging of the competition, but he was a regular fixture at performances and could often be seen hugging contestants after especially grueling rounds. His presence lent star power to an event that in its heyday in the 1960s and '70s was one of the world's most prestigious piano competitions.Yet for at least the past decade, criticisms have dogged the Cliburn. One common complaint is that few widely embraced performers have emerged from it. "The only winner of the competition who has become a legendary figure is Radu Lupu," said Scott Cantrell, the classical music critic for The Dallas Morning News, referring to the Grammy-winning, Romanian-born pianist, who won the competition in 1966. "Whether this kind of gladiatorial situation is an ideal way for identifying significant musicians is a real question."Mr. Lebrecht has asserted that many piano competitions, including the Cliburn, are too insular and may indulge in favoritism. At least two judges on this year's jury have current or former students competing. Cliburn officials counter that if a judge tried to vote for his or her own student, the vote would be nullified.Mr. Lebrecht suggested that one solution might be to allow online audience voting to factor into the judges' decision. "The days of smoke-filled rooms are over," he said. "If the competition is to survive, walls need to be broken down."A series of high-profile turnovers have also troubled the Van Cliburn Foundation, the organization that oversees the competition. Following the 2009 edition, its longtime president and chief executive, Richard Rodzinski, left to become general director of the Tchaikovsky, which he is widely credited with revitalizing. Mr. Rodzinski's replacement, David Worters, left in 2011, after six months. The longtime chair of the foundation's board, Alann Sampson, became interim president, then resigned abruptly last fall.Whether the changes at the top signal a larger problem is not known; no one involved has been willing to discuss the matter publicly. In a recent interview, Jacques Marquis, who was named president of the foundation in March, declined to answer questions about the possibility of organizational infighting. "Talking about management is not an option," he said.Mr. Marquis plans to expand the Cliburn's online presence to include behind-the-scenes features and additional profiles of competitors. This year, for the first time, audience members can use mobile devices to vote, with the results posted online. (The votes will not be a factor in the jury's decision.)A series of tributes to Mr. Cliburn are planned during the event, but Mr. Marquis does not want the proceedings to turn into an extended memorial service. "At the awards ceremony we will give the prizes, and then we go on. Because carrying Van's vision forward means moving the vision along."
Every year since 2008, the hip-hop magazine XXL has anointed a group of up-and-coming rappers as part of its Freshman Class , giving over a month's cover to a gaggle of relatively little-known faces. But as the Internet has become more vital in building hip-hop careers, these lists aren't gambles so much as aggregates of established online wisdom.So XXL Freshmen Live 2013, at the Best Buy Theater, isn't really the rookie show it purports to be. It's more like an all-star retrospective, featuring rap's Internet champions of recent years.This year's lineup is one of the best to date — the grand gastronome Action Bronson, the mid-1990s obsessive Joey Badass, the amiably surly Schoolboy Q, the mildly trippy Ab-Soul, the ferocious and bitter Angel Haze. (The list also includes Trinidad James, Logic, Travis Scott, Kirko Bangz and Dizzy Wright.) Some of these artists may well graduate to the more traditional forms of success — radio play, major label deals and so on. But what's telling is how some of these artists — say, Mr. James — are already there, freshmen running the whole school. (Tuesday, 7 p.m., 1515 Broadway, at 44th Street, 800-745-3000, bestbuytheater.com; $28.50.)
SALZBURG, AUSTRIA — On a cool afternoon in March, a crowd filled the Festspielhaus here to see the German conductor Christian Thielemann lead the Dresden Staatskapelle in Wagner's "Parsifal." It was the dress rehearsal, three days before the production's premiere as the opening-night attraction of the Salzburg Easter Festival and an early celebration of Wagner's 200th birthday, which falls on Wednesday."Parsifal" begins with a calm, quiet ascent up six notes of an A-flat scale. The score is marked "sehr langsam" — very slow — and conductors tend to oblige. Some, from Wilhelm Furtwängler to James Levine, have lingered over the first three notes in particular, as if dropping a pebble into a pond and waiting for the ripples to subside before dropping another. It is, after all, a solemn and rather mystical prelude to a solemn and rather mystical opera.In Salzburg it seemed, at first, that Mr. Thielemann was taking the passage too fast. The first notes seemed to breeze by, closer to the opening bar of a Johann Strauss waltz than to the somber intonations of a Christian allegory. The movement was almost too quick to allow for weight.Then the sixth bar arrived. The violas began pages of rolling, barely audible arpeggios, and the brasses took up the deliberate, melancholy melody. Gradually the mood came to feel less hurried than pastoral, less pushing than flowing."Every time I do things, I change a lot," Mr. Thielemann said in an interview in his dressing room. "This time I think I'm faster with 'Parsifal' than I used to be. I was surprised I took less than 1:35 for Act I, which is very fast but sounds normal to me now."The performance swiftly started to take on the quality that, more than any other, has made Mr. Thielemann, at 54, one of the most acclaimed Wagner conductors in the world: a naturalness, an ease, a sense of the music simply unfolding.Some musicians, including very good ones, lead "Parsifal" so that every note sounds interpreted, every phrase a decision. Mr. Thielemann offers the illusion that interpretation has been suspended, that he is simply presenting the score, immaculate.In the German-speaking world Mr. Thielemann is one of the most celebrated names in classical music, the heir to storied maestros like Furtwängler and Herbert von Karajan. Longtime watchers of the Vienna scene say that he is as big an audience draw there as beloved star singers like Anna Netrebko and Jonas Kaufmann, or bigger.But after high-profile and successful concert and opera dates in America, Britain and elsewhere through the 1990s and early 2000s, Mr. Thielemann retrenched in the last decade, concentrating on a select few engagements in Germany and Austria and rarely traveling abroad."I think people do too much nowadays, and there is a lack of quality," he said. "And these people — some people — have a terrible personal life. I had wonderful invitations, and many places are still asking, but I don't know how to do it. I also want to have a private life. I don't want my whole life to be in hotels and airplanes."It is hard to think of another conductor today on Mr. Thielemann's level whose schedule is so restricted, dominated by performances of the canonical Austro-German repertory in the Austro-German cities of Dresden, where he is principal conductor of the Staatskapelle; Vienna, where he makes frequent appearances with the Philharmonic; and Bayreuth, at the annual summer Wagner festival, where he assisted early in his career, made his debut in 2000, led a brilliant "Ring" cycle in 2006 and is now the de facto music director.During one of his few appearances at the Metropolitan Opera years ago, a Met patron lent Mr. Thielemann the use of an apartment with a view of Central Park to make him feel more at home."But he didn't feel at home," Joseph Volpe, the company's general manager at the time, said by phone. "He's at home in Germany, I guess. I think it was quite apparent after the 'Frau' " — a gleaming new production of Strauss's "Frau Ohne Schatten" in 2001 — "that he didn't want to spend a lot of time here."Mr. Thielemann was born into a comfortable, cultured family in West Berlin in 1959, the only child of a pharmacist mother and a father who ran a steel factory. He started out as a pianist and violist, studying at the Karajan Academy, associated with the Berlin Philharmonic, and eventually serving as an assistant to Herbert von Karajan himself.
LOS ANGELES — Thomas Bangalter, half of the influential French dance-music act Daft Punk, has a house high in the Hollywood Hills here. He and his musical partner, Guy-Manuel de Homem-Christo, divide their time between Los Angeles and Paris, where their families live. But for all their jet-setting, there's little evidence of rock star flash to be seen (well, apart from the Porsche that Mr. de Homem-Christo has parked in the driveway). Built in the midcentury style called post and beam, the bungalow exudes a subtle retro feel, with white carpeting, a cross section of a tree trunk as a coffee table, and a gravel fireplace in the living room. The swimming pool, a small square of radiant Hockney blue, is visible through the glass walls.The house's décor mirrors the retro-modern aesthetic that runs through every stage of Daft Punk's 20-year career. From its first dance-floor smash, "Da Funk," in 1996 through the synthetic dazzle of the 2001 album "Discovery" to the 2010 score for the movie "Tron: Legacy," the duo's defining balancing act has been breaking new ground while simultaneously invoking earlier golden ages of club music, like disco and 1980s electro-pop.Daft Punk expanded the audience for dance music alongside late-'90s peers like the Chemical Brothers, influenced Madonna and Kanye West, and helped shape the visual side of live dance music performance. Its famous robot masks and spectacular pyramid-shaped stage set inspired the high-tech showmanship of younger electronic dance music stars like Skrillex. In the eight years since the duo's last studio album, "Human After All," dance music has become big business, while Daft Punk-like sounds have infiltrated Top 40 radio, popping up in songs by artists like Justin Bieber.But after years on the cutting edge, Daft Punk has reversed course with its new album, "Random Access Memories," out on Daft Life/Columbia this week. Spurning the digital audio software that empowers the electronic dance music generation, the album is an analog flashback to the era of live musicianship, involving a crack squad of session players, the disco legends Nile Rodgers and Giorgio Moroder, indie rockers like Julian Casablancas and the hip-hop star Pharrell Williams. Mr. Rodgers and Mr. Williams both appear on the album's first single, "Get Lucky," an uncanny replication of the sparkling disco-funk of Mr. Rodgers's band Chic."In some ways it's like we're running on a highway going the opposite direction to everybody else," said Mr. Bangalter, 38, sitting on the floor while the taciturn Mr. de Homem-Christo, 39, slumped on a sofa.It's a problem that confronts many innovators: When the rest of the world catches up with you, where do you go next? In a paradox that informs the entire project, doing something new for Daft Punk involved embracing the methods and mind-set of the past. The result is an album that is impressive but backward-looking, drawing on influences like soft rock, progressive rock and New Wave. Aspiring to the sumptuous production and arrangements of late '70s rock and R&B albums, "Random Access Memories" is full of songs that allude to time, transience and yesterday's idea of the future. The title is a play on the idea of computer memory — RAM — versus human memory.In part, the promotional campaign for the album also looked back to an era before Twitter and free downloads. Daft Punk and its team orchestrated a suspense-building trail of hints about a new project with billboard ads and teaser minicommercials on TV. Deliberately frustrating fans who have become used to instant gratification, Daft Punk stoked anticipation and created an aura of mystery around "Random Access Memories."Yet in other respects Daft Punk have provided a richer informational context for the project. The digital promotion involved a series of well-made videos, each based around an interview with a collaborator. "Pulling back the curtain a little bit more and more, they're showing the human aspect of making a record," said Clark Warner, the executive creative director of the online music store Beatport, where "Get Lucky" has been the top-selling track for several weeks.The notion of restoring a human touch to dance music seems central to the new album, whose opening track is titled "Give Life Back to Music." But the band mates, who met at school in Paris in 1987, are adamant that nostalgia is not their primary motivation. Nor is there anything "judgmental," said Mr. Bangalter, about the antidigital stance that he and Mr. de Homem-Christo took with the making of the album.Still, he referred to technology like Pro Tools and Auto-Tune as having "created a musical landscape that is very uniform" and enthused about the flexibility of the flesh-and-blood musicians they recruited, like the drummer John Robinson, who played on Michael Jackson's "Off the Wall.""It's an infinity of nuance, in the shuffles and the grooves," Mr. Bangalter said, knocking over his drink in his excitement. "These things are impossible to create with machines."Albums by megabands like Fleetwood Mac and the Eagles, with their no-expense-spared attention to detail, served as the model for the album's intricately layered production. "The late '70s and early '80s is the zenith of a certain craftsmanship in sound recording," Mr. Bangalter said. For Daft Punk there is a subtle but crucial distinction between perfection pursued through human effort and the perfection easily achieved through digital means.
When it comes to classical music these days, the kids — relatively speaking, of course — are all right. The news that the Latvian conductor Andris Nelsons , 34, has been named music director of the Boston Symphony Orchestra is the latest in what has felt like a youth trend in major American ensembles.Mr. Nelsons steps into a position left vacant since 2011, when James Levine resigned after an extended run of injuries, illness and cancellations. It's no surprise, after years of uncertainty, that the orchestra chose to replace Mr. Levine, now 69 and attempting a return to the podium, with a healthy man less than half his age.But even ensembles without this fraught history have filled one directorship after another with conductors under 40, and even under 30, in the last few years. There's been Gustavo Dudamel, who was 28 when he took the helm of the Los Angeles Philharmonic in 2009. Ludovic Morlot, 37, Seattle Symphony. Krzysztof Urbanski, 29, Indianapolis Symphony Orchestra. Yannick Nézet-Séguin, 37, Philadelphia Orchestra."For me, turning 30 was some kind of break point," Mr. Nelsons said by phone on Friday from Amsterdam, where he was conducting the Royal Concertgebouw Orchestra. "I think that's where you kind of start realizing what you can offer truly from yourself, not copying but truly from yourself."While he and his contemporaries are all gifted musicians — all men, but that's another story — their ages are no fluke. American orchestras are in an uncertain place, threatened with labor unrest and declining subscriber rolls. A fresh-faced youngster bounding onstage inspires excitement and gets whatever dregs remain of media attention.As the Philadelphia Orchestra emerged from bankruptcy protection, it was no surprise that the ensemble wanted the grinning, charismatic Mr. Nézet-Séguin to be the face of its new era, as potent a symbol as following Mr. Levine with Mr. Nelsons. (A once-favored candidate for the Boston position, Riccardo Chailly, now 60, fell out of the running after heart problems caused him to cancel performances.)But youth and youthfulness are two different things, and they shouldn't be confused. Orchestras should not think that hiring a dynamic 20- or 30-something conductor can take the place of planning dynamic contemporary programs. That's just old wine in new bottles.Mr. Nézet-Séguin's performances are galvanizing, but his appointment has not led (yet) to particularly intriguing expansions of the Philadelphia Orchestra's repertory. Next season, his second as music director, he leads just three works by living composers, of just four that are a part of the season.The Boston Symphony has a better track record lately with new and recent music; Mr. Levine was a passionate interpreter of bristly modernism.But Mr. Nelsons has thus far conducted Mahler, Ravel, Sarasate, Stravinsky, Brahms, Shostakovich and Tchaikovsky with the orchestra. Coming up next year are Wagner, Mozart, Brahms, Strauss and Verdi: more standards. The living composers he has said he favors — including John Adams and Mark-Anthony Turnage — are themselves close to standards at this point."Whether Nelsons possesses anything like Koussevitzky's genius for cultivating composers or building institutions remains to be seen," Alex Ross wrote last year in The New Yorker, referring to Serge Koussevitzky, the Boston music director whose tenure began when he was 50 and lasted 25 years, embracing contemporary music all the while.The Koussevitzkian ranks of the youthful-if-no-longer-young are now led by Michael Tilson Thomas, the music director of the San Francisco Symphony, who remains, at 68, a more committed and persuasive advocate for contemporary music than almost any rising maestro.Riccardo Muti became music director of the Chicago Symphony Orchestra in 2010, when he was 69, and his tenure so far has embodied a best-case scenario of a storied conductor in a new position with an orchestra willing to support him.While Mr. Nelsons and Mr. Nézet-Séguin are still building their repertories and making initial statements in the classics, Mr. Muti no longer has anything to prove. His programming has accordingly been idiosyncratic, even eccentric, leapfrogging from overlooked older pieces to the work of Anna Clyne with a refreshing gusto that recalls the Bob Dylan line, "I was so much older then/I'm younger than that now."The Spring for Music festival, which brings North American orchestras to Carnegie Hall on the basis of the creativity of their planned programs, has included a mix of young conductors — including, next year, Mr. Morlot and Michael Christie, 38, of the Rochester Philharmonic Orchestra — and veterans. The artists doing exciting work, youthful in the best sense, and the orchestras and cities behind them are not necessarily the flashy young ones.
When Romanthony died earlier this month, word of the news took almost two weeks to reach the dance music community that he'd been so vital to. But that wasn't a surprise for this house music producer and singer, who'd move in and out of reclusive periods, preferring to work in relative anonymity, even as his records spoke loudly. An influential figure but by no means a prolific one, Romanthony (born Anthony Moore) sang with a combination of ecstasy and restraint, and his catalog of material from the mid and late 1990s (often on his own imprint Black Male Records) remains vibrant. "Let Me Show You Love," "Hold On," "The Wanderer": these are foundational soulful house records, nourishing and also raw at the seams. (Recently, the label Glasgow Underground has been undertaking a remix campaign of some of Romanthony's older material.)His highest-profile work was on the 2001 Daft Punk album "Discovery" (Virgin), writing lyrics and contributing vocals to "Too Long" and "One More Time," one of modern dance music's most important and euphoric songs. But if anything, that spotlight sent him back into the shadows. For most of the 2000s he was quiet, and only lately did he pop back up, collaborating with Kevin McKay, Kraak & Smaak and others, and working on songs with Boys Noize and MikeQ at the time of his death.George Strait is a stoic, not much for sentiment, so there's almost no way to prepare for the dark clouds hovering over the best parts of "Love Is Everything" (MCA Nashville), his latest studio album. Mr. Strait's prolific career is drawing down — he's released almost an album a year since 1981, and he's on the verge of his last tour — and he's finally letting the sunsets get to him.A true country moderate, Mr. Strait has never given George Jones a run for his money like he does on "Blue Melodies," where he sings with a pulpy richness he hasn't touched in decades. The only song solely written by Mr. Strait here, "I Just Can't Go On Dying Like This," is a paragon of dignified regret, practically slumping over with hurt. Musically, this album is fuller-bodied than much of his recent work, which has often been listless and by rote, the work of a man churning out the songs he knows will keep the ship afloat. But from "I Believe," which appears to be inspired by the Sandy Hook Elementary School shooting, to the album closer, "When the Credits Roll," about taking stock of one's life, Mr. Strait's blood is pumping more intensely than usual. From a man who's as close to clockwork as it gets, it represents the unmistakable realization that time is indeed slipping away.TO SEE MORE LIGHT"New History Warfare Vol. 3: To See More Light" (Constellation) is Colin Stetson's mesmerizing new album. It's difficult-sounding — the product of Mr. Stetson's circular breathing techniques and his gift for multiphonics — but in fact it is not so difficult, this album. Mr. Stetson, who plays alto, tenor and bass saxophones, recorded these songs live, in single takes, and emerged with songs that are elegantly composed and violently textured. He's a marvel, and produces sounds that are deeply anxious yet also exultant, sometimes like viciously seesawing heavy metal ("Brute") or aching whales ("High Above a Grey Green Sea") or an industrial dirge (the never-dull 15-minute "To See More Light").Mr. Stetson has also lately been playing with Bon Iver, and Justin Vernon, that group's primary engine, is featured on four songs here. Legibility has been a hallmark of Mr. Vernon's recent side projects — the unashamed blues boogie of the Shouting Matches, or his coming gig producing the Blind Boys of Alabama. But on "Brute," he howls and churns, practically veering into grindcore territory. Mr. Stetson has unleashed him, too.The long tail of the Queens rapper N.O.R.E.'s career has been far longer than anyone could have anticipated. He survived the incarceration of his former partner in Capone-N-Noreaga; an unexpected pop hit, "Superthug"; a misfire reggaetón phase — and more. That he would manage to pull off a minor hit, "Tadow," as catchy as anything from his prime years is a shock. That it's not the only bright spot on his new album, "Student of the Game" (Entertainment One), is a relief and thrill.N.O.R.E. isn't as manic a barker as he once was, but his voice still has a winningly mealy texture, even on songs like the contemplative title track and "What I Had to Do." It's put to better use, though, on tracks that deliver mid-'90s New York classicism like "Camouflage Unicorns" and "Built Pyramids." N.O.R.E. has never been a superstar, but he's widely loved, enough to secure guest appearances from the likes of Lil Wayne, Scarface and Raekwon, and on "The Problem (LAWWWDDD)," to collaborate with Pharrell, who as part of the Neptunes produced N.O.R.E.'s biggest hits, "Superthug" and "Nothin'." There's also a hilarious skit with enthused testimony from Scott Disick, the nattily attired squire of Kourtney Kardashian, even funnier because the credits misspell his name.
For more than three decades, the pianist Charles Wadsworth was chamber music's Johnny Carson. In his role as the avuncular M.C. and director of the chamber music series at the Spoleto Festival USA in Charleston, S.C., Mr. Wadsworth introduced music from the stage with witty anecdotes. His low-key folksiness and Georgia drawl made him a beloved figure for audiences not only in Charleston but also in New York, where he directed the Chamber Music Society of Lincoln Center for 20 years.So in 2009, when Mr. Wadsworth retired from Spoleto, the violinist Geoff Nuttall stepped into big shoes as his anointed successor.It was an inspired choice. Mr. Nuttall turns out to be chamber music's Jon Stewart. Like that television comedian, Mr. Nuttall is a creatively daring, physically talented performer who can go goofball in a nanosecond, maintaining a veneer of entertainment while educating his base about serious matters (classical music, as against politics for Mr. Stewart).Mr. Nuttall, for all his onstage high jinks, is indisputably a violin virtuoso and an extraordinary musician. In his first three seasons as director, while maintaining the high musical standards of the series, he has established a new style of presentation that juxtaposes the ridiculous with the sublime, delves into serious musicology and casually uses technology. In short, he is subtly redefining what a chamber music concert can be.The chamber series, which takes place in the historic Dock Street Theater, is part of the array of opera, theater, symphonic, jazz and dance performances that make up the Spoleto Festival, which opened on Friday and runs through June 9.The festival's general director, Nigel Redden, notes that given Mr. Nuttall's popularity, the series has maintained ticket sales in "the high 80 percent" of capacity."If classical music is going to continue to have a vibrant audience," Mr. Redden said, "then audiences need to enjoy themselves and also have their ears refreshed. We need to provide the unexpected."That unexpected includes not only zany humor but also difficult works by Xenakis, Cage and Pierre Boulez, Mr. Redden said, and "Geoff has brought us all with him because of his enthusiasm.""It's very Geoff," Mr. Redden added, "to want to please and challenge at the same time."In his comedic role, Mr. Nuttall makes the most of his appearance. At 6 feet tall, he is a bit gawky."A coiled preying mantis," is how the longtime festivalgoer and donor Tish Lynn described Mr. Nuttall. "You fear that at any moment a limb could be launched."Ms. Lynn recalled hearing Mr. Nuttall first as a guest artist during the Wadsworth era. "Geoff was an audacious, irreverent bad boy," she said. "Now, as music director, he takes no prisoners."Dr. Layton McCurdy, another Charlestonian chamber music devotee, noted that Mr. Nuttall "always has costume issues.""There are those weird shirts," Dr. McCurdy said. "And he used to wear boots half up to his knees."And then there is that changeable hair. Mr. Nuttall's hair has been long, brown and wavy. Dyed bright yellow. Then spiked. Two seasons ago, when he morphed overnight from a shaggy '60s hippie to a shaved boot-camp recruit, there was a lot of teasing from musicians onstage, from raucous audience members and from Mr. Wadsworth, who still takes in concerts from a box over the stage, offering the occasional snarky comment. The issue of Mr. Nuttall's hair became so inescapable that the festival's Web site now features a photomontage of Mr. Nuttall's various looks over the years.The visiting artists go along with his quirks and even egg him on, as if he needed it. Among this year's artists are the cellist Alisa Weilerstein, the Brentano String Quartet, the pianist Pavel Kolesnikov and the St. Lawrence String Quartet, of which Mr. Nuttall is a founding member. Programs typically mix audience favorites by Schubert, Beethoven and Vivaldi with works of lesser-knowns like Johann Friedrich Fasch and Joseph Lanner or the more challenging contemporary fare.Sometimes there is madcap music, too. Last year the composer Jon Deak's clever take on vampire lore, "Lucy and the Count (Love Dreams From Transylvania)" had the violinist Scott St. John sporting a Marilyn Monroe wig and lipstick. The production included smoke, satin capes and a bloodstained moon — and a pause in the music when the musicians turned and smiled to reveal plastic fangs."Yes, that was over the top," Mr. Nuttall admitted, sounding not at all rueful.Mr. Nuttall, 47, took up the violin at 8, when the family moved from Texas to Canada. His sense of humor did not come from his father, a theoretical physicist ("who never cracked a joke," he said), but more probably from his childhood collection of Monty Python records.Mr. Nuttall trained at the Banff Center in Alberta and the University of Toronto. With the St. Lawrence String Quartet, founded in 1989, he began performing at the Spoleto Festival in 1995, and they quickly became regular guests. Since 1999, the quartet has been in residence at Stanford University, where Mr. Nuttall teaches. He lives in the Bay Area with his wife, the violinist Livia Sohn, and their two children.Even though he totes his iPad onstage, he calls himself a Luddite with 10,000 LPs in his living room.He rarely listens to music on CD, he said, finding that the digitization process removes essential information from the sound, making performances less moving. He is just as demanding of live acoustics, and often mentions the natural reverberation at the Dock Street Theater, where the 33 chamber music concerts (11 programs, each played three times) take place.
NASHVILLE — You can't beat Shane McAnally's commute. Mr. McAnally, one of the top songwriters in country music, lives in a spacious two-story house on leafy side street in East Nashville, a few miles and a quick jump across the Cumberland River from Music Row, the heart of the country industrial complex. He maintains an office on Music Row, but these days Mr. McAnally prefers to work, quite literally, in his own backyard: in his recently renovated writing room, a plush aerie above a two-car garage, about a dozen steps from his home.Mr. McAnally was there, at 11 o'clock on a recent morning, leading a "co-write" with two close friends and regular collaborators, Josh Osborne and Matt Jenkins. Commercial country songwriting is an art that leaves no room for artsy airs; there's no waiting around for the muse to strike. Mr. McAnally is a clock-puncher who maintains a strict writing regimen, a packed schedule of co-writes, which yields several songs a week, a couple of hundred a year. "The motto down here is: 'It's 11 a.m. — be creative,' " he said.After about 20 minutes, a song began to take shape. It was a midtempo ballad about a string of fortuities — a sudden rain shower, a stoplight avoided, a left turn taken — that led to a couple's meeting in a bar. It had a lush, limpid melody, which rose and tumbled over Mr. Osborne and Mr. Jenkins' fingerpicked guitars. The hook was one of those nifty lyrics that are country songwriters' stock in trade: a quip that sketches a whole story line. "We wouldn't be here," Mr. McAnally sang, "if you hadn't been there." Two hours later, "We Wouldn't Be Here" was a wrap.Mr. McAnally's quick work that morning was typical of Music Row pros. But in noteworthy ways, Mr. McAnally distinguishes himself from his peers. Over the last few years, he has emerged as a commercial force in Nashville, a songwriter with a unique melodic and lyrical touch, and an uncommon knack for hits. Since November 2010, he's helped write seven No. 1 country singles, and numerous other fine songs, for some of the genre's leading stars (Kenny Chesney, Luke Bryan, Lady Antebellum), legacy acts (Reba McEntire, Lee Ann Womack), and upstarts (Kacey Musgraves, the Band Perry). Sitting at dinner in a downtown Nashville restaurant the evening of the "We Wouldn't Be Here," session, Mr. McAnally received a text message informing him that "Mama's Broken Heart," the feisty Miranda Lambert single he helped write, had reached No. 1.What really sets Mr. McAnally apart, though, is his personal life. Mr. McAnally is gay. Country remains American music's bastion of cultural conservatism, with a fan base that sits well to the right of the wider pop audience, and songs that strenuously uphold traditional white working-class images of masculinity. Mr. McAnally presents a paradox: a Nashville powerhouse who is also an out gay man — a songwriter who cooks up chart-topping country songs at the home he shares with his husband and their 5-month-old twins. For Mr. McAnally, the two facts are not unrelated."My career really took off when I came out," he said. "When I stopped hiding who I am, I started writing hits."Mr. McAnally, 38, was born and raised in Mineral Wells, a small city in north-central Texas. He can't recall a time when he didn't want to be a country singer. "I used to just soak up anything country," he said. "The Nashville Network, that's all I would watch as a kid."He began singing and writing songs at a young age. In his teens, he appeared on the TV talent show "Star Search" (he lost), and performed in Branson, Mo., the country-music resort town. He enrolled in college at the University of Texas, Austin, but dropped out to move to Nashville and pursue a music career. He signed a publishing deal with Curb Records and in 2000, he released his self-titled debut album. "I was sure I was going to be a superstar," Mr. McAnally said.With his blond hair and toothsome grin he looked like one of the well-scrubbed stars of that era. The songs on his debut were smart and well-sung; a single, "Are Your Eyes Still Blue," cracked the country Top 40. He had good connections: he shared a manager with Alabama and Kenny Chesney, and opened for those acts on tour. But his album flopped."I didn't know who I was, but I blamed everyone else," Mr. McAnally said. "The truth is, I probably would be dead if I had become a star, because at that point I was so closeted and so afraid of people of finding out I was gay. There was no telling what would have happened.""Within a week I was like, 'I'm staying,' " he said. "West Hollywood blew my mind: gay men, walking down the street, kissing and holding hands. I'd never imagined there was a place like that."
The director Steven Soderbergh and just about everyone associated with "Behind the Candelabra," the new biographical film about Liberace, emphasized from the start that the movie was going to be about a love affair. A strange love affair, for sure — more a sordid co-dependency between Scott Thorson , a rootless young man, and Mr. Entertainment himself, Liberace, who was 40 years older.The much-awaited film, starring Michael Douglas as Liberace and Matt Damon as Mr. Thorson, was shown on HBO on Sunday night (and continues its run on that channel and through HBO Go and HBO on Demand). As we were forewarned, not much attention is paid to Liberace the pianist or his attitude toward music. "I love giving people a good time," Mr. Douglas's Liberace explains to Mr. Damon's Thorson soon after they meet. "That's what I'm all about."There is an element of entertainment in all the performing arts. Liszt, at the height of his touring-virtuoso period, took the trappings of the superstar to another dimension. Beatlemania had nothing over the Lisztomania that swept Europe in the early 1840s.But was there musical substance to Liberace's showmanship, at least in its early years? I am no expert on the subject because even as a young piano student I thought his flamboyant television persona and frilly playing were absurd.Still, "Behind the Candelabra" stirred my curiosity. I watched some videos of Liberace's early appearances, including a 1940s film segment of him playing "The 12th Street Rag" on a white grand piano for three adoring, glamorous women, and a 1960s television appearance on "The Hollywood Palace" hosted by Milton Berle. But one video in particular — a performance of Chopin's popular Polonaise in A flat (Op. 53), from what appears to be a 1950s television show — was revealing, even touching.Born in 1919 to a humble family in West Allis, Wis., near Milwaukee, Liberace had precocious talent and solid training. His Italian immigrant father, who played the French horn in bands but also held down jobs as a laborer, recognized his son's gifts. Liberace took lessons with Florence Kelly, a student of the virtuoso Moriz Rosenthal.But while Liberace studied classical piano, he also played popular music and jazz in theaters and cabarets. At 20 he played Liszt's Second Piano Concerto with the Chicago Symphony Orchestra for a concert in Milwaukee. The reviews were positive, especially from the critic in The Milwaukee Sentinel, who wrote that Liberace "kept Liszt's bombastic passages within reason" and "did not miss some of the piano's most liquid conversations with the woodwinds."That same year, 1940, Liberace went to New York and started playing in nightclubs. Thus began his evolution into the flamboyant entertainer who specialized in medleys in which popular songs segued into "Home on the Range" and bits of Chopin morphed into "Chopsticks."Still, that broadcast performance of the Chopin polonaise from the 1950s surprised me. From the way Liberace announces the piece, it clearly will be something unusual. Wearing a black tuxedo and facing the camera directly, Liberace explains that he is going to play the Chopin work "in its entirety." The implication is that we are about to be engaged in an act of uncompromising artistry.Actually, Liberace cuts two extended passages, places where sections of the music are essentially repeated. Still, the performance has its charms.Though there are some rough patches, there is fluidity in his technique and nice colorings in his sound. His fingerwork does not seem much encumbered by the ring he wears on his right-hand pinkie. This is Chopin's "Heroic" Polonaise, and Liberace brings stirring energy to the theme and a nice bounce to the left-hand accompaniment, though he stretches the tempo indulgently. The middle section, which breaks into stern marchlike music with a relentlessly repeating bass pattern of four descending notes (played in octaves), is famously difficult. Liberace pulls it off pretty well.Yet something in his playing is frivolous and saccharine. This is not Chopin's exciting polonaise happening in the moment with everything on the line. Rather, this is an exercise in nostalgia. Liberace is reminding us how much we all love this grand and splendid polonaise. Isn't it marvelous?A telltale moment comes in the work's surprising lyrical interlude before the return of the heroic main theme — a ruminative passage in which a searching melodic line and gentle chords go through minor-mode excursions. Here is music that, for a moment, questions the whole idea of heroism. But Liberace seems oddly inhibited, too reticent to explore the emotional depths and ambiguities.I may be reading too much into the performance. Perhaps I am straining to find early hints of the Liberace who in 1984, three years before his death at 67, would arrive onstage for a concert at Radio City Music Hall in a silver Rolls-Royce and emerge wearing a $300,000 fox cape with a 16-foot bejeweled train. But to me, the Liberace playing that Chopin polonaise in the 1950s seems to understand that his performance is nothing exceptional, that any number of Juilliard students could have played it better.Of course, some of those Juilliard students, for all their well-honed technique, might have lacked a little flair. Liberace certainly had flair.Early in "Behind the Candelabra" Mr. Douglas's Liberace, in a self-deprecating moment, tells young Thorson that a critic recently complained, "Liberace is no Rubinstein." Well, Liberace retorts, "Rubinstein is no Liberace!"Actually, the comparison is interesting. Rubinstein was a master pianist and extraordinary musician, but he had a healthy streak of the entertainer in him. I recently rewatched the French-made movie "Arthur Rubinstein — The Love of Life," which won the 1969 Academy Award for documentary feature. This wonderful film follows Rubinstein, about 80 at the time, on a visit to Europe and on a stop in Israel, and it includes footage of his early career.In one scene Rubinstein is sitting in the garden of a house he owns in Spain, talking about how audiences loved him from the start. He humorously recalls the sensation he used to create playing Manuel de Falla's brilliant "Ritual Fire Dance," which has a breathless passage in which the two hands play hard-driving, alternating chords. Rubinstein explains that, to enhance the drama, he always threw his hands high in the air after striking each chord. The audience would go wild, he said. Leaning back in a chair, Rubinstein says (translated from his fluent French), "That piece of music bought me this house."Toward the end of the documentary, that wizened master is shown speaking with and playing for a group of students in Israel. One piece he plays is the Chopin Polonaise in A flat, and during this impromptu performance he may drop a few more notes than Liberace does in his video.But here is Chopin's familiar polonaise played with exhilarating depth, breadth and majesty. In that pensive interlude, Rubinstein's playing is at once noble and heart-wrenching.Yes, this is an unfair comparison. But Liberace, at least the Liberace of "Behind the Candelabra," brought it up.
LAS VEGAS — Two singers, two gigs, two cities and stages, the same opening song. "It's not my imagination," it begins, drawled. Pause, and then a yell: "I've got a gun at my back!"The first version, on Saturday night at the Korova club in San Antonio, was Ron Reyes's: a rallying cry. The second, on Monday night at an outdoor stage of the Punk Rock Bowling and Music Festival here, was Keith Morris's: a freaked howl. Mr. Morris was the first singer, and Mr. Reyes the second, of Black Flag, which started in the late '70s and went on to become one of America's most important punk bands, its four-bars logo tattooed on 18- to 50-year-old flesh all over the world.The song was "Revenge," from Black Flag's second EP, released in 1980. The elasticity of the vowels in "imagination" — by both singers — is South Bay Los Angeles. The gun in the narrative isn't explicitly, but could be, a cop's; punks were new and little understood on the West Coast when Black Flag started, and hunted by the local police. Shows were regularly stopped; violence followed the band; little money was made.Until its end in 1986, Black Flag went through at least 16 band members. The fourth and final singer was Henry Rollins, the most famous member of the band, then and since. But "final" is perhaps the wrong word. Two different reunionlike post-Black Flag entities are on tour right now. Mr. Reyes is in one called Black Flag; Mr. Morris is in one called Flag. Neither includes Mr. Rollins, who has more or less given up music for writing. Both bands — for reunion bands — are strangely good and in possession of a life force, in different ways.The dueling-reunions aspect came together quickly. In late 2011 Mr. Morris convened a few of the band's most significant ex-members — the bassist Chuck Dukowski and the drummer Bill Stevenson, as well as Stephen Egerton, guitarist for the Descendents — for a one-off set, and it went well. They started planning, later roping in the guitarist and hoarse-voiced singer Dez Cadena, and had a tour almost ready to announce in January this year.But Greg Ginn, Black Flag's lead guitarist, principal songwriter and owner of its old record label, SST, beat them to it with announcement that a new Black Flag — he has legal rights to the name — would play at the Hevy Music Festival in England. Flag rushed out its announcement of its own tour on the same day. Mr. Ginn followed with more news, of a plan to tour roughly the same markets at around the same time as Flag, as well as to release a new album of new songs.Four months later, the Black Flag show on Saturday in San Antonio was the third in the United States after a weeklong warm-up in Europe; the Flag concert on Monday was its first in this country after an unannounced gig at the Moose Lodge in Redondo Beach, Calif. — the site, in fact, of Black Flag's first gig in 1979 — and three dates in Europe. Both bands will continue touring through the summer; Black Flag plays two dates in Brooklyn in June, and Flag performs at Irving Plaza in Manhattan on Sept. 19.There is some tension between the two groups. Several former members of Black Flag don't talk to Mr. Ginn anymore; as the band's musical director, more or less, he fired a lot of them, or made it hard for them to stay.But the members of Flag say that their band is not about getting back at Mr. Ginn. Mr. Morris, in a brief conversation before Flag's set on Monday, put Flag's existence as a basic declaration of identity: the core of Black Flag came from the same square mile of Hermosa Beach, Calif.Mr. Ginn, for his part, seems not to be warm about Flag. The official site for Black Flag refers to Flag as "the 'fake' Flag band playing the old songs of Black Flag in an embarrassingly weak 'mailing it in' fashion." At the moment, if you're a journalist, neither he nor Mr. Reyes is talking to you.What was Black Flag? A lot of it does boil down to Mr. Ginn, the un-guitar hero. His sound was untutored, inexact, viscid and full of scrabbling solos, delivered with force and wobbly relation to the beat. He was the prime agent for the group's change, in 1983, toward slower tempos, turning toward a kind of free-improvisation doom metal. (He's into electronic music and jam bands now; on Saturday he wore a T-shirt with the logo of Camp Bisco, the annual festival of the jam band the Disco Biscuits.)In Saturday's Black Flag show, Mr. Ginn's levels of guitar and theremin — which he also plays now, for what it's worth — were pushed so high that they nearly blotted out his adequate band. (The rhythm section is the recent-hire bassist Dave Klein and the drummer Gregory Moore, who's been in some of Mr. Ginn's other groups for 20 years.) They leaned toward old songs, from 1979 to 1981, but also pushed toward the later midtempo music; they also played several songs from the forthcoming new album, which are slight and dull, and made you realize how good the writing was in early Black Flag.But the best part — besides Mr. Reyes's gung-ho effort not to be flattened by guitar — was that Mr. Ginn does not quote himself as an improviser. All his solos were from scratch, and scratchy. He's unpredictable, inconsistent, maddening and exciting; for a while he'd lose focus and grow slack and dull, but then snap back into focus and attack the music again.The two sets had 10 songs in common. But Flag's show on Monday felt qualitatively different. This is a complete band; all parts are equal. Mr. Stevenson's drumming was crisp and powerful; he was borrowing style from Roberto Velverde, a k a Robo, a Colombian musician two drummers before him in the band, who put cumbia rhythm into his high-hat patterns and made punk swing.  Mr. Dukowski played rushing, impatient, vivid bass; Mr. Egerton, using the same kind of guitar Mr. Ginn used to play in the '80s, a clear-body Ampeg Dan Armstrong, replicated some of Mr. Ginn's old solos, more precisely than Mr. Ginn ever did. (This can be troubling: here is where Flag does, to an extent, resemble a cover band, engineered to please.)And Mr. Morris, now with long dreadlocks, small and wary, smart-alecky and comical, kept control. "I hope you're having fun," he told the audience, as earnest as he can sound. "When we started doing this, that wasn't a possibility."
Students in this year's high school musical at the School of the Future in Manhattan were milling around the auditorium before a performance the other day, when a senior hooked his phone to the sound system and played a new song he had found online. The beat was pure 1970s disco — smooth vocals, a funky syncopated guitar riff riding over a tight drum-and-bass groove.The teenagers, who were born two decades after disco died, started moving to the music."Everyone resonated with it," recalled Sora Suzuki, 16. "You just kind of get absorbed into it. It's got this old feel about it."The song was Daft Punk's "Get Lucky," a nod to disco from a French electronic duo known for kitschy robot costumes, machinelike vocals and computer-generated beats. Since it was released on April 19, the song has rapidly ascended to No. 4 on the Billboard singles chart, making it an early candidate to become the song of the summer.It is the first Top 10 pop hit for the musicians, Thomas Bangalter and Guy-Manuel de Homem-Christo, and it has thrust their sci-fi brand of dance music upon a wider audience, even propelling their fourth studio album, "Random Access Memories" (Daft Life/Columbia) to No. 1 on the Billboard album chart. The album, Daft Punk's first since 2010, has sold 339,000 copies since it was released last week, putting the group on par with more mainstream acts like Pink and Dave Matthews.Radio programmers say that "Get Lucky" reinforces a recent Top 40 trend of hit songs that mine the sounds of 1970s disco and R&B, among them Justin Timberlake's "Suit & Tie" and Robin Thicke's "Blurred Lines."What is more, the song is getting airplay and generating requests from listeners across several radio formats — Top 40, hip-hop, alternative, even Spanish-language pop stations — with its timeless, rapturous message about finding a soul mate (or at least a bedmate) at a dance party.Dylan Sprague, who programs Clear Channel stations in Boston, said he has put the song into rotation on three stations devoted to electronic dance music, hip-hop and Top 40 and that it has become one of the most requested songs on all three formats."Just anecdotally, I feel like it's everybody's favorite song, no matter who the person is demographically," he said. "It's got great lyrics. It's easy to digest, easy to sing along with. It's got a nostalgic vibe and yet it still sounds current and hip, a little disco-y and dance-y. It just works across multiple formats."So how does a disco song become a hit with the millennial generation? Radio programmers note the pop charts list more dance-oriented songs than at any point since the late 1970s, a consequence of the surging popularity of electronic dance music. In that world, Daft Punk has long had a cult following and is viewed as the progenitor of electronic acts like Skrillex and Deadmau5. Programmers also say that vocals from Pharrell Williams, the singer and songwriter known for his work with N.E.R.D. and the Neptunes, also help the track resonate with young urban and pop audiences."It has a good dance vibe to it," said Aaron Zytle, program director for KRXP, an alternative station in Colorado Springs. "And it's got Pharrell on it, which gives it credibility for Top 40 and urban stations.""Get Lucky" is Daft Punk's highest charting single ever on Billboard's Hot 100; its only other contenders were "Around the World" in 1997 and "One More Time" in 2000, neither of which ever reached the Top 40, though they did well on dance charts.An all-star lineup of musicians made a difference. Nile Rodgers, the guitarist and songwriter for Chic, wrote the underlying riff and plays guitar. Mr. Williams sang the lead and wrote the lyrics. The rhythm section consists of Omar Hakim, an acclaimed jazz drummer who has worked with Madonna and Sting, and the bassist Nathan East, who has recorded with Stevie Wonder, Eric Clapton and Phil Collins.Mr. Bangalter and Mr. de Homem-Christo, who declined to be interviewed for this article, have told reporters that they started working on the album in 2008. The aim was to depart from their usual way of operating and recapture what they call the "golden age" of recording in the late 1970s. They abandoned playing the parts themselves and relying heavily on drum machines, computerized loops and samples of disco and rock records. Instead they recruited master studio musicians with the technique to play a syncopated groove in near-perfect time for five or 10 minutes."Get Lucky" took more than 18 months to write. The duo came up with the chord progression and organ part early on, then asked Mr. Hakim and Mr. East to record a rhythm track. Mr. Rodgers laid down the guitar tracks at the Electric Lady Studios in Manhattan, where he recorded his first Chic single in the 1970s. He jammed over the tracks, playing his trademark chord inversions and chicken-scratch rhythms until the riff emerged.Months later, Mr. Williams traveled to Paris and composed the melody line and lyrics in the duo's studio there. "It was so spontaneous and instant," Mr. de Homem-Christo told the BBC. "It was just a fast sparkle of magic, and he channeled to some of the best R&B he had been listening to."Mr. Williams said in a later online interview he had been so jet-lagged that he did not remember the session well.The marketing for the song was old-school as well. Columbia Records avoided waging a modern Internet campaign, opting instead for billboards with just the band's robot-helmet logo in Los Angeles and other cities. Then came 15-second spots on "Saturday Night Live" with snippets of "Get Lucky" to whet the public's appetite, and finally a videotaped promotion at the Coachella music festival in which Mr. Rodgers and Mr. Williams appeared with Daft Punk."We were trying to reveal as little as possible," said Scott Greer, Columbia's vice president for marketing. "The thing that has enhanced the brand is the scarcity, the absence of any information, and then supplying it here and there."Many teenagers only know Daft Punk through "Tron," the duo's 2010 album, or through Kanye West, who sampled one of its earlier songs for his 2006 hit "Stronger." But what many seem to be responding to in "Get Lucky" is what lies at the heart of many disco hits: an upbeat message and danceable beat.Theoren Hyland, 15, a self-described science "nerd" at the School of the Future who likes rock bands like Coldplay, said he only became interested in Daft Punk this year, when friends showed him a YouTube video with sci-fi anime characters for the song "One More Time." Then he heard "Get Lucky" at a rehearsal for the "Guys and Dolls" production at school and became a convert."It's catchy," he said. "It has a good vibe. But it's also the theme, what it's about: partying and celebration."
When the New York Philharmonic announced its 2013-14 season in January, it sketched out a major new initiative, the NY Phil Biennial, in broad terms and a sprinkling of intriguing details. On Wednesday, the orchestra filled in more of the blanks, making clear that it is expanding its contemporary-music activities well beyond the composer residencies, the new-music series Contact! and the special events that it has embraced since Alan Gilbert took over as the Philharmonic's music director four years ago.The inaugural series, to run from May 28 to June 7, 2014, positions the orchestra at the heart of an evolving cultural sector concerned with new sounds and fresh ideas. Other participants include the Orchestra of St. Luke's, the American Composers Orchestra, Lincoln Center, Bang on a Can, the Juilliard School, Gotham Chamber Opera, the Metropolitan Museum of Art, the Museum of Modern Art, the 92nd Street Y and the Special Music High School at the Kaufman Center.In a recent interview at Avery Fisher Hall, Mr. Gilbert said that the Philharmonic had been mustering the partners and programs for the biennial for two years. "The idea itself is something I've been talking about and thinking about for much longer than that," he said, "before I was even appointed here: this notion that maybe we could do something for music that has been done in the world of visual arts, famously in Venice and Art Basel and Art Basel Miami and the Whitney, these institutions that are now part of the vernacular."The Philharmonic has raised $1.25 million for the biennial so far, including major donations from the Andrew W. Mellon Foundation, the Susan and Elihu Rose Foundation and the Francis Goelet Fund, and is still lining up support, a spokeswoman said.The inaugural biennial includes three programs featuring the entire Philharmonic. One, to be presented on May 30 and 31, pairs Julia Wolfe's "Anthracite Fields" — performed by the Bang on a Can All-Stars and a choir to be named — with Steven Mackey's "Dreamhouse," played by the Philharmonic. It will be the orchestra's first collaboration with Bang on a Can, a 26-year-old composers' collective born of an expansive, uncompromising aesthetic in some ways antithetical to the Philharmonic's conventional sphere."There were very interesting battles fought, certainly by our mentors, and that was how Bang on a Can came to be," Ms. Wolfe said in a telephone interview. "I think that change has come, spurred on by the activities that we've been doing as well as others. In a way, this is an interesting outcome: the friendly, open nation is here."That the Philharmonic is embracing Bang on a Can, she said, shows that the orchestra is eager to welcome an open-minded new audience with broad listening habits.On June 5 and 7, Mr. Gilbert is to conduct the world premiere of Symphony No. 4 by Christopher Rouse, the Philharmonic's composer-in-residence, and the first New York performances of Peter Eotvos's "DoReMi," featuring the violinist Midori, for whom the piece was written. On June 6, the composer Matthias Pintscher is to conduct his own "Reflections on Narcissus," with the cellist Alisa Weilerstein, and Elliott Carter's last completed work, "Instances."Both of these programs will also include new pieces selected from an open call for scores through EarShot, the National Orchestral Composition Discovery Network, a program run by the American Composers Orchestra with the League of American Orchestras, the American Composers Forum and New Music USA. "That's our way of trying to have our finger on the pulse of really new stuff, untested and unheralded composers," Mr. Gilbert said.The biennial includes two events presented under the Contact! banner. One, on May 29 and 31 at the Museum of Modern Art, features works by 11 composers selected by Mr. Pintscher who were each asked to respond to a specific visual artwork located in Salzburg, Austria. The other, to be presented on June 3 at the new Greenwich Village space SubCulture, focuses on solo works by young American composers. (Those events augment, but do not replace, the season's two regular Contact! offerings, which include a concert of Esa-Pekka Salonen's chamber works overseen by the composer on Nov. 4 and a concert featuring the pianist Yefim Bronfman on Jan. 13, both at SubCulture.)Interspersed among the Philharmonic performances are events programmed by partner institutions with divergent but complementary agendas. The Orchestra of St. Luke's, conducted by Pablo Heras-Casado, will present concerts of works by Pierre Boulez, George Benjamin and their associates and disciples. Giants Are Small, familiar to Philharmonic audiences for staging the operas "Le Grand Macabre" and "The Cunning Little Vixen" with the orchestra, will collaborate with the Juilliard School in mounting H. K. Gruber's opera "Gloria: A Pigtale" at the Metropolitan Museum. Events presented by the Gotham Chamber Opera, the pianist Marino Formenti and the Kaufman Center's youth ensemble Face the Music offer still other perspectives.Such events are fundamental to the biennial's raison d'être, Mr. Gilbert said. "The idea was to have curated events — pavilions, if you will — that present different points of view, different threads of composition, of pursuit, of philosophy, of direction," he explained, "so that it's possible for an audience member to immerse him- or herself in a very rich, kaleidoscopic exploration of a lot of things presented together in a way that you wouldn't be able to do otherwise without travel, expense and time."
Maybe it was the placement on a coke-fueled episode of "Girls," or as the theme song to the MTV reality show "Snooki & Jwoww," but the music of Icona Pop has always seemed fit for a neon-tinged night out. Since they broke onto the charts last year with the soundtrack-ready single "I Love It" (co-written by and featuring the British singer Charli XCX) the Swedish duo has made its name on synthy dance pop with hedonistic lyrics and imagery.Caroline Hjelt, 25, and Aino Jawo, 26, met in Stockholm in 2009, and formed a band immediately, shuttling among Sweden, London, New York and Los Angeles as they worked on tracks with a who's who of pop producers, like Stargate (Rihanna, Beyoncé) and Benny Blanco (Katy Perry, Maroon 5). Lately they have been on a promotional tour that has taken them across America."When we first started going here, we felt very Swedish," Ms. Hjelt said. "Now we've been to so many different places, we're starting to understand the culture."They are homeless, but happy on the road."We always carry a mike everywhere, so we can record everywhere," Ms. Hjelt said. "We build studios in our hotel rooms, closets, our car. We're most comfortable in cozy studios that are not too fancy, because then I get a little intimidated and a little shy. We've been doing a lot of vocals in the car."They spoke by phone from Los Angeles, where they are finishing their debut album, due at the end of the summer. They are also embarking on their first headlining tour — they play the Governors Ball festival on Randalls Island on Saturday — which means they get their first dedicated tour bus."Oh yes, we will sing karaoke on the bus," Ms. Hjelt said. "Sisqo's 'Thong Song' — that's our Top 10 song when it comes to karaoke."Ms. Jawo said, "Caroline is better at the chorus."No one broke into "thong th-thong thong thong," but they did discuss their fashion inspirations and favorite podcasts with Melena Ryzik. These are excerpts from the conversation.Q. You guys met at a party at Caroline's house, and then started writing music together right away. How did you know you would be simpatico?A. Caroline Hjelt I had a lot of parties at that time in the apartment. I heard through a mutual friend that Aino was heartbroken, and my friend was like, "she needs to have some fun again." We went out dancing the whole night and the day after, Aino came to my place and we sat down with a bottle of wine and a computer and we wrote our first song.The funny thing is we didn't even talk about the kind of music we liked listening to or what we wanted to do. Aino had a band with a lot of guys and she was singing and playing cowbell. And I was involved in a lot of projects that didn't feel right. We more bonded over the frustration that no one ever got our thing.Aino Jawo It was kind of like we had a lot of something that no one else really had. It's almost like when you fall in love with someone. It was just a lot of good energy.And you have a song about the night you met, "Nights Like This." What did you dance to that night? Does it still move you?Jawo They played Robin S.'s "Show Me Love," and also Hot Chip over and over again, so we know that that's the start of our musical journey. [Now] I will usually put on "Show Me Love" and you will see me and Caroline shaking.A lot of your songs are about romantic revenge. Do you ever listen to country music as you're driving for inspiration?Jawo It's not country from America, it's country from Africa — they're called Tinariwen. That's been our relaxing music, that's what we're listening to before shows. We want to get into the musical mode — you have to focus, that's very important.Hjelt It's almost like you get into a trance, because the rhythms are just repetitive and very strong. When you listen to the same music [repeatedly], it becomes something that you need. As soon as you hear it, you feel like you get closer to yourself.Did you think or talk about what your clothing style would be when you became a band?Hjelt We share most of the clothes that we have. Of course we talk about it: Today I wanna wear this, I wanna feel like Prince tonight, and then the other one can decide.Jawo I want to feel like David Bowie.Hjelt Together we feel kind of invincible, like we're pop warriors.I know you don't have much of it, but what do you do in your down time?Hjelt We love to watch [lousy] TV shows. We love, like, "Days of Our Lives," "Teen Mom" — I cry sometimes when I watch it, it's really sad.Jawo We love watching documentaries and listening to podcasts about space. That's one thing that we do every night, listen to different podcasts [from Swedish radio]. Space, but then also about weird stories, like mafia things.Hjelt The scarier, the better.
Aoife O'Donovan knows that her first name is hard to pronounce, her voice is easy on the ears and the path she has chosen — a singer-songwriter-guitarist in New York — can be a brutal one. (It's EEE-fah, now that you're wondering.)If she also seems to know her way around an interview, it may be that decade as lead singer of the bluegrass outfit Crooked Still, not to mention running with the folk trio Sometymes Why and work on the Grammy-winning "Goat Rodeo Sessions" with Chris Thile and Yo-Yo Ma. Now Ms. O'Donovan is preparing to release her first solo album, "Fossils," out June 11 on Yep Roc Records.Ms. O'Donovan, 30, has been thinking about "Fossils," or some version of it, since she was a student at the New England Conservatory of Music in Boston. She's the kind of person who keeps lists, and on one was her desire to record with the producer Tucker Martine, who has worked with My Morning Jacket and Tift Merritt. To her mind, he would help frame her young-but-wise voice and her thinking in remarkable new ways.It worked out. Her songwriting skills were already established: she wrote "Lay My Burden Down," recorded by Alison Krauss for her 2011 album "Paper Airplane." It is a measure of Ms. O'Donovan's confidence that "Fossils" opens with her own version. Pedal steel guitar threads the album, which tilts country, but works in horns and off-the-hook electric guitar, too.Ms. O'Donovan grew up in Boston; her parents are musicians, and her father has an Irish music radio show. She moved to New York in 2009 and sees herself as a working musician in the folk and bluegrass scene that is growing around the Gowanus Canal in Brooklyn.Ms. O'Donovan, who seems to take everything seriously except herself, spoke with David Carr about playing Bonnaroo and the bar that is her muse. These are excerpts from their conversation.Q. You have an odd touring schedule this summer.A. (Laughs) I'm going to play the Grand Ole Opry, Mountain Stage, Tanglewood with Goat Rodeo, the Ottawa Jazz Festival, I'm hopping on Garrison Keillor's tour for a bit and I'm doing Bonnaroo.Have you played Bonnaroo before?In 2008. I was in a little trio with two other women [Sometymes Why], and we got a slot in one of the middle tents, and we were a super quiet band — ukuleles and three-part harmony and one microphone. We played next to Death Cab for Cutie, and it was a really interesting sonic experience. I'm looking forward to getting up there with a full sound system and my own band.You sound excited about that.When I thought about becoming a musician, the idea of being a solo artist always seemed really lonely to me. It still is in a lot of ways, because even though I'm going to have a band on this tour, it's still just my name on the marquee.What drew you to the Gowanus scene?I like people getting together and playing fiddles and banjos in a communal way. It's different than the songwriter scene that I was part of in Boston, which is centered around people getting together and sharing songs. New York offers the chance to meld the two. In my neighborhood, there's Lowlands, which is the kind of bar where they literally have keys to my house. Friends own the place, you can go and drink a water and work on your computer, or you can go at 3 in the morning and have a whiskey. Amazing people stop in to play: Punch Brothers, Tim O'Brien, Dirk Powell, Kristin Andreassen.You seem to pay a lot of attention to the rhythm of your voice.I think that has a lot to do with Crooked Still. We started out as a quartet, with only three instruments and vocals. You couldn't leave it up to the bass, cello or banjo, because everybody traded roles. I come from a traditional music school background, and I want every note I sing to be full of purpose. When you have to sing the same song every night, you can phone it in, but then it stops being fun for you and the people who show up. You have to access whatever it was that inspired you to write the song and get to that place every single night.
NASHVILLE — "My life is one very large country song," said LeAnn Rimes. "What I've lived in the last four years is country music at its finest."She was referring to the time she has spent as a staple in the tabloids, attacked from many quarters for not only leaving her husband, but for also breaking up another celebrity marriage. Ms. Rimes, though, has never had what you would call an ordinary life.In 1997, at 14, she won a Grammy Award, and was the first country act to win the best new artist category. Since then she has sold more than 20 million records in the United States, with eight albums in the country Top 10 and a No. 2 pop hit with "How Do I Live."Even her early career, though, was fraught with controversy. In 2000, Ms. Rimes filed multiple lawsuits concerning her income and her contracts, first against her father and her former manager and then against her record company (all were eventually resolved). Yet that strife scarcely prepared her for the chaos of the last few years.In 2009, Ms. Rimes began an affair with the actor Eddie Cibrian when they starred in a made-for-TV film, "Northern Lights." She divorced her husband, Dean Sheremet, who had been one of her backup dancers; Mr. Cibrian's wife, Brandi Glanville of the reality series "The Real Housewives of Beverly Hills," kicked him out of their house, and in 2011, he and Ms. Rimes married.Ms. Glanville wrote a best-selling memoir in which she referred to Ms. Rimes as Mr. Cibrian's "sugar mama," and then called Ms. Rimes "insane" on national television. TMZ and Us Weekly obsessively covered the singer's outfits and haircuts. During this period, paparazzi shots of Ms. Rimes in a bikini on California's beaches, looking dangerously thin, were plastered all over the celebrity magazines and gossip Web sites. Last August, she checked into a clinic seeking treatment for anxiety and stress.This week, however, Ms. Rimes responds to the turmoil with a new album, "Spitfire" (Curb Records), that represents the boldest steps — in both music and lyrics — of her career. The sound of the record is mostly acoustic-based and stripped-down, rootsy and soulful. The up-tempo songs have a rockabilly slap, while the ballads are spare and intimate, the better to feature her still-powerful voice.It's the words, though, that will surely draw the most attention: The album, subtitled "The Truth . . . in No Particular Order," uses the grand tradition of old-school country music to document the joyous and messy complexities of a relationship. On "A Waste Is a Terrible Thing to Mind," Ms. Rimes sings, "I threw him out like he was trash one night/The dumbest thing I've ever done" and "I keep me warm with the bridges I burn." On "Just a Girl Like You," she offers: "He may break my heart, too/But that's a chance I gotta take/Just like you did."During an interview last month in a nondescript conference room in an office park here on Music Row, Ms. Rimes said: "Someone said to me yesterday that this album is like taking a knife and stabbing myself in public. And it's true — I'm letting everyone watch while I rip my guts out. There was not an ounce of me left to put on this record. It was the most fearless I've ever been, in anything that I've ever done."After people have written my life for me for the last four and a half years — and it doesn't matter whether it's true or not, it's what sells the most magazines that week — this was the first time I could dig into my emotions and write from this perspective, and not have to apologize for being human. A lot of people don't see me as that, and haven't for a long time."It's unclear, though, how "Spitfire" will be received by country music fans. Having left Nashville for Los Angeles, become fodder for the scandal sheets and recorded an album that doesn't sound like the glossy hits on country radio, Ms. Rimes is far from a sure thing commercially.
A formal description of Luigi Dallapiccola's one-act "Il Prigioniero," a bleak 12-tone opera about a despairing prisoner during the Spanish Inquisition, might not sound like a crowd pleaser. Still, the conductor Alan Gilbert is giving New York Philharmonic audiences a rare chance to experience this sensual and mysterious 1950 work as part of Gilbert's Playlist, a series devoted to his favorites. I share his enthusiasm for "Il Prigioniero," which I first saw in a wrenching production at the Paris National Opera in 2008.Though this will be a concert performance, the drama comes from Dallapiccola's powerful score. A Spanish prisoner tells his visiting mother of being befriended by a jailer, who is by the end revealed to be the Grand Inquisitor himself. The compelling bass-baritone Gerald Finley is the prisoner, and the vibrant soprano Patricia Racette the mother. The program opens with the brilliant violinist Lisa Batiashvili in Prokofiev's Violin Concerto No. 1. (7:30 p.m. Thursday, 8 p.m. Saturday and 7:30 p.m. June 11, Avery Fisher Hall, Lincoln Center, 212-875-5656, nyphil.org; $29 to $99.) The Philharmonic will also present the author Harvey Sachs and the cellist Eileen Moon in an Insights series program (6:30 p.m. Wednesday, $20) about the context of Dallapiccola's life, musical and political.
The lineup for the 20th edition of Hot 97's Summer Jam seemed like a certain undersell, a curiously superstar-free collection of largely B- and C-listers, rookies and sophomores. No Jay-Z, no Drake, no Lil Wayne, no Nicki Minaj, no Kanye West. It practically screamed, "We're hiding our big-name surprise guests!"At least, that would have fit in with Summer Jam's legacy. This concert is the annual reckoning of hip-hop hierarchies in the genre's birthplace. It's where beefs are often started, and less often settled; where big names bring out even bigger names onstage; where out-of-towners come to earn stripes; and where Hot 97 (WQHT 97.1 FM), which was long the only hip-hop station in town, has flaunted its dominance and clout, which rose with hip-hop's commercial fortunes throughout the 1990s and 2000s.But hip-hop isn't the oligarchy it once was, New York isn't the hub it once was, and Hot 97 isn't the only game in this diminished town. And the station has sometimes set off controversy by becoming part of the drama, not merely an observer.That's what happened at last year's Summer Jam, when the Hot 97 D.J. Peter Rosenberg maligned one of the pop hits of Ms. Minaj, who was to be a headliner. She refused to perform that night, leading to what became perhaps the highest-profile squabble between a musician and a radio station.About a week ago, Ms. Minaj sat for an interview with Mr. Rosenberg; the station's program director, Ebro Darden; and others in what was portrayed as a healing of wounds. She apologized for disappointing her fans. Mr. Rosenberg apologized for being bullheaded, or being perceived as bullheaded. Ms. Minaj casually demeaned Mr. Rosenberg. Everyone laughed.The stage was set, then, for possible closure. At this year's Summer Jam on Sunday night at MetLife Stadium in East Rutherford, N.J., streamed live on hot97.com, the thinking went, Ms. Minaj could perhaps perform a surprise set, bring out her label boss, Lil Wayne, and her label mate Drake, and set hip-hop back on its axis, and give this haphazard lineup some direction. (Because of travel constraints, I watched this year's show via the live stream, which was mostly reliable if volume-challenged.)She made no promises, though. That was probably because there was no way Ms. Minaj would cotton to an easy redemption narrative, or allow Hot 97 to profit from her name — not yet, at least. She did come onstage midway through the show on Sunday night, during 2 Chainz's set, to perform a pair of songs. Her appearance was radiant and quick, and the reconciliation was terse and unsatisfying; she gave Mr. Rosenberg a brief, affectionless hug as she walked off the stage.With Ms. Minaj out of the way, and on decidedly unflashy terms, it quickly became clear that Hot 97 had played its ace early: no real help was on the way. What was left wasn't a referendum on hip-hop's boundaries, like last year's conflict, but maybe an inadvertent one on the scale of its current ambitions.With no big-budget names to lean on, the show made do with a different caliber of star. 2 Chainz, just two years ago effectively a castoff, was a geyser of anthems and confidence and undoubtedly the most relevant rapper in this lineup. Meek Mill, not on the bill, stole sets from both the uncharacteristically amiable Wale and Fabolous. R&B was represented by the tender Miguel, who was joined by Mariah Carey, and the limber and soulless Chris Brown.But the tenor of the night was set by the back-to-back sets of ASAP Rocky and Kendrick Lamar, two rising stars who are chipping away at hip-hop maximalism.ASAP Rocky is an aesthete but not a worldbeater; his charms are restrained. He was energetic, though, and he brought out Bone Thugs-N-Harmony, the great and still-underappreciated Cleveland rappers of the 1990s that he, a New Yorker with open ears, cites as a major influence.Mr. Lamar is a different kind of star — modest-size, with minor-key music who often crawls and rarely overwhelms. He was dominant during his performance, full of confidence that overshadowed his music's fundamental humility. At the end of his set, his crew and ASAP Rocky's crew stood at center stage together, staking a claim to victory that was not really challenged.
The Eiffel Tower's Voice: Using drumsticks and mallets, composer Joseph Bertolozzi is turning Paris' Eiffel Tower into a giant percussive instrument.PARIS — The composer Joseph Bertolozzi , bearing a meditative look, stood with his feet apart in front of a door frame inside the Eiffel Tower. Then, 187 feet above the Champ de Mars garden, he pulled a latex mallet from his tool bag and hit the frame hard, and then softer, with agility and rhythm."That one was beautiful!" said Paul Kozel, a sound engineer, who recorded the dull thuds.Mr. Bertolozzi, who lives in Beacon, N.Y., is in Paris harvesting sounds for what he calls a "public art installation," a musical project that has taken him, Mr. Kozel and a team of seven to one of the most visited monuments in the world.His mission is to "play the Eiffel Tower" by striking its surfaces, collecting sounds through a microphone and using them as samples for an hourlong composition called "Tower Music." He eventually hopes for a live, on-site performance of the work to celebrate the tower's 125th anniversary next year."I'm exhilarated to be here," Mr. Bertolozzi said, just before striking a wall with a sheepskin-padded log hanging from a leather strap. "I've been planning this for so long."Knowing no French and lacking contacts in Paris, Mr. Bertolozzi has spent more than four years on his quest. He raised $40,000 from private donors and convinced the Eiffel Tower administration that he was a legitimate musician."Improbable" yet "extraordinary," Jean-Bernard Bros, the president of the Eiffel Tower operating company, said of the project, which he called "exceptional because it is rare, it is unique, it never happened before." Mr. Bros, however, was noncommittal about allowing a live performance. "Let's see first what the sounds produce — the fruit of his effort," he said.As outlandish as Mr. Bertolozzi's project seems, it actually falls within a longstanding tradition of percussion works produced by found objects. One example is Magnus Lindberg's "Kraft," scored for orchestra and percussion "instruments" found in local junkyards — like brake drums and wheel rims — and performed in recent years by the New York Philharmonic. This time the object happens to be a giant monument in a European capital, but it is not the first large structure from which Mr. Bertolozzi has created a work. He also composed "Bridge Music," a piece consisting of sounds culled from the Franklin D. Roosevelt Mid-Hudson Bridge, near Poughkeepsie, N.Y.On the second day of a two-week expedition that started last month, Mr. Bertolozzi and his team had already recorded about 400 sounds. He struck girders, spindles and handrails with drum sticks, wooden dowels, Lucite mallets and rubber hammers, some of which he had designed."We see if the sounds have a pitch relation, like do re mi," Mr. Bertolozzi said, adding, "The different dimensions of the Eiffel Tower give you different notes." For instance, "if you have a big panel, it will vibrate slower and longer, so you'll produce a deeper pitch, usually." The vertical shape of the tower, he said, "gives you a great number of resources if you need high notes, middle notes, low notes."Mr. Bertolozzi said he originally felt some anxiety. "If I find 500 B flats on it, then what am I going to do?" he said. "But we're doing great. We're finding all kinds of notes."The idea of playing on the Eiffel Tower struck Mr. Bertolozzi, an organist who also collects gongs, after his wife mimicked him striking a gong one day nearly a decade ago."She 'banged' at the Eiffel Tower on a poster hanging on the wall of our bedroom," Mr. Bertolozzi said. "I thought, 'This would work.' "At the time, the Eiffel Tower seemed a stretch, so he turned his efforts to an instrument closer to home. "I knew Gustave Eiffel was a bridge builder, so I said, let me do something on a bridge here in America," Mr. Bertolozzi recalled.The result, "Bridge Music," was released in 2009 and reached No. 18 on the Billboard classical crossover charts. He couldn't find money to make it into a live performance, but local authorities installed a permanent listening station on both sides of the bridge, where visitors can hear samples from April through October.In preparation for his Parisian experiment, Mr. Bertolozzi studied the design of the Eiffel Tower. He listened to the works of French composers like Ravel and Poulenc, whose pieces have elements of cafe music and street sounds.The tower, too, serves as "a deeper inspiration for me to try to find new ways of creating sounds," he said. "So it's just constant reinvention."During his note gathering, some tourists seemed a little puzzled, but the tower's staff found Mr. Bertolozzi's approach coherent and unsurprising.Stéphane Roussin, the chief engineer of the tower, said the structure makes noises and vibrations. "It whispers," he said."We often bang on it," he said with a smile, "to make sure that the material isn't defective."
Outdoor Pianos, Impromptu Concerts: For two weeks this summer, 88 outdoor pianos will be available in all five boroughs of New York City. The Times's chief classical music critic, Anthony Tommasini, decided to sample a few.Henry Andrews, a little boy going about town with his mother, dismounted his miniscooter one day this week and, still wearing a helmet, began dancing to a jaunty Bach bourrée. He was in a small square on the edge of Lincoln Center, and the music came from a beat-up but attractively decorated silver piano played by a stranger: me.The instrument was courtesy of Sing for Hope, the nonprofit organization founded in 2006 to foster interaction between artists and communities and to make the arts accessible to the public. This is the third consecutive year of Sing for Hope Pianos, a project that has placed 88 such keyboards in outdoor locations in all five boroughs. It runs through June 16, when, in a new and ambitious initiative, all the pianos will be moved to Josie Robertson Plaza in Lincoln Center for a day of outdoor concerts before they are donated to schools, hospitals and community centers.The idea behind this project couldn't be simpler. The pianos, mostly old uprights with some well-worn grands mixed in, have been placed in squares, plazas, parks and other sites throughout the city. Each has been painted and decorated by an artist. (The silver-painted piano at Lincoln Center came from the clothing designer John Varvatos.) The instruments are available for anyone to play, from children who have never touched a piano to professional artists. Two years ago I chanced upon David Kaplan, then 26, a graduate of Juilliard, while he was playing Schumann's demanding "Carnaval" on a Sing for Hope piano in the sunken plaza in front of Alice Tully Hall. He played the whole piece!This year I decided to take a little tour of the project. When I showed up at Lincoln Center on Tuesday, a fluid jazz pianist, Adam Bonomo, was playing breezy, vibrant music. Somehow, listening to him, I did not really mind all the traffic noise, complete with screeching trucks, on Columbus Avenue.And when I took a turn and started playing, the noise bothered me even less, especially, to my surprise, during subdued passages, including the theme and variations movement of Beethoven's "Appassionata" Sonata. People came by and listened; many took smartphone photos. All of a sudden I noticed that one of my listeners was Joseph Polisi, the president of the Juilliard School, who waved.There are summer festivals around the world where making music takes place in the open air. But playing a piano in the urban outdoors is very different. The incongruity makes it all the more special.So, after saying goodbye to Henry, my new buddy, I took off to find other outdoor pianos, along with two video journalists from The New York Times, Gabriel Johnson and Vijai Singh.The weather was sunny and clear, a perfect June day. On the 65th Street Transverse in Central Park, just outside the Dairy, stood a small upright painted by the scuba diving artist Izabel Lam, all aqua blue, with sea creatures, including Opus the Octopus. This piano had the advantage of being under a covered walkway, which protects it from the weather. Yet each piano, no matter how exposed, has a volunteer team of "piano buddies" who make sure to cover it with tarps when rain comes and who check to see that the pianos stay, more or less, in tune.At the Dairy three young girls — Juliet and Simone Benn, twins, and Anuki Wattage — were all playing at once, trying out notes and making up little patterns. There was no banging, which impressed me. I asked if they wanted to hear me play something, which they did. So I chose the jolly first movement of Haydn's Sonata in F (Hob. XVI/23), a piece full of quick turns, surprise chords and fancy runs.It was rather hard to dispatch one passage where a crucial repeated note fell on a key that kept sticking. But my young listeners liked it so much that a couple of them joined in, one girl playing clusters in the high register (absolutely in time with the beat), and the other playing tolling notes in the low bass. It sounded sort of good. This was very urban Haydn.For a while we played a musical game, in which I had one girl try to play the notes of the C major scale (all white keys), holding each one four beats as I thumped accompanying chords, while parents, baby sitters and others listened.I was unprepared, though, to be as affected as I was when we moved to another piano in a peaceful enclave in Central Park, and I played the first of Beethoven's Six Bagatelles (Op. 126). This is late Beethoven, the last piano work he published. On the surface the first bagatelle from this group seems lyrical and soothing. But curious flights and strange happenings make the music rather mystical.I tried that piece on each piano I played. At a special place in Central Park, Cherry Hill, west of Bethesda Terrace, there was a mini-upright piano near a watering trough for horses pulling carriages. This endearing instrument, decorated by the artist Amanda de Souza (with lettering spelling out "Play Me" and "Hello Friend"), faced out on a tranquil pond. All his life Beethoven was a sucker for natural beauty, so this seemed an ideal setting for that ruminative bagatelle.At the New York Public Library I found "Mosaic Piano," a small upright decorated with paint, glass tiles and porcelain pieces by the artist Kathleen Ruel, in the elevated side plaza facing 40th Street, near Fifth Avenue. This was a popular site, with lots of players taking turns, including one who performed a jazzy riff on Rachmaninoff's Third Piano Concerto.That people of all skill levels feel free to sit down and play emboldens you. Sloppy results do not matter. So I tried out this and that, including some Chopin. It was amazing how many pedestrians walking along 40th Street stopped to listen to the people who played.My tour concluded with an appearance on the grounds of the Cathedral Church of St. John the Divine, where there was a small piano in the area behind that strange maelstrom of a sculpture at the center of the Peace Fountain. This stop became another dance event as I played for — and with — two small children, Teddy Glazek and Joey Reiss, who seemed intrigued by seeing music, however modest, being played live by a person they could speak with, outdoors in a neighborhood.They too started dancing, holding hands, to the music of Haydn and Bach. One delight of that day was finding out how easy it was to get little children to dance.
For a while, the Nashville Symphony Orchestra seemed to have everything going for it. After a triumphant Carnegie Hall debut in 2000 , it began to make compact discs prolifically, winning a handful of Grammys and a reputation for its championship of contemporary American music along the way. And it opened a sumptuous new concert hall, the 1,844 seat, $123 million Schermerhorn Symphony Center, in 2006.When the Louisiana Symphony was flooded out by Hurricane Katrina, the Nashville Symphony invited the New Orleans musicians to Nashville to play a benefit concert, offering its own players to fill in gaps in the Louisiana string section.Now this feisty, can-do orchestra's future is imperiled. On Wednesday, independent auditors submitted a review in which they questioned whether the orchestra could "continue as a 'going concern.' "And on Thursday, after months of negotiations about how the orchestra can repay an $82.3 million loan for the construction of the hall, the Bank of America began foreclosure proceedings, announcing that the hall would be put up for auction on June 28.The orchestra's management has kept its audience abreast of developments with a series of open letters and updates on its Web site, and officials said they hoped to avert foreclosure, perhaps by filing for bankruptcy if necessary."At the moment, we are continuing what I believe is a very productive negotiation with the lender group," Kevin Crumbo, the treasurer of the orchestra's board of directors and the chairman of its financial restructuring committee, said on Friday, "and we remain hopeful of reaching an out-of-court resolution."The orchestra's problems stem from a string of reversals in recent years. A flood in Nashville in May 2010 caused about $40 million in damages to the hall. The economic downturn has taken its toll as well, as gifts to the orchestra dropped to $10.6 million last year from a high of just over $39 million in 2008, and investment income dropped to $2.2 million in 2012 from $6.4 million in 2011, according to the orchestra.Though the orchestra points out that this decline was partly offset by 2011 flood recovery funds from the Federal Emergency Management Agency, it contributed to a shortfall of $11.7 million for the fiscal year that ended last July — and a total shortfall of $39 million since 2009.To some extent, the foreclosure notice may be the bank's latest move in a high-stakes chess game that began in April, when the orchestra's board voted not to renew the letter of credit that was backing the loan.That, as Mr. Crumbo explained, made the orchestra's debt come due immediately, though it was clear that it did not have the means to pay it, which contributed to the auditors' doleful conclusion. The board reasoned that its action would force the bank to restructure the debt with more favorable terms. That restructuring is the subject of the current negotiations between the orchestra and the bank.Bank of America had nothing to add beyond a terse statement:"The bank group has been in discussions for some time with the orchestra to help it resolve its debt on an acceptable basis and operate at a sustainable level," Shirley Norton, the bank's spokesman, wrote in an e-mail. "Left with no other alternative the bank group has been forced to file for foreclosure, always a last resort."Mr. Crumbo said foreclosure postings were unsurprising in negotiations of this sort, as an attempt to "move negotiations forward." He said the bank could extend the foreclosure deadline."The symphony," he added, "could also head off a foreclosure by filing a Chapter 11 bankruptcy. We're prepared to do that if it becomes necessary, but our preference is to continue the negotiations, and stay out of court."Alan D. Valentine, the orchestra's president and chief executive, noted that the orchestra was finding new ways to produce income, including presenting pop and jazz concerts in the hall and making the hall available for rentals. He said ticket income has been increasing by 30 percent a year.Mr. Crumbo added that Nashville's new Music City Center, a large convention space, has just opened about a block and a half from the hall, and will attract visitors to Nashville who may also buy tickets and support the orchestra."I don't think our prospects have ever been brighter than they are now," Mr. Crumbo said, sounding surprisingly upbeat for someone who has just been served with a foreclosure notice. "We have a growing downtown area. Surely we can wrap up these negotiations and move on with developing that."
Conrad Tao, a gifted composer-pianist who is in the Columbia University-Juilliard School joint degree program, will celebrate his 19th birthday on Tuesday by inaugurating the Unplay Festival. This three-day event that he is organizing at the Powerhouse Arena in Brooklyn will explore several themes, including the musician's evolving role in contemporary culture and how and why particular works come to be considered standard repertory.Mr. Tao is to play several of his own scores on a program dedicated to electroacoustic music, including "Iridescence," a piece for iPad and piano that shows the influence of Brian Eno and Messiaen. That program also features works by Phil Kline and Tristan Perich, among others. Messiaen's "Louange à l'Éternité de Jésus" is included on an alluring lineup on Wednesday that also features music by John Adams, David Lang, Julia Wolfe, Chopin, Ravel and Louis Andriessen.Performers include Sideband (an ensemble using speakers and laptops), Iktus Percussion, Todd Reynolds, Face the Music and the experimental group thingNY. (8 p.m., Tuesday-Thursday, 37 Main Street, Dumbo, unplayfestival.com; three-night pass $25.)
Notoriety was the key to headlining the Governors Ball Music Festival last weekend on Randalls Island. It used to be the making of a pop hero, and sometimes it still is.Saturday's main-stage closer was Guns N' Roses, the band led by a vociferous bad boy of yesteryear, W. Axl Rose. Sunday's finale — and by far the biggest draw, if tabulations by the festival's scheduling app were any indication — was Kanye West, the rapper and producer who has so often acted up in the spotlight and then written songs about fame-induced folly and megalomania. He had a new one on Sunday, modestly titled "I Am a God."They both have long, tangled back stories that have become incentives for attending their shows; see it live before it's reported by the tabloids. And their music was set at full blast. They're two generations of pop hero: Mr. Rose stays shameless while Mr. West is (sometimes) repentant.At Governors Ball they avoided the self-destructive rants of past occasions. Mr. Rose came back onstage after his band's big fireworks display to announce, "I love New York." And when Mr. West got to the spot in his song "Clique" where, he said, he usually starts complaining and justifying himself, he instead touted his artistic independence. "We just made some real music," he said of his album "Yeezus," due for release next Tuesday, going on to insist that he didn't care about selling a million albums or tailoring songs for radio play. "When I listen to radio, that ain't how I want to be no more," he declared to roars of approval, though radio stations might be resentful.If Mr. West was out to steamroll the acts that came before his — 63 others over three days — he came pretty close. His new songs relied on brutally stark synthesizer riffs and drumbeats, closer to industrial dance music than to current hip-hop, and they were delivered on Sunday through a sound system with bone-rattling bass. Most of his older songs were remixed along the same lines: all deep, ominous punch as Mr. West shouted nearly every line.He spent most of his performance on a small stage in the audience, wearing a loose gray outfit that made him look something like a penitent; for those who could see him, he was heaving back and forth, working up a sweat. But he set aside the beat for two long ballads with only piano chords and his computer-tuned voice: "Heartless," about a breakup, and "Runaway," a toast to boorish behavior. Bragging and materialism are at war with self-consciousness and self-criticism in Mr. West's songs; a hero of ambivalence, he slammed home all the contradictions.Guns N' Roses, by contrast, unabashedly celebrated excess. The group, which now consists of Mr. Rose and sidemen rather than the band of comrades from its 1987-91 heyday, is larger, slicker and even more cartoonish than it was in its early years. Mr. Rose and the band's three guitarists struck rock-star poses, songs indulged themselves in long buildups and guitar interludes, and the stage spewed fireworks and confetti. It was an older school of rock-hero behavior, full of preening and bombast. Yet once Mr. Rose got his voice up to full, abrasive yowl and screech, Guns N' Roses was the embodiment of nostalgia-enhanced memories, a relic reanimated like a woolly mammoth suddenly charging across the tundra.Kings of Leon, whose headlining set was rained out on Friday, were squeezed into Saturday's lineup for their first New York City show since 2010. They didn't play hero; they worked their instruments and let their songs — brooding Southern rock updated with hints of punk agitation or U2's arena-scale hooks — speak for themselves.Most of the rock bands presented themselves with that kind of modesty. Gary Clark Jr., a blues-rocker from Texas, made his songs slash and scream and erupt with distortion, communing with his guitar rather than telegraphing the music's drama. Divine Fits — the songwriting alliance of Britt Daniel, from Spoon, and Dan Boeckner, from Wolf Parade — did some clowning onstage, but never hid the rigorous neatness of songs that use every detail of an arrangement to tell their stories.Deerhunter's guitarists just stood there casually as they showed how two or three chords could swell into clouds of noise evoking specific eras: garage-rock, psychedelia, postpunk. A different variety of postpunk — revved up by breakneck, pointillistic guitar patterns — came through in galvanizing sets by two British bands, Bloc Party and Foals. Haim, a band led by three sisters from California, channeled guitar patterns into a sunnier style, like Fleetwood Mac thinking about the Feelies.
The Northside Festival grew out of a simple question posed by its organizers, the brothers Scott and Daniel Stedman, about five years ago. The Stedmans, who founded The L Magazine a decade ago to record the goings on around Williamsburg, realized that every year, many of the musicians, managers and record labels in Brooklyn's indie rock scene were trekking en masse to Austin, Tex., for the South by Southwest music festival, which had become the country's most important forum for new bands."We're sitting in a geographic space, Brooklyn, that is synonymous with what's next," said Scott Stedman, 36. "Why annually is there a pilgrimage from New York to Austin to discover what's next?"Now in its fifth year, the Northside Festival, running from Thursday through June 20, has grown into a compact and intensely Brooklyn counterpoint to South by Southwest. The festival will feature 400 bands, three quarters of them local, appearing at 30 clubs, from dives like the Trash Bar to the Music Hall of Williamsburg. Like the Austin organizers, the Stedmans have added a four-day film festival and a two-day expo and conference for high-tech entrepreneurs, called NExT.Music festivals on the South by Southwest model, which sell all-access badges and make use of existing clubs and theaters rather than erecting a temporary stage in a field and charging admission, are nothing new in New York. Indeed the founders of South by Southwest modeled their event on the CMJ Music Marathon, held every fall in Manhattan and Brooklyn. The New Music Seminar and the CBGB Festival follow a similar template.Other New York festivals, like Governors Ball and Electric Zoo, have found success with the traditional stage-in-a-muddy-field approach, fencing off a portion of Randalls Island, putting in beer vendors, food stands and dozens of port-a-potties and charging a steep admission for a slate of big-name acts. Those festivals are patterned after Bonnaroo, the giant, four-day concert in Manchester, Tenn., which also takes place this weekend.But the Stedmans' event is the only one rooted in Brooklyn's do-it-yourself ethos, a movement born when artists and musicians seeking cheaper rents left the East Village for Williamsburg in the late 1990s, starting up dozens of bands, underground clubs, theaters and galleries. Because so many of the bands are from the New York area, the Northside Festival in a sense only magnifies and celebrates what is going on every week in the borough's clubs and underground spaces."It's starting to grow and have more of an impact on everyone who lives here," said Michelle Cable, the owner of Panache Booking, which is sponsoring a showcase. "But it's not a destination festival like South by Southwest. It's for local folks."This year, the lineup is long on guitar-driven rock and punk-influenced bands, like Merchandise, Milk Music, the So So Glos, Iceage and Soft Moon. The noisy aggression of these bands appears to signal a shift away from the sweeter electronic chillwave that dominated the festival when it started in 2009.While there will be a sprinkling of older bands from the original punk era, like Black Flag, the Stedmans acknowledge that many of Brooklyn's most established indie bands — acts like TV on the Radio, Grizzly Bear, the Yeah Yeah Yeahs and Animal Collective — do not participate. That caliber of band is too expensive for the festival's budget, they said, and performance spaces in northern Brooklyn are too small to make such concerts profitable.Still, Daniel Stedman, 35, said the organizers have resisted expanding the festival to larger music halls and theaters in Manhattan, like Webster Hall and Terminal 5. "We intentionally restrict the whole footprint of the festival to the walkable area of Brooklyn" he said. "That's one of the things that makes Northside unique."The festival takes in about $2 million in revenues, three-quarters of that in sponsorships from companies like Heineken and Red Bull. It sells about 3,000 badges, ranging from $80 for access to music shows to $260 for access to film, music and the tech exhibition. By comparison, the cost of a music badge is $795 at South by Southwest and $549 at CMJ. Festivalgoers may also buy tickets to individual concerts; last year, about 80,000 in all attended shows, films or the expo.Northside's limited means have forced the organizers to hunt for on-the-cusp bands, lending the festival a gritty, experimental air. "Northside definitely has more of a scrappy, up-and-coming feel," said Brandon Stosuy, an editor at the online music publication Pitchfork.Lauren Beck, an associate editor at The L who signs most of the festival's acts, put it this way: "We're trying to get bands that, in two months, could play Webster Hall."
If, as Shakespeare said, all the world's a stage, it's even truer that all New York City's a concert hall. Hardly a day goes by when you won't stumble upon spontaneous music in the city's parks and public spaces.The condition will grow especially acute this Friday when Make Music New York returns for its seventh year. Random encounters are the event's raison d'être, but ever since a percussion troupe rowed out onto the Lake in Central Park to play a Xenakis concert in 2010, new-music groups have outdone themselves in creating destination events.This year's highlights include a performance by an apparently record-setting 175 keyboardists — including, we've heard, Mayor Michael R. Bloomberg — on Cornelia Street at 11 a.m.; a wandering, all-day rendition of the English avant-gardist Cornelius Cardew's "Great Learning," starting at St. Paul's Chapel at 11 a.m.; and three concerts featuring the music of R. Murray Schafer on the Lake, at 7:30 a.m., 5 p.m. and 8:15 p.m. (Various locations, 7:30 a.m. to 10 p.m.; makemusicny.org.)
"I have not slept in three days," Mac Miller said, "so I apologize if I'm a little weird." Actually, Mr. Miller, the Pittsburgh-born rapper, was less weird than wiped. He's in one of his busiest periods since his 2011 debut, "Blue Slide Park," entered the Billboard charts at No. 1, the first independent album to do so in 16 years. His follow-up, "Watching Movies With the Sound Off," is due Tuesday from Rostrum Records."I've been filming videos from 10 p.m. to 11 a.m. and then having rehearsals during the day," he said by phone from Los Angeles, all part of his plan to continue feeding his fans with YouTube videos and performance.He had another chart-topper this spring, the single "The Way," with the 19-year-old Nickelodeon star and singer Ariana Grande. And at 21, he's already a TV veteran: His MTV2 reality series, "Mac Miller and the Most Dope Family," set in his new home in Los Angeles, was just renewed for a second season.On a rare break, Mr. Miller got a haircut — a buzzer was audible in the background — and spoke with Melena Ryzik about forging a rap career. "I started because I loved to make music," he said. "To create for the sake of creating and nothing else." These are excerpts from the conversation.Q. How do you like living in Los Angeles?A. Greatest decision of my life. Pittsburgh forever, that's my heart. [But] L.A. is definitely where I needed to go. It's the place for me to kind of grow into myself, and the only way to do that is to do everything. I built my own studio, which has changed my life. I really love the idea of just making super weird songs that don't really have a form, and they don't have a purpose. The music industry is so serious — "What single are you gonna do? What's for the radio? What's for the girls?" It's really stressful for a young artist, because you don't know what's going to tell your story, so doing this is just liberating.You have a lot of guests on your album — Tyler, the Creator, Action Bronson — and Flying Lotus as a producer. How did you get them involved?I paid each of them $100,000 to make me look cool: "Give me a verse, because you all are cool and I'm an MTV reality star." No, to be real, I came out to L.A. and I have this studio and the door's always open. So I found a group of people that I consider really good friends, and they're my peers and my homies. I didn't hit up my manager, like, "Hey, man, I've always really wanted to do a song with whoever — Rivers Cuomo from Weezer — can you make this happen?"I dropped the cover, and everyone is like, "Mac Miller naked, he's crazy!" Half the people are saying, "Oh man, I'm not going to buy that, what am I gonna look like buying a naked-dude album?" People thought I was doing it for attention, as a marketing tactic, which really made me laugh, because I'm so over doing things as a marketing tactic. That ruins everything. As days went, people started coming up with their own little concept, which I love. I want it to start discussions.Do you watch your show?It's weird to see that stuff, being super-obnoxious on television. But other people consider it funny. Now that we got the good ratings and we're coming back for the second season, I'm making all sorts of demands. I'm trying to make it really weird. If you really watch the show and think about it, we don't do anything. But Season 2 is going to be more emotional and intimate. We're going to get into everyone's relationships, with their struggles and with their girlfriends. That'll be tight: "Mac Miller and the Most Mope Family."
It was like clockwork. Someone writing in The New York Times would refer to the Big Five American orchestras: the Boston Symphony Orchestra , the Chicago Symphony Orchestra , the Cleveland Orchestra , the New York Philharmonic and the Philadelphia Orchestra . And within hours, Peter Pastreich, the respected executive director of the San Francisco Symphony from 1978 to 1999, would beard The Times's overseer of classical music — at the time, me — by telephone or e-mail, complaining that the term Big Five had long since outlived whatever usefulness it may once have had.The Times was by no means alone in using it. At least by the mid-1960s, soon after I had started to follow classical music, the term had become common coin in discussions of the American orchestral scene. And it proved remarkably persistent, even as the mighty handful started to suffer setbacks and other orchestras grew in budget and artistic stature, notably the St. Louis Symphony, the Los Angeles Philharmonic and the San Francisco Symphony.Ernest Fleischmann, executive director of the Los Angeles Philharmonic from 1969 to 1998, argued for recognition of a big six. And the San Francisco Symphony, celebrating its centennial in the 2011-12 season under Mr. Pastreich's successor, Brent Assink, found a creative way to imply the existence of a big seven if not proclaim it, presenting each of the Big Five and the Los Angeles Philharmonic in brief residencies at its home, Davies Symphony Hall.Plausible notions both, though neither caught on. Yet it is true that while the idea of the Big Five may still exist in the public imagination, you no longer hear talk of it in the profession except from Big Five members, when, occasionally, they find it useful.A century or so ago, when classical music thrived in a nation of immigrants, orchestras were a powerful force, flagship institutions that helped to put American cities on the cultural map. And the Big Five, when it coalesced, helped, with its cumulative weight, to put American orchestras firmly on the international map. No other country could boast of such a constellation.But this landscape has changed greatly over the last half-century, much as the country's economic, demographic and cultural landscape has, and in many of the same ways. The economic fortunes of the flagship ensembles have changed with the fortunes of their cities."The notion of the Big Five just doesn't exist today," Thomas W. Morris, the chief executive and artistic director of Spring for Music, a festival of North American orchestras at Carnegie Hall, says in a video on the festival's Web site.The idea of the Big Five was largely created and popularized by journalists, although the member executives started to hold their own meetings. The concept was certified, in a way, by 1969 and 1972 analyses commissioned by, er, the Big Five suggesting that perhaps only the Big Five would survive."There is a natural tendency in any field to want to identify and celebrate the best," said Jesse Rosen, president and chief executive of the League of American Orchestras, a service organization, whose annual conference opens Tuesday in St. Louis.The problem is establishing criteria. In sports, the best can usually be identified by hard and fast quantities: timings, distances, scores, percentages. In music, as in other arts, the issue is quality, and that is not so easily determined or compared.In fact, the criteria of membership in the Big Five, never firmly established, began with quantities. They included size of budget, number of recordings, amount of touring (especially stops in New York), presence on radio and television, and number of year-round musicians. Quality, it was more or less assumed, would follow the numbers, with more-prosperous orchestras able to attract better players, conductors and guest artists.But those quantities were always squishy, and the balances shifted. The Cleveland Orchestra, for example, with the smallest budget by far, got its foot in the door of what some thought of as a Big Four Plus One mainly on the strength of its artistic achievement under George Szell, its music director from 1946 to 1970, before gaining full recognition.Vague though it was, the notion of a Big Five carried real meaning and impact for a time. "If you go far enough back, 30 to 40 years," said Gary Hanson, the Cleveland Orchestra's executive director, "the defining element of success had a lot more to do with an institution's ability to compete for talent than anything else. In that competitive environment, there was a direct relationship between reputation and quality."The major orchestras competed for recording contracts, players, major conductors. Today, with recording contracts rare, more orchestras employing their players year-round and geographical mobility a way of life, the market is more diffuse. Climate and cost of living are as likely to figure in a musician's choice of employer as an orchestra's historic renown.Mr. Hanson acknowledged that the Big Five orchestras benefit slightly from a "residual reputational momentum.""But today," he added, "the ability to maintain a viable orchestra and pursue greater quality depends almost entirely on philanthropy. It depends on the ability of the local community to fund its orchestra."Cleveland is a particularly difficult case, with so many corporations having fled the city. But with Franz Welser-Möst as music director, the Cleveland Orchestra has retained its lofty artistic profile while relying on major gifts and on residencies in Miami, Vienna and elsewhere.In another stressed city, the Philadelphia Orchestra filed for bankruptcy in 2011. But it, too, seems to have weathered the storm in fine artistic fettle, thanks to the interim efforts of Charles Dutoit as principal conductor and Yannick Nézet-Séguin's arrival last year as music director.
Malibu, Calif. — From Shangri-la Studio here you can see the Pacific Ocean just over the fence lapping calmly at Zuma Beach. And this compound is just as Zen, with recording equipment set up in various locations, including an old bus and a spotless white house with all the mirrors removed.But there is no rest at Shangri-la, at least for Kanye West. For several days in late May and early June, he and a rotating group of intimates, collaborators and hangers-on were holed up in service of finishing "Yeezus" (Roc-A-Fella/Def Jam), Mr. West's sixth solo album, out Tuesday, and one that marks a turn away from his reliable maximalism to something more urgent and visceral.The original studios were built under the supervision of Bob Dylan and the Band in the 1970s — some of "The Last Waltz" was filmed here — and the property was bought in 2011 by the producer Rick Rubin, the man whose brain Mr. West had come here to pick. Together, they sandpapered off the album's rough edges, rerecording vocals and sometimes writing entire new verses. Even as the deadline loomed, Mr. West made room for an appearance at the baby shower for his girlfriend, Kim Kardashian, who's expecting their first child. As the days passed, the songs noticeably morphed, becoming more skeletal and ferocious.One afternoon, Mr. Rubin exited the studio and declared, to everyone and no one, "It's un-bee-leave-able what's happening in there."If by that he meant the paring-down to what Mr. West lightheartedly referred to as "aspiration minimalism," then yes, it was somewhat unbelievable.Mr. West has had the most sui generis hip-hop career of the last decade. No rapper has embodied hip-hop's often contradictory impulses of narcissism and social good quite as he has, and no producer has celebrated the lush and the ornate quite as he has. He has spent most of his career in additive mode, figuring out how to make music that's majestic and thought-provoking and grand-scaled. And he's also widened the genre's gates, whether for middle-class values or high-fashion and high-art dreams.At the same time, he's been a frequent lightning rod for controversy, a bombastic figure who can count rankling two presidents among his achievements, along with being a reliably dyspeptic presence at award shows (when he attends them).But Mr. West is, above all, a technician, obsessed with sound, and the music of "Yeezus" — spare, direct and throbbing — is, effectively, a palate cleanser after years of overexertion, backing up lyrics that are among the most serrated and provocative of his career.In a conversation that spanned several hours over three days, and is excerpted here, the Chicago-raised Mr. West, 36, was similarly forthright, both elliptical and lucid, even as long workdays led to evident fatigue. He compared the current moment — about to release "Yeezus," and looking to make a bigger footprint in worlds outside of music — to life just before his debut album, "The College Dropout," from 2004, another time when he was in untested waters. "I want to break the glass ceilings," he said. "I'm frustrated."When your debut album, "The College Dropout" came out, the thing that people began to associate with you besides music was: Here's someone who's going to argue for his place in history; like, "Why am I not getting five stars?"I think you got to make your case. Seventh grade, I wanted to be on the basketball team. I didn't get on the team, so that summer I practiced. I was on the summer league. My team won the championship; I was the point guard. And then when I went for eighth grade, I practiced and I hit every free throw, every layup, and the next day I looked on this chart, and my name wasn't on it. I asked the coach what's up, and they were like, "You're just not on it." I was like, "But I hit every shot." The next year — I was on the junior team when I was a freshman, that's how good I was. But I wasn't on my eighth-grade team, because some coach — some Grammy, some reviewer, some fashion person, some blah blah blah — they're all the same as that coach. Where I didn't feel that I had a position in eighth grade to scream and say, "Because I hit every one of my shots, I deserve to be on this team!" I'm letting it out on everybody who doesn't want to give me my credit.And you know you hit your shots.
About 20 men and women assembled in a ballet studio in Chinatown on a recent Monday evening to rehearse a sequence of austere and meticulously choreographed movements in silence. Peering over a piece of paper covered in tiny handwriting, Jamie Benson, a choreographer leading this rehearsal of the Shakedown Dance Collective, called out instructions while the group flowed through a series of arm movements, hand gestures, dips and bends."It says 'right arm downward, outward and inward through the thighs,' " he said, as members of the group tried to translate those instructions into a scooping arm movement. "Hand raised, arm outstretched — ""I don't like it," a woman interrupted. "It looks like a Hitler salute.""Then let's change it," Mr. Benson said. "Let's stop with the arm a little below shoulder level. We have the freedom to do that."Mr. Benson is a founder of the Shakedown Dance Collective, a group of amateur dance enthusiasts who normally specialize in high-energy pieces performed to funk music in flash mobs and at dance parades. But on Friday they will appear in part of "The Great Learning," Cornelius Cardew's masterpiece of the postwar avant-garde that is in equal parts live music, performance art and social experiment. The performance is part of the River to River Festival and Make Music New York."The Great Learning," set to a text by Confucius about individual discipline and good governance, lasts about eight hours. On Friday each of its seven sections, called Paragraphs, will be performed at a different site in Lower Manhattan. The piece is led by Mantra Percussion and brings together dozens of amateur and professional instrumentalists, singers, members of the Shakedown Dance Collective, and — where possible — audience members willing to take part.The British composer Michael Nyman, who participated in the first performance of Paragraph 2, called it "one of those rare works of such power and freshness that it seems to reinvent music from its very sources by somersaulting musical history."Cardew (1936-81), also British, was an apprentice to the German electronic composer Karlheinz Stockhausen in the late 1950s and an admirer of the American experimentalist John Cage. His music combines elements of serialism, indeterminacy and minimalism with his own brand of left-wing politics. These became increasingly radical: after 1972 he renounced Modernism, published a book-length diatribe, "Stockhausen Serves Imperialism," and churned out folk songs to texts like "Smash the Social Contract."Cardew wrote "The Great Learning" between 1968-70 for his newly formed Scratch Orchestra, a group designed to incorporate and exploit the talents of both untrained and trained musicians. In the group's founding manifesto Cardew laid down detailed instructions on improvisation rituals and rehearsal procedures, notation — verbal, graphic, musical, collage — and the process by which a work is admitted into a canon of "popular classics." Once it is, "adherence to the original terms of composition is waived," he wrote. That is, as a piece becomes established, the interpreter's freedom grows and the composer's control diminishes."Cardew didn't want experimental music to be exclusive," said Nick Hennies, a percussionist with the Austin New Music Co-Op who organized a performance of the work in that city in 2011 and will play (and sing, shout and whistle) in the New York performance on Friday.Within the work, the balance between specificity and freedom shifts constantly. In both the music and the movements, Cardew's detailed handwritten instructions always leave room for interpretation. The structure of individual Paragraphs is determined, but the musical outcome in each performance is unique. Where other composers were concerned with organizing sound, Cardew was interested in organizing the production of sound.In one instance, Mr. Hennies said, singers are instructed to begin singing any note of their choosing. The next note has to be selected from one of the notes sung by a neighboring performer. "Over the course of an hour the number of available notes gradually decreases," Mr. Hennies said. "The piece goes from totally dissonant to much more tonal and dronelike. It's very pretty."Paragraph 1, which will be performed in St Paul's Chapel on Broadway, features organ music, speakers and whistling on a variety of found objects and instruments. "There's a large group of people, divided into people who speak and people who whistle," Mr. Hennies explained. "They take turns reading the text and whistling until all the whistlers have taken a solo. Then the organist finishes the piece."The learning aspect of "The Great Learning" is most visible in Paragraph 5, which will be performed at South Street Seaport with members of the Shakedown Dance Collective. It begins with a single performer "teaching" another performer the first sentence, or movement sequence. The "student" then teaches another performer, while the first continues through the sequences, until all students have become teachers and all sentences have been performed in full. The musicians then begin an hourlong improvisation."It is difficult to have a through-composed piece that incorporates untrained musicians," Michael McCurdy, a member of Mantra Percussion, said. "It's like an art installation and it works really well outdoors. At each of the sites we will have a description of what's going on so you can go along. It's like in church: there is a choir who knows the music, but everyone else just follows along. There is an element of teaching built in."
For all but the most knowledgeable pop-music fans, Jay-Z's three-minute commercial during the N.B.A. finals last Sunday might have been perplexing. The black-and-white spot showed a rumpled Jay-Z working on music in a studio. Its documentary style created the impression the viewer was eavesdropping on a session as the rapper talked with producers in poetic terms about an album. It ended with a cryptic text message on screen, "The Next Big Thing Is Here" and below it the Web site magnacartaholygrail.com .At the site it becomes clear that "Magna Carta Holy Grail" is the title of a new album, and that the commercial was, in effect, Jay-Z's announcement of its release on July 4 under an arrangement with Samsung. The company will give away the first million copies to owners of its cellphones through an app.The mysterious tone of the ad and the secrecy surrounding the making of the album are in keeping with recent trends in music marketing. In the last six months, several major artists — David Bowie, Daft Punk and Kanye West — have kept their new albums under wraps, then mounted brief, intense campaigns aimed not at critics and radio programmers, but at generating waves of interest on the Internet, banking on their fans to pass along news.Such viral marketing isn't new. Trent Reznor of Nine Inch Nails, for instance, concocted an elaborate online scavenger hunt involving codes on T-shirts and songs left on flash drives in bathrooms at his concerts to promote his 2007 album "Year Zero." But the recent examples are bigger in scale and ambition and seem to underscore what marketing experts see as two trends: the decline of record sales as part of the overall income of musicians and the rise of the artist as a branded commodity.A musician's interaction with fans, they say, has become a form of entertainment itself that drives sales of merchandise and concert tickets as well as corporate sponsorships. Jay-Z's decision to let Samsung buy the first million copies of his record at a discounted price and give them away is bound to boost his personal brand."It ain't like there is a lot of money in selling records anyway," said Steve Stoute, founder of the marketing agency Translation LLC. "If the music is shared and people like it, you are going to make the money on tour."Mike King, who teaches marketing at the Berklee College of Music in Boston, said that teasing fans with tidbits, creating a sense of mystery and letting Internet buzz do the marketing, circumvents the critics and the major media outlets that used to set the agenda. Once, "it was 'How can you engage with the gatekeepers?' " he said. "Now it's 'How do you remove these gatekeepers and go directly to the fans?' "But marketing experts say this approach works best with established acts who have a large online following. Errol Kolosine, who teaches music business and marketing at New York University, said, "When you as an artist reach a point where your brand is as valuable as any label, then you are at the point where you can call your shots."Mr. Stoute said viral marketing taps into the treasure-hunting instinct fans display when they scour the Internet for pirated tracks. Musicians have learned that news passed from fan to fan can be more powerful than a review in a major publication. "The marketing of music today has been informed by the process of how music was stolen, " he said. "Everybody figured out through the hard route that once there is buzz on a song it's going to be shared at an intense rate."Most albums are still marketed the old-fashioned way with labels distributing promotional copies to journalists and other tastemakers ahead of a release. Then theyissue a single to radio stations a month or so before the album, looking for a hit to attract people. And the musician does interviews and makes radio and TV appearances to generate publicity.That paradigm seems to be changing or undergoing variations, at least with big artists. David Bowie, for instance, kept his new album, two years in the making, a secret until Jan. 8 (his birthday). Then, without fanfare, he released the single "Where Are They Now?" and posted a surreal music video on YouTube. He did no interviews, though it was his first album in a decade. Instead, he plastered London and other cities with posters showing the album cover, a guerrilla campaign more fitting for a DIY punk band than a major star. Then he posted a second video for the single "The Stars Are Out," starring Tilda Swinton.Daft Punk, the French electronic duo famous for their robot headgear, also gave few hints that they planned to release an album in May. The first clue came in February when they posted a picture of their helmets fused together on Facebook, along with the logo of their label, Columbia Records. Over the next two months, they tantalized audiences with enigmatic billboards and Saturday Night Live spots and played the entire album at a small fair in rural Australia, posted interviews on YouTube and showed a 60-second ad at the Coachella Music festival.By the time the single "Get Lucky" was released to radio on April 19, the online buzz was in high gear, said Scott Greer, Columbia's vice president for marketing. "We were trying to reveal as little as possible," he said.Kanye West was also coy about his new release, "Yeezus." He sent a Twitter message to his fans on May 1 saying only "June Eighteenth," which turned out to be the issue date for the album. Two weeks later, he had a video for one of the singles, "New Slaves," projected on the outsides of buildings in 10 major cities around the world, alerting fans about the showings on Twitter. Thousands recorded the screenings on their phones and posted the images online.The next day, he appeared on "Saturday Night Live" and performed "New Slaves" and "Black Skinhead." Before the release of "Yeezus," he did only one traditional interview — a long one with The New York Times. He skipped releasing a single to radio altogether.When the album finally leaked on the Internet four days before its release date, fans scrambled to get it. The record was on track to sell more than 500,000 copies this week."It was Kanye's vision to create intrigue and mystique around the project," said Steve Bartels, the president of Island Def Jam Music Group. "Kanye always wanted to create a way for fans of music to be presented an album and his vision all at one time."
If you ask Buddy Guy who embodies the future of blues guitar, he will point to a 14-year-old boy from Massachusetts named Quinn Sullivan. "Remember that name," Mr. Guy said in a recent interview. "He sounds like Eric Clapton, B. B. King, me, Hendrix, everybody, man!"Mr. Sullivan is just graduating from middle school, but at a time when most teenagers are getting ready for summer vacation, he's getting ready to tour to promote his new album, "Getting There" (SuperStar Records), a set of blues, rock, rockabilly and Beatlesesque pop songs, sung in his sweet, guileless voice.Mr. Sullivan began playing the guitar at 3, and his remarkable ability came to national attention at 6, when Ellen DeGeneres, who often showcases child prodigies, invited him to play on her show. But his career did not truly take off until 2009, when Mr. Guy, the Chicago bluesman, invited him on tour after meeting him backstage at a show. Mr. Guy also produced Mr. Sullivan's first album, "Cyclone," which peaked at No. 7 on the Billboard Blues Chart in 2011. In April Mr. Sullivan impressed a sold-out crowd of blues-rock fans at Madison Square Garden, appearing with Mr. Guy at Eric Clapton's Crossroads Guitar Festival."I got to go up for the finale," Mr. Sullivan said. "You look down the line — there's Derek Trucks, Gary Clark Jr., Jimmie Vaughan. There's Clapton — my heroes."Mr. Sullivan has a mellifluous voice and a sweet, mildly awkward bearing, but onstage his guitar bucks, wails, screeches, crunches and soars. He came to New York earlier this month to appear on "Late Night With Jimmy Fallon" and talked to James McKinley Jr. about his first guitar and feeling the blues. Below are excerpts from their conversation.Q. HOW DID YOU GET INTERESTED IN THE GUITAR?A. My parents had a lot of music in the house, from the Allman Brothers to the Beatles, and all those old rock 'n' roll bands playing on the stereo. I fell in love with that whole thing. One Christmas — I was 3 — my parents bought me, because I was craving and dying for one, a little First Act guitar. I started taking lessons when I was 5.WHAT WAS THE FIRST SONG YOU LEARNED?"Blackbird" by the Beatles. I was in love with that song from the start, because I was a huge Beatles fanatic.WHEN DID YOU FIRST HEAR THE BLUES?My dad had Eric Clapton's first Crossroads Guitar Festival on DVD, the 2004 one. I saw Buddy Guy come out and do "Sweet Home Chicago." It was something else with his stage mannerisms, just his whole thing — something I had never seen in my life. The first time you listen to the blues, you feel something toward it. You can already feel a story behind it. You can feel history. For me it was listening to Buddy and feeling where he's been in his life.WHEN DID YOU MEET HIM?I met him in 2007 at a little theater in my hometown, New Bedford, Mass., called the Zeiterion Theater. My dad knew some people at the theater and got us backstage to see Buddy. I had a guitar with me, and I asked him to sign it. Then he said, 'Can you play a few licks?' I played and he said, 'You be ready when I call you.' He's been my mentor since then.Nope. I probably will branch into that a little bit, because I want to have some theory behind what I'm doing. But for now it's always by ear.DO YOUR FRIENDS GET WHAT YOU DO?They look at it more like, "That kid's been on 'Ellen,' " or "That kid's been on 'Oprah.' " The highlights.WHAT'S IT LIKE PLAYING IN BLUES CLUBS WHEN YOU'RE NOT OLD ENOUGH TO DRINK?I just try to ignore the drunk people.
BOISE, Idaho — The pounding on his cargo-van doors started as soon as Jalan Crossland 's head hit the pillow. After a thousand miles of rough road and his fifth straight night onstage, the bone-tired banjo man had kicked off his boots and collapsed on the mattress in his old Dodge 3500 outside Pengilly's, the saloon here where he and his fellow musicians had jammed well into the early morning.Roused by the adrenaline jolt of his "Big Horn Mountain Blues," the bluegrass closer of his touring show, some of his more ardent and well-lubricated fans weren't buying the idea that he was allowed to retire for the evening. Mr. Crossland, 43, affectionately known in his home state, Wyoming, as the "trailer park troubadour," had half a mind to wave the .38 pistol he keeps nearby when sleeping on the road. Instead he fired up his rig and headed for a reliably quiet spot to crash: "A Walmart parking lot or Flying J truck stop — you'll always get a good night's sleep there," he said.Mr. Crossland's choice of accommodations was dictated by personal preference and the hardscrabble economics of the WYOamericana Caravan, a 14-date swing through the heart of the rugged American West featuring three popular Wyoming bands. This monthlong "traveling concert circus" wound down this month after treating juke-joint crowds in Colorado, Montana, Idaho and Wyoming to a buoyant mix of bluegrass, rock, folk, and old-timey music. Joining Mr. Crossland, who hails from the town of Ten Sleep and drove solo, were J Shogren Shanghai'd, a trio from Centennial, and Screen Door Porch, a quartet from Jackson.The tour was brainstormed and organized by Seadar Rose, who shares singer-songwriter duties with her husband, Aaron Davis, in Screen Door Porch. (Their alt-country band also includes the bass player Tom Davidson and the drummer Andy Peterson.) Aiming to present a showcase of Wyoming roots music both inside and beyond the least populous state's borders, she wrangled commitments from club owners, started a promotional Web site, designed posters, solicited sponsorships from merchants (suggested donation: cash or beer) and recruited advance people at each stop to spread word of the caravan's impending arrival."We all like each other and each other's music," said Ms. Rose, 31, "and always thought it would be cool to tour together. So rather than wait for some promoter to step in, we said, 'Let's just bootstrap the thing, do it ourselves.' After all, that's how we do everything else in Wyoming."The caravan's grass-roots style of self-promotion reflects a growing trend. "I'm seeing more and more artists who don't have an agent or publicist but are finding creative ways to tour," said Valerie Denn, a booking agent in Austin, Tex. As examples, she cites Dave Barnes, master of the "barnjo" (a hard-body electric banjo), whose coming itinerary takes him through Missouri, Indiana, Kentucky, Ohio and Michigan, and the Denver-based singer-songwriter Megan Burtt, who will be appearing at clubs in Colorado, California and Texas."Bands are pooling their resources, coming up with unusual packaging ideas," Ms. Denn said. "They're using social media to raise money, find free places to stay on the road or do house concerts between tour dates so they can pick up a little cash and sell some CDs. Crowdsourcing is the new norm among independent bands."An artist's fan base is critical to this evolving strategy."Today's music lovers may not be willing to pay a lot for recorded music, but they do want a direct connection to bands they like," said Panos Panay, founder of the Web site sonicbids.com, which connects musicians with promoters, booking agents and retailers. "They want to contribute to artists' development, so they'll donate money to help finance tours and recordings. Smart new bands are tapping into that by being more proactive in marketing their own brand."Besides Ms. Rose and her entrepreneurial gumption, the Wyoming caravan had the advantage of a renowned numbers man on board. When he's not growling the lyrics to irreverent tunes like "Hand Grenade" ("When my Tommy-gun starts burpin' Satan will be a-hurtin' ") Jason Shogren, the lead singer and songwriter in J Shogren Shanghai'd (the latter term a reference to how he strong-arms musicians into his band), holds down a day job as chairman of the economics department at the University of Wyoming, in Laramie. An expert on biodiversity and climate change, he prefers to tinker with equations more relevant to what he considers his real job."You know how many hits you need on Spotify to make the minimum wage each month?" he asks, referring to the popular music downloading service. "More than four million."More impressively, he's among the few pop musicians who have been party to a Nobel Peace Prize. After serving a year in the Clinton White House's Council of Economic Advisers, Mr. Shogren was appointed to the Intergovernmental Panel of Climate Change, which shared a Nobel with Al Gore in 2007. He was deemed a party to the award along with 2,500 others who have served on the panel. "I've got the little plastic keychain thingy with a picture of Alfred Nobel to prove it," he said. "But I was never invited to any party."Not that his professorial cred ranks very high with his tour mates, who include the drummer and guitarist Jascha Herdt and the bass player Shaun Kelley."No one would want my advice even if I were dumb enough to offer it," said Mr. Shogren, 54, an affable bear of a man with a beard and searing blue eyes who has recorded four albums since 2007. "Seadar and Aaron are the ringleaders — I'm just along for the ride. Jalan is the real star here."
Asked by a student about her musical inspirations after a recent Baroque master class at Juilliard, the violinist Rachel Barton Pine gestured toward the stickers of heavy metal bands plastered on her violin case. "When they're onstage, they're getting everyone headbanging," she said. "Within classical music my goal is to do the same thing, to give 150 percent and get everyone caught up in the emotions."Heavy metal and early music are among the many interests of Ms. Pine, an energetic Chicagoan who plays Baroque violin and viola d'amore with Trio Settecento, her period-instrument ensemble. She also focuses on early 20th-century and Romantic violin concertos. She recently recorded the Glazunov Violin Concerto with the Russian National Orchestra, with José Serebrier, a frequent collaborator, as conductor; other projects include a recording of 18th- and 19th-century black composers and a book of original cadenzas and arrangements.Striking and charismatic with waves of Pre-Raphaelite auburn hair, Ms. Pine often speaks to the audience during concerts. She offered anecdotes about Paganini's 24 Caprices during a performance last year at Rockefeller University in which she demonstrated a bravura technique and soulful musicianship. (She will also perform the Caprices on Aug. 17 and 18 at the Ravinia festival in Highland Park, Ill.)In contrast to the pyrotechnics of the Paganini, her most recent release, "Violin Lullabies" (Cedille), features work by an eclectic range of well-known and obscure composers. Inspired by the birth of her daughter, Sylvia, in September 2011, Ms. Pine unearthed the lullabies in libraries around the world and on the Internet."Sometimes I would hear someone else's performance of these pieces, and they were interpreting it like a passionate piece of music, like I would if I didn't know it was a lullaby," Ms. Pine, 38, said in an interview in Manhattan. "But once you know it's a lullaby it takes you to a different place. You have to be calm and delicate."Ms. Pine, whose comments about classical music were threaded with anecdotes about the rock guitarist Eddie Van Halen and Dave Lombardo, a former drummer with the thrash metal band Slayer, doesn't plan to perform all of the lullabies live, "unless I'm playing for a meeting of Insomniacs Anonymous," she said jokingly. "It's funny, because I have been advocating to fellow rock fans that classical music can be just as exciting as any other music out there, and it's not just pretty stuff that puts you to sleep. And now I've made an entire album of just that!"Ms. Pine's range of achievement is all the more impressive given her setbacks. In 1995, when she was 20, the doors of a Chicago commuter train closed on the straps of her violin case as she tried to get off. She was dragged about 200 feet; half of her left leg was severed and her right foot was mangled. Her upper body was unscathed. She had to use a wheelchair at first, but after many operations and a long recuperation she learned to walk with a prosthetic leg. (Four years later she would be awarded $29.6 million in a lawsuit against the commuter line and a railroad company.)Ms. Pine, then on the brink of a major career, said she saw the accident as just another challenge after a difficult childhood. Her parents, now divorced, encouraged her musical aspirations."I nagged for a violin when I was 3, and by age 5 I self-identified as a violinist and was signing my kindergarten papers 'Rachel, violinist,' " she said. "That was the core of my being."Yet because her father, Terry Barton, was unemployed throughout her youth, Ms. Pine became the family breadwinner, playing weddings and orchestra gigs. Any prize money from music competitions that she entered covered groceries and rent rather than lessons or sheet music. Her mother, Amy Barton, home-schooled her and her two younger sisters to accommodate Ms. Pine's hectic musical schedule. She practiced up to eight hours a day and performed at 10 with the Chicago Symphony Orchestra; at 17, she won the 1992 Bach International Competition in Leipzig, Germany."I feel like my childhood formed my character," she said, describing "seemingly hopeless situations" in which the family could not pay for the gasoline that would be needed to drive to lessons or she did not know whether scholarship money would come through. "And yet I think that God meant for me to be a violinist. That's the sort of illogical aspect of faith." (Ms. Pine is a member of the United Church of Christ.)"I would just have to hold onto hope and keep practicing and doing my best and believe that everything would work out even if I couldn't possibly see how it could," she said. "I spent the precarious years of my childhood living like that, so when I was injured, it wasn't, as many people think, a defining or life-changing moment. It was more like, 'Oh, one more challenge, one more bump in the road.' "
Bill Frisell has had a lot of practice putting high concept into a humble package. Long hailed as one of the most distinctive and original improvising guitarists of our time, he has also earned a reputation — over the last 30 years, and especially within the last 10 or so — for teasing out thematic connections with his music.The tenor of his work, and the slant of his signature, has kept Mr. Frisell, 62, at the forefront of a hybrid you might call jazz Americana. His style suggests a folklike vernacular that finds purchase in country, Protestant hymns, jazz and blues. He has drawn recent, long-form inspiration from the rural portrait photography of Mike Disfarmer and the Great Mississippi Flood of 1927. This spring at SFJazz, he performed multimedia tributes to Allen Ginsberg and Hunter S. Thompson."Big Sur" (OKeh), his gorgeously evocative new album, fits squarely into this portfolio, with a welcome twist. As the title implies, it's about the rugged sweep of California coastline that runs south of the Monterey Peninsula, with a sound that often courts the majestic. But the album doesn't strike a dialogue with Henry Miller or Jack Kerouac, who each put a claim on the region. That literary filter would be true to Mr. Frisell's established pattern of inquiry, maybe even a little too on-the-nose.What "Big Sur" represents is at once simpler and more ambitious. Commissioned by the Monterey Jazz Festival, where it had its premiere last year, this suitelike work attempts to evoke an experience, a sense of place. Mr. Frisell composed all the music in seclusion on a sprawling property owned by the Big Sur Land Trust, during a 10-day residency there. Most of the album's 19 tracks bear titles seemingly copied out of a pocket notebook: "On the Lookout," "A Good Spot," "The Animals."The sound of these pieces convincingly suggests a blush of discovery bound by larger purpose. The tunes don't become a tasteful blur, like those on "Disfarmer," from 2009. They don't form a crowded canvas of disconnected ideas, as on "History, Mystery," from the previous year. They aren't experiments in texture, like so much of "The Intercontinentals" and "Unspeakable," from roughly a decade ago. (Each of those albums, released on Nonesuch, has been justly acclaimed.)What's striking about "Big Sur" is its determined strength of melody, along with its shrewd marshaling of resources. It merges two of Mr. Frisell's recent bands: his 858 Quartet, essentially a string ensemble, and Beautiful Dreamers, a hardier postbop trio. So along with its leader, "Big Sur" features the violist Eyvind Kang, the violinist Jenny Scheinman, the cellist Hank Roberts and the drummer Rudy Royston: musicians with a strong feeling for Mr. Frisell's language.It isn't really an album for those who come to Mr. Frisell for his calmly inquisitive brand of guitar wizardry. ("Silent Comedy," the experimental solo recording he put out this year on John Zorn's label, Tzadik, is one of many other places to find that fix.) With the exception of a passable surf-rock track, it's not an album that hangs on the guitar playing in general, deriving more purpose from chamberlike actions. The big picture is the point, and as usual, credit is due to Lee Townsend, Mr. Frisell's longtime producer.But it's Mr. Frisell's fingerprints that are all over this music. "A Beautiful View," with its convergence of Copland-esque grandeur and arpeggiated shimmer, could hardly have come from another source. Likewise with "Going to California" and its air of noble austerity. And "Shacked Up" is a slow-drag country waltz that milks the half-step dissonance in its melody, as if Bob Wills were tipping his hat to Thelonious Monk.And while a lot of Mr. Frisell's recent music has shied away from aggressive rhythm, he strikes a strong balance on "Big Sur." Mr. Royston knows how to put a hard bounce beneath any groove without sounding overbearing, and from the first moments here, on "The Music of Glen Deven Ranch," his presence is crucial. It helps prevent the album from being swallowed by interiority, or tapering off into sameness. Joey Baron used to do the same thing on Mr. Frisell's early albums in this spirit, like "This Land," from 1994.It's clear, in any case, that Mr. Frisell has been thinking along these lines almost since the beginning. There's a reason that Jazz at Lincoln Center had him program a series called "Roots of Americana" for its coming season. The first concerts, in the Allen Room on Sept. 20 and 21, will include the singer, banjoist and fiddler Sam Amidon; the mezzo-soprano Alicia Hall Moran; and her husband, the pianist Jason Moran. Their repertory will feature a kind of proto-Americana: music by the 18th-century choral composer William Billings, as well as by Stephen Foster and Charles Ives.Frisell-ologists will recall that his 1992 album, "Have a Little Faith," included themes by Foster, Ives, Aaron Copland and John Philip Sousa. So it might seem as if he were coming full circle here, to some degree.As it happens, Mr. Frisell is due to appear on Sunday at the Montreal Jazz Festival, in collaboration with Mr. Moran and the venerable saxophonist and flutist Charles Lloyd. Mr. Frisell has recalled that his first encounter with live jazz was seeing Mr. Lloyd in concert in 1968 — just a few years before Mr. Lloyd withdrew from the scene, finding sobriety and spiritual clarity in Big Sur. He and Mr. Frisell, having admired some of the same vistas, will have plenty to talk about.
The Metropolitan Opera House has been justly acclaimed for its excellent acoustics. And not just in the choice seats. Many opera buffs assert that the best seats in the house are the most affordable ones: up in the balcony and family circle.A small number of opera houses and concert halls around the world have introduced sound enhancement systems, sometimes openly, sometimes stealthily. But the Met is and always will be an amplification-free zone, the company maintains, a place where opera can be experienced the traditional way — with natural sound.Yet, when Willy Decker's boldly modern production of Verdi's "Traviata" returned to the Met in March, why was the soprano Diana Damrau, singing Violetta, wearing what looked suspiciously like the kind of body microphone that has been used for decades in amplified Broadway shows?Attendees at the Met may not have noticed it. I didn't. But a photograph taken during the "Traviata" dress rehearsal by Sara Krulwich of The New York Times clearly shows a wire running up Ms. Damrau's back, from the top edge of her dress right into her hair. In this revealing photo Ms. Damrau looks like she could be appearing on Broadway in "Violetta, the Musical." Ms. Krulwich, who has been photographing Met productions for more than 20 years, had never noticed a singer with a body microphone, including in her close-up camera images. Nor had I ever seen such a thing from the excellent seat I usually occupy.When I first made inquiries at the Met's press office I encountered some confusion about the matter. An explanation soon came from Peter Gelb, the company's general manager, who also spoke at length with me during a recent phone interview.In certain productions during certain scenes singers are sometimes positioned in places on the Met's large stage where their voices cannot be picked up by the network of microphones used for radio and for the HD broadcasts that have become so popular in recent years. In these instances a singer will wear a body microphone, which carries the singer's voice to the control panel for the broadcast, but not, Mr. Gelb insisted, into the house.Mr. Decker's production of "La Traviata" is dominated by a set with a high curved wall that extends well into the rear of the stage (upstage in theater lingo). So during some scenes the soprano singing Violetta is quite far from the radio microphones, which are typically placed downstage near the rim of the orchestra pit, on the sides of the proscenium and above the stage. Using a body microphone is the only way, Mr. Gelb said, to make Violetta audible, with proper balances, to the broadcast audience.That's the explanation and, assuming this is the whole story, it seems reasonable.Still, this practice takes sound design for an opera broadcast to a new dimension. Those who want to see if they can notice these body microphones have an opportunity on Sunday afternoon when PBS continues its Great Performances at the Met series with Berlioz's "Troyens," a broadcast of the production directed by Francesca Zambello, starting at noon in most locations (12:30 p.m. in New York). The series concludes on Sept. 1 with Handel's "Giulio Cesare."The sight of an opera singer wearing a body microphone is enough to cause consternation among many opera-lovers. Mr. Gelb described the practice as a pragmatic necessity at a time when the Met is doing more broadcasts than ever. He acknowledged that the practice, rare before the advent of HD broadcasts, had become more common, though only five productions (out of 27) in the past season involved body microphones during certain scenes, he said.For example, in Bartlett Sher's 2012 production of Donizetti's "Elisir d'Amore," which returned this season, when Dr. Dulcamara first steps from his wagon to sing about the wonders of his miracle elixir, a large crowd of choristers stand downstage facing him, their backs to the audience. The hubbub from the crowd does not cover Dulcamara's voice in the house, but it does drown him out for broadcast listeners. So during that scene, Mr. Gelb said, the singer wears a microphone on broadcast day.And in Bizet's "Carmen," in Richard Eyre's production, also seen this season, during the scene at Lillas Pastia's tavern when the women start dancing, the stomping and shuffling would drown out Carmen on a broadcast. So the mezzo-soprano singing the role must wear a body microphone during that scene, and only that scene, Mr. Gelb said. Carmen's voice comes through fine on its own in the house.Mr. Gelb said that the Met generally tried to avoid using body microphones. For one thing, "singers don't like being impeded by hardware," he explained. "On the other hand, singers like being heard properly. So during the broadcast they will wear them, sometimes taped to a leg, if required."Of course, we have to figure out a clever way to camouflage them, though."There was obviously a slipup in the camouflaging when Ms. Damrau's wire was exposed during "Traviata."
Macklemore & Ryan Lewis are one of the hottest acts on pop radio these days, having scored No. 1 hits with the lighthearted novelty song "Thrift Shop" and its bouncy follow-up "Can't Hold Us."That is no small feat for a rap duo from Seattle without a major-label contract, but their single "Same Love" has the potential to be groundbreaking in a different way: it is the first song to explicitly embrace and promote gay marriage that has made it into the Top 40, gay-rights advocates and radio executives said."The fact that a song solely dedicated to the message of marriage equality is climbing the charts and quickly becoming a popular song across the country is a big deal," said Charlie Joughin, a spokesman for the Human Rights Campaign, the largest gay rights organization. "It's indicative of a changing attitude."Radio programmers say "Same Love" seems to have captured the nation's mood, reflecting growing support among young adults for gay marriage in polling. It also hit the charts in February, just as several states began taking up the issue and the Supreme Court was considering challenges to the federal Defense of Marriage Act and to California's ban on same-sex marriage.On Wednesday, the same day the Supreme Court handed historic victories to same-sex couples in both cases, "Same Love" rose to No. 28 on the Billboard Hot 100 chart, up from No. 65 three weeks ago. On the strength of online streaming more than airplay, the song was No. 5 on the Rap Songs chart, where lyrics in support of gay rights are almost unheard-of. Sales of the single surged 23 percent last week from the previous week to a total of more than 788,000 copies, and views of the single's video on YouTube had approached 53 million by Sunday.Several radio programmers say surveys of listeners predict the song will continue to rise. "It's been phenomenal," said Tom Poleman, the president for national programming at Clear Channel Media and Entertainment, which operates 850 stations. "Everything we are seeing shows it's going to be another monster hit for them."Support for gay rights is certainly not a new phenomenon in pop music. Frank Ocean, a singer in the hip-hop collective Odd Future, broke down barriers in R&B last year when he released "Channel Orange," an album with songs about his love for a man. Lady Gaga's "Born This Way" was a chart-topping song in 2011 that generally affirmed acceptance of homosexuality, and artists like Katy Perry, Fun and Kacey Musgraves have made support for gay rights part of their public personas.Going farther back, Melissa Etheridge, who is openly gay, scored Top 10 hits in the 1990s with songs about her lesbian relationships, "Come to My Window" and "I'm the Only One."But Macklemore has offered up an overtly political message in favor of gay marriage from the point of view of a straight man. "This is a song that has the most unequivocal pro-equality message to ever be expressed in a major single, and it's really reached a wide range of audiences," said Rich Ferraro, a spokesman for GLAAD, a gay-right organization that tracks media.In the song, Macklemore takes other rappers to task for using gay slurs, ties abusive language to bullying of gay teenagers and mocks religious leaders for opposing gay marriage. He states plainly where he stands on the marriage question: "No freedom till we're equal/ Damn right I support it." Then Mary Lambert, an openly lesbian singer, delivers a stirring chorus over Mr. Lewis's lush piano. "I can't change even if I tried," she sings, and "My love/ My Love/ My Love/ She keeps me warm/ She keeps me warm."In a telephone interview, Macklemore said he composed the rap in March 2012 after reading a news article about a teenager who committed suicide after being bullied. He said he thought the epithets routinely heard in rap music might be partly to blame, and that denying gay adults the right to marry might also contribute to despair among gay teenagers. He also wanted to write a song, he said, to support his two gay uncles and his gay godfather in Seattle, all of whom are in committed relationships."I just wanted to hold myself accountable and hold hip-hop accountable and bring up an issue that was being pushed under the rug," he said.From the start, the duo intended "Same Love" to have a political impact. Released as a single in July 2012, they offered it as a theme song to groups working to pass Referendum 74, which legalized same-sex marriage in Washington State. Some profits from the single were donated to the advocacy group Washington United for Marriage. In October, Macklemore and Mr. Lewis released a video for the song with a rosy depiction of a gay marriage that political organizers said helped influenced the vote.
It is a notoriously difficult song to sing, a musical high-wire act, with an octave-and-a-half range and a devilishly spaced melody. You usually sing it a cappella in a stadium where the echo hits your ear a half-beat behind the melody, and the lyrics are so familiar and fraught with meaning that every fan in the stands can hear the slightest mistake or botched note.Yet the singers who step out on the baseball field to deliver the "The Star-Spangled Banner" say singing it can be a sublime experience, so much so that most of them perform it free, either to fulfill a childhood dream or pay respect to country and team. It can also further their careers. Sometimes the motive is all three desires."It's certainly nerve-racking," said David Cook, the pop singer and "American Idol" winner who will sing the anthem on the Fourth of July in Kansas City, Mo., just before the Royals take on the Cleveland Indians. "For every person who wants to talk about Whitney Houston killing it years ago, 10 people want to talk about Roseanne Barr butchering it, so there is always that fear that 'I better not forget the words to this song.' "Mr. Cook is one of the musicians who will sing the anthem before 15 Major League Baseball games on the nation's birthday, a ritual combining patriotism with sport, and democratic ideals with speeding pitches and swinging bats.It is a ritual that has been resistant to change and hostile to parody. José Feliciano was booed at the 1968 World Series when he offered his soft-rock version of the anthem, the melody gently altered over his rhythm guitar. Ms. Barr was roundly condemned for belting the song out of tune for comic effect, at a Padres game in 1990.Each team handles the booking of the anthem singers differently. Some, like the Mets, hold open auditions in the off-season to give amateurs a chance to try out. Many recruit singers from the scores of aspiring pop stars who send them demo recordings.Teams like to go for a mix of pop stars, military bands, school vocal groups and community choirs, some of which must buy batches of tickets for the opportunity to sing, said Charles Steinberg, a veteran baseball marketing executive. "You span the spectrum, from talent-laden amateurs to young professionals to some of the greatest performers in modern American music," he said.The Yankees, ever traditionalists, still use the opera star Robert Merrill's venerable recording for many games. When the team does invite a singer to perform, it favors hiring Broadway stars with impeccable technique, a marketing strategy that dovetails with the interests of the theater district. Yankees officials insist on a hidebound, 90-second rendition with no accompaniment."It isn't just a random talent show," said Deborah A. Tymon, the Yankees' senior vice president for marketing.Typical of the singers at Yankee Stadium is Constantine Maroulis, a Brooklyn-born Broadway performer who also happens to be a lifelong Yankees fan. On opening day this year, Mr. Maroulis, who most recently appeared in "Rock of Ages" and "Jekyll & Hyde," stepped to the microphone a moment after a solemn memorial for victims of the Newtown massacre and gave a virtuosic rendition of the anthem that seemed to take flight."The Yankees don't use a monitor, so you really have to trust yourself," Mr. Maroulis said. "I heard the crowd go crazy when I started hitting the big notes."Mr. Cook, too, said singing in Kauffman Stadium in Kansas City, Mo., was a labor of love for him. Having grown up in Blue Springs, Mo., he has rooted for the Royals his whole life, even though they haven't won a World Series since 1985. He worked at the stadium as a waiter in high school and college, and his list of heroes include the pitcher Bret Saberhagen, the third baseman George Brett, and Buck O'Neil, the manager of the Kansas City Monarchs in the Negro leagues. "I'm not ashamed to admit that I have some dirt from the field somewhere in my house," Mr. Cook said.
Opera's New Face: Last year, The Times spoke to the director Chen Shi-Zheng on his reinterpretation of the traditional Beijing Opera. His latest work, "Monkey: Journey to the West," will open in New York this month.JIANHU, China — WHEN Chen Shi-Zheng began rehearsals with the two actors he had chosen to play the lead in "Monkey: Journey to the West," a pop-inflected international opera with a Chinese cast that opens the Lincoln Center Festival , he knew he had to break them of their past training.The Monkey King, the mythical animal warrior in Chinese classical literature, is often portrayed as a prankster. But Mr. Chen, a veteran Chinese-born stage and film director living in New York, saw Monkey as a fighter who could be vicious and ill-tempered. That meant helping the actors understand the character's motivations and mind-set — something they had never done before when they played Monkey in more traditional Peking opera productions."The Chinese Monkey is very cute, even when he's angry," one of the actors, 32-year-old Wang Lu, said during a banquet after one of the final rehearsals in this city in eastern China. "This one has Western characteristics. He's naughty. He's a bad child. It took me a while to adjust."Bridging Chinese and Western artistic approaches is a continuing challenge for Mr. Chen, whose first appearance at the Lincoln Center Festival, in 1999, was after a major run-in with Shanghai officials who objected to his experimental approach to "The Peony Pavilion," a kunqu opera, a traditional form of Chinese theater. Most recently his adventurous 2012 production of another well-known opera, "Farewell My Concubine," had several previews in Beijing but never officially opened. (It included video, choreographed fight scenes and a live horse onstage.)Many in the Peking opera establishment condemned his take on "Farewell," and China Daily, an official English-language newspaper, ran a long article on the controversy with the headline "Innovation or Violation?""I still haven't had anything produced for the public in China," Mr. Chen said with a smile. "I hope one day that will change."Instead, his productions play the international festival circuit. After its 2007 debut at the Manchester International Festival and runs in Paris, London and at the Spoleto Festival U.S.A., "Monkey" begins performances at Lincoln Center on Saturday.Mr. Chen collaborated on the music and design with Damon Albarn, the frontman for the bands Blur and Gorillaz, and Jamie Hewlett, the animator of Gorillaz. Mr. Chen wrote the lyrics, which are in Mandarin. With 27 performances at Lincoln Center, "Monkey" will get the longest festival run ever, a sign of faith and also a risk on the part of festival organizers.The show takes as its starting point a Chinese fable based on the story of Xuanzang, the monk who made an epic overland journey to India to bring back venerated Buddhist texts. "Of all the Chinese classics, this is the funniest," Mr. Chen said. "There's a certain kind of freedom and exuberance."The 41-member cast is a mix of Chinese acrobats, martial artists and Peking opera actors and singers. Only nine are returning from the show's original run, and most of the acrobats are new. Twenty of them come from the Jiangsu Yancheng Acrobatic Company, based in the nearby city of Yancheng.For centuries, this region was known for producing some of China's most talented acrobats. But there is little money to be made these days doing acrobatics in China, so the tradition is dying, and circus companies have shrunk. Mr. Chen "was looking for an acrobatic troupe with influence and power for this performance," said Wu Qikai, head of the Yancheng troupe, which was founded in 1954. "We have that reputation in China."In recasting principal roles, Mr. Chen was faced with finding performers flexible enough to shed aspects of their Chinese opera training, including the emphasis on emulating the styles of past great performances. After one run-through at an enormous new cultural center in this rural swath of Jiangsu Province, he gathered the main actors and delivered a short lecture in which he urged them to make their performances more natural.Li Li, 25, who plays the monk, said in an interview that her Peking opera training had not taught her how to embrace the kind of acting that Mr. Chen sought.In Peking opera, "I'm copying what the previous generation has left for us," she said. "The way I'm judged is by the standard set by previous performers. This time, the previous generation didn't help me." The work "took me out of my comfort zone," she added. "The director created a new language."This new production of "Monkey" is the first work Mr. Chen has put together in China since the short-lived "Farewell My Concubine." He was hired in late 2011 to direct a version of that story as, in essence, dinner theater at an upscale Beijing hotel owned by the Reignwood Group. Yan Bin, the Thai-Chinese founder of Reignwood, is a fan of both Chinese and Western opera.Looking past "Monkey," Mr. Chen already has another opera in the works that he is aiming for next year's Lincoln Center Festival — and it once again draws on a well-known Chinese tale, in this case "Legend of the White Snake." Mr. Chen plans to include video and other experimental elements. The main investors are Chinese this time, but there are still no plans for it to be produced in China.
Great Jones Street is a blip on the map of Manhattan, but it has great personal resonance for the Miser, who first laid eyes on the future Ms. Miser there in the waning days of the 20th century.The tiny street was also home to Fez Under Time Cafe, which, lamentably, vacated its spot at the corner of Lafayette in 2005 after a good run. Truth be told, the cutting-edge contemporary rock and pop the Miser usually saw there never quite did justice to the mysterious, Moroccan-themed ambience of the place.This Saturday you can get a taste of genuine Arab culture when the 11th Annual Arab-American and North African Cultural Street Festival transforms that very block of Great Jones into a multicultural souk of music, food and crafts, representing traditions from Tunisia and Morocco to Syria and Jordan. Acts slated to perform include DJ Ibrahim, Nujoom Dabkeh Troupe and the Algerian singer Cheb Yassin, who performs rai, a form of folk music. Admission to the festival, organized by the Network of Arab American Professionals, is free.You can experience music and dance from another side of Africa earlier on Saturday, when the Ethiopian dancer Melaku Belay (Alastair Macaulay called him "a happily superlative artist" in a 2011 review in The Times) takes the stage alongside the musicians and dancers of Fendika for a free concert at David Rubenstein Atrium in Lincoln Center. The group, as adept with the centuries-old azmari tradition as they are with current trends, will also participate in a Q. and A. as part of the atrium's Meet the Artist Saturday series.Had he not written a word, Thomas Kyd would still be remembered as a close associate of the Elizabethan playwright Christopher Marlowe, with whom Kyd lived for a time and betrayed, probably under torture, after being arrested on heresy charges. Fortunately for Kyd, posterity also has his play "The Spanish Tragedy," a work some scholars consider a forerunner of "Hamlet," influencing both contemporaries like Ben Jonson and moderns like T. S. Eliot.On Saturday the Hudson Park Library will host an open reading of "The Spanish Tragedy," organized by the New York Shakespeare Reading Group. Bring your own copy of the play, along with snacks to share and $1 to contribute to the group's Web site.
The Spirit of New York was making good time down the Hudson on a recent evening, approaching the southern tip of Manhattan, when the members of BWB emerged from below deck to a full-throated cheer. It was the first installment of the current Smooth Cruise season, and the applause kept going as BWB — a collaboration of the guitarist Norman Brown, the saxophonist Kirk Whalum and the trumpeter Rick Braun — played a snippet of "Milestones," by Miles Davis, and then swerved into Michael Jackson's " Billie Jean ."Looking over the neatly dressed, enthusiastic and racially diverse crowd, a casual observer could reasonably have concluded that times are still flush for smooth jazz. But from an informed position, the scene was yet more proof of the music's entrenchment in post-shock survival mode. Since the great radio purges of 2008 and 2009, when stations across the country abandoned the format, smooth jazz has been not just maligned but also marginalized — stripped of its main distribution channel just as the record business was falling to pieces. The only recourse for its musicians and fans has been to adapt, regrouping now as a subculture, often literally at sea.Perhaps less expectedly, those practical adjustments have begun to yield aesthetic developments, as seen in a spate of recent albums, notably "Human Nature" (Heads Up International), by BWB; "The Beat" (Concord), by the saxophonist Boney James; and especially "Summer Horns" (Concord), featuring Dave Koz and three fellow saxophonists, each known as a solo artist.These albums, which all have tracks on Billboard's Smooth Jazz Songs chart, make an emphatic point of collaboration, potentially appealing to multiple fan bases. They all exploit some form of nostalgia, expertly reformulated for contemporary palates. And they all feature musicianship by real-life studio aces, creating a tight but organic sound that feels easily transferable to live performance. If you were a smooth-jazz veteran looking to cover your bases at an uncertain time, you'd be making albums like these: meticulous but breezy, openhearted but not sentimental, smart but not too smart. It's as if everyone involved had cracked some kind of code.Twenty years ago, of course, smooth jazz wasn't a code to be cracked so much as a wave to be caught. Like most species of pop, it felt ubiquitous and maybe a little insidious, asking nothing more (or less) of you than surrender. During the summer of 1993, Kenny G had a Top 40 single, his second such hit from the inescapable album "Breathless." Smooth jazz had an enviable infrastructure then; even a small American city was likely to have a dedicated radio station.What it didn't have was cachet, critical regard or any trace of cool. (Kenny G has recently taken pains to show that he's in on the joke.)  This was a music forged by market considerations, less a coherent genre than a commercial format. Its native habitats were the office cubicle, the minivan and the five-day forecast. "The Weather Channel Presents: The Best of Smooth Jazz" was a compilation album that actually saw release, in 2007; it was so successful that a sequel appeared the following year. Which was just when the ground began to buckle."Radio went away because some corporate knucklehead said, 'O.K., this isn't working, because we need to make more money,' " Mr. Braun said on the Spirit of New York before BWB's set, expressing a point of view widely shared among his fellow artists. "And they changed it, and now they're making less money. But we're lucky because our audience is basically an older, affluent audience. And the audience is still there."True enough, but you'd have to know where to look. The Smooth Jazz Cruise — not the Lower Manhattan sunset jaunt but a weeklong experience on the Holland America Line — has been profitable since its maiden voyage not quite a decade ago. (The 2014 edition has been sold out for months.) "When we first started the cruise," said Michael Lazaroff, the executive director of Entertainment Cruise Productions, "radio and print were the infrastructure on which we relied.""Whereas now," he said, "you could suggest that our cruise is one of the pillars of the infrastructure."Mr. Koz has a cruise of his own, which was founded by Mr. Lazaroff, and now competes for a similar talent pool and target demographic. There are also some land-based institutions, like the Thornton Winery Champagne Jazz Series, in Temecula, Calif., which is celebrating its 25th anniversary this year.Still, a thriving niche market isn't quite the same thing as a robustly healthy ecosystem. In its opening week, "Human Nature," the BWB album, sold all of 3,000 copies, according to Nielsen SoundScan. This was enough for a No. 4 spot on Billboard's Jazz Albums chart, directly behind Mr. Koz. But unlike jazz proper, which has long been grimly accustomed to paltry figures, smooth jazz has no reassuring claim to cultural value. It's no wonder some of its pioneers and progenitors have distanced themselves from the style.
The Original Music Workshop, a multidisciplinary arts organization that is building a modern performance and rehearsal facility in Williamsburg, Brooklyn, is presenting concerts in its unfinished space and elsewhere in town. This week, the workshop is collaborating with the River to River Festival to produce Ex-Situ, a series of three site-specific events.On Sunday evening, the Norwegian vocalist and composer Maja SK Ratkje will tailor her performance to the contours of Cannon's Walk at the South Street Seaport. On Tuesday night, the violinists Cornelius Dufallo and Amy Kauffman are featured in "The Violin," a 45-minute work by the composer Anna Clyne and the visual artist Josh Dorman, at Federal Hall. And on Thursday night, the pianist Hauschka, the percussionist Samuli Kosminen and the former Kronos Quartet cellist Jeffrey Zeigler introduce their new trio at Pier 15. (5 p.m. Sunday, 7 p.m. Tuesday, 7:45 p.m. Thursday, rivertorivernyc.com; free.)
The New World Mall in Flushing, Queens, is a busy place. Customers pass through its chrome and glass doors in a steady stream that can swell to a torrent, then shop its dozens of boutiques or cruise the aisles at J-Mart, a huge supermarket that, like the businesses around it, caters primarily to Chinese-Americans from Flushing, Elmhurst and Long Island."This is a good place for us — lots of people," said Zoe Zhang, a vice president of China Express Agency, a marketing company that has promoted numerous Chinese cultural events in the United States. She was standing near the mall's escalators on a recent Saturday afternoon and directing a team of Mandarin speakers recruited from local universities as they pushed Lincoln Center Festival's centerpiece production, "Monkey: Journey to the West."Meanwhile, in neighborhoods like Williamsburg, Brooklyn, and the Lower East Side of Manhattan, Cornerstone, a music marketing and branding company, was busy pushing "Monkey" fliers on a completely different population: indie music enthusiasts.Both companies were hired by the Lincoln Center Festival in an unusual multipronged campaign for "Monkey," a production based on a classic Chinese tale with music and visuals by the creators of the virtual band Gorillaz. Its 27 performances run the entire length of the festival, through July 28, at the David H. Koch Theater.The campaign is a departure for Lincoln Center, whose promotional efforts tend toward the tried and true, but "Monkey" offers unusual opportunities. It takes as its source material a traditional story as familiar to the Chinese as "The Odyssey" is to Western audiences, but the director, Chen Shi-Zheng, has modernized it with a vengeance.Working with Damon Albarn and Jamie Hewlett, the creators of Gorillaz, he has wrought a Chinese rock opera in Mandarin with mythic themes and a razzle-dazzle staging that incorporates animated sequences, kung-fu fighters, acrobats and contortionists. It has a little something for everybody, in other words, and the festival is selling it that way.Ticket prices, for one thing, have a big spread, starting at a modest $25 and topping out at $250. At the moment, a spokeswoman for Lincoln Center said, ticket sales are "on track to make our goal." She declined to explain what the goal was, but expectations are high, since the show was a big hit in Paris and in England (London and Manchester) and at the 2008 Spoleto Festival USA in Charleston, S.C.To reach the Chinese media, here and abroad, Lincoln Center hired Wei Zhou, a publicist in Basking Ridge, N.J., to work local Chinese newspapers, television and radio, and the main television networks and news agencies in China. In similar fashion, Cornerstone was hired to reach a younger, culturally adventurous audience, starting with the Gorillaz fan base, for whom this show is not necessarily an easy sell. "Musically it's totally different," said Jon Cohen, a partner with Rob Stone, the company's founder. "It takes place in a venue and a neighborhood that core fans do not know. They will have to have a reason to go to Lincoln Center."At the mall, Ms. Zhang's team passed out "Monkey" fliers and cardboard fans, talked up the show and directed traffic to an information and ticketing table at the bottom of the down escalator. The canvassing was relentless. Before long, even babies in strollers were clutching promotional materials. Some shoppers, after quizzing the workers at the ticketing table, reached for their credit cards.Lily Chow, buying tickets for her husband and two sons, said that she had seen many productions of "Journey to the West," starting with a famous television series that Chinese Central Television broadcast in the 1970s. "I expect this one to be more like a Broadway musical," she said.Lapwah Yan, a Flushing resident, picked up a pair of tickets that she had reserved though the China Express Web site. "This combination of Western music and the Chinese story," she said. "I think that's interesting."Ms. Zhang, a native of Shanghai who now lives in Elmhurst, has also brought the "Monkey" message far beyond the mall. She has given presentations at community centers, Chinese-owned businesses and dance schools. Since the martial-art style known as monkey kung fu, or monkey fist, takes its inspiration from the hero of "Journey to the West," Ms. Zhang has made appearances at kung-fu studios and plans to attend summer enrichment classes for Chinese students.Ms. Zhou, the publicist, said: "Chinese parents would like their children to go. They want to encourage them to practice the language. Like my daughter. She doesn't speak to me in Chinese. Also for the grandparents, who do not speak English — finally they can relax and enjoy the whole thing."While Ms. Zhang and her team were working the mall, Cornerstone's field workers were spreading out across neighborhoods identified as "retail and lifestyle sites." Earlier, they had hit Great GoogaMooga, the food and music festival in Prospect Park, Brooklyn, and AnimeNext, an annual festival in Somerset, N.J.YouTube, Twitter and Tumbler loom large in Cornerstone's strategy, as well as clued-in lifestyle blogs like Flavorpill, Bullett and Brooklyn Vegan. To rope in the indie-music crowd, they have worked with Web sites like Oh My Rockness and Consequence of Sound, as well as The Fader, the indie-music and culture magazine started by Mr. Stone and Mr. Cohen.On a sticky night in late June, a team from Cornerstone emerged from the subway at 68th Street and Lexington Avenue. The assignment: work the line waiting to get into a Comedy Central show, part of SummerStage in Central Park.Unexpectedly, a swarm of high school students in caps and gowns began gathering for a graduation ceremony at Hunter College. Taking advantage of this bonanza, the team worked the crowd for a while, then headed to the park. The comedy audience, wilting in the heat, eagerly accepted "Monkey" fans and, with plenty of time on their hands, studied the fliers.A man reading over her shoulder said, "I would totally see that."The woman looked more closely at the flyer. "It's, like, where the philharmonic is," she said. "It's legit."
Only three rock bands had albums that sold more than one million last year — the Black Keys, Mumford & Sons and a hard-rock outfit from Wisconsin with far less name recognition: Skillet.What makes Skillet unusual is not just that its sales numbers rival two of the biggest rock acts on the American charts, but also that this quartet is an unabashedly Christian band that has won over mainstream rock aficionados without alienating its religious fans."That is a little bit of a trick," said John Cooper, the 38-year-old frontman, bassist and songwriter. "I tend to write songs I believe in, that get my message across in the best way possible and leave it as nonthreatening as possible."Last week Skillet's most recent release, "Rise," a concept album about a teenager coming to terms with a violent world, made its debut at No. 4 on the Billboard 200 chart and No. 1 on the Top Rock Albums chart. And this comes after the group's last album in 2009, "Awake," reached No. 2.Skillet's success seems to signal a growing acceptance of Christian rock at a time when rock is generally declining in cultural importance. While it is not unusual for Christian acts to score an occasional hit on mainstream radio, Skillet has become a regular presence there, emerging as a leader among Christian bands that have crossover appeal, among them Thousand Foot Krutch, P.O.D., Flyleaf and Switchfoot.Mr. Cooper composes squarely in the heavy-metal vein and sings in an angry yet melodic rasp, recalling 1990s Nu Metal bands. His lyrics touch on Christian themes — struggle, salvation, a relationship with a heroic savior — but seldom mention Jesus. He makes no open overtures to win converts.One single from the new album, "Sick of It," has been getting heavy airplay on mainstream rock stations and has climbed Billboard's Active Rock airplay chart to No. 12. Another Skillet single, "American Noise," is steadily moving up the Christian Songs chart."Skillet's done a really good job of straddling that line, where they are pulling from both the Christians and the mainstream rock crowd," said Jeff Cage, program director of the Edge, a rock radio station in Little Rock, Ark. "Skillet is not a Christian band that is overly preachy, by any means. You'd have to dig into their lyrics to even find out they are a Christian band."Though some detractors have complained that Skillet does not proselytize enough, Christian rock stations, like KVRK in Dallas, still consider the band to be one of their own. "They are one of our core bands, and they have been for many, many years," said the station's music director, Chris Goodwin. "The power of their music breaks down any kind of barrier people might have."Zach Kelm, Skillet's manager, attributed the band's success to relentless touring that includes both mainstream rock festivals and Christian music events. This week it will appear on Conan O'Brien's show, play a mainstream festival in Quebec City supporting Guns 'n' Roses, then travel to Wisconsin for the Christian Lifest. Later in the year it will tour with mainstream acts like Shinedown and Nickelback.But Skillet has also been canny about using viral marketing — online contests and events pegged to the release of singles and videos — to motivate fans, who call themselves Panheads, to spread word about the album. The band has four million followers on Facebook.Rather than simply release a single to radio in advance of the album, the band rolled out four singles on iTunes between early April and mid-June and tied those releases to animated videos published online by rock magazines like Revolver and Guitar World."We felt, 'They have this fan base — let's give them a real taste of the album, not just an appetizer,' " said Julie Greenwald, chairwoman of Atlantic Records, the group's label.So far, critical acclaim has eluded Skillet; it remains a band with a big and loyal following but a low profile in popular culture."They are not necessarily the critics' darling," Ms. Greenwald said. "When you are not the critics' darling, it's hard to get media attention, so we just go right to the consumers."The band also invited fans to contribute images to a video for the song "Sick of It" by sending Instagram pictures of themselves holding signs spelling out what made them angry (hopelessness, peer pressure, vanity, ignorance, hate, depression, bullying, apathy). Then Skillet pieced together a music video using the images and released that on YouTube.Despite several lineup changes, the band has had a steady climb since it was formed in Memphis and released its self-titled debut album in 1996. The core of the group is Mr. Cooper and his wife, Korey Cooper, who plays keyboards. The other current members are the drummer Jen Ledger and the lead guitarist Seth Morrison.Mr. Cooper grew up in a Baptist family in Memphis, where he was forbidden to listen to rock music — "Drums were considered evil," he recalled — but became fascinated with metal after hearing Metallica and Motley Crue at school.For years Skillet won fans only in Christian circles. Then, in 2006, its album "Comatose" spun off the single "Whispers in the Dark," which crossed over to rock radio. It has since had nine songs on Billboard's rock chart, including the hits "Monster" and "Awake and Alive."Mr. Cooper said that "Rise," inspired partly by school shootings and terrorist bombings, is about "a typical American teenager coming into adulthood and faced with how tragic and horrifying the world can be," he said.By purposely keeping his approach understated, Mr. Cooper finds that many secular-minded rock fans feel that the band's messages are as moving as those of darker, more violent groups. "I get a lot of people at our concerts who say Skillet and Slipknot are their favorite bands," he said.Indeed, some of the songs on the album can be interpreted as about a couple facing adversity together, but also can be read as a teenager turning to God for comfort and spiritual salvation. A good example of this ambiguity is the chorus of the song "Salvation":I feel you keeping me aliveYou are my salvationTouch you, taste you, feel you hereYou are my salvation"I like that it can be interpreted in different ways," Mr. Cooper said. "If it was very clearly about Jesus, they might not get what we are saying."
It's inevitable that we'll have to get to a definition of "ratchet," so let's dispense with it quickly. To act ratchet is to act foolish, or trashy, to behave in a way that makes others shield their eyes. It is the opposite of decorous. There are plenty of places one can act ratchet — in the club, in the bedroom — but it's always about behavior that's dubious at best, that makes people point fingers in slack-jawed astonishment and discomfort.Ratchet is exactly where Ty Dolla Sign lives, and happily at that. (There is ratchet music, too, the dominant sound of Los Angeles hip-hop. That's also a place he lives. More on that later.) On his fantastic new mixtape "Beach House 2" — available for download at datpiff.com and livemixtapes.com — is a song called "Ratchet in My Benz," a filthy number about cycles of deception and mistrust, a love song for these dubious times. He opens it creepily:She got his name tatted on herShe texting me like, 'Babe, come over'I lied and said I'm out of townI'm with my other bitch right nowAvert your eyes. It's ratchet everywhere, especially, by the time the chorus comes around, in Ty Dolla Sign's back seat."Ratchet in My Benz" is a lewd song, but also a lustrously beautiful one, full of dreamscape synthesizers and slow-rolling drums, like a sunrise on a robot-occupied planet. Ty Dolla Sign is a deadpan singer, barely impressed by the feats of seduction that make up the whole of his interest set, but via vocal effects he sounds both heroic and sensual.This is a trick he pulls off steadily through this often mesmerizing mixtape, one of the most arresting and alluring-sounding releases of the year. The lyrics are spiteful and raw, and sometimes downright unpleasant. They're also almost comically simple, emphasizing plain rhyme schemes and repetition.But Ty Dolla Sign's imagination is in the arrangements — he does a good deal of the production himself — which are lush and erotic. He favors slow, thick beats that sound like caresses, sometimes with a motor gunning underneath, as on "I Bet," and sometimes, as on "Get It How I Live" and "Float," preferring unhurried bliss. On "1st Night," a brief flash of vocals explode in a Zapp-esque digital spray. (Ty Dolla Sign's father was a member of the funk band Lakeside.)Throughout, there are echoes of 1970s porn-funk and 1980s quiet storm R&B, and there's also a surprising amount of violin on the album — a cheap play for seriousness, but also effective — presumably contributed by Peter Lee Johnson, a violinist who has a series of hip-hop and R&B covers on YouTube and a producer who worked on some songs here.What Ty Dolla Sign happily exploits is the increasingly thin line between hip-hop and R&B that's been blurred over the years by artists like T-Pain, R. Kelly and Drake. He's not an ostentatious singer — often his lyrics sound like recitations, probably read off a smartphone notepad — but he's got calm swagger. With his single-minded commitment to singing about ratchet love, he's like The-Dream without the emotional baggage or the conscience. As a songwriter The-Dream has written convincing songs for female singers, and for himself, as well as moving songs about vulnerability and heartbreak, but Ty Dolla Sign isn't concerned with anything outside the reach of his own ego."Girl, I never made you any promises/Never said that we would be monogamous," he sings on "These Hoes." On "1st Night," he's a smooth abettor: "Girl, be yourself/Ain't nothing wrong with being ratchet." Only "Float" approaches something like tenderness, but most of that comes courtesy of guest rapper Iamsu, who sounds like a teenager bumbling through love for the first time.Mostly, Ty Dolla Sign brings his guests into his frame of mind — the sinewy R&B singer Trey Songz sounds especially eager to get ratchet on "4 A Young (Remix)," and on one unprintably titled song, the Los Angeles rapper Jay 305 sounds like a hyper, addled Too Short. Wiz Khalifa, whose style is so lethargic it approaches existential sadness, appears here on two tracks: Ty Dolla Sign, who's been signed to Atlantic Records for some time, recently was brought under Wiz Khalifa's Taylor Gang imprint, which feels like a needless enforced cosign.Ty Dolla Sign is already well beyond the minor leagues. That was true on "My Cabana," his breakout hit last year, even though it was more numbing than most of "Whoop!," his excellent 2012 mixtape with the rapper Joe Moses, which was far more intriguing.That mixtape was produced by DJ Mustard, the auteur of ratchet music. It's the sound of Tyga's "Rack City," and any number of strip club anthems — icy, pulverizing, and with a hard swing.In many ways, DJ Mustard's production is antithetical to Ty Dolla Sign's relaxed cool, though the two have been working together for years. On "Beach House 2," DJ Mustard produced one of the standout songs, "Paranoid," about navigating two women in a club. ("Paranoid" also appears on "Ketchup," the strong recent mixtape by DJ Mustard.)I got 'em both the same damn red bottomsAnd bought 'em both the same damn fragranceBoth of my bitches drive Range RoversNone of my bitches can stay overEven over DJ Mustard's brittle metallic thump, Ty Dolla Sign sounds as genteel as early New Edition, though his subject matter is far sweatier. For DJ Mustard, ratchet is just a sound. For Ty Dolla Sign, it's more than that; it's a way of life.
Despite earlier fears of a rainstorm, the weather was clear and breezy, if muggy, on Wednesday night for the New York Philharmonic 's concert in Prospect Park, the "most beautiful park in these United States," in the effusive words of Marty Markowitz , the Brooklyn borough president, who addressed the estimated crowd of 17,000 people. Alan Gilbert, the Philharmonic's music director, conducted the program, which offered a majestic account of Dvorak's great Cello Concerto with Carter Brey , the orchestra's principal cello, as soloist, followed by an assured and stirring performance of Tchaikovsky's Fifth Symphony after intermission.In his welcoming comments before the concert, Matthew VanBesien, the Philharmonic's executive director, rightly touted the orchestra's history of presenting these popular free concerts in the parks, which have drawn a total audience of more than 14 million since 1965.There was a recent hitch in this record, however, when the early-summer parks tour was canceled in 2011. That September the Philharmonic joined the crossover tenor Andrea Bocelli for a concert in Central Park, and it later presented a free performance at Avery Fisher Hall of Mahler's "Resurrection" Symphony as a memorial to the Sept. 11, 2001, victims. To compensate for the added work on the schedule, the players were given time off in July, when the park concerts would have taken place.That was the explanation then from the Philharmonic. But responding to strong criticism, Mr. Gilbert sent an e-mail to The New York Times disassociating himself from the orchestra's decision and making "a personal promise" that those concerts would return.He kept that promise last summer. And Wednesday's performance was the first on a tour scheduled to take this program to parks in three more boroughs. The Philharmonic is also to present its brass players in a free indoor concert on Sunday afternoon at the College of Staten Island.In past tours the Philharmonic typically presented two programs in Central Park. This summer the second one is a special event, an All-Star Charity Concert on Saturday for Hurricane Sandy relief efforts. With Mariah Carey as a guest, the orchestra is to perform New York- and baseball-theme music, including classical works, in anticipation of the All-Star Game at Citi Field on Tuesday.The orchestra hopes the event will connect the Philharmonic to popular culture and to Major League Baseball as well as raise funds for a good cause. The orchestra will be compensated, however, for taking part. And technically, this is a cutback in that there will be only one, not two, full classical programs in Central Park this summer.Nonetheless, the audience at Prospect Park on Wednesday night appeared grateful, as usual, for the chance to hear the Philharmonic in a wonderful setting. The amplification is never going to be excellent for outdoor events that use a portable stage and sound system. Still, if balances were never quite right, the orchestra came through strongly.For all its popularity, the Dvorak concerto was a bold choice for an outdoor concert. Though the music is alive with full-bodied outbursts and dynamic episodes, whole stretches feature intimate playing from the cello soloist with light-textured orchestral scoring.To their credit, Mr. Brey and Mr. Gilbert did not pump up or exaggerate the music. If anything, they embraced the work's moments of tenderness and pensive lyricism and tried to draw listeners in.Mr. Brey's cello came through vividly. His playing was probing, supple and, when called for, brilliant. Mr. Gilbert gracefully shaped the wistful passage for a choir of woodwinds at the opening of the great slow movement. Mr. Brey brought dancing vitality to the rustic finale.Mr. Gilbert led a magisterial account of Tchaikovsky's Fifth Symphony. The fourth and final movement was especially fresh and bracing. He kept the tempo somewhat reined in, the better to make textures clear and bring narrative sweep to the shifts of mood, which culminated in breathless, exuberant playing of the symphony's thrilling final moments.Almost as soon as the performance ended, instead of an encore, there were fireworks, which the crowd lingered to enjoy.Before the concert, Mr. Gilbert, the son of two Philharmonic violinists, shared memories with the audience of attending concerts as a child in Central Park. He pronounced himself "as committed as ever" to this series, and is backing up that vow by conducting every orchestra concert this summer.
First, Steinway & Sons closed on the sale of its Beaux-Arts Manhattan building on West 57th Street, where the likes of Sergei Rachmaninoff and Vladimir Horowitz once practiced. Three days later, it announced that it was planning to sell the whole company to a private-equity firm that owns more than 15 other medium-size manufacturers, making everything from windshield wipers to sewing machines to coffins.For pianists who obsess about all things Steinway — is a brand-new Steinway as good as one from the 1920s, and are those made in Germany preferable to those made in New York? — the developments had the force of a one-two punch. Pianists cherish memories of the first time they set foot in the building and its famous basement, where generations of professional pianists have chosen the Steinways they played at concerts and recording sessions.They also worry that new owners could meddle with Steinway's time-honored and time-consuming manufacturing methods. Steinway spends almost a year building each grand piano, and pianists fret that an assembly line speedup at the company's two factories would spoil what they prize: the delicacy of a Steinway's touch, the colorations of its sound."There's concern any time there's a shift," the pianist Gary Graffman said. "There's no way of my knowing: will they take as much care with each piano as they have in the past?"It is a question that has reverberated through the music world since the $438 million deal for the company was announced last week. The offer, which came from the private equity firm Kohlberg & Company, would take Steinway private. It has been traded under the stock symbol LVB, for Ludwig van Beethoven, since Steinway went public in 1996.Steinway is now 13 days into a 45-day "go-shop" period, during which it can consider other bids, and at least one portfolio manager whose firm has a stake in Steinway has said the price is too low. Shares of Steinway closed at $36.18 on Friday, $1.18 above Kohlberg's $35-a-share offer.Kohlberg is "not contemplating any changes to any of the manufacturing operations," said a Kohlberg investment partner, Christopher W. Anderson, adding that there had been no discussion of closing or moving the factories in Astoria, Queens, and Hamburg, Germany. He would not comment on whether Steinway's top management would remain after the takeover. (Kohlberg's chairman, James A. Kohlberg, has been a director of The New York Times Company since 2008.)Beyond the balance sheet, Mr. Anderson, 38, has an interest in the company's products. "I grew up playing on a Steinway," he said in an interview this week: an upright that once belonged to his great-grandmother. And on Friday, he posted a letter online to Steinway's dealers in which he said one of Kohlberg's "main goals for Steinway" was to "preserve and support everything that makes a Steinway piano special." He also said that by going private, Steinway would be "free from the short-term financial constraints of publicly-traded companies" and would have more latitude to "plan and invest with a long-term perspective."The deal would give Steinway its fifth set of owners. In 1972, the Steinway family — descendants of the immigrant instrument maker who started the company in 1853 — sold it to CBS. That marriage eventually soured, and in the 1980s, Steinway was sold to an investment group from Boston. Steinway changed hands again in the 1990s, when it was bought by what was then Selmer Industries, a band-instrument manufacturer with plants in the Midwest and South. The combined company was led by two investment bankers who had controlled Selmer, Kyle R. Kirkland and Dana D. Messina.Mr. Messina served as chief executive until 2011, stepping down after he and John M. Stoner Jr., the president of the band-instrument division, made a bid to buy everything but the company's piano operations. Steinway began a review of strategic alternatives that ended last December, when it turned down the Stoner-Messina offer and said the company was not for sale. Then came the overture from Kohlberg.Under Mr. Messina's replacement — Michael T. Sweeney, a former president of Starbucks in Britain who is chairman of the holding company for The Minneapolis Star-Tribune — Steinway's financial picture brightened. The company posted a profit of $2.7 million in the first quarter of 2013, up from $590,000 in the first quarter of 2012. Piano sales rose 2.9 percent worldwide.To keep pace with orders in Europe and Asia, Steinway has increased its work force by almost 20 percent in the last year at the Hamburg plant, and Mr. Sweeney said that leaving either New York or Hamburg "would be pushing the self-destruct button for an investor."He said the building on 57th Street was another matter. He called it old and forbidding — it opened in 1925 down the block and across the street from Carnegie Hall — and a financial burden. Steinway is shopping for space in Manhattan, convenient to Carnegie Hall and Lincoln Center, and Mr. Sweeney said he wanted a showroom where the pianos would look like "sculptural objects," along with a recital hall and practice rooms.Steinway must vacate the 57th Street space by the end of next year, and many pianists are sorry it is leaving. "I'm sure I'm with everybody else on this, that it's a shame that building will no longer be Steinway Hall," the pianist Emanuel Ax said. "One of the two times that I met Horowitz for five seconds was when they did a celebration in that building after his 1965 return" to performing, at Carnegie Hall. "That was very, very meaningful."
On Friday night in the Bronx, the hometown king Jay-Z will take over Yankee Stadium for the first of two nights, a tag-team event with an again-ascendant Justin Timberlake. It's a gimme, as these things go, an event too big to fail. By comparison, what's taking place out at the Nikon at Jones Beach Theater on Long Island the same night — the "America's Most Wanted Festival" — might feel small, but it's the more intriguing statement about hip-hop now. The headliner is Lil Wayne, whose failures are more intriguing than Jay-Z's and who's been the more challenging hip-hop star over the last decade. That he has managed to continue making successful records even as his interest in rap has been in decline is a testament to his stubborn natural talent. He'll be joined by, among others, T.I. and 2 Chainz, representing two generations of Atlanta-based hip-hop success. (A 6 p.m., 1000 Ocean Parkway, Wantagh, N.Y.; 516-221-1000, jonesbeach.com.)
Over the course of his prominent career, the German composer Karlheinz Stockhausen took on myriad guises. To the European postwar establishment, he was an enfant terrible, embracing the objective rigor of total serialism and the uncharted vistas of electronic music and happenings. For adventurous jazz and rock musicians like Miles Davis, the Beatles and Frank Zappa, he was a Promethean figure who delivered unto the world techniques for fashioning mind-altering sounds.From the '80s onward, as Stockhausen obsessively devoted his time and labor to the seven-day opera cycle "Licht" ("Light") and the 24-part series "Klang" ("Sound"), he was a mystic and a narcissist, making eccentric, unrealistic demands — a string quartet for players aloft in four separate helicopters, for example. That he might have lost his grip on reality altogether seemed possible when, in 2001, he referred to the Sept. 11 attacks as "the greatest work of art that is possible in the whole cosmos" — a statement taken out of context, he strenuously insisted.Now, just over five years after his death — and with an acclaimed staging of "Michaels Reise um die Erde" ("Michael's Journey Around the World"), the second act of the opera "Donnerstag aus Licht" ("Thursday From Light"), opening at the Lincoln Center Festival on Thursday — Stockhausen appears to have assumed his least-likely status of all: surefire box-office hit."He was always the one composer who was the icon of contemporary music," said Thomas Oesterdiekhoff, the chief executive director of Ensemble musikFabrik, the German new-music group that is mounting "Michaels Reise um die Erde" in its North American premiere.Contemporary music has become a standard part of normal concert life, he asserted, so audiences naturally are drawn to Stockhausen. "If they want to know something new, they can get it now through Stockhausen," he said.Certainly, nothing fundamental has changed about compositions like "Gruppen," the complex work for three orchestras mounted by the New York Philharmonic and the Park Avenue Armory in 2012, or the electronic piece "Oktophonie," a segment of "Dienstag aus Licht" ("Tuesday From Light"), presented by the Armory in March. But the Philharmonic concerts sold out, and the Armory had to add extra performances of "Oktophonie" to satisfy the demand for tickets.Even before those large-scale, attention-grabbing productions, a Stockhausen boomlet was under way in New York. "Stimmung," a 1968 vocal work, mesmerized an audience at 5:30 a.m. during the 2008 Bang on a Can Marathon, held just yards away from ground zero. And the grass-roots concert organizers of Darmstadt: Classics of the Avant-Garde attracted capacity audiences to the Issue Project Room in Brooklyn with seminal older works like "Gesang der Jünglinge" and "Kontakte" in 2010, and with the New York premiere of "Cosmic Pulses" (from "Klang") in 2011.The phenomenon is not limited to New York. A 2012 Birmingham Opera Company production of the opera "Mittwoch aus Licht" ("Wednesday From Light"), including the notorious "Helicopter String Quartet," earned a prestigious award from the Royal Philharmonic Society. At the same time, musikFabrik has successfully mounted "Michaels Reise" in Vienna, Cologne, Dresden, Warsaw, Venice and Paris.Speaking by telephone from Cologne, where musikFabrik was presenting Stockhausen's "Samstag aus Licht" ("Saturday From Light") with the Bavarian Radio Symphony Orchestra, Mr. Oesterdiekhoff said that the composer's death emboldened some institutions previously reluctant to take on his works. "When he was alive, to be honest, he was quite demanding," he said. "There were a lot of presenters who were really afraid of Stockhausen, because, they said, when we want to do something by Stockhausen, it will cost a fortune, and that will be our ruin."Ensembles and institutions are willing to offer interpretations that might deviate from the composer's explicit intentions, Mr. Oesterdiekhoff said, adding, "Now, people are more free to do it in the way they think it should be done." After musikFabrik introduced an elaborate, appealing staging of "Michaels Reise" — produced by the Vienna Taschenoper and directed by Carlus Padrissa of the innovative Catalan street-theater company La Fura dels Baus, in 2008 — the group went on to mount the first complete traversal of "Klang" in 2010, then joined Opera Cologne in the world premiere of "Sonntag aus Licht" ("Sunday From Light") in 2011."After that, everything is now workable, everything is possible and accessible," Mr. Oesterdiekhoff said. He added that while the two musicians who manage Stockhausen's legacy, Kathinka Pasveer and Suzanne Stephens, don't agree with every interpretive departure, they have eagerly cooperated in the promulgation of his works and even performed with musikFabrik in some instances.Of course, accessible is a relative term when it comes to Stockhausen, in whose operas sacred, mundane, autobiographical and absurd elements collide. The wholly instrumental "Michaels Reise" concerns a voyage of discovery undertaken by the angel Michael, one of three characters featured throughout "Licht." The others are the rebel angel Lucifer and the earth mother Eve. All come from "The Urantia Book," a volume of quasi-Christian mysticism that Stockhausen said he bought from a mysterious stranger after the composer conducted the New York Philharmonic at Avery Fisher Hall in 1971.Effectively a staged concerto in which the trumpeter Marco Blaauw portrays Michael while suspended from a crane onstage, "Michaels Reise" is saturated with mystery, whimsy, eros and spirituality: elements echoed in Mr. Padrissa's imaginative stage conception. The Lincoln Center Festival director Nigel Redden, who was inspired to bring the work to New York after seeing musikFabrik's collaboration with Mr. Padrissa in "Sonntag aus Licht" in Cologne, said that a mix of spirituality and absurdity is a key aspect of Stockhausen's work."There's almost a ridiculous aspect to some of the requirements, and somehow that is also part of what makes these performances extremely strong," Mr. Redden said. "They could become pretentious if they didn't have this element of the absurd." Inviting audience members to embrace Stockhausen's conceits, he said, Lincoln Center is encouraging those attending "Michaels Reise" to wear bright blue, designated by the composer as the "exoteric" color of "Donnerstag aus Licht."
The song that opens "Amelita" (Columbia) — the second album by Court Yard Hounds, due out on Tuesday — is "Sunshine," a honey-dipped poison dart aimed at the sort of person who rains on every parade. "Tonight you'll grace us all with your inner presence," Emily Robison sings over an acoustic guitar, "While your backhanded compliments let the air out of the room." Then comes the chorus, a summery burst of melody, led by a harmonized "Hey," that leaves no doubt as to who'll have the last word.Ms. Robison and her sister Martie Maguire may still be best recognized for flanking Natalie Maines in the Dixie Chicks, but they've grown into their roles in Court Yard Hounds; "Amelita" is a more sure-footed album than the duo's self-titled 2010 debut. (It's also more satisfying than Ms. Maines's recent solo album, for whatever that's worth.) Ms. Robison has become a warmly assertive lead singer, and on the album's ballads, like "Divided" and "The Road You Take," she drills down on a grown-up romantic ambivalence, with expressive precision.But the album, produced by Jim Scott, isn't mopey or bitter. Its sound runs decisively breezy-modern: Ms. Maguire's fiddle can be heard on most tracks, but within a sturdy power-pop matrix, more Sheryl Crow than Old Crow Medicine Show. The title track borrows the strum-and-gallop strategies of the Beatles' "Two of Us," while "Aimless Upward" feels like late-vintage Suzanne Vega. Only on "Phoebe" do we get a strong slug of bluegrass, and a nugget of folk wisdom. "The golden rule/You'll never learn in school," the sisters sing in one verse. "Boys can be mean, but girls are downright cruel."It would be reasonable to assume that the magisterial Cuban pianist Chucho Valdés has covered every possible angle on the music of his homeland, which he long ago infused with all manner of classical arabesques, jazz inflections and sheer feats of solo exhibitionism. Yet he finds some new terrain to till on "Border-Free" (Jazz Village), the dynamic new release by his Afro-Cuban Messengers. The album's centerpiece is "Afro-Comanche," a 12-minute excursion inspired by the intermingling between expatriated American Indians and the Cuban population in the 18th century.Mr. Valdés also incorporates elements from flamenco, danzón and Rachmaninoff, dedicating one stirring song apiece to his father ("Bebo") and mother ("Pilar"). And, following his lead, the Afro-Cuban Messengers make earthy fantasias of rhythm. The band's trumpeter, Reinaldo Melián Alvarez, brings boppish flair to his playing, joined on several tracks by a featured guest, the saxophonist Branford Marsalis. After blowing temperate and terse elsewhere on the album, Mr. Marsalis goes in for heatstroke incantation on the closer, "Abdel," a song of North African inflection. It's just one more fusion on an album brimming with them.A few years ago, the pedal-steel phenom Robert Randolph released his third studio album, "We Walk This Road" (Warner Brothers), a T Bone Burnett production that made a point of poking through the dustbin of American roots music. Mr. Randolph came off like an earnest student then — so it's refreshing that on "Lickety Split" (Blue Note), due out on Tuesday, he's back in the saddle as a party starter. There's some redundancy here: tracks like "Amped Up," "Get Ready" and "Take the Party" fall under the category of Let's Talk About the Fun We're Having. But the guitar work is explosive and vibrant, and Mr. Randolph's band is accustomed to turning a congregation into a howling audience (and vice versa). At times it's easy to forget that this isn't a live recording, which seems like the point. So here's Mr. Randolph calling audibles on "Brand New Wayo," a bouncy funk tune with a guest turn by Carlos Santana. And there he is barking a declaration of intent at the start of "All American," a blast of retro new wave: "Halfway civilized/Halfway buck wild.""Wake an Echo" (Greenleaf), due out on Tuesday, could only be the product of a composer-improviser working in this era, with frictionless access to great chunks of classical postminimalism, atmospheric indie-rock and harmonically astute post-bop. The artist at the controls is Matt Ulery, a Chicago bassist who earned acclaim for an album of similar disposition last year. But while that album, "By a Little Light" (Greenleaf), incorporated a proper chamber ensemble, this one uses an adaptable quintet. Its members are conservatory trained young musicians who haven't quite become known quantities in jazz: Marquis Hill on trumpet, Geof Bradfield on bass clarinet, Rob Clearfield on piano and accordion, Jon Deitemyer on drums. Going with the flow of Mr. Ulery's writing and direction, they paint in wide, arcing brush strokes at one moment, and with pointillist exactitude the next. This is music of brisk intelligence and an almost off-putting abundance of composure.
The composer and saxophonist John Zorn was easy to spot in the atrium of the Guggenheim Museum one evening last month. As chatty patrons filed in for a performance of his work, Mr. Zorn — for decades the most prolific and polarizing figure in New York's downtown scene — sat silently in a T-shirt and camouflage combat pants, gazing up at the otherworldly light installation by the artist James Turrell.The concert was part of Zorn@60, a worldwide festival marking his 60th birthday. The festival, which continues this week at the Lincoln Center Festival and throughout September at uptown temples of high culture like the Metropolitan Museum of Art, celebrates Mr. Zorn as a major American composer whose work crosses just about every stylistic boundary imaginable: jazz, classical, klezmer; from caustically noisy to sweetly lyrical. But at the Guggenheim he was quick to correct any impression, real or imagined, that he was being "rubber stamped" by the cultural powers that be. The concerts, he said, came about only because of his long relationships with supportive presenters."Let's get this straight," he said in an interview. "Individuals are bringing me in, not institutions."If anything can define Mr. Zorn and his work, it is his stance as a defiant outsider — even upon his big moment of insider acceptance. At nearly 60 (his birthday is Sept. 2), he has built a singularly influential career on his own terms, acting as a kind of all-purpose impresario of the avant-garde while creating a vast body of work that is growing faster than ever. In the last three years, he has released more than 30 albums of original work, all on his own label."What happens when you get to the age of 60," Mr. Zorn said, "is that you have no more doubts. I know why I'm here on this planet. I know what I need to do. I know what is a distraction and what isn't."The Guggenheim concert featured two sinuously beautiful works for female vocals, with mystical texts and echoes of 14th-century polyphony — a long way, it would seem, from the manic hybrids of jazz, thrash and B-movie soundtracks that brought Mr. Zorn to fame in the 1980s, on albums like "The Big Gundown" and "Spillane," and with his band Naked City.Since then, his CD stack of Babel has only towered higher. George E. Lewis, a professor of music at Columbia University and a trombonist who has played with him in the past, said that this "extreme openness to new ideas" linked Mr. Zorn to both the jazz avant-garde and to John Cage."What's interesting about John is the way he has managed to confound ideas about genre and tradition in a very truthful way that opened things up for a lot of younger people," Mr. Lewis said. "The early jazz musicians would always tell you that you should listen to everything. John took that about as literally as can be."Yet that extreme openness means that Mr. Zorn's music has never fit into any category, and despite honors like a MacArthur Foundation grant, he has remained somewhat on the margins of several musical worlds. Each new undertaking has drawn a pool of skeptical commentators, with jazz critics particularly scandalized over the years by albums like "Spy vs. Spy" (1990), which featured Ornette Coleman pieces played with the frantic intensity of hardcore punk."Even very early on, John set himself as an outsider, as someone making a comment on jazz," said Howard Mandel, a critic and the author of "Future Jazz." "On the other hand, he is definitely coming out of a jazz background. There is no tradition of what he is doing with the saxophone in any kind of classical music."The Zorn@60 festival displays some of Mr. Zorn's variety. The two Lincoln Center concerts this week feature a cappella works and a survey of his six string quartets. Miller Theater at Columbia University will present three classical concerts and a fourth of the improvisational "games" he began leading in the late '70s. In a pair of Zornathons, 12 groups will survey his jazz-meets-klezmer project Masada at the N.Y.U. Skirball Center, and the Met will host a day of performances in 12 galleries. And there's more.To maintain such an output, Mr. Zorn has adopted a discipline that few could muster or tolerate. He lives alone in the same East Village apartment where he has lived since 1977 — with what is by all accounts a gigantically ecumenical record collection — and works constantly, eliminating distractions like magazines, television or, sometimes, people."I have made extreme sacrifices to continue doing what I do," Mr. Zorn said. "Anything that gets in the way of my focus to create gets cut out of my life. It's not easy. Sometimes it's family. Sometimes it's friends. Sometimes it's the ability to have a relationship."Along the way his popular image has been set as a kind of cantankerous musical bad boy, which Mr. Zorn dismisses as caricature by a lazy music press — although he has fed the fire with the occasional sharp-tongued remark and song titles like "Perfume of a Critic's Burning Flesh."In conversation Mr. Zorn is every bit as intense and opinionated as his reputation suggests, yet also disarmingly open and personal. He may have even mellowed (slightly). For nearly three hours after the Guggenheim concert, he sat on a low concrete wall outside the museum and eagerly discussed his music and influences, his childhood, the role of the artist in society and his uneasy relationship with the press.
Conducting the New York Philharmonic in the city parks from a portable pavilion with heavy-duty amplification is hardly an ideal condition for making music. But Alan Gilbert , a New York native, born to two violinists in the orchestra, grew up attending the Philharmonic's parks concerts. For him, conducting these programs is central to his vision of what the orchestra's music director should be.His enthusiasm for these popular gifts to the city will be on display again on Tuesday night at Van Cortlandt Park in the Bronx, as he conducts the orchestra in the last of this summer's park series, presenting the same program he led when the series opened last week in Prospect Park in Brooklyn: Dvorak's Cello Concerto and Tchaikovsky's Fifth Symphony.Mr. Gilbert knows that he is the public face of the Philharmonic, which is why he has also conducted many programs for schoolchildren at Avery Fisher Hall. Though he has a modest manner, he has been a galvanizing force at the Philharmonic. Even those patrons and critics who have reservations about the depth and excitement of his performances acknowledge that he has admirably used the opportunity his post offers to be a cultural leader.Mr. Gilbert has infused the Philharmonic with his passion for contemporary music and reinstituted the position of composer in residence. He started the Contact! contemporary music series, presented at the Metropolitan Museum of Art and Symphony Space. These adventurous programs attract enthusiastic audiences that include gratifying numbers of younger listeners. Still, until now there have been only two programs per season (each played twice), so the series has seemed an offshoot. Next season it expands to four programs, which should make Contact! more integral.The Philharmonic's profile as a force for contemporary music may be about to expand in a big way. Next season, in conjunction with 10 institutional partners, including the Museum of Modern Art and the Juilliard School, Mr. Gilbert inaugurates NY Phil Biennial, a series that over 11 days in May and June will offer works by some 50 composers. Mr. Gilbert has said that his hope is that this ambitious biennial could become for new music what the Venice Biennale is for art. It just might.Mr. Gilbert seems mostly to have won over the Philharmonic's administration and board, which have a history of stodginess. But he still faces frustrations, even regarding success stories like his collaborations with the director and designer Doug Fitch.In his first season, Mr. Gilbert persuaded the institution to let him present a fully staged production of Ligeti's satirical, apocalyptic opera, "Le Grand Macabre," designed and directed by Mr. Fitch, at Avery Fisher Hall. This pathbreaking modernist work, first performed in 1978, had never been presented in New York.But the administration, nervous that audiences might be scared off, scheduled only three performances. Mr. Fitch's ingenious production included animation and puppetry, and the orchestra's performance was sizzling. All three shows sold out. At the last performance, you could see scalpers hovering outside.Did this success teach the institution that bold programming pays off? Not really. The next season Mr. Gilbert and Mr. Fitch brought us Janacek's "Cunning Little Vixen." This time there were four performances, all of which sold out.In 2012, to try something different, Mr. Gilbert presented "Philharmonic 360," an inventive program of works by Boulez, Mozart, Ives and Stockhausen presented in the Park Avenue Armory, where the audience sat in bleachers among and around the scattered orchestra. There were just two performances, each one selling out — another missed opportunity.And so it was again when Mr. Gilbert ended the season last month with "A Dancer's Dream," a program of two Stravinsky ballets, directed by Mr. Fitch. There were just three performances. Weeks before opening night, you could not get a ticket. (There will be a screening worldwide in movie theaters in September.)This timidity brings up the most frustrating aspect of American orchestras over all: a deep-rooted fear of jettisoning the weekly subscription series format, or at least cutting back on it. At a time when the percentage of subscription sales is declining, it makes no sense to cling tightly to this outmoded protocol. Why couldn't "A Dancer's Dream" run for two weeks? Even three?For a sizable segment of classical music fans, however, what matters most is how a conductor fares in the standard repertory that has long been the core of orchestra programming. Mr. Gilbert has drawn some criticism for his work in this area. In certain pieces, his performances have been perceived as thoroughly professional, well executed and intelligent, but uninspired.This is not my view. I appreciate that there is no interpretive agenda in Mr. Gilbert's performances of the canon. There are lofty conductors who profess a devotion to a composer's score, then indulge in expressive and attention-grabbing displays. In a self-effacing way, Mr. Gilbert brings the respect of a lifelong student to his performances. With a combination of sure technique and enthusiasm, he knows how to get a symphonic work up and running, whether by Haydn, Mahler or Unsuk Chin.I admire conductors who can convey, to put it simply, how a piece of music goes. Mr. Gilbert is excellent at revealing, without being didactic, the way the phrase-to-phrase layout of a composition fits into its larger structural arcs. His inquisitive mind lights on inner details, harmonic clashes and contrapuntal intricacies, and makes the music leap off the stage.This season, orchestras everywhere have been playing Stravinsky's "Rite of Spring" to celebrate the centennial of this still shocking ballet score. Mr. Gilbert's account at the Philharmonic's opening-night concert stood out for me as bracing, organic and elemental. Instead of making the savage bits more savage, the pummeling rhythms more pummeling, he reminded us, in a gripping, inexorable performance, that the "Rite" is not just an evocation of primitivism, but an astonishing musical composition.His account of Bach's Mass in B minor, utilizing the full resources of a modern orchestra, was lucid, sensitive and urgent. I have found his performances of Tchaikovsky, Mozart, Beethoven, Brahms and Bruckner symphonies consistently involving and insightful. I learn something when he conducts this repertory.Still, if to some ears his Beethoven lacks a measure of spontaneity and inspiration, not on a par with the maestros who have conducted this composer's works with the Philharmonic, I don't care. His Beethoven is insightful and strong. And by programming these and other staples alongside new and recent pieces, he presents them in revealing historical contexts.Besides, the Philharmonic can bring in towering maestros like Bernard Haitink and Christoph von Dohnanyi as guests and turn them loose on the canon. But day to day the Philharmonic needs an innovative, idealistic conductor in charge. At his best, Mr. Gilbert is such a leader.He may not be Mr. Charisma. Yet he throws himself into his work, even bodily during "A Dancer's Dream." Early on in that production's staged performance of Stravinsky's "Petrushka," Mr. Gilbert, dressed in a satiny coat, leapt from the podium and faced the audience with an eerie grin. He was portraying the magician who controls the puppets that are the story's main characters.Is Mr. Gilbert ideal? No one would be. But he is building a legacy that matters and is helping to change the template for what an American orchestra can be.
How hot was it? So hot that the New York Philharmonic skipped half its program on Tuesday night, prompting scattered protests from disappointed concertgoers who chanted, "We want Dvorak."The orchestra was appearing in Van Cortlandt Park in the Bronx for the last of its free outdoor summer concerts. The plan was to perform the program the orchestra had played the night before in Central Park and last week in parks in Queens and Brooklyn: Tchaikovsky's Fifth Symphony and the Dvorak Cello Concerto, with the orchestra's principal cellist, Carter Brey, as soloist.But hours before the concert was to begin, with the temperature pushing past 90 and the National Weather Service expanding its heat advisory, orchestra officials decided to skip the Dvorak and play only the Tchaikovsky."We had performed the night before in Central Park to extreme heat and conditions that were really difficult," said Katherine E. Johnson, a spokeswoman for the orchestra. "It was our understanding that it was forecast to be just as hot or hotter" by concert time in the Bronx.Several people who attended the Bronx concert said that David Snead, a vice president of the Philharmonic, was booed when he announced the change before the music director, Alan Gilbert, took the podium.When the Tchaikovsky ended, there was more booing as the applause died down and the orchestra left the stage, the clearest sign there would be no more music. Some people in the audience called for an encore, said one concertgoer, Amelie de Richemont."People were chanting, 'Dvorak,' and, 'We want Dvorak,' " she said. "People were quite irritated as to why they hadn't played it."The orchestra not only played less than planned, it wore less. The usual attire for concerts in the parks is white jackets and short-sleeved white shirts for the men and short-sleeved white shirts for the women. But Mr. Gilbert conducted without his jacket on Tuesday, as he had on Monday in Central Park. Ms. Johnson said the men in the orchestra were permitted to take off their jackets both nights."We almost had people pass out" in Central Park, said Carl R. Schiebler, the orchestra's personnel manager. He said orchestra members mopped themselves with wet towels during passages when they were not playing. They also carried bottles of water onstage with their instruments, sneaking sips when they could."We try not to put the musicians in, effectively, harm's way with the weather," he said. "You try to get the concert in. You know that people have come, but there are also some limits." He said that the orchestra does not play in rain, and that in the past it had coped with the opposite of the problem it faced this week: It had set up space heaters for an open-air concert on a South American tour when the weather turned unexpectedly chilly.The Philharmonic also has big fans that it can place onstage during a concert. "They helped a bit," Mr. Schiebler said.But some orchestras turn them off when the music begins. The Cleveland Orchestra does so after cooling down the stage at the Blossom Music Center, the amphitheater where it plays in the summer. And Mark Volpe, the managing director of the Boston Symphony, noted that his orchestra's concerts from the music shed at Tanglewood are broadcast on radio — "which means no fans" — because of a buzz that can be heard on the air.Mr. Volpe said a more pressing concern is lightning. Like many golf courses, Tanglewood has a lightning detection system, and he said he consults a meteorologist in Albany when the skies darken. He added that on July 7 he had delayed a Boston Pops concert for 40 minutes until a storm passed by.But there is no escaping heat. "You have instruments that are made of metal and wood, and they expand and contract at different rates" as the temperature rises and falls, said Mr. Volpe, a former clarinetist. "I feel sorry for players trying to play in tune, something I was never able to do in good conditions."
Those questions have been percolating through the worlds of music and dance since the publication of a quietly inflammatory essay by the writer and musician Robert Craft in the June 21 issue of The Times Literary Supplement.Mr. Craft, 89, was Stravinsky's confidant and literary collaborator in his final decades and has for many years written his own accounts of the composer's life and work. His essay appeared on the heels of his latest book, "Stravinsky: Discoveries and Memories" (Naxos), which repeats its most provocative assertions, blending the artistic, historical and personal.Mr. Craft contends first that Stravinsky's creative influence over the epochal 1913 ballet "The Rite of Spring," particularly its choreography, was far greater than has been assumed. And then there's the gay thing."It will come as a surprise to most people," Mr. Craft writes in the book, "that in the early Diaghilev period" — the years following 1909, when Stravinsky began collaborating with Sergei Diaghilev's Ballets Russes — "Stravinsky was exclusively in an ambisexual phase while writing 'Petrushka' and 'The Rite of Spring.' "A surprise to most people, indeed. While Stravinsky was loud and proud about his heterosexual affairs, and was immersed in gay artistic circles in Paris, there has never before been any talk about gay behavior of his own.But Mr. Craft identifies several sexual relationships with prominent men. In addition to an extended liaison with the composer Maurice Delage, he said Stravinsky and Ravel were apparently "time-to-time lovers." Most tantalizing is an alleged affair between Stravinsky and Diaghilev, which would cast an entirely new light on their important and productive collaboration, and on their many quarrels.Proof of Stravinsky's gay behavior would also lead scholars to re-evaluate the role of the gay audience for the Ballets Russes and the reasons for Stravinsky's intense antipathy to Nijinsky, the choreographer of "The Rite of Spring" and Diaghilev's longtime lover. It would encourage new interpretations of the "Rite," whose plot of male elders watching a girl dance herself to death has generally been understood as entirely heterosexual.If Stravinsky had sexual or romantic relationships with men, we would and should care. But did he?"The evidence he has is extremely poor," Tamara Levitz, a Stravinsky scholar at the University of California, Los Angeles, who has done research on his relationship with early-20th-century gay Paris, said of Mr. Craft's assertions in a telephone interview.What evidence Mr. Craft musters comes from new readings of letters published long ago in the three-volume collection — edited by Mr. Craft — of Stravinsky's correspondence. They reveal — not much. Delage lived for a time with the Stravinskys, and one letter from Stravinsky says, "Delage is with me every day."Delage sometimes closes his letters to Stravinsky with "kisses and hugs." One letter from Stravinsky to Delage expresses his "desire to come to your house to spend a few autumn days with you again"; it is signed "Forever, your Igor."None of this strongly suggests sexual consummation. The tone and content intimate instead the kind of close yet platonic male friendships that Stravinsky had throughout his life (including with Mr. Craft).Other bits of substantiation are even less plausible. In the book Mr. Craft says that Stravinsky sent a nude photograph of himself with an erection to Delage. ("I think he's making that up," Ms. Levitz told me. "I'll believe it when he reproduces it.")In 1912 Delage was living with Stravinsky, his wife and his children in Switzerland when Diaghilev asked Stravinsky to come to Budapest for a performance of "The Firebird." Delage wrote in a subsequent letter, "I hope you have regained your good humor in the arms of that horrible fiend Diaghilev."Mr. Craft writes in the book, "The reference to Diaghilev was apparently intended literally." Well, maybe. Or maybe not. But it is inadequate on its own to confirm, or even imply, such a significant liaison.
Before I showed up, no one in my family was musical, played an instrument or even sang in a choir. I found music on my own. In a way, my eureka moment came early, when my parents bought me a little toy piano and, like Schroeder in "Peanuts," I started picking out tunes on it. I campaigned to get a real piano. It wasn't until I was 8 that, seeing that I was serious, my parents complied. One day a boxy old upright was hauled into our home on Long Island.Of course there were formative moments when I started going to live performances, hearing Van Cliburn play the Brahms Second Concerto with the Long Island Philharmonic and Bernstein conduct the "Eroica" Symphony and Stravinsky's "Rite of Spring" with the New York Philharmonic. It was not my parents but my fifth-grade teacher, a classical music devotee and audiophile, who generously took me to some of my first concerts and, of special note, my first opera: "Tosca," at the Metropolitan Opera, with Dorothy Kirsten in the title role, Richard Tucker as Cavaradossi and George London as Scarpia.What really pulled me in, though, was listening to certain recordings in the basement den of my home, by myself. Two albums especially may have pointed me to my life's passion.The first was an RCA release titled "Rubinstein Plays Grieg." I already had a recording I loved of Grieg's Piano Concerto, which my mother had picked up at a supermarket, and I cannot remember the pianist. On the Rubinstein recording of solo works by Grieg, there was just one longer piece: the Ballade in G minor, written in theme and variations form. I was haunted by the achingly sad theme. The subsequent variations were exciting but baffling. This work of nearly 17 minutes was Grieg's only attempt at writing an extended solo piano piece, and the music becomes confusingly tumultuous.What really hooked me on this recording, though, were Rubinstein's accounts of 11 of Grieg's short "Lyric Pieces." Like most aspiring Norwegian composers, Grieg felt compelled to go to Germany to complete his training. Still, he remained Norwegian to his core, someone who loved the music of his country and incorporated freely adapted folk songs into his works.In the "Lyric Pieces," the combination of the colorful titles and the wistful music filled me with curiosity about Norway. Why was Grieg's "Shepherd Boy" so sad? In the "Little Bird," Grieg depicts no chirping feathered friend but a mysterious forest creature. Even "Spring Dance," though hardy and rustic, had thick, heavy chords and strangely impetuous energy. This recording taught me that music could stir deep, perplexing emotions in a way that made me want to know more.The other recording was a Columbia LP of Rudolf Serkin playing three titled piano sonatas by Beethoven: the "Pathétique," the "Moonlight" and the "Appassionata." All three pieces were thrilling, and Serkin became my pianist hero.But the "Pathétique" especially hooked me. I loved that in the grave, slow introduction to the first movement, each phrase began with a steely chord that lingered, then trailed off into a sighing harmonized melodic turn.Hearing this piece made me want to, even need to, play it. It was somehow already clear that I could never be a Rudolf Serkin. He was a titan. But what he did, I just had to do in my own way.When I finally heard Serkin perform live, my titan looked like a toothy, bespectacled grandfather. Still, he was charismatic to me. I will never forget the Serkin concerts I heard in my youth, including recitals at Carnegie Hall and solo appearances with the New York Philharmonic, especially a sensational Beethoven "Emperor" Concerto with an exuberant Bernstein conducting.Before then, though, when I first tried to play the "Pathétique" Sonata, I figured out how to navigate those grave opening chords pretty well, putting all my force into making a crashing fortissimo sound. But the restless Allegro main section was beyond me.It was not until my sophomore year in high school that I performed the first movement as a musical interlude during a school function. Despite some tangled passagework, my playing, if I remember, was full of tragic intensity. I played the whole sonata on a recital program the next year, along with shorter works by MacDowell, Bartok and Schumann, ending with a sloppy but rhapsodic performance of Chopin's Second Scherzo.Later, in graduate school, I played the "Appassionata" quite a bit in concerts, but I dropped the "Pathétique" after high school. Perhaps I had become too emotionally entangled with it.I was reminded of this formative moment when I interviewed the great soprano Leontyne Price, one of my early idols from the opera world, in public for The New York Times in 2004. I was asking her about growing up in Laurel, Miss., and her early musical experiences. She recalled a life-changing trip as a young girl with her mother by bus to Jackson to see the magnificent American contralto Marian Anderson in recital. The hall was segregated, so Ms. Price and her mother sat in the "colored" section.This had to have been a confusing experience for the young Ms. Price. I asked her how she processed it. She said that she blocked out everything except Anderson's glorious singing. "I looked at her," Ms. Price said, "and told myself, 'I am going to be her.' "One more thing, something wonderful, about my eureka moment with "Rubinstein Plays Grieg." In a 1996 article about some Grieg recordings, I mentioned how much that album had meant to me. I received a letter from Paul A. Rubinstein, the pianist's elder son, who wanted to make a present of his father's personal copy of that 1955 release. I met him at his office to pick it up, something I could never have imagined when I used to sit alone in the den, listening to that recording as a child.
Natural sound is one of the glories of classical music. In our increasingly overamplified world, the concert hall and the opera house are like nature preserves where you can hear orchestras and operas without any electronic enhancement.This kind of sonic magic works, though, only when traditional classical music is performed in an acoustically vibrant and, by definition, enclosed space. Take it outdoors, and amplification is almost always necessary. Often lots of it.Still, there is something special about hearing an orchestra or a chorus, even an intimate string quartet, play outdoors, perhaps because it is so incongruous. The New York Philharmonic just completed its annual series of free concerts in the parks of New York, which opened on July 10 with Alan Gilbert conducting the Dvorak Cello Concerto and Tchaikovsky's Fifth Symphony. The sound system for the portable pavilion the Philharmonic carts from park to park is not ideal. But it does the job. I have always found it heartening to be among thousands of people enjoying these concerts: families with children, picnickers with elaborate meals, young people lying on blankets listening.At the smaller outdoor stages for classical music, even with amplification, you can get close enough to the performers that some of the natural sound comes through. There is the Metropolitan Opera's summer series of free voice recitals in the parks, which continues on Friday at Brooklyn Bridge Park with three exciting younger singers — the soprano Erin Morley, the mezzo-soprano Isabel Leonard and the tenor Stephen Costello — accompanied by the pianist Bradley Moore.The Summergarden series at the Museum of Modern Art, which presents contemporary music in the museum's spacious sculpture garden, continues on Sunday with new music for string quartet. Even with amplification, it must compete with nearby traffic noise and the loud chirping of the birds that nestle in the courtyard's tree (though they mostly stop singing when the sun goes down). In a way, it's the musicians playing cellos and timpani and such who are the interlopers.When it comes to outdoor sites for classical music, a roof changes everything. There are acoustically splendid open-air music structures where amplification is unnecessary, like the Music Shed at Tanglewood in Lenox, Mass., the summer home of the Boston Symphony Orchestra. The Santa Fe Opera, an important summer company, performs in an open-air space with a big stage and ample orchestra pit, with seating for more than 2,100, all covered by a high roof. Is this outdoor music? Of course, though it is not the same as the Philharmonic's playing Central Park.I recently enjoyed hearing the Knights, an adventurous chamber orchestra, in an imaginative program at the Naumburg Bandshell in Central Park. The ensemble is returning on July 30 for another free concert, offering, among other enticements, the fine tenor Nicholas Phan singing Britten's magnificent Serenade for Tenor, Horn and Strings.I only wish this series would experiment and present a concert without amplification. The sound system can be a little overbearing. But if amplification is the trade-off we must accept in order to hear the Knights play on a summer evening in an inviting nook of Central Park, so be it.
After distinguished careers, some prominent string quartets disband. Others, like the Emerson String Quartet, replenish their ranks. In its first change of membership since 1979, the cellist Paul Watkins replaces David Finckel (who joined the group that year). On Sunday, the Emerson makes its American debut with Mr. Watkins, who is also music director of the English Chamber Orchestra. It will demonstrate its mettle with a new member with two of Beethoven's "Razumovsky" string quartets and Britten's String Quartet No. 3. (4:30 p.m., Venetian Theater, 149 Girdle Ridge Road, Katonah, N.Y., 914-232-1252, caramoor.org; $15 to $40.)
A neat split in the popular-music audience goes down this week. Over here, the young cool of the New York area; over there, the more, uh, seasoned version. Bob Dylan's "AmericanaramA" tour is so much the summation and apotheosis of dad-rock that no experience of dad-rock may ever match it. The tour, which includes Wilco, Beck and My Morning Jacket, visits Pier A Park in Hoboken, N.J., on Friday, and the Nikon at Jones Beach Theater on Long Island on Saturday. (5:30 p.m., bobdylan.com; $75.50 in Hoboken, $65 and up at Jones Beach .)
BOSTON — Robin Thicke was having a smoke behind the Colonnade Hotel here after performing his hit "Blurred Lines" at a radio promotion party when he attracted the attention of some teenagers passing by. They knew he was famous, but they still had trouble placing him."Is that Justin Timberlake?" a young man asked. Mr. Thicke exhaled smoke and shook his head with a wry smile. "It's Robin Thicke," Mr. Thicke's manager said. "Can I hug you?" a wide-eyed young woman asked. She ran to Mr. Thicke, and as they hugged, she squealed, "Oh, my God."These days, Mr. Thicke gets mistaken for Mr. Timberlake less and less. With "Blurred Lines," he has finally scored a No. 1 hit, after 20 years of writing romantic R&B songs that did well with black audiences, especially women, but never crossed over to pop radio.As the young woman left with her friends, Mr. Thicke climbed into the back seat of a black S.U.V., settling in next to an empty car seat that belongs to his 3-year-old son, Julian Fuego. The boy had fallen asleep during his father's set, and his mother, the actress Paula Patton, had taken him back to the nearby Four Seasons. "We still got the baby seat in here," Mr. Thicke said. "How rock 'n' roll is that?"At 36, Mr. Thicke is a bundle of contradictions: a white singer from a privileged Hollywood family who sounds as if he got his start working smoky R&B clubs; a family man who married his first sweetheart but croons about sex and seduction with the moist heat of a veteran ladies' man; a songwriter with a political conscience whose video for "Blurred Lines" is so risqué — it features nearly nude models cavorting around Mr. Thicke as he leers and sings, "I know you want it" — that critics accused him of objectifying women and reinforcing rape myths.The deliberately lewd video stirred up a predictable storm of publicity, both positive and negative. It turned out to be a marketing coup, transforming Mr. Thicke within days into a recognizable star and helping to propel the song up the pop chart. The song is a catchy come-on that Mr. Thicke composed in a few hours with Pharrell Williams (who also performs in it) over a '70s funk beat, and it has topped the Billboard Hot 100 chart for five weeks. That success has raised expectations for his sixth studio album, also titled "Blurred Lines" (Star Trak/Interscope Records), to be released on July 30."It's like being an athlete and finally winning a championship," he said. "I feel like I've been waiting to win a championship, just one, before I retire."This moment was long in coming. From the time he was 16 and landed a recording contract with Jimmy Iovine at Interscope Records, Mr. Thicke has had some of the most influential producers and artists in the R&B world betting on his talent.His early mentors included the singer Brian McKnight and the producer Andre Harrell. Both heard a powerful soul singer in the longhaired, idealistic son of the actor Alan Thicke, best known for playing the father on "Growing Pains," and the singer Gloria Loring. "It's really hard for a white singer to play on the radio and really sound like he's a black church singer," Mr. Harrell said. "His gift is romantic intimacy."Mr. Thicke's smooth vocals and falsetto became a staple on urban adult radio, and a few of his songs, like "Lost Without U" and "Sex Therapy," have topped Billboard's R&B chart. But until now, a pop radio hit had eluded him.Mr. Iovine attributes the success of "Blurred Lines" to the popularity of the retro R&B sound that has developed over the last two years, not any change in Mr. Thicke's songwriting. "The market is now timed to where he wants to be," he said. "He didn't go after the market."Mr. Thicke said he gravitated toward R&B from a young age. Though his father loved Bruce Springsteen and Gordon Lightfoot, his mother, who had a long career as a singer and recorded the hit duet "Friends and Lovers" in 1986, considered rock vocals to be "a bunch of yelling." Her house in Sherman Oaks, Calif., was filled with the music of Aretha Franklin, Luther Vandross and Marvin Gaye.Ms. Loring recalled that her son started singing as a toddler and often pretended to be a lead singer when he and other children would play. A great mimic, he learned early on to do impressions of Stevie Wonder and Michael Jackson to impress his friends. By 14, he had formed a vocal group, As One, and started performing R&B songs in churches. It was a demo tape he recorded with the group that intrigued Mr. McKnight and eventually led to his first recording contract.
COOPERSTOWN, N.Y. — Ambition has never been in short supply at the Alice Busch Opera Theater, the cozy 900-seat auditorium that long housed the Glimmerglass Opera, and now is the principal setting for its successor, the Glimmerglass Festival . But even measured by the high standard this annual affair has sustained, this year's festival — which runs through Aug. 24 here — rises to new levels of innovation, curiosity and, yes, chutzpah.Make no mistake, that's meant as praise. It takes a certain kind of fearlessness to conceive and execute a summer series in which the most conventional offering is Wagner's "Flying Dutchman." One of two shows directed by Francesca Zambello, the festival's renowned and provocative general and artistic director, the production is the first Glimmerglass staging of one of Wagner's canonical works. ("Das Liebesverbot," Wagner's second opera, was mounted here in 2008, during Michael MacLeod's brief tenure at the helm.)Compared to last season's notorious topical updating of Verdi's "Aida" — and to the other works in this year's festival, which include a popular Broadway musical, a fascinating pair of staged vocal works not intended for the theater, and a rare Verdi flop — "The Flying Dutchman" was presented in an essentially traditional manner. But Ms. Zambello's resourceful, riveting conception, seen on Thursday, still illuminates fresh depths and currents in this Wagner seafaring tale.Credit the casting with at least part of the effect. The seaman of the title may have been cursed to wander the seas for eternity until finding a woman willing to pledge fidelity. But in Ryan McKinny, a lithe, handsome bass-baritone outfitted by the costume designer Erik Teague in a leather jacket worn open to expose a full-chest tattoo, Ms. Zambello offered a Dutchman who seemed unusually close in age and bearing to Senta, the virtuous young woman whose love could provide his salvation.The lustrous soprano Melody Moore played Senta with a reckless passion that matched Mr. McKinny's brooding intensity, their interactions suffusing the goings-on with an unmistakable erotic charge. Mark McCullough's vivid lighting and James Noone's stark set — a towering metal scaffolding that frames the stage; Senta's bed; billowing sheets; and dangling ropes — intersected in ways that blurred distinctions between reality and feverish dream.The tenor Jay Hunter Morris, a Wagnerian hero to be reckoned with after his portrayals of Siegfried at the Metropolitan Opera and the San Francisco Opera, gave a powerfully sung, physically impassioned account of Erik, Senta's discarded lover. Peter Volpe's bluff Daland injected a welcome note of levity. Adam Bielamowicz, a tenor, was a bright steersman. And the conductor John Keenan elicited properly elemental surges and billows from the Glimmerglass Festival Orchestra.Despite recounting the torrid tale of the rise and fall of King Arthur's Round Table, "Camelot" (seen on Friday night) contained few comparable frissons of intensity or passion. Directed by Robert Longbottom with elegantly spare sets by Kevin Depinet, sumptuous costumes by Paul Tazewell and sensitive lighting by Robert Wierzel, this Lerner and Loewe chestnut offered bright whimsy, understated heartache and a string of good tunes, well sung and played.The suave baritone Nathan Gunn, the Glimmerglass Festival's artist in residence this season, unsurprisingly made for a handsome, secure Lancelot. Andriana Chuchman, a winsome soprano, sang sweetly as Guenevere, bringing out the role's devilish streak especially well. But the standout performance was David Pittsinger's charismatic, nuanced Arthur, touchingly characterized and nobly voiced.Two musical-theater actors, Wynn Harmon as Merlyn/Pellinore and Jack Noseworthy as Mordred, did lively work. Clay Hilley, Noel Bouley and Wayne Hu, all from Glimmerglass's exemplary Young Artists Program, were admirable knights. The chorus sang and danced well, and the conductor James Lowe drew a delicious performance from the orchestra."Passions," a new production that opened on Saturday night, ventured furthest from standard notions of operatic fare. Conceived by Ms. Zambello as a means by which to stage "The Little Match Girl Passion," David Lang's 2008 Pulitzer Prize-winning work for vocal quartet, the event paired a new arrangement of that piece with a dance-oriented rendition of Pergolesi's 1736 "Stabat Mater," directed by the choreographer Jessica Lang (no relation to Mr. Lang).The Pergolesi work, a reflection on Mary's suffering at Christ's Crucifixion, fluctuates between somberness and ecstasy, shadow and light: a complex mix brilliantly personified by the soprano Nadine Sierra and the countertenor Anthony Roth Costanzo, complemented by Mr. McCullough's deft stage illumination and Speranza Scappucci's eloquent conducting.
Teen stardom is about being special: one kid's talent and dreams standing in for millions. But the adult world affords fewer favors. How former child stars transition into adulthood has evolved over the decades, but there's still no one true path to success.Invariably, though, there's a rupture, the moment in which the skin of youth is definitively molted. Of late, Miley Cyrus, 20, and Selena Gomez, who turned 21 on Monday, have each been pushing back in different ways — Ms. Gomez with her role in the film "Spring Breakers," and Ms. Cyrus with her sometimes erratic, sometimes free-spirited tabloid life.And yes, they are both still making music, though they're using it for different things. For Ms. Gomez, who just released her debut solo album, "Stars Dance" (Hollywood), it's a starchy place holder, a steppingstone from the naïve yesterday to the uncertain tomorrow. For Ms. Cyrus, whose single "We Can't Stop" (RCA) is the No. 3 song in the country, it's a rocket ship designed for maximum speed, the vehicle that can help her put her old life far in the rear."We Can't Stop" is a low-key burner produced by Mike Will Made It, whose work expertly straddles urgent, dark R&B; hip-hop gravity; and pop accessibility. It's a rejection of all of teen-pop's brightness, except in the chipperness of the chorus, which basically amounts to Ms. Cyrus's gloating about misbehaving."We Can't Stop" is about youth, and the sense that it is best spent fast and irresponsibly. In the video, Ms. Cyrus pops a gold grill into her mouth, dresses like someone who shops at VFiles, makes out with a doll and, as has been her recent wont, gets to twerking, the derrière-centric stripper-derived dancing du jour.It's a statement of young-woman independence from someone choked in her own youth not only by Disney fame, but also by being the child of a celebrity. Plenty of former child stars rebel, but Ms. Cyrus is taking the express lane. "Everyone in line in the bathroom/trying to get a line in the bathroom," she sings at one point, in an alluring, husky croak. Elsewhere she spits out a line that, depending how you hear it, says "dancing with Miley" or "dancing with molly" (as in Ecstasy).Over the last year, Ms. Cyrus has become something of a TMZ fixture, not for Britney Spears-style meltdowns, but for feeling out new forms of rebellion, including the touristic appropriation of black culture she shows off in the song's video. (That's doubly hilarious given that after she referred to Jay Z in her 2009 breakout pop single "Party in the U.S.A.," she insisted she'd never even heard a Jay Z song.) But give Ms. Cyrus credit for keeping her creative life and her public life consistent; the closer the two get, the better an artist she's becoming.Ms. Gomez is walking a lower wire on her album, though it's unclear why. She's already dispensed with her supposed teenage naïveté with her star turn in "Spring Breakers," Harmony Korine's teen apocalypse film (even if she was the most timid of all its stars).But music still matters for Ms. Gomez, as it does for most of her Disney peers. It has a low barrier to entry and it has the greatest potential for viral spread. One good TV or film role might earn some credibility, but stumble upon a hit song, and you can live on forever.Of all her Disney-generation peers, though, she's been the least convincing musician. In their younger years, Ms. Cyrus was more talented than Ms. Gomez, though less intriguing. Their fellow ex-Disney star Demi Lovato, 20, has carved out similar routes with far more success; Ms. Lovato is twice the rebel Ms. Gomez is, and four times the singer.Before "Stars Dance," Ms. Gomez released a string of pleasant enough but undistinguished releases as part of Selena Gomez & the Scene. Her solo album is safe, too, in its eclecticism, which is closest to the spirit of Gwen Stefani — breathy, wide-ranging, largely toothless.This album bears scars of faceless modern club music, as on "Forget Forever" and "Write Your Name," which includes a whisper-rap right out of Madonna's "Vogue." "B.E.A.T." is dirtier and more promising, aiming for Kesha's moistness but landing somewhere closer to no-hit-wonder Dev's "Bass Down Low." The producers of "Slow Down," with its punk-funk backdrop, appear to have listened to a Gang of Four album, or at least one by the Rapture. There are also flickers of rocksteady on "Come & Get It," and the brattiness of Icona Pop on the excellent "Birthday."Ms. Gomez has grown up, too, though she's not as eager to show it off as Ms. Cyrus. On the banal "Undercover," she sings, "Find me in the shadows, and pull the shades down until tomorrow." (A similar awakening is had, to a much less tawdry degree, by the Nickelodeon star Ariana Grande on her recent single "The Way.")And "Love Will Remember" appears to close the chapter on Ms. Gomez's relationship with Justin Bieber: "We lit the whole world up before we blew up/I still don't know just how we screwed it up."A leaked version of the song included what appeared to be a love-proclaiming voice mail from Mr. Bieber. That version doesn't appear on the finished album, but that it made its way out into the world didn't feel accidental. Ms. Gomez's real adulthood gambit might not be musical, or creative, but psychological.
Although it has generated less hoopla than the Verdi and Wagner bicentennials this season, the English composer Benjamin Britten's 100th birthday is also cause for celebration in 2013. Major events loom as Britten's actual birth date (Nov. 22) draws near. But on Tuesday, the Knights, a terrific independent orchestra, get a jump on the festivities with their second appearance in the free Naumburg Orchestral Concerts series in Central Park.The orchestra's program includes one of Britten's most distinctive masterpieces, the Serenade for Tenor, Horn and Strings, which he wrote in 1943 for his partner, the tenor Peter Pears, and the great French-horn player Dennis Brain. Nicholas Phan, a distinguished young tenor who has released two memorable albums of Britten's songs, is featured alongside the Knights horn player Michael P. Atkinson. Also on the program are concertos by Johann Sebastian Bach, his son C. P. E. Bach and Stravinsky, as well as the premiere of a Chaconne credited to the entire orchestra. (7:30 p.m., Naumburg Bandshell, midpark at 70th Street; naumburgconcerts.org.)
"Who wants that perfect love story, anyway?" Beyoncé sings on "Part II (On the Run)," a track on her husband's new album. He, of course, is Shawn Carter, a k a Jay Z, and the album is "Magna Carta ... Holy Grail." In case her reservations about storybook romance weren't clear, she adds a disdainfully silky refrain: "Cliché, cliché, cliché, cliché."O.K., fine: Pop's First Couple was always more like a summer blockbuster, the conjoining of an immovable object and an irresistible force. So as Jay Z works the stadium circuit, Beyoncé troupes on with a tour she calls the "Mrs. Carter Show," its title hinting cheekily at a cozy domesticity even as it reaffirms her compulsion to dazzle. (8 p.m., Wednesday, Izod Center, East Rutherford, N.J., meadowlands.com; sold out. 8 p.m., Friday, Mohegan Sun Arena, Uncasville, Conn., mohegansun.arena-ct.com; 8 p.m., next Saturday, Sunday and Monday, Barclays Center, 620 Atlantic Avenue, , Brooklyn, barclayscenter.com; sold out.)
A dozen years ago the Mostly Mozart Festival epitomized much of what was wrong with the tradition-bound ways of classical music.Certainly, a powerhouse institution like Lincoln Center, in America's cultural capital, could come up with something fresher each summer than a calcified festival offering listlessly played performances of boring programs under the banner of Mozart.In 2002, the musicians of the Mostly Mozart Festival Orchestra called a strike over job security. Lincoln Center immediately canceled all 20 concerts the ensemble was scheduled to perform. The institution seemed poised to jettison the orchestra and turn future festivals over to the visiting ensembles that had been outplaying the hometown band for years.Today, however, Mostly Mozart, which opens on Tuesday with a concert by the festival orchestra at Avery Fisher Hall, is thriving. Jane Moss is its boastful artistic director. She and the dynamic French conductor Louis Langrée, the festival's music director since late 2002, who is credited with rejuvenating the orchestra, have found the right balance between honoring the Mozart brand and implementing innovative initiatives. Back in the dull days, who could have imagined that Mostly Mozart would have the members of the brilliant International Contemporary Ensemble (ICE, for short) as risk-taking artists in residence? This once-hopeless festival has become an unlikely model of change. Of course, the issues facing America's full-time symphony orchestras are more complex than what this four-week summer festival has had to cope with. Still, there are things to be learned from Mostly Mozart by institutions everywhere.I should not overstate the boldness of the festival, which remains a big-institution series built around a tried-and-true namesake. This year, the offerings include a major celebration of Beethoven, which is not exactly daring.Still, once Mr. Langrée was brought in, the festival directors embraced a set of forward-looking common-sense principles that enabled them to inject new purpose into the festival without rejecting its identity. It's important to put the festival in the larger context of the challenges facing classical music. The field is facing enormous problems, not just external economic pressures and seemingly daily news reports about the bankruptcy of opera companies and symphonies, but also internal habits that keep institutions clinging to outmoded ways of presenting the art form.Many smart commentators argue that only complete reinvention will avert looming crises. Yet the success of Mostly Mozart in recent years shows that significant transformation is possible without going all radical.In June, the flutist Claire Chase, a co-founder of ICE, gave the convocation address to a class of graduating students from Northwestern University's Bienen School of Music. She argued that the challenges classical music is grappling with are actually empowering a new generation to fresh modes of creativity, including ICE, which she described as a "new model for a new century: a contemporary, innovative, modular, artist-driven organization that transforms ideas into new music and new music into new ideas."This is all true and immensely exciting. Still, the groundswell of entrepreneurial energy Ms. Chase celebrates is emanating up from the ranks of new young musicians. It is harder for the top-down, established institutions to embrace the new innovative ethos.Mostly Mozart shows that it can be done. It did not invent any of the principles that pulled them out of stagnation. They simply embraced them, beginning with:No institution or ensemble will thrive in these new times without visionary musicians at the helm. Mr. Langrée arrived on the job with enhanced authority to make personnel changes. He found the players, over all, experienced and skilled. They were just demoralized. So he was able to infuse energy into the ensemble without making that many changes to the roster, in part by enlivening the programming and mixing diverse works and contemporary music into the offerings.This brings up another obvious principle that the festival adopted:If classical music is going to be a living, breathing art form, then living, breathing composers, and young musicians who are excited about those composers, have to be a full part of any enterprise, even when Mozart is the brand name of a festival. When Mr. Langrée was recruited, he was primarily known for his outstanding work in the early music movement, a credential that made him a good fit.To his credit, he has fully supported Ms. Moss's efforts to make living composers and new-music ensembles essential to the series. This summer the festival orchestra is performing eight programs, most of them two times each. ICE is presenting seven programs of its own, including the New York premiere of "the whisper opera," a recent work by David Lang, a Pulitzer winner. This chamber opera for soprano and four instruments is described as exploring the tension between what we hide and what we reveal. The ICE programs take place in the intimate Clark Studio Theater, and ticket availability for the four performances of Mr. Lang's work is already, alas, limited.Still, there is an upside to putting on concerts in this space, which brings up another principle of programming:
LOS ANGELES — Trent Reznor was not happy. Sitting ramrod straight, dressed in a black T-shirt and black shorts, he was staring with grim concentration as his band, Nine Inch Nails , worked through their set in a full-scale production rehearsal at the Los Angeles Sports Arena. Smoke, strobe lights and video screens on wheels restlessly reconfigured themselves as the band performed, without Mr. Reznor's lead vocals and instruments. Through song after song, his glare and scowl barely wavered; he'd look away only to tap notes into his laptop. After the band ran through the full set, he convened the musicians and technicians in a back room, well away from a visiting journalist."I don't like having to yell at people," he said the next day. "But I was letting them know the severity of the situation." A lot had to shape up, and very soon.In the course of a daylong tech rehearsal, some of it would. Powerful stage lights would no longer wash out video screens; the speed and density of interactive displays featuring cascades of virtual particles would be adjusted; the "chaos" and "turbulence" Mr. Reznor and his art director, Rob Sheridan, wanted to arise in each song would be calibrated to their specifications.In 10 days Nine Inch Nails would be on tour for the first time since 2009, when Mr. Reznor had his band "disappear for a while," as he wrote on the band's Web site. "Hesitation Marks" (Columbia), a new Nine Inch Nails album that sounds radically different from the guitar-driven blasts of aggression that the band released before the hiatus, is due for release on Sept. 3."Hesitation Marks" — the term for the self-inflicted wounds of people contemplating suicide — veers toward the electronic and the pointillistic, and it reveals its anxieties and longings more subtly than much of the Nine Inch Nails catalog. It looks back, from a distance of two decades, on "The Downward Spiral," Mr. Reznor's 1994 masterpiece that contemplated self-destruction and suicide during a period of personal and career turmoil; it became Nine Inch Nails' musical and commercial breakthrough. It also, in the long run, will test how fans respond to a more grown-up Nine Inch Nails. "I'm proud of it," Mr. Reznor said. "What fear I had — of 'What does Nine Inch Nails have to say in 2013?' — this is it. I don't feel like it's trying to force something into the wrong container."The band is introducing a few of the new songs before the album's release as it plays headlining slots at 14 summer festivals worldwide, including Lollapalooza in Chicago on Friday, Outside Lands in San Francisco on Aug. 10 and Made in America in Philadelphia on Sept. 1. It released a single, "Came Back Haunted," in June, with a video clip directed by David Lynch.Mr. Reznor isn't easing back into performing. Most bands play festivals with a bare-bones production, for quick setup on a shared stage. His is making a far more elaborate comeback. The show brings dizzying visual effects to an idea borrowed, Mr. Reznor freely admits, from the 1983 Talking Heads tour, filmed as "Stop Making Sense." Mr. Reznor starts out onstage alone, and the band gradually assembles around him. From there, the visuals escalate. "We're always pushing the envelope," said Roy Bennett, the band's longtime lighting and production designer. "We've always tried to make people think and keep them on edge and keep them wondering what's going on."The trajectories of lights and video screens, pushed around by the road crew, are so complex that the tour has them choreographed — with time-code cues — to avoid collisions and tangled power cords. (But the band, Mr. Reznor pledged, has "no dance moves.")After the festival shows, Nine Inch Nails will mount an entirely different production with three weeks of rehearsals in September, to headline arenas through much of the next year. "The fact that we're doing all this only for these few shows, and then we have to do it over again, throwing all this out to do a completely new thing, with new things that won't work," Mr. Reznor said, "that feels a little insane."But he was determined to make the return of Nine Inch Nails memorable. "O.K. is not acceptable," he said. "Strangely, we're bigger now than we were ever before. When we put the single out, and we put tickets on sale, the question mark was answered. This is the biggest it's ever been. Maybe it's scarcity or time away."Mr. Reznor, 48, has been a taboo-smashing songwriter with music that meticulously blends melody and abrasion, ferocity and detail. Since 1989, when Nine Inch Nails released its debut album, "Pretty Hate Machine," Mr. Reznor has been recording songs that exorcise pain, fear and rage as they embrace extremes. In the 1990s, he melded styles that had segregated themselves — electronica, punk, metal, pop melody — to give voice to bitter alienation and self-lacerating fury, the urge to annihilate himself or the world. His music can be ominous, brutal, danceable, noisy and still, amid the fray, tuneful. In the studio, the band is largely Mr. Reznor on his own; for tours, he hires band members to rework his meticulous productions as visceral live rock.
Since its founding 30 years ago, Harlem Stage has burnished its reputation by presenting innovative artists like Bill T. Jones and Vijay Iyer and plumbing social issues. Now, the theater is betting that "Makandal" — its first opera commission and an ambitious, contemporary work revolving around the leader of an 18th-century slave revolt in Haiti — will raise its international profile and win it respect as a producer. But the group faces large hurdles.For starters, Harlem Stage still needs to raise about $500,000 for its plan to produce and tour the multimedia opera in the United States, Haiti and South Africa once it has its premiere next fall at the company's 196-seat performing-arts center, called the Gatehouse, at 135th Street and Convent Avenue in Hamilton Heights. While Harlem Stage's works have traveled before, it has never before taken sole responsibility for producing and touring. There are also a host of practical considerations in transferring the two-hour opera's video projections, animation and lighting to places like a park in Port-au-Prince.Still, Patricia Cruz, Harlem Stage's executive director, views "Makandal" as an opportunity to attract new financers and producing partners for the organization, which has an annual operating budget of around $3 million. And between the upheaval in Egypt, immigration debates and the fallout over the killing of Trayvon Martin, she said the times were right to use the escaped slave and rebel François Makandal to explore questions about immigration, race and liberation."It is super-ambitious," Ms. Cruz said of the project. "In order to advance our work and the artists we present, we need to do more — not just in the Harlem community or just in New York." She said the opera form allows its creators "to mix the mythic, the historic and contemporary tragedies with the idea of hope and the idea of change.""Makandal" was five years in the making. It was conceived and written by Carl Hancock Rux, who is also a performance artist. His work includes the play "Talk," and he originated the title role in Robert Wilson and Bernice Johnson Reagon's opera, "The Temptation of St. Anthony." The director is Lars Jan, a genre-bending media artist. Jazz, classical and traditional Afro-Cuban music ripple through the score, written by Yosvany Terry, a composer born in Cuba. Edouard Duval-Carrié, the visual designer whose politically charged art is featured in the opera, was born in Port-au-Prince.With nine actors (all trained singers) playing multiple roles, "Makandal" also tells the contemporary story of a boatload of Cuban, Dominican and Haitian immigrants embarking on a boat ride to a better life. It is a layered story: In the center is the tale of Makandal, a slave who escapes a Haitian plantation, hides out in the hills, leads a group of revolutionaries plotting an overthrow of colonial powers and is captured and burned alive at the stake in the public square in Cap-Haïtien in 1758. "Makandal" is not strictly biographical, though, as it shifts between myth and reality, the past and the present.Harlem Stage officials say the opera project is well on its way. Performance spaces in both South Africa and Haiti are in the pipeline, although Ms. Cruz declined to name them. A "Making Makandal" marketing and fund-raising campaign will begin in September, with events like films, readings and concerts leading up to the premiere, for which no date has been set. One-third of the approximately $750,000 needed has already been raised from individual donors, corporations and foundations."I think it's within their capacity," said Sandra L. Gibson, an arts consultant and former president of the Association of Performing Arts Presenters, with 2,000 members worldwide. "These global cultural exchanges are not just the province of larger institutions. We found from our research that three-fourths of the field has been engaged in global cultural exchange. The size of your entity is not a factor; it was your community, your interest, your mission and your capacity to do this."There is little downside to "Makandal" even if it does not reach all of its goals, said Michael M. Kaiser, the president of the John F. Kennedy Center for the Performing Arts and the founder of the center's DeVos Institute of Arts Management. "The next time, you come back with a different project," Mr. Kaiser said, building a reputation that does not rely on one hit or miss but a steady series of exciting ventures.For Mr. Rux, the opera grew out of his three-year residency at what is now called the Adrienne Arsht Center for the Performing Arts of Miami-Dade County, which started in 2005.
This summer, a number of New York Times critics are writing about their cultural first crushes — the moments or works that prompted them to write about the arts. A new essay will arrive each week, paired with stories from readers who work within the given discipline about their own cultural epiphanies.This week, stories from six readers who work in pop music. Previously we heard from readers who work in television, classical music and dance; in the coming weeks, we will explore the worlds of video games, visual art and more.Although my journey as an artist began sophomore year in high hchool as a rapper, over time I evolved into more of a hybrid pop/hip-hop artist. Urban music gave me a voice through the years when I struggled to "fit in" and find my place among social groups, but pop music is what truly made me want to become an entertainer.The first pop acts I ever became infatuated with as a kid were Michael Jackson and New Kids On The Block, thanks primarily to my older sister, who was the typical boy group superfan. NKOTB was the first concert I ever attended at Madison Square Garden, and I recall the energy being indescribable and me thinking, "One day I will be on that stage and have girls screaming." Wishful thinking, indeed. My mom also played a lot of dance and '80s pop records in the house, which created an obsessive curiosity in me that yearned to discover what made those records so catchy and unforgettable.Writing a catchy pop song presented a whole new challenge for me but also allowed a balance of true expression through the merging of genres. These days my songwriting has expanded to writing for other pop artists through collaborations with various producers, as well as a newly launched solo career as "Hans Inglish." Nothing makes me happier than when someone says, "I can't get your song out of my head," because I know that I intentionally engineered that and in some ways solved the mystery of those records my mom once played, or at least captured some of the magic.I am an author of music biographies (Chet Baker, Lena Horne, and a forthcoming one on Peggy Lee) and articles. My fate was sealed at the age of five. By then I knew how to read, and as things were not so good at home – Dad drank – I guess I needed comfort.There were a few old, abandoned records in our apartment on a gray street in Yonkers. There was also a portable 45-r.p.m. record player, the kind my folks had once taken on picnics or to the beach. I remember the first disc I played. Grayed from overuse, it dropped down the big, round spindle as an automatic tone arm slid over. Out came the sound of Patti Page singing "The Tennessee Waltz," a No. 1 hit for 13 weeks in the early '50s. I watched the record revolve as I listened to that lilting, plaintive voice confide in overdubbed four-part harmony about a girl who introduces an "old friend" to her beau at a dance – then sees them fall in love before her eyes, leaving her all alone. I was riveted by the ability of this singer to make me feel things. How had Patti Page done it? And who was this lady, anyhow?That was the epiphany that turned the disembodied voices on records into my best childhood friends, and eventually made me want to spend my life trying to move people with stories about singers and musicians and the lives behind the songs.I am a full-time staff photographer and videographer for the Island Def Jam Music Group — but consider the position to be more archival than anything else. I remember watching "Pop-Up Video" as a kid in the '90s, knowing that I needed to be involved somehow, and wanting to collect those insider facts that wouldn't be relevant for at least another 20 years. As a teenager, I photographed many shows in my hometown of Houston, which led to an internship at another major label, which led to my current job. I photographed a Black Keys show in 2005 at a dive bar called Mary Jane's Fat Cat — that might have been the moment I committed to the music industry. I knew they were on the verge of something huge, and for the first time I felt like I was part of the movement.Growing up in the Midwest, I was part of the "post-punk" band scene in Rockford, Ill., as a teen. Somewhere around the 9th grade, I heard Björk's "Post" for the first time, and was forever changed. I was blessed to have been surrounded by very talented and ambitious individuals at the time, which offered the opportunities to learn how to record and produce bands in my parent's basement. But once I heard "Post" my aims shifted, and I knew that I wanted to be a beat programmer and music producer.After countless late-night coffees at Perkins waxing poetic about our dreams with friends (one who actually ended up photographing his childhood music idol, Billy Corgan, just as he said he would), and hours reading "Future Music" magazine for the price of a chai tea at Borders, I finally found an in-depth article describing Björk's production rig. At the heart of her work on "Vespertine" was a PowerBook G4. I had no idea what this was, only that I needed it.Somehow, I got one. I put out electronic albums in those years, which led to me producing and programming for artists upon my move to Chicago for college. I have been signed to Rondor/Universal Music as a songwriter, had my artists and songs appear on national television, and traveled around the country working on records. Currently I work with artists in Chicago, and do a lot of commercial music. I've worked for myself full time for four years now, living a generally fun and modest existence!In 1980, I wrote it all down. Week after week, I marked down every song title listed by Casey Kasem on "American Top 40," noting their debuts, their upward moves, their peaks, and their eventual drop down the chart. Casey would credit Billboard magazine as the source of these charts. So I finally got my hands on a copy. I pored over that Billboard for weeks. It was the industry bible, and I prayed over it.But I never thought about working in music as a goal, or even an option. I was on a track to be a doctor from my freshman year of high school. I went to Columbia as a pre-med major and finished all the courses, taking the MCATs twice, and working at Columbia Presbyterian. At the same time I worked at the school paper, wrote record reviews and eventually became music editor.Which led to an invite to become an intern at Elektra Records in 1984, where everything I had stored up from my study of that copy of Billboard (and everything else I had absorbed, listening, reading and thinking about music) came in handy. I was offered the first job that came open there, and eventually decided I would delay my application to med school one year, just to get my pre-med G.P.A. up some. I turned left and only occasionally questioned if I made the right choice.I took a job at an indie P.R. firm, and after 25 years working at six different record labels, started my my own indie marketing and P.R. firm, Missing Piece Group, four years ago. And I still read Billboard.
It's a long way from Timbuktu to Lincoln Center, and not just geographically. For the musicians performing on Wednesday in the Festival au Désert as part of the Lincoln Center Out of Doors series at the Damrosch Park Bandshell, the path from there to here has included an Islamist takeover of their Saharan homeland, followed by a religious war on music and then a French-led military intervention.That is why the festival's Web site refers to the extravaganza touring the United States this summer, featuring the Tuareg groups Tartit and Imharhan and the guitarist and singer Mamadou Kelly, as both a "caravan for peace" and a "festival in exile." The future of one of the world's most musically fertile cultures is uncertain after two years of political upheaval and armed conflict, and its practitioners are eager to make their plight known."The occupiers made all kinds of threats, that they would chop off your hand so you couldn't play, or cut out your tongue so you couldn't sing," said Mohamed Issa ag Oumar, a guitarist who performs in Imharhan. "If they saw anyone with a guitar," and here he paused to make a gesture of slitting a throat, "so if my guitar couldn't stay, I decided I would split town, too."Founded in 2001 and held annually in the Sahara, the Festival au Désert quickly became one of the premier showcases for the various regional styles lumped together under the heading "world music." Until last year, fans, including pop stars like Bono of U2, Damon Albarn of Blur and Robert Plant of Led Zeppelin, would flock to the festival site outside Timbuktu, in Mali, from all over Africa and Europe.A landlocked West African nation, one of the poorest in the world, Mali has only 15 million people spread over an area twice the size of France, its former colonial master. But in the realm of world music, the country is a recognized superpower: global stars like Ali Farka Touré and his son Vieux Farka Touré; Tinariwen; Toumani Diabaté; Amadou & Mariam; Salif Keita; Oumou Sangaré; and Boubacar Traoré are all natives of Mali.But just after the January 2012 festival, an uprising initiated by Tuareg rebel groups in northern Mali — some seeking more autonomy for their nomadic Berber people, others favoring an independent homeland — was hijacked by Islamic extremists, who seized control of Timbuktu as they began marching southward. That led to a military coup in the southern part of the country, and fighting followed."The survival of the festival mandates that we relocate far from our home" in northern Mali, Mohamed Aly Ansar, the event's chief organizer, said early this year at a conference on censorship. That would remain the case, he added, "until the music can return to its roots with freedom of expression and dignity."This year's festival was initially scheduled to be an itinerant production traveling across West Africa, a plan that had to be shelved when Islamic radicals seized a gas plant in neighboring Algeria, spreading turmoil across the region. That came after the French intervention in Mali in January, which has driven members of Al Qaeda in the Islamic Maghreb and other militants into the mountains and deserts, where they remain.In his new book, "Music, Culture and Conflict in Mali," Andy Morgan, a former manager of the Tuareg rock band Tinariwen, describes in detail the Islamists' campaign against what they called "Satan's music." Their targets included not only popular Western artists like Bob Marley, but also local music styles deemed offensive to the standards of Shariah, or Islamic law, that were being imposed on a traditionally tolerant and multicultural society.Among the genres repressed was music based on tindé drums, which Mr. Morgan describes as "the mitochondrial DNA of all Tuareg music." Though traditionally performed by female ensembles, Tartit among them, the music is enjoyed by audiences of both sexes, which led to incidents in which, Mr. Morgan writes, "militiamen with black headbands and AK-47s strapped to their chests" broke up public performances, "shouting at the men to keep away from the women and go home."When the crackdown began, "I thought we were finished," Fadimata Walet Oumar, the leader of Tartit, said in an interview on Monday at the group's favorite African restaurant in Harlem. "We had to leave, but during the crisis we continued to hold our concerts in refugee camps, so as to keep our traditions alive."In other instances, musicians stopped at roadblocks had all of their instruments and amplifiers seized and "doused in petrol and set alight," Mr. Morgan wrote. According to other reports, Islamist police also demolished recording studios and raided radio stations, where they confiscated and destroyed painstakingly accumulated archives of local music.
Maxwell's, the feisty little club in Hoboken, N.J., will close on Wednesday after 35 years. In that time, just about every indie-rock and alternative-rock band has played there, from the Feelies to R.E.M. to Sonic Youth. Todd Abramson has been a near-constant presence since the mid-'80s, first as a booker and then as a part owner. Mr. Abramson, 51, left, has booked more than 200 gigs a year. He reflects fondly here on some memorable moments:One of the best things of the job for me has been the opportunity to work with some of my musical heroes. That January Dave Davies of the Kinks played two magical shows in one night. I think everyone in the audience was as pumped up as I was. It meant a lot to me, as well, because when I was briefly not involved with the club in the mid-'90s, I went and saw him perform at a dinner theater in New Jersey, and when I returned, one of my first thoughts was that I needed to book him, so people didn't have to go through that experience again.At this show, the Hoboken band Yo La Tengo brought out the rocker Jon Spencer as a surprise guest, part of its first Hanukkah benefit series. Now 72 such shows later (skipping a few years), the series has become a Maxwell's institution. That Sunday night show was probably the most raucous of them all, with Yo La Tengo teaming up with Jon to cover songs by the Rolling Stones, DMZ and Jon's own band, Pussy Galore. Many who witnessed that evening's performance of "Love Power" (originally performed by Dick Shawn in "The Producers") are still trying to recover.Doug Sahm, a Texan, gave his Sir Douglas Quintet a British-sounding name, but its 1960s hits like "She's About a Mover" were really Tex-Mex music. He came to Maxwell's with a quintet including his longtime co-conspirator Augie Meyers on electric organ, playing a Texas treasury of rock 'n' roll, country, R&B, Tex-Mex and more. His sax player, Rocky Morales, told me in the men's room, "I used to be in the bughouse, but I'm O.K. now."I knew a little about this Texas country singer from his work in the Flatlanders, but thought his first solo album, "Fair and Square," was a revelation. He played on a Friday night, and the fact that there weren't that many people there enabled the show to turn into a honky-tonk dance party, a rarity over the years at Maxwell's. A few days later, the band came back to town and hung out at my place. We went over and had drinks at the Elysian (down the block from Maxwell's), back when it was a working-class dive.This might have been the most transcendent show I ever witnessed at Maxwell's. I had never paid much attention to the family singing group with 1960s pop hits like "Indian Lake," so I was taken aback when it tore it up. The energy and love in the room was unbelievable. The band did the old hits, some great new material and a killer version of "Going Down to Liverpool." I tried booking it a few times after this show, and it never worked out, which might have been for the best.The term "oldies" has negative connotations for most people, even those who enjoy much of the music thrown under its umbrella. But this manic band from Houston turns the term upside down with its love of songs from the '50s and '60s and the joy with which it plays them. I fell in love with Allen Hill and his crew, watching them perform at SXSW that year and flew them up for a gig. The show lasted three and a half hours, and when it ended, the entire audience was onstage, and Allen alone in the audience.After hearing of Maxwell's closing, Jon Langford of the Mekons wanted to do one last show at the club where he had played many times with the Mekons, Waco Brothers, Three Johns, etc. Two sets, no opener (my choice). The first set was "serious," or as serious as Jon ever got. The second set, he played three Mekons songs in a row and announced that that was more than the Mekons ever did. Even though he had just flown in from Chicago that day, the versions of George Jones's tune "A Good Year for the Roses" and Fats Domino's "Before I Grow Too Old" were haunting and beautiful. What a wonderful send-off.This show occurred on my birthday. Of all the ridiculous shows Maxwell's put on over the years, this has to be up there. Nothing like trying to fit 18 Swedes on an 18-x-12-foot stage. In order to be seen better, some of the members duct-taped milk crates to their shoes downstairs and proceeded to walk up our old wooden steps that way. It was nights like this when the sheer joy emanating from that stage transcended the difficulties of trying to operate the place. And it was the only time I ever played kazoo.
When I was 9 or 10, our family acquired a new book called "Album Cover Album," a collection of record cover reproductions: 160 pages, with from 1 to 16 records arranged on each page. It was made by Hipgnosis, the English design firm, and Roger Dean, the illustrator of album jackets for Yes and some less savory prog-rock bands.My father worked as a graphic designer and is the kind of person who might buy a record based on its cover. I liked music, but at that point had not much grid for understanding it beyond AM radio; there wasn't a ton of it in our house. We lived in a part of the Rockland County, N.Y., suburbs where keeping up with music meant looking at Billboard's Top 10 in a Bradlees department store. This book — softcover, 12 by 12 like an LP — was really my first record shop, my first significant filter. It was important to me! But that's not my point."Album Cover Album" was a retrospective of jackets from the first flourishing of the LP in the early 1950s and settling hard on the late 1960s and the '70s. The predominant visual aesthetic of the book was postpsychedelia and prepunk; it was published in 1977 and must have gone to press just too soon to include the cover of the Sex Pistols' first album.The principals at Hipgnosis were the designers Storm Thorgerson, Aubrey Powell and Peter Christopherson (a k a Sleazy), who later became part of the industrial bands Throbbing Gristle, Psychic TV and Coil. Hipgnosis specialized in bright and recondite covers involving totems and symbols, or living beings looking profoundly, even morbidly, out of context; the images would interact with your head. (Pink Floyd's "Atom Heart Mother" and Led Zeppelin's "Houses of the Holy" were two.)So here was "Hi, We're the Miracles," the first Motown album; Andy Warhol and Reid Miles's late-1950s Blue Note jackets for Kenny Burrell; a bunch of Black Sabbath; the 1969 Moondog record on CBS; the Jimmy Castor Bunch's "Butt Of Course ..."; Michael Nyman's percussion piece "Decay Music"; the Art Ensemble of Chicago; Roxy Music; Captain Beefheart; ELO; Ted Nugent; Leonard Bernstein with the London Symphony Orchestra. Mass-audience and cultish, over- and underproduced, music for teenagers and — let's say — old people, often on the same page.Some pages were confined to a single musician or style — one page of Elvis Presley, 10 pages of jazz — but the best pages sorted records only by common visual elements. There were pages with a lot of black skin tone or a lot of white skin tone; freak figures in a normative landscape, normative figures in a freak landscape; Art Brut illustrations; color-saturated photography; a lot of sky or sand or water.Their arrangement and juxtaposition were funny and intense and provocative. I don't have a great visual memory, but I do for this book. As I got older, when I first encountered records in the real world that would come to mean a lot to me — the Ohio Players' "Fire," Cecil Taylor's "Silent Tongues," the first Velvet Underground album, the various-artists collection "That's Truckdrivin' " (but now I am bragging) — they were already familiar from "Album Cover Album." I clicked them into place in the book's layout stored in my mind, sort of like affixing stamps to their images in a stamp-collecting album. This is about as close as I come to a record collector: I'm a mental one. I've got some stuff, but it's not very important to me as a physical presence, and I probably don't deserve to have it.So "Album Cover Album" is a history of about a quarter-century of jackets, as understood through the eyes of design-heads who might have known something about music, maybe even a lot, though it wasn't clear how much. It felt important that it wasn't clear. I couldn't have told you why.And here is the point. I was too young to know that this was really a book about design, conceived by people like my father. Through childhood I was dimly and progressively aware that the book represented a great number of ways to play and think about music, and so I came to take it as a book tracing a kind of philosophy of listening. The implicit message from such a wise book, I thought, was that wise people listen as broadly as this.Over the next 15 years or so I made my way toward most of the records in the book, consciously or not. As I started to learn something about what a Cecil Taylor record sounded like, as opposed to, say, a Ted Nugent record or a Michael Nyman record, the spaghetti of musical style represented on each page would accelerate my blood, as if each grouping represented a question you had to answer within yourself: What do these different entities have in common? How can you hear them all and think all of this has something to do with you?I distrust lists of records you ought to hear, even though making them is part of my job. When you see them, you're usually reading someone with a well-meaning desire to protect and restrict the understanding of music; you're reading a subtext of fear and anxiety as much as one of pleasure."Album Cover Album" had no fear or anxiety. It was not conceived as a list of things to hear. It was an arrangement of things to look at. But the backward logic of taking it as a kind of record guide appeals to me still. Its view of music is not snobbish or specializing; it is improbably, almost illogically wide. It can be hard on the brain to be open to many kinds of music meant for very different sensibilities. That's why most people aren't. This book, misread, can help solve that problem.
HOBOKEN, N.J. — "THIS room was a bit more to us than a performance room," Richard Barone of the Bongos said about halfway through the group's set at Maxwell's here on Wednesday evening. "It was also our practice space. And it still feels like a practice space."The Bongos' set was the final performance of the final evening at Maxwell's, a storied rock club that by the late 1980s had become the home of a certain brand of jangly, Britpop-inspired, postpunk indie rock. So after a few more songs that offered an overview of this quintessential 1980s band's history — including songs from "Phantom Train," an album the Bongos recorded in 1985 but left unreleased (it is due out in October) — Mr. Barone and company rang down the curtain with a few pre-Bongos, pre-Maxwell's, garage-band classics in a half-hour encore set.For those, the band was joined at various points by other Maxwell's royalty, including Ira Kaplan and Georgia Hubley of Yo La Tengo and Glenn Mercer, the Feelies' guitarist, as well as a former owner, Steve Fallon, who transformed the bar into a rock showcase (and who played tambourine here), and a current owner, Todd Abramson (who sang backing vocals). The valedictory oldies set began with stinging versions of Donovan's "Sunshine Superman," the Velvet Underground's "Rock & Roll" and Paul Revere and the Raiders' "Kicks" and ended, at half-past midnight, with Big Star's gentler "Thank You Friends."The Big Star song was as close as the closing-day festivities came to veering toward mawkishness. Even so, the group gave it a dry-eyed reading that suited the spirit of a day that began with a block party outside Maxwell's, eight and a half hours earlier, and also included sets by three other bands in the club's small back room."I think Todd said it best," the Bongos guitarist James Mastro said during the block party, referring to Mr. Abramson. "It's like a Mardi Gras funeral. It's sad, but it's also a celebration. The Bongos must have played a couple of hundred shows here, more than any place we've ever played."Gaylord Fields, a disc jockey for WFMU-FM, who was spinning discs at the block party, evoked the funeral-celebration dichotomy as well."It's like any departure," Mr. Fields said. "You don't feel it until afterwards. I don't miss Maxwell's now. I'll miss it a month from now."In a way, closing night offered a glimpse of the ghosts of Maxwell's past. The Bongos, after all, had gone their separate ways in the late 1980s and reconvened for the show. So did the band "a," which shared the late show with the Bongos. The first rock band ever to perform at the bar, "a" is actually Bongos prehistory. Led by Glenn Morrow, a guitarist, singer and songwriter who now runs Bar/None Records, the group also includes Mr. Barone, the bassist Rob Norris and the drummer Frank Giannini — the original Bongos lineup after Mr. Morrow left the band. (Mr. Mastro joined later.)The Individuals — Mr. Morrow's post-"a" band — headlined the early show, with guest appearances by Mr. Kaplan, Ms. Hubley, Sean Eden of Luna, and Dave Weckerman of the Feelies, among others. (The highlight of its set was a stomping cover of the Chambers Brothers' "Time Has Come Today," with Mr. Weckerman leading a small army of cowbell players.) And as a nod to the club's reputation for latching on early to young, promising New Jersey bands, the Individuals shared the early show with Delicate Steve, an eclectic group that had never played Maxwell's before.The block party, for which 11th Street, outside the bar, was closed, started modestly, with several dozen people — many wearing or carrying Maxwell's T-shirts, which were for sale there, and others in shirts commemorating bands that performed there (Mr. Abramson himself sported a black Yo La Tengo shirt) — milled around with cups of draft beer from a concession stand. By 8:30, between the two sets inside, the place was hopping. You could barely move through the section of the club that had been the restaurant, and the street was packed as well.Perhaps because people had grown used to the news that Maxwell's was closing — Mr. Abramson announced it in June — there were few glum faces in the crowd. Some had come simply to pay their respects."It does mean something to us," said Bob Bevan of Jersey City, who came to the block party with a friend, Tom Hartley, of Maplewood, N.J. "It really was a premium venue in Hoboken, and there are not too many clubs left. We came by because we wanted to say goodbye."Some were more overtly nostalgic. Avi Ohring, who lives in Hoboken and runs Mangia Hoboken! — The Hoboken Food Tour (his day job is credit card processing), brought a plastic folder with tickets for some of the Maxwell's shows he had attended, including ones with Jonathan Richman, Bob Mould, the Blasters, the Feelies and the avant-garde performance artist Karen Finley."I've seen more than 100 shows here," Mr. Ohring said. "I saw the Feelies every year. I saw — what was the name of the Beatles' original drummer? Yeah, Pete Best, he played here. I saw Richard Thompson several times. And Maureen Tucker, the drummer from the Velvet Underground. I had a habit of, two or three times a week, checking to see what the upcoming shows at Maxwell's were."Maxwell's has offered a stylistically broad menu over the years, though its openness to indie rockers has brought it the most attention. Its history is fascinatingly tangled: When Mr. Fallon, along with his brother and sister, bought the bar in 1978, it catered mainly to Maxwell House workers (the plant closed in 1992) and was open only during shift changes. At the time, young musicians were flocking to Hoboken, a comfortable, mile-square city, for its reasonable rents and proximity to New York. And when Mr. Fallon began booking bands, word spread quickly among musicians that Maxwell's was open to new talent.By the mid-1980s, the club had hit its stride, with the Bongos, the Feelies, Soundgarden, the Replacements, the dB's and the Fleshtones drawing both local and New York audiences.
Grecchinois , the name of Nicholas Phan's engaging blog, reflects the Greek and Chinese heritage of this 34-year-old American tenor, who has fast made a name for himself as an expressive interpreter of the British composer Benjamin Britten. Raised Greek Orthodox in Ann Arbor, Mich., Mr. Phan, who initially studied the violin and played in a youth orchestra, discovered Britten when he played his "Young Person's Guide to the Orchestra." In college, as a gay man, he became fascinated with the relationship between Britten and the tenor Peter Pears, who lived together at a time when homosexual acts were illegal in Britain. He cites an experience performing Britten in a recital at Truman State University in Kirksville, Mo., around early 2006 as proof that the music, with its "beautiful combination of head and heart," speaks to audiences everywhere.Mr. Phan has myriad coming performances during the Britten centennial this year. At festivities this summer at the Ravinia Festival, in Illinois, he will sing Nebuchadnezzar in "The Burning Fiery Furnace" on Aug. 17 and the Serenade for Tenor, Horn and Strings on Sept. 3 with the New York ensemble the Knights. Mr. Phan's fall schedule includes concerts in New York on Sept. 5 and 21.Mr. Phan made his Carnegie Hall debut in 2009 on three hours' notice, when he was asked to replace an ill tenor in Haydn's "Creation" with Helmuth Rilling and the Orchestra of St. Luke's. Reviewing that concert in The New York Times, Anthony Tommasini wrote that he brought a "sweet-toned lyric tenor voice and crisp German diction to his work." Mr. Phan had performed "The Creation" eight years before but not in German. Lively and candid, he spoke with Vivien Schweitzer by phone about Britten, making a last-minute debut and the dangers of revealing too much on social media. These are excerpts from the conversation.Q. What was it like making a Carnegie debut on three hours' notice?A. The performance ended up being amazing, and it was such a liberating experience. I didn't know I could perform or enjoy myself under that kind of pressure. It changed the way I approached my career and music making.What initially drew you to Britten and Pears?When I was a young gay man in college in the late 1990s, there were no gay role models. What was so inspiring about Britten and Pears was this idea that they could be gay, and it could be a positive thing and not mean loneliness, illness or depravity. They were inspiring pioneers. It takes a lot of strength to live with that kind of integrity.How has social media impacted the performing arts world?There is definitely such a thing as oversharing on Facebook and Twitter. It's wonderful to have these behind-the-scenes moments, but there is supposed to be an air of mystery about what we do. What is virtuosic about a performance is that you do something incredibly difficult with apparent ease. The oversharing can steal that air of mystery.You've written about the dangers of excessive self-criticism on your blog. How have you developed as an artist over time?I definitely still get nervous, but I've learned that the nerves are adrenaline and excitement. Courage is not the absence of fear but the ability to face it. It's better to make a positive choice — to balance an inner critic with an inner cheerleader.Many singers who perform opera seem uncomfortable on the recital stage. But you seem to love it.There is nothing more difficult than giving a solo recital, because there is no costume to hide behind. In an opera, you are interacting with your colleagues. In a recital, you are baring your soul, and there is direct contact with an audience. I get my thrill from that. There is no fourth wall to hide behind.
A year ago, the folk-rock duo the Civil Wars seemed to be golden. Their 2011 debut album, "Barton Hollow," had sold a half-million copies without a major label and won them two Grammy Awards. They had toured with Adele and Emmylou Harris and collaborated with Taylor Swift on a hit song. More success seemed certain.But in November, just two months after they had begun recording a follow-up album, the duo abruptly broke up in the middle of their first European tour. They canceled the rest of the performances and put out a statement citing "irreconcilable differences of ambition."Now, they are releasing that second album, simply titled "Civil Wars," on Columbia Records with a cover showing billowing black smoke. It's an anguished collection of songs about troubled love, breakups, heartaches, murder and infidelity that mines many of the Appalachian and folksy themes of their debut and pushes them into darker territory.The two singers — John Paul White and Joy Williams — are no longer speaking to each other, however. Mr. White, 40, has retreated to his home outside Muscle Shoals, Ala., to spend time with his wife and four children and declines to talk about the breakup or the album. Ms. Williams, 30, has granted interviews, some of them tearful, lamenting that the duo cannot perform to promote the record."There are moments when I do feel like my hands are tied, because I would love to be performing these songs," she said in a telephone interview from her home in Nashville. "I'm wrestling with it. I'm losing sleep over it."Rob Stringer, the chairman of Columbia, acknowledged that the impasse between the estranged partners presents a problem for the label. "I'm aware of the pitfalls, but believe you me, there are plenty of records that have permeated through that haven't had standard marketing promotion practices," Mr. Stringer said. "I know what we have. We have a body of songs, and that's what I've got to work with."There are precedents for albums succeeding after a band has splintered. One of the best-selling albums in history, Fleetwood Mac's "Rumours" (1977), came out after the divorce of two members and a stormy love affair between two others fractured the group. But if a band already has a fan base, stories about internal turmoil can spur sales, said Errol Kolosine, a music marketing expert at New York University. "In our business today, the No. 1 challenge for any artist it is to get people's attention," he said. "So it's already a positive, isn't it?"Ms. Williams and Mr. White met in 2008 at a Nashville songwriting camp, where two dozen musicians had been thrown together to brainstorm about material for a country star. Both of their careers had stalled: Ms. Williams, from Santa Cruz, Calif., had given up recording as a contemporary Christian singer after three albums, and Mr. White, from outside Muscle Shoals, had parted ways with Capitol Records after recording a rock album that was never released.But they soon discovered their voices melded beautifully, and the songs they produced had a haunting, folksy charm. They started performing together in clubs around Nashville and released a digital album, "Live at Eddie's Attic," in 2009. Then they teamed with the producer Charlie Peacock to make "Barton Hollow," released in February 2011 to rave reviews. For the next 21 months, Mr. White and Ms. Williams had a dizzying ride, collecting awards, appearing on national television and singing at the Grand Ole Opry and at the White House.Onstage there was a crackling romantic energy between them, although both were married to other people and always maintained that their lovelorn duets and ballads were pure artifice. Ms. Williams's husband, Nate Yetton, managed the band and was literally in the wings. In July 2012 Ms. Williams gave birth to their first child, Miles, who traveled with the duo during its last tour.Ms. Williams said that creative disagreements had been building for several months and came to a head in the songwriting sessions on her screened porch after her son was born. "I have a lot of ambition," she said. "I believe in pushing borders and finding new territory and expanding. I personally felt like John Paul was more of the ilk that things would happen organically and 'If it ain't broke, don't fix it.' "Ms. Williams said becoming a new mother had nothing to do with the breakup. She also dismissed rumors that she had romantic feelings for Mr. White. "I was not in love with John Paul," she said. "But I was, and am, in love with the band."
Opera and technology have long had an uneasy relationship. The one has always required the other — from the Baroque spectacle of 17th-century operas, with their deus-ex-machina gimmickry, to the stagecraft required to mount any contemporary production of Wagner's "Ring" cycle.Historically, though, opera tended to avoid confronting the technological head-on. Composers stuck to timeworn subjects from literature, myth or history. Machines controlled the staging; they didn't usually appear onstage.But we live with a different set of myths today, and contemporary opera has begun to reflect the age of Mark Zuckerberg and Edward Snowden. Thus, Nico Muhly's "Two Boys," a story of intrigue and murder in online chat rooms, which will arrive at the Metropolitan Opera in October; and Tod Machover's 2010 "Death and the Powers," a "robot pageant" featuring animatronic sets and a wealthy industrialist who downloads his own consciousness. And in David Lang's "whisper opera" — which will have its New York premiere on Saturday at the Clark Studio Theater at Lincoln Center — the Internet takes center stage.Online communication forms the backbone of "the whisper opera," which will run through Aug. 13 as part of the Mostly Mozart Festival. Mr. Lang, a Pulitzer Prize-winning composer and a founder of the Bang on a Can new-music collective, has created a libretto out of what he calls Internet secrets. He typed short, personal phrases like "When I think of you I think of" into a search engine and cataloged the results. The opera consists of these poignant aphorisms, made anonymous by the omission of sources. A kind of one-man version of the Prism project, Mr. Lang trolls Internet data for clandestine truths."It is about the difference between our live persons and our hidden persons," Mr. Lang said in a recent phone interview. Invoking Mr. Snowden, the composer noted the paradox between recent anger over government surveillance and the willingness of consumers to give information to advertisers. "There are things that we're happy to reveal about ourselves through our corporate purchases or through our chat rooms, or through our political speech, or through all sorts of incredible communications that we make" through the Internet, he added. "And yet live, we would never say these things."Except in Mr. Lang's opera, in which they are whispered by the soprano Tony Arnold as well as four instrumentalists from the International Contemporary Ensemble, who will also perform the composer's hushed music. Removed from their original context, lines like "It's not my fault that I am so pretty" recall the plaintive, mesmerizing repetition of Mr. Lang's recent works, like "The Little Match Girl Passion," a reinterpretation of Bach and Hans Christian Andersen; "Death Speaks," a song cycle deconstructing Schubert lieder; and "love fail," a meditation on the tale of Tristan and Isolde.In drawing on Internet secrets, Mr. Lang illuminates the contradictions in modern life, the contrasts drawn between what we reveal in heated comment threads and what we conceal in the real world. "When we go search something on the Internet," and then suddenly "ads for it show up for the rest of the year — whatever site we visit — we don't have any problem with this," he said. "And yet if there were a marketer calling us every day, if there was a human part of this, we would be very upset."The Internet has lately been of particular interest to Mr. Lang. In 2011, he hosted a crowd-sourced competition in which musicians could submit YouTube videos of their renditions of one of his piano pieces. For "Death Speaks," he used the Internet to browse through hundreds of Schubert songs for mentions of death, and constructed his text out of them. The "whisper opera" libretto presents prosaic, personal thoughts gathered from sources like Twitter feeds and Tumblr posts. Googling selections from the text reveals some lines to be less secret than Mr. Lang may have intended. One search led to a Miley Cyrus song, another to the memoirs of Representative Charles B. Rangel.
How do you solve a problem like French Montana? For the last couple of years, he's made a cottage industry of lifting bits of old hip-hop songs and redelivering them in his sleepy drawl, a strategy that only intermittently worked on his recent debut album, "Excuse My French" (Bad Boy/Interscope), which revealed him as the sum of parts but not whole. And yet he remains a regular radio presence, though not via any of his own songs. On Chris Echols's "Smile," he's used in the familiar way, as a living repository of rap history, repurposing some old Lil' Kim lines from 1996's "Crush on You" on an R&B song that could have easily come from that era. But on DJ SpinKing's "Body Operator," which also features the singer Jeremih, a different idea is at work. This is a club song: big, blocky house cut through with some reggae, some R&B and some French Montana. He's rapping carefully here, and plainly, too, but it's a success. Every word hits hard. The quicker beat turns his lethargy into something of a strategy, and he sounds like no one but himself.The abrasion begins early on "Jinx" (Slumberland), the second album from the post-punk outfit Weekend. There are the guitars, sure, played in a fashion just left of sandpaper, but then there's the frontman, Shaun Durkan, who sings, over and again, "I feel sick sick sick sick/In my heart." Almost everything on this album is grander scale than this band's 2010 debut, "Sports," from the sturdiness of the melodies to the certainty of the dour mood. The album is slightly parched in places, especially when Mr. Durkan seems to be singing with his eyes rolled, but mostly the juxtaposition of gloom and urgency holds firm. And there's a little Simple Minds shimmer on "Celebration, FL," which would have held up the brattiest Brat Pack soundtracks.Eric Strickland is a mournful singer, whatever the topic — heartache, drugs, gas prices. He grieves about all those things on "I'm Bad for You," the rousing and consistently impressive second self-released album by his band, Eric Strickland and the B Sides, which is facile with blues, country, Western swing and more. Mr. Strickland sings with enough flexibility to accommodate that range, but he might be an even better, and more versatile, songwriter. The elegant "So Easy" would have been a hit for George Jones 40 years ago, or for Hank Williams 20 or so years before that. "Methamphetamines" splits the difference between the agitated outlaws of the 1970s and the up-tempo country attitude of the early 1990s. Mostly his characters are rural anybodys facing struggle, but Mr. Strickland's descriptions are far from lazy. Take "Angel Like You," about a couple trying not to be defined by what they lack:She does tooBut they can't pay the billsAnd you'd think after all of this climbing they've doneThey'd finally get over that hillBorrowing from 1980s sleaze metal and 2000s pop-punk lands New Years Day not far from Paramore, a comparison it would likely loathe. New Years Day is tougher and more flamboyant, but on its excellent second album, "Victim to Villain" (Century Media), it's also its pop equal. That's thanks to scrappy songs with biting verses and soaring choruses from the often extravagantly made-up frontwoman, Ash Costello. She's got a sweet, cloying and sticky voice — you can practically hear the gum snapping on songs like "I'm No Good" — but that just means that when she's feeling harsh, it hits even harder. "Bloody Mary" is a rough evisceration of a peer, or a competitor, or a bug under Ms. Costello's shoe: "You're just a stitched-up puppet chasing someone else's dreams."The bookend songs of "Home" (Jesus Culture), the first album from Kim Walker-Smith & Skyler Smith — a married couple who share a ministry, Only Love Remains — are duets so spare you can virtually hear the air moving through them. They might not sound out of place on an album by the ace minimalist band Low. The rest of this striking devotional album is more lush, and stylistically diverse, from the woozy piano melodrama of "Christ the Rock" to the Alison Krauss-esque roots of the title track. Ms. Walker-Smith is a far more striking singer than her husband, and "Unstoppable Love" is her finest showcase. It's an impressive swell, with shadows of 1980s quiet-storm R&B and maybe the faintest flickers of Shontelle's bombastic 2010 ballad "Impossible." And in the lyric, Ms. Walker-Smith's God is practically an action hero: "You tore down every wall/All the while shouting/'My love, you're worth it all.' "
NEWPORT, R.I. — The Newport Jazz Festival, which ended Sunday at Fort Adams State Park here, is 59 now. It had early brilliance followed by middle-age aesthetic confusion, edging into pop and smooth jazz. Over the last nine years, it has corrected its course, entering a new period of steadiness and dignity as it seeks a new framing of jazz — and of its own audience.Newport serves its own interests — its history, its long relationships with particular musicians — and monitors the aesthetic horizon, careful not to make its bookings too obscure or too slick. There are more inventive, more specific and daring jazz festivals, and bigger ones. But Newport, with all the important recordings generated from its past and its career-making (or career-saving) performances, is genuinely tied up with the story of modern jazz. In the 1950s and some of the '60s, it was often the case that if you were a hero at Newport, you were a hero in jazz generally. That could be the case again. Recently the festival has navigated rough waters well. There is more to do.Careers in jazz are long now, but they can take several decades to develop, if developing means getting to the point where an audience at an outdoor festival will give you a standing ovation before you play a note. Some of those musicians — the major heroes of jazz, who attained peak relevance in the '60s or '70s — are entering their true late periods. Chick Corea, Herbie Hancock, Eddie Palmieri, Wayne Shorter and Roy Haynes, all of whom performed over the weekend, are all somewhere on the line between 72 and 88. And all of them performed at a high level.Mr. Shorter brought his regular quartet, sometimes augmented by Mr. Hancock, who played four-handed piano sitting on the bench next to Danilo Pérez through the group's intuitive, nebulous cohesion. Mr. Palmieri brought his orchestra, heaving out hard-core Afro-Cuban dance music and Latin jazz, spangled with dissonant piano chords. And Mr. Corea presented a new band, the Vigil, which finds a middle way between electric fusion and mainstream acoustic jazz; it involves the drummer Marcus Gilmore (Mr. Haynes's grandson), the bassist Christian McBride, the saxophonist Tim Garland and Charles Altura, who is perfect for this music, a young guitar hero who can play faster than you can think. And Mr. Haynes was himself; he swung aggressively, tap-danced, hit all available surfaces with his drumsticks and teased his audience. In none of these cases was there a sense of audiences delivering respect just because respect is deserved, a hazard of jazz festivals.Newport is also trying to replenish those heroes with middle-age ones, the major figures whom we might take for granted because they're so busy. The trumpeter Terence Blanchard and the saxophonist Steve Coleman fit that description on Saturday and Sunday. Mr. Blanchard's performance felt a bit more normative. His working band, including the pianist Fabian Almazan, the saxophonist Brice Winston and the guitarist Lionel Loueke, played new music that borrowed the patient spaciness and curiosity about sound of Miles Davis's "Bitches Brew" period. But Mr. Blanchard has a great understanding of pacing and drama, and in the liquid structure of his piece "Hallucinations," he played a solo that could get pretty much anyone interested in him: slow and ripping, with lots of space and variation, thematic, logically built, full of melody and weird texture. There was jazz history and process, but it was also thrilling on a basic level.Mr. Coleman's setup was more unusual. Now 56, he's less about a new group or a new album (though he has both of those pretty often) than a continuing lesson; the method of his music was what mattered more than lineups or material. He played three shorter sets: one a first-time performance of a new composed piece for the classical Talea Ensemble, joined by jazz improvisers including himself, the trumpeter Jonathan Finlayson and the drummer Dafnis Prieto. (It used his overlapping rhythmic cycles on a more even grid and came out sounding like Henry Threadgill.) Then a duet with the pianist David Bryant, and finally a loose and mesmerizing set of fast, polyrhythmic, polytonal music with his band Five Elements, which included Mr. Bryant, the electric bassist Anthony Tidd, Mr. Finlayson and Mr. Gilmore once again, right after his set with Mr. Corea. Mr. Coleman played at the festival two years ago and seems as if he could become a kind of a regular here; it would be great to see who else could come on his stage and join his system.The festival is also trying to seed the ground for the next group of heroes. It's going after the waves of young jazz-literate musicians banging around New England jazz schools, and it sold 1,900 reduced-price tickets to them this year, out of the 17,200 total attendance. (There are plans to add a third full day to the festival next year of younger musicians only, which could be an important move but only if it doesn't seem like ghettoization.)Newport Jazz wants to represent its interests — not just with the new guitar shredders, like Mr. Altura, but the newer scholars and tradition bridgers, like Amir ElSaffar, the trumpeter and bandleader who brought his group Two Rivers, incorporating Iraqi music and jazz, with an oud and buzuq — short and long-necked cousins of the lute — alongside a jazz quartet; or Mary Halvorson, who's connecting a classic jazz-guitar sound and sensibility (like that of Jim Hall, a quieter jazz elder, who also played at the festival) with its opposite, basically aggression, noise, hyperactivity.The pianist Jon Batiste and bassist Esperanza Spalding are only 26 and 28, but they're fast-tracking toward heroism, aiming to get all listeners on their side immediately: an impossible goal, but they're persuasive. Ms. Spalding's set, with her wide-ranging Radio Music Society, used a big-band horn section, pop and funk grooves, and her serene, flexible singing; Mr. Batiste played bebop and New Orleans rhythm and early jazz. Mr. Batiste seems more teacherly, but they are both complicated machines of American musical history, and they won't rest until they've won you.A couple of singers this weekend came from a more '70s or early '80s-oriented place in the African-American jazz tradition, strong and sometimes experimental yet serenely unacademic, and they were mightily good. One was Dee Alexander, from Chicago, who sang standards and semicosmic originals, turning her voice into birdsong or a synthesizer or a Tibetan monk chant. The other was Gregory Porter, a powerful baritone who writes his own songs. Neither of them have gonzo youthful vitality; they're hitting their stride midlife. They're not shredders, sound inventors or bringing an X-meets-Y concept. They're not turning themselves out to make their case. But they, too, could be among this festival's next heroes.
Many aspiring country singers have day jobs, typically along the lines of waiting tables or tending bar. Not Mark Seliger. He has shot famous portraits of public figures — actors, dancers, politicians, rock stars and artists, from Jay Z to the Dalai Lama — for magazines like Time, Rolling Stone, GQ and Vanity Fair.Yet Mr. Seliger has a lesser-known passion: writing country songs. For the last decade, he has been the lead singer of the Los Angeles band Rusty Truck. On Tuesday, the group releases its second album, "Kicker Town," a collection of lonesome songs in the tradition of Merle Haggard, Hank Williams and Willie Nelson.Mr. Seliger, 54, said he started writing country songs in the late 1990s to stave off melancholy and artistic angst as his tenure as the chief photographer for Rolling Stone was winding down."It was really a kind of change of seasons for me," he recalled. "It was just the experience of doing something new and original and getting back to that feeling of the first time you took a photograph. The ability to do something I had never done before."Skeptics may dismiss the albums as the vanity projects of someone whose work has given him deep connections in the music world, but Mr. Seliger's songs have gained the respect of musicians like Lenny Kravitz, Gillian Welch and Willie Nelson, and his band mates include seasoned professionals like Joey Peters, the drummer from Grant Lee Buffalo, and Michael Duff, the guitarist from Chalk Farm. Mr. Seliger, they say, carries the burden of someone well known for one thing, yet trying to do another: the difficulty of being taken seriously."I think Mark is a really great songwriter," Mr. Kravitz said in an interview. "You hear it and you go, 'This guy writes heartfelt, beautiful songs.' "Mr. Peters, the drummer, said Mr. Seliger's lyrics are "very cinematic, very emotional.""There is a darkness to it I relate to, a storytelling vibe," he added.As a teenager, Mr. Seliger, the son of a traveling pipe salesman who was born in Amarillo, Tex., and grew up in Houston, was enamored of rock bands like ZZ Top and the Allman Brothers. But he became entranced with country music in college after he borrowed a car for a weekend that had Willie Nelson's "Stardust" in the tape deck. That led him to Merle Haggard, Waylon Jennings, George Jones and Tammy Wynette.As his photography career gained momentum in the 1980s, he continued to dabble in music, occasionally breaking out his guitar at a party to sing a Cat Stevens song or do a passable cover of a Willie Nelson hit.That began to change in the late 1990s, while he was touring as a photographer with Jakob Dylan's band, the Wallflowers, snapping images for an album cover. On the tour bus, he started playing Dwight Yoakum songs with the keyboardist Rami Jaffee. Later, he began coming up with his own melodies, and Mr. Jaffee, sensing a talent, recorded one of his ballads."I was a very reluctant songwriter," Mr. Seliger said.He writes in a traditional country style, skirting Nashville's current pop-rock sound. His singing evokes the steel-string twang and emotion of singers like George Jones. On the new album, the lead track, "Buildings," is typical of his work. He sings about unrequited love over simple chords and an old-school country beat, woven with dobro lines: "What am I supposed to do, yeah/what am I supposed to do, girl/ With this love as big as a building?"Mr. Seliger said writing songs "refreshed the battery" in his photography. He ventured away from portraits, experimenting with surreal images of still lifes, landscapes and nudes."After 20 years of making images, I kind of freed myself up to do what I wanted to do and not think about it too hard," he said.Mr. Seliger, who is single and lives above his West Village studio, did not perform in a club until 1998, when Andy Gibson, a friend who is a professional dobro player, dragged him onstage at the Rodeo Bar in Manhattan and forced him to sing a Merle Haggard song. It was nerve-racking but intoxicating, Mr. Seliger said. He began showing up to open-mike nights at C-Note in the East Village and playing gigs with his own country combo at Mercury Lounge and the Knitting Factory.
SANTA FE, N.M. — The five productions of the Santa Fe Opera season come in two kinds, a distinction made clear last week, when they were presented in quick succession for the benefit of the press and other completists looking to economize. (Good luck with that in Santa Fe.)First came three new productions mounted as star vehicles for established performers: Offenbach's "Grand Duchess of Gerolstein," for the mezzo-soprano Susan Graham, on July 30; Theodore Morrison's "Oscar," for the countertenor David Daniels (already reviewed), on July 31; and Rossini's "Donna del Lago," for the mezzo-soprano Joyce DiDonato, last Thursday. Then came two revivals, more evenly cast and featuring mostly young and rising singers: Verdi's "Traviata" on Friday and Mozart's "Nozze di Figaro" on Saturday.It was largely a matter of taste in repertory, granted, but for one listener, the revivals were more satisfying over all. Nor did those productions lack star power of their own.The "Traviata" was especially effective, with moving performances from Brenda Rae, as Violetta, and Michael Fabiano, as Alfredo. Laurent Pelly's staging, the program notes say, has been refined since its premiere in 2009, but to judge from reports of that production, the essentials remain intact.With minimal, boxy sets, designed by Chantal Thomas, and elaborate Belle Époque costumes, designed by Mr. Pelly, the staging strives for naturalism. In the opening party scene, the women's gowns are slit up the front to the waist, affording easy access and allowing the high-class prostitutes to do what prostitutes do. The scene ends with Alfredo and Violetta kissing and groping each other, and suggesting and simulating the rest.The naturalism carried through to the final scene, where Violetta looked a wreck, as a woman dying of consumption might, but sang gorgeously. Dying slowly, of course: Ms. Rae made Violetta's bursts of renewed energy and song, so often the butt of jokes, as believable dramatically as they could possibly be.Ms. Rae soared beautifully in the early going, but it was in her pianissimo singing that she really shone. Her assurance to Alfredo's father that she would step aside from her romance with his son to protect the honor of the Germont family was ineffably touching, her death scene even more so.Mr. Fabiano, though a slightly stiff stage presence, also sang nimbly and with attractive tone, his voice showing real metal at times. Roland Wood was a little woolly and wobbly as the elder Germont, but Jennifer Panara was winning as Violetta's friend Flora.Leo Hussain conducted, and both chorus and orchestra had fine moments. All this despite the thunder and wind storm that blew through the open-air theater during most of the third and fourth acts.The pleasures of "Le Nozze di Figaro" were different, achieved through the work of a unified and multitalented ensemble. Perhaps the best-established singer here was the Countess, Susanna Phillips, heard just a week before at the Aspen Music Festival in Colorado as Ellen Orford in Britten's "Peter Grimes." Her touchstone aria in "Figaro," "Dove sono" ("Where are the lovely moments"), was a model, delivered straightforwardly at first, then in a gripping half-voice and with melting ornamentation in the da capo repeat.A sturdy and elegant presence throughout, Ms. Phillips was offset in kind by the Count, Daniel Okulitch, who sang with a full, rich bass-baritone and added a fine comic touch. Zachary Nelson made an attractive, ebullient Figaro, and Lisette Oropesa was irresistible as Susanna, burbling to and fro in a lovely voice. Emily Fons proved unusually persuasive as a male in the trouser role of Cherubino, the libidinous page, and Susanne Mentzer, who used to be quite the Cherubino herself, brought the older Marcellina (Figaro's mother, it turns out) to appealing life.As Mr. Pelly did with costumes in "La Traviata," Bruce Donnell, in this "Figaro" production from 2008, made flowers a sort of keynote: markers of class, since they are grown and bestowed by underlings for the flattery and edification of aristocrats. Flowers are a frequent presence in the opera — with Cherubino's death-defying leap into the flower pots, the floral homage paid to the Countess by shepherdesses and the final scene in the garden — and Mr. Donnell makes them omnipresent.For others, the main attractions of the season will undoubtedly be the new productions. I willingly admit to my own shortcomings here: a limited tolerance for operetta silliness of the kind shown in "The Grand Duchess of Gerolstein" and for bel canto vocal display of the type that fills "La Donna del Lago" ("The Lady of the Lake").That said, the star turns were remarkable. The veteran Ms. Graham plays the Grand Duchess to the hilt as a cougar, in the director Lee Blakeley's conception, a woman who is willing to go to war simply to relieve her boredom. For whatever reason, the action is transferred to the United States, a land blessedly free of duchies. The music is left in French, the dialogue presented in English.Ms. Graham dominates (in every sense) and sings with her usual richness. Paul Appleby is modestly appealing as Fritz, a second-class private promoted to general as the Duchess's plaything and busted back down. And Kevin Burdette is stentorian as General Boum, at whose expense Fritz is promoted.Mr. Blakeley fills the stage with colorful costumes (designed by Jo van Schuppen) and entertaining dance (choreographed by Peggy Hickey) and stage activity.Ms. DiDonato's performance as Walter Scott's Lady of the Lake is indisputably great, both vocally and dramatically. And she is superbly supported by the tenor Lawrence Brownlee, as Uberto, King James of Scotland in disguise.The supporting cast is less effective. René Barbera, as Rodrigo, the chief of the Highlanders, commands a vocal agility to rival that of the leads, but his tone tends to turn steely. Marianna Pizzolato, in the trouser role of Malcolm (who is in amorous pursuit of Elena, the Lady), sings well but fails to project anything remotely mannish.Paul Curran's production, with set and costume designs by Kevin Knight, is serviceable.The audiences were more universally enthusiastic than I was, showering ovations on revivals and new productions alike. More power to the Santa Fe Opera.
Four years ago, a singer named Margaret Durante tried to have a go at Nashville. She released a tepid country cover of "Use Somebody," the desperate Kings of Leon anthem — an uncommitted way to begin a career — and that was that. She kicked around the city for a while, jumping among independent labels, but only this year, remade as Maggie Rose, has she sounded anything like herself.Her debut album, "Cut to Impress" (RPM), is one of the year's best country releases, maybe because of the tough skin one grows when success slips out of reach. Maggie Rose is a sturdy heartbreaker on this album, which is full of astute, aggrieved songwriting (by herself and others) and attitude that even in the post-Miranda Lambert era feels knifelike. But because Maggie Rose is still, in most ways, a rookie, she'll be playing this week at the Emporium as the opener for Scotty McCreery, the "American Idol" winner with the froggy-deep voice and the Alfred E. Neuman grin. (7:30 p.m., Tuesday, 9 Railroad Avenue, Patchogue, N.Y., 631-627-8787, theemporiumny.com, $35, or $125 for V.I.P. seats.)
Each summer in the silver-roofed, Gehry-designed Fisher Center, the Bard Music Festival spotlights one composer. The intense weekend lineups feature well-known and obscure repertory performed by rising and established musicians, as well as panels and talks by scholars. Stravinsky, whose "Rite of Spring" turns 100 this year, is being honored at the festival. Sunday's afternoon lineup includes musicians like the pianist Alessio Bax, and works by Stravinsky, Debussy, Schoenberg, Ravel and Satie. That evening, Leon Botstein conducts members of the American Symphony Orchestra and soloists, including the tenor Nicholas Phan, in works by Milhaud, Poulenc, Satie and Stravinsky.On Friday night, pieces by Stravinsky, Bartok, Varèse, Hindemith and Messiaen will be explored; on Saturday afternoon Stravinsky, Roussel, Martinu, Prokofiev and Alexandre Tansman are highlighted. (Bard College, Annandale-on-Hudson, N.Y., 845-758-7900, fishercenter.bard.edu; $25 to $75.)
In 1979, the Ramones were recording at a studio in Los Angeles with the producer Phil Spector, whose work with the Ronettes, the Righteous Brothers and the Beatles had earned him a reputation as both a musical genius and an exacting, combustible egomaniac. He hadn't produced a hit since John Lennon's "Imagine" in 1971, and the Ramones, who had released four critically acclaimed albums of exuberant punk rock, were still searching for a commercial breakthrough. The sessions for the resulting album, "End of the Century," were tumultuous, and the opening pages of the new book, "Gabba Gabba Hey!: The Graphic Story of the Ramones," written by Jim McCarthy and illustrated by Brian Williamson, details some of Mr. Spector's more notorious moments: forcing the guitarist Johnny Ramone to play the opening chord to "Rock 'N' Roll High School" more than 70 times; pointing a gun at the bassist Dee Dee Ramone."I wanted to open with a flash point," Mr. McCarthy said in a recent telephone interview from his home in Bexhill-on-Sea, England. "The Phil Spector thing was two worlds colliding in a culture clash."Neither Mr. McCarthy nor Mr. Williamson had access to images, video or audio recordings of the sessions other than those of the "End of the Century" album itself. They didn't conduct any interviews; their main source material was previously published books and articles. Nonetheless, the gritty black-and-white illustrations, in a photo-realistic style, depict scenes from the studio in detail, and all four Ramones and Mr. Spector are quoted saying things they surely never did."Obviously, you're putting words in people's mouths to a degree because who knows what was said," said Mr. McCarthy, who has also written graphic biographies of Kurt Cobain, Eminem, the Sex Pistols, Tupac Shakur and Michael Jackson, all for the Omnibus Press, a publisher in London. "But even if you're making dialogue up, you try for a realistic way of speaking. I think I'm a lover of the Ramones' music enough to know roughly how they would've spoken to each other."Mr. Williamson's approach was similar. "The scene in Phil Spector's place, there's a lot there that obviously no one is privy to that I had to make up," he said. "But you look at different photographs, you have an idea of their different expressions."This kind of creative license isn't unique to this scene or this book or even just to Mr. McCarthy's biographies. But it raises questions as to how "Gabba Gabba Hey" and works like it should be perceived. Does the presence of illustrations set up a different standard of truth than would be expected of a traditional biography? Similarly does inventing dialogue and scenes necessarily undermine an author's credibility?Mr. McCarthy thinks not. "In a funny way, it's almost like directing a film on paper," he said. "There's a lot you can do with a graphic novel that you can't do with a biography. You can take liberties with the timeline and visuals, and open the story up."Barnaby Legg, who wrote "Godspeed," about the Nirvana frontman Kurt Cobain, with Mr. McCarthy, described it as "part biography, part dreamscape.""You don't come to a graphic novel expecting something purely biographical," Mr. Legg said. "You're expecting something more imaginative and impressionistic."Music and comics share a long, intertwined history. Elvis Presley and the Beatles were frequent fodder for illustrators beginning in the 1950s and 1960s, and since the late 1970s, few major stars have avoided being written about in a comic or longer graphic novel."Comics have always been a kind of disposable medium in which people find transcendent experiences," Mr. Legg said. "Pop music can be compared to that. You're talking about a medium that's essentially trashy by nature. The pop art quality of graphic novels is a wonderful analogue for the bright, vibrant, instant language of music."
NEWARK — The costumes were all wrong for "Andrea Chénier." At the center of the action were men in white protective suits, not tailcoats and breeches, and they were aiming high-pressure hoses at pieces of the set. Not one of them sang a note.This was not the Metropolitan Opera's usual "Chénier."In an out-of-the-way parking lot here in what one Met official called " 'Sopranos' country" — and he was not talking about the ones who sing — the stagehands from the carpentry department were doing the Met's version of housecleaning, readying the backdrop of an opera that the house has not performed in six years.They offered a glimpse into the complex preparations that go into the Met's season, which begins on Sept. 23 with the first of 218 performances of 26 different operas. They also provided a reminder of the potential headaches and the expenses that come with running a repertory company that never performs the same opera two nights in a row.Ever since the last performance of "Chénier" in 2007, the sets have been packed in shipping containers in a storage yard owned by a trucking company called Daybreak Express, which shares its name with a Duke Ellington song. The Met has 1,300 containers at the yard, all air- and water-tight. "Chénier" fills eight."We are their warehouse," John Scerbo, the executive vice president of Daybreak Express, said one day this week. "If you were to put this stuff in a regular warehouse, you'd need over a million square feet.""Chénier" is going back into the repertory this season, so the stage crew did what it does whenever the Met revives a production. Stagehands removed the locks on each container and checked for dust and damage. (Hence the protective gear.) Stephen Diaz, the Met's master carpenter, led the way into one container. The air was slightly musty."This is not bad," he said, "but you have to get the smell out. Singers are sensitive to smell, especially the principals. You have to make sure they're comfortable."So the stage crew hauled the set into the parking lot, piece by piece. Someone turned on the hoses, spraying bleach and odor eliminator on columns and arches that were left to dry in the sun.The Met keeps the makings of about 100 different productions here: sets broken down into pieces marked with instructions for speedy assembly at Lincoln Center. The containers for an opera are trucked to Lincoln Center just before it goes into rehearsal, and the sets remain at the Met until after the season's last performance of that opera. The Met has some backstage storage space; Mr. Diaz said that he usually has the sets for four to seven operas on hand at any given time — about 80 containers' worth.The Met, which struggled financially during the recession, will not say how much it pays for storage or transport. But the Met's repertory means that there are times when a marathon of trucks is coming and going, as the stage crew knocks down one set and takes in the next one. "It is a 24/7 operation when they are in season," said Larry Pucciarello, who coordinates the logistics for Daybreak Express. "They're on the phone: 'Where's this truck? Where's that truck?' "Only once in 30 years of what Mr. Diaz calls "containerizing" — until the 1980s, the Met ran its own warehouse, in Weehawken, N.J. — has a truck been stolen. In the 1990s, thieves broke into a depot, probably hoping for a load of televisions, not part of the set for "Turandot." The stolen container was never found, said Mr. Diaz, who had to do an inventory of the 18 other containers to figure out what to replace before that "Turandot" could be staged again.The Met has thinned out its holdings in recent years, retaining only one production of most operas, although it has held on to multiple versions of a few for historical reasons or for their value, among them the Mark Chagall production of Mozart's "Zauberflöte," which had its premiere in 1967, during the Met's first season at Lincoln Center. But Mr. Diaz discarded the David Hockney sets for a 1990s production of that same opera after the staging by Julie Taymor went into the repertory nine years ago.Other containers hold the trappings of two "Toscas," the classic Franco Zeffirelli version and the one by the French director Luc Bondy that replaced it in 2009, and two "Ring" cycles. Pieces of the "Ring" machine, the problem-plagued device that served as a set in the most recent staging of these four Wagner operas, were stored here after it was disassembled in May; other components were sent to a climate-controlled warehouse in Newburgh, N.Y.But the Met still has 25 containers loaded with the Otto Schenk "Ring" cycle, which first went into production in the 1980s. (It is now on the list of productions to be disposed of, but it is not clear how soon that will happen.)Mr. Diaz said the storage yard had "long-term positions and short-term positions." Referring to Mr. Scerbo of Daybreak Express, he explained the difference: "I send him an opera that we're not doing for five years, he goes long term. An opera like 'Bohème,' that we'll do every year, he'll go short term."Until the Met moved to Lincoln Center from Broadway and 39th Street in 1966, it stored its sets in the open, propping them against the Seventh Avenue side of the house. When it rained, the sets could get wet, or at least damp.With the move uptown, "the intention was to have the whole season's repertory in the building at the beginning of the season," Mr. Diaz said. Most of the sets in those days were flat and could be rolled up; now, almost all the sets are three-dimensional, and cannot be."One of the larger shows there was 'Madame Butterfly,' " Mr. Diaz said, "which was one of the smallest shows here." The "Butterfly" that migrated to Lincoln Center and remained in the repertory until 1993 filled two storage containers. The Anthony Minghella "Butterfly" that had its premiere at the Met in 2006 takes eight.
If Ivete Sangalo were an American singer, rather than the most popular female vocalist in Brazil, she would undoubtedly be described as a belter. Onstage, she is bold, brassy and boisterous, part of a lineage that includes Tina Turner, Janis Joplin and Bette Midler, and on her records she has often favored songs that allow her to emote loudly and dramatically.It's an approach that has worked splendidly for Ms. Sangalo, who on Saturday will be performing at the Prudential Center in Newark. She has sold more than 15 million records as a solo artist; is said by the Brazilian press to be the country's highest-paid active performer, earning up to $500,000 a show; has 8.5 million followers on Twitter; and runs her own production company."To be able to entertain people is a triumph, but the funny thing is that I never dreamed as a child about being a singer, never looked in the mirror and played at being a pop star," Ms. Sangalo, 41, said in an interview this week at a Manhattan hotel. "I played at being an actress, and it wasn't until I started going to Carnival as a teenager and heard all that loud, joyous music blaring from the trucks that I said to myself, 'There's nothing I'd rather do than this.' "Ms. Sangalo (pronounced San-GAHL-oh) is the leading exponent of an upbeat and often raucous style known as axé music, which combines a variety of Brazilian and foreign influences into a high-octane blend, reminiscent of what is heard at Carnival. Samba and reggae are the most obvious sources, but rock, soul and Caribbean genres like salsa and merengue, as well as local regional rhythms, also enter the mix.Her enormous popularity illustrates the gap between foreign perceptions of Brazilian music and the reality there. While singer-songwriters like Caetano Veloso, Gilberto Gil and Marisa Monte win plaudits abroad for their subtle vocals and sophisticated melodies and harmonies, Brazil's charts are dominated by axé, romantic pop ballads and a local version of country music called sertaneja."For better or worse, Ivete reflects the state of Brazilian popular music at a moment when people are buying a lot of upbeat, simple dance music with lyrics that are very basic," Chris McGowan, a co-author of the pop music history "The Brazilian Sound," said in a telephone interview from Brazil. "She's a consummate professional with a powerful, controlled voice that can soar over drums and polyrhythms. On the other hand, there is not much subtlety about her and no great artistry, just pure show business."Increasingly, the popularity of Ms. Sangalo, a former model with dark, expressive eyes; a husky voice; and an effervescent personality, extends beyond the stage and recordings. She appears regularly in television and print ads and on the cover of celebrity-oriented magazines, has been adopted by players on the national soccer team as their muse, has branched out into acting and has also shot fashion spreads for Brazilian Vogue and other magazines."She's not just a singer or entertainer, she's also a personality whom people here like a lot, someone who is admired and seen as a role model," Ricardo Pessanha, the other author of "The Brazilian Sound," said from Rio de Janeiro. "Women in particular are inspired by her, seeing her as a person who is strong, independent, happy, well-dressed and fulfilled, with a child and lots of money."Ms. Sangalo was born in the interior of the state of Bahia, in Juazeiro, also the birthplace of João Gilberto, one of the fathers of the bossa nova. As a child, the youngest of a brood of six, she listened to all kinds of Brazilian music, but after her family moved to Salvador, the capital of Bahia, the most musically rich state in a country obsessed with music, her horizons broadened to include reggae and American pop and soul music."I adore Sly and the Family Stone, George Clinton, Prince, Kool and the Gang and especially Stevie Wonder," she said. Normally, "I don't do covers, but I bring them into my music and translate them into the percussion lines."After Ms. Sangalo's father, a jeweler, died when she was a teenager, she began playing the bars of Salvador, accompanying herself on guitar and learning to project above the din and disarm potentially hostile crowds with humor and between-song patter. She joined a group called Banda Eva in 1993, had several hit records with them, and then ventured out on her own in 1999.
CAMBRIDGE, Mass. — On a recent Tuesday afternoon, Tod Machover , a professor of music and media at the Massachusetts Institute of Technology's Media Lab and head of the Opera of the Future group there, assembled his students in his glass-walled lab. The space was cluttered with computers, triangular-headed robots, colorful fabric-covered children's toys and digital control tables. A large metal chandelier hung suspended from the ceiling, its swooping curves and fanned-out spokes giving it the look of a mathematically minded jellyfish.But at this moment all eyes were fixed on the Cauldron, a computer program developed by Mr. Machover and his group, which was being remotely stirred, so to speak, in Edinburgh. On screens throughout the room, colorful blobs bearing the names of composers floated toward each other, pulsated, grew and shrank, as unseen participants voted by mouse click for a particular composer.Seated at a Yamaha piano, Tae Kim, a highly skilled improviser, turned the visual brew into sound, reacting to the changing composer bubbles on screen as he fluidly connected snippets of Mozart's "Magic Flute" with those from Bach's "Goldberg Variations" and Elgar's "Nimrod." Mr. Machover looked on with keen interest.The remotely controlled improvisation was part of the composition process of Mr. Machover's "Festival City," a symphonic work he was writing for — and partly with — the city of Edinburgh, and which will receive its premiere at a festival there on Aug. 27. The piece weaves in city sounds and quotations from the classical works most often performed at the Edinburgh International Festival over the years. Playful, inclusive and driven by a delight in the creative possibilities of computers, it well represents Mr. Machover's work."Everyone has a deep intuitive feel of what music is," Mr. Machover said during an interview in his office. "I went into composition because I think following your imagination and making things from scratch is the most wonderful thing. I'm an evangelizer about trying to convince everyone to do that as much as possible."The best known — and commercially most successful — outgrowth of that belief is the computer game Guitar Hero, which was developed by two of Mr. Machover's students who worked with him on Brain Opera, a project presented at the Lincoln Center Festival in 1996 that invited the public to make music on a range of fantastical "hyperinstruments." Those instruments spawned Symphony Painter, visual composition software for children, which Fisher-Price developed commercially in 2004, and its older brother, Hyperscore, a software program that lets users compose music through the manipulation of colors and shapes on a screen. Hyperscore, Mr. Machover said, did more than get schoolchildren to make music — it made them think deeply about the creative process."You can think about structure and narrative in a pretty sophisticated way pretty fast, what it means to take an idea and develop it," he said. "And you can have people work on things that are deeply important to them without necessarily verbalizing what they are."The experience with children led to work with adults with disabilities; here, too, the creative process, freed of the technical command of music theory, brought tangible benefits. Hyperscore's visual and musical stimulation even made it a useful tool in the early detection of Alzheimer's.It was not the only invention by Mr. Machover that had unintended consequences. When he developed a "hypercello" for Yo-Yo Ma in the 1990s that would alter the instrument's sound in reaction to the cellist's movements, Mr. Machover inadvertently solved a problem that had been bugging the car industry.At the heart of the hypercello — and other hyperinstruments he has developed since — are complex measurements of a musician's movements. The bow strokes, were analyzed for pressure, intensity, speed and other parameters. At first, Mr. Machover tried sending electricity from both ends of the bow through antennas.But when Mr. Ma played close to the frog (the bow end the musician holds), "the measurement went all crazy," Mr. Machover said. "Our students took it back to the lab and realized that his body was absorbing electricity from the sensor — we'd inadvertently invented a digital theremin."But then we realized that if you send electricity through someone's body and have the sensors on the outside, we now know where the hands are. It's a fantastic way of measuring the relationship between a person and the physical world. There were about 15 patents that came out of it relating to electric field sensing."Mr. Machover's work caught the eye of the NEC Corporation in Japan, a Media Lab sponsor, which had been frustrated by the difficulty of building infant car seats smart enough to know whether a child is strapped in properly."A light bulb went off for them," Mr. Machover said. "So they licensed it and now pretty much all baby seats in the world use that technology."
A couple of years ago, when the Odd Future major-domo Tyler, the Creator made his television performance debut on "Late Night With Jimmy Fallon," it was a transfixing eruption of untamed energy and nerve, pop savvy and mayhem, ending with his jumping on Mr. Fallon's back and grinning for the cameras, a misfit who just ran wild through the castle.Earlier this month, Odd Future's Earl Sweatshirt made his debut on the same show, performing "Burgundy," a low-key vamp from his major-label debut album "Doris" (Tan Cressida/Columbia), at an energy level somewhere below simmer. The song — its first half, anyway — is a strikingly naked admission of stress from an artist whose career path was largely shaped for him while he was at a boarding school in Samoa during Odd Future's ascent. "Afraid I'm going to blow it," he raps at one point. At another: "I'm 'bout to relish in this anguish."The contrast was emblematic of the difference between the first and second generations of the recent wave of Internet-facilitated hip-hop movements: the accessible traditionalist who seemed avant at first glance, giving way to the true eccentric who suddenly has a huge stage to shine on. Tyler, the Creator was able to kick down doors with his charisma and drive, as well as the intensity of his vision, which includes room for an outlandishly gifted solipsist like Earl Sweatshirt.A similar dynamic is at play in the rise of ASAP Ferg, a member of ASAP Rocky's extended crew, the ASAP Mob. Over the last couple of years, ASAP Rocky has reframed the sound of New York hip-hop, borrowing widely from other regional styles. But with his intense charm and his pinpoint-precise aesthetic choices, it was clear almost from the beginning that he was a mainstream rap star in cool-kid clothing.ASAP Ferg, though, is something quite different, as is clear from the new album "Trap Lord" (ASAP Worldwide/Polo Grounds/RCA). He's an experimentalist, the most sonically curious rapper since Nicki Minaj, and the possessor of an unusual, winning blend of aggression and artistry.Earl Sweatshirt and ASAP Ferg have little in common aesthetically, but structurally both reflect the influences hip-hop's progressives have been sorting through in recent years. Both are neck-deep in 1990s aesthetics — for Earl Sweatshirt, it's the murky, syllabically dense sounds of that generation's independent hip-hop; for ASAP Ferg, it's the flash of the mid-1990s crossover moment, combined with the regional styles that were taking shape during that era.Odd Future, from Los Angeles, and the ASAP Mob, from New York, developed in parallel, with essentially no overlap. Aesthetically, they're almost at odds. Odd Future favors skateboarding, tie-dye, and images of cats with their eyes blacked out. The ASAP Mob tends toward Rick Owens, gold teeth and silk. But both are modern hip-hop outfits in that they borrow widely, and catholically. Both crews were ready-made for the Tumblr generation of image-hounding rebloggers, understanding that building a music career in this era means more than releasing songs, it means delivering a fully packaged worldview. And neither crew would have gotten as far as it did without an intensely magnetic pathbreaker at the foreEarl Sweatshirt and ASAP Ferg are both less literal and more inventive than their crews' alphas. Their albums are risky and unpredictable, the result of loose cannons allowed to fire freely."Doris" may be Earl Sweatshirt's highest profile release, but it is also his most ambivalent. In his earliest songs — before Odd Future drew any notice, before Samoa — he was a wisecracking foulmouth interested in pushing the boundaries of language and taste. It made him something of an Internet legend, casting an impossibly long shadow.On "Doris," the wordplay is still intact, but much of the old angst is turned inward. On "Chum," he tells his story of going astray. "It's probably been 12 years since my father left, left me fatherless/And I just used to say I hate him in dishonest jest," he begins, going on to talk about his teenage misanthropy, his struggles to feel comfortable, his strained relationship with his mother. "Momma often was offering peace offerings/Think, wheeze, cough, scoff, and then he's off again."At the end of the song is a burst of self-aware self-loathing: "Been back a week and I already feel like calling it quits."
ANNANDALE-ON-HUDSON, N.Y. — While Igor Stravinsky successfully cultivated the air of a rootless cosmopolitan during his long stretch as the 20th century's most renowned composer, modern scholarship has firmly established his links to a broader tradition of Russian music and the debt many of his works owe to his culture and forebears. But with that facet of his multifarious career having been summarily addressed during the first weekend of this year's Bard Music Festival , there was plenty more to cover during three more jam-packed days and nights.The second weekend's agenda picked up chronologically where the first left off: Stravinsky asserting his place among a heady avant-garde milieu in Paris between the world wars, when a widespread rejection of Romanticism and Wagnerian heft was in the air. Friday's program, "Against Interpretation and Expression: The Aesthetics of Mechanization," emphasized works created during this period of New Objectivity, as it was termed in Weimar Germany, when Romanticism was eschewed for a confluence of neo-Classical lucidity, mechanical rigidity, the sharp angles of African art and American jazz, and sardonic cheek.Considering all this, Stravinsky's "Madrid" — written for mechanical pianola but presented in a two-pianos version by Stravinsky's son Soulima — was perhaps too blithe and evocative to represent the evening's thesis. The Sonata for Two Pianos, despite its formal rigor, had a similarly breezy aspect. The Concerto for Piano and Winds — played by Peter Serkin with an ensemble of professional and student players conducted by Leon Botstein — had a chillier modernist glint: "Bach with smallpox," as Prokofiev uncharitably described it.Between those works came Bartok's atmospheric Sonata for Two Pianos and Percussion; Hindemith's puckish Kleine Kammermusik; and Varèse's fervid "Octandre." The sharpest contrast was between two adjacent piano works: Messiaen's hyper-rigorous "Mode de valeurs et d'intensités," splendidly executed by Gilles Vonsattel, and George Antheil's unwittingly condescending "Sonata Sauvage," thunderously dispatched by Piers Lane."Stravinsky in Paris," on Saturday afternoon, offered his tender "Cinq doigts," refined "Duo Concertant" and spirited Octet for Wind Instruments, interspersed with pieces by fellow expatriates, like the Polish composer Alexandre Tansman's temperamentally Gallic Sonatina for Flute and Piano, and the Czech composer Bohuslav Martinu's dense, rustic String Quartet No. 4.Albert Roussel's "Sérénade," for flute, harp and string trio, offered a taste of authentic French lushness and finery. The Sonata for Violin and Double Bass by Arthur Lourié, a neglected Russian composer who served as Stravinsky's personal assistant and spokesman, bore the impression of Stravinsky's style. The standout performance was a compelling rendition of Prokofiev's Sonata for Two Violins, lent an arresting vigor by Jesse Mills and Harumi Rhodes.On Saturday evening, the scene shifted to the United States, where Stravinsky lived from 1939 until 1971. Settling in Southern California, he was surrounded by fellow European émigrés. The program, which featured Mr. Botstein and the American Symphony Orchestra, included Stravinsky's rumbustious 1941 reharmonization of "The Star-Spangled Banner," his elegant ballet "Jeu de Cartes" (1936), elegiac "Ode" (1943) and severe, majestic "Requiem Canticles" (1965-66).An example of Stravinsky's idiosyncratic embrace of 12-tone composition, "Requiem Canticles" benefited from ardent performances by the mezzo-soprano Rebecca Ringle, the bass-baritone John Relyea and the Bard Festival Chorale, whose work here and throughout the festival was exemplary. Paradoxically, Schoenberg, the father of serialism, fashioned a rapprochement with conventional tonality in his somber, dramatic "Kol Nidrei," potently narrated here by Erik Contzius.And Hanns Eisler, a Stravinsky associate whose radical politics saw him expelled from the United States in 1948, brought to his score for Alain Resnais's 1955 Holocaust documentary, "Night and Fog," a neutrality almost untenable to modern listeners accustomed to more emotionally suasive scoring. The film was shown during the performance; beforehand, Mr. Botstein invited audience members whose sensibilities might be offended by the documentary's shocking concentration-camp images to leave. (A small portion did.)The chorale had a program of its own on Sunday morning conducted by James Bagwell. "Stravinsky, Spirituality, and the Choral Tradition" included a trio of short Stravinsky pieces — "Pater Noster" and "Ave Maria," redolent of Russian Orthodox tradition, and the serial "Anthem: The Dove Descending Breaks the Air" — among contemporary works by Poulenc and Krenek, and influential pieces by Monteverdi, Gesualdo and Bach.Stravinsky's influence among American composers and thinkers, assured by his delivery of lectures at Harvard University in 1939 and 1940, was the subject of the Sunday afternoon chamber-music program. Bracketed by his uproarious "Circus Polka" (in a solo-piano arrangement winningly played by Reiko Aizawa) and taut, playful Septet were pieces by admirers like Elliott Carter, Walter Piston and Aaron Copland.Ellis Kohs, a Piston student, was represented by his stylish Sonatina for Violin and Piano, a 1948 work that Stravinsky urged his concertizing partner, the violinist Samuel Dushkin, to commission: proof that Stravinsky was not ungenerous with his influence. Outstripping everything for profundity and heft was Copland's Nonet, a dusky, pungent 1960 work for strings that should be better known.The festival's grand finale presented Stravinsky's mythological epics "Persephone" and "Oedipus Rex." A preconcert lecture by Tamara Levitz, the festival's scholar in residence, illuminated contradictory objectives among Stravinsky and his chief collaborators on "Persephone," the actress Ida Rubenstein, who commissioned the work, and the writer André Gide, who provided the libretto.Formative frictions aside, the account was seamless and ravishing, with striking performances by the tenor Sean Panikkar and the narrator Jean Stilwell. Grander still, "Oedipus Rex" benefited from lucid narration by the actress Kathleen Chalfant, stormy exhortations by Mr. Relyea and the larger-than-life presence of Jennifer Larmore as Jocasta.The soloists Gordon Gietz, David Baldwin and William Ferguson sang valiantly. The director Douglas Fitch, making his Bard debut, provided both works with deft, economical stage designs and evocative animated titles projected overhead. What resulted was an estimable triumph for Mr. Botstein and all involved.
At least, it was easy to believe that was the case when news came out in 2011 that he'd developed a granuloma near his vocal cords, treatment for which effectively rendered him mute. For months, he couldn't make a peep.In the years before that, Mr. Mayer had peeped plenty: kissing and sort of telling about his high-profile love life to TMZ; letting loose with a racial slur in a Playboy interview. Microphones seemed to call to Mr. Mayer, reach down his throat and disinter all manner of frisky, eyebrow-raising statements.Except on his albums, that is. As a musician, Mr. Mayer has almost always been sober, a blues-rock guitar wunderkind with a medium voice put in service of lightweight songs. Even as his tabloid life took on outsize proportions, he remained the heartthrob next door, safe and clean. It was tough to know which part of his personality was a front for the other.And now Mr. Mayer, 35, is talking again, but the dynamic has switched. In interviews, he is respectful, even a bit reluctant. And on "Paradise Valley" (Columbia), his unexpectedly impressive new album, he has quite a lot to say.Yes, Mr. Mayer is speaking about others on this, his sixth solo studio album, but let's table that for now: "Paradise Valley" is meant to represent his staking a claim to maturity, both as a musician and as a person.He does that by acknowledging past wrongs, obliquely. Variously he describes himself as "a runaway train," "a feather in a hurricane" and "the breeze," and he waxes nostalgic for "that peaceful wandering free I used to know."On "Dear Marie," he addresses someone who knew him before he learned to insert his foot in his mouth: "Remember me?/I'm the boy you used to love when you were 15/Now I wonder what you think when you see me in a magazine." Later, he moans, "I got my dream, but you got a family."Now it's Mr. Mayer's turn for stability. "Waitin' on the Day" is one of a few declarations of domesticity and calm on this album, which includes some of his strongest songwriting. Finally, Mr. Mayer sings, he's not running away, but rather holding on for the moment "when you'll love me all the way/when you take my side in every little firefight/when you hang your things and stay."That song goes hand in hand with the slightly dull lament of "I Will Be Found (Lost at Sea)," one of a few places where he renounces his rolling stone ways:It doesn't matter where you roamWhen no one's left to call you homeI might have strayed a bit too farOn "Wildfire," he virtually whispers, "You can rest your head/On my shoulder if you/Want to get older with me." (There's also a second "Wildfire," a wonderful 85-second interlude with Frank Ocean, who sings heartbreakingly about tough love.)Another part of growing up is moving past the overcompensations of your youth. Musically, he accomplishes that here with guitar playing that's emphatic but not ostentatious.One of Mr. Mayer's longstanding tensions has been between his urge to be virtuosic and his understanding that virtuosity is a crutch and a muzzle; his live shows have often toed the line between croon session and extended jam. But there's almost nothing complex about this album — there are blues, soul, maybe a hint of Bakersfield country on a cover of J. J. Cale's "Call Me the Breeze," but not much more. Mr. Mayer wants his feelings to be heard.Can you blame him? In 2010, Taylor Swift — a former paramour — released "Dear John." It was, by any measure, savage, one of the great romantic eviscerations in modern pop. Whether it was merited, only two people know, but certainly the glowing Ms. Swift couldn't help seeming justified in her angst against the oily Mr. Mayer.Mr. Mayer has returned the favor here. It doesn't matter whether "Paper Doll" is really about Ms. Swift; it only matters if people think it is.Unlike "Dear John," which wore Mr. Mayer's blues-rock DNA like armor, "Paper Doll" is unflashy, apart from the barbs: "You're like 22 girls in one/And none of them know what they're running from." A few of Mr. Mayer's taunts are cruel and clumsy: "Strap into some heels that hurt/You shoulda kept my undershirt" and "Sure was fun being good to you," which can be read with varying levels of ickiness.As if taking back the power from a 23-year-old pop icon weren't enough, Mr. Mayer ups the ante with "Who You Love," a duet with Katy Perry, his current girlfriend. The soft-rock arrangement is as warm as angora, and Ms. Perry sounds great, less shouty than on her own songs, singing in Mr. Mayer's defense:My boy, he ain't the one that I saw comingAnd some have said his heart's too hard to holdAnd it takes a little time, but you should see him when he shines'Cause you'd never want to let that feeling goWhether she knows it or not, Ms. Perry has been weaponized here, on a song that is from one angle a tender display of mutual affection, and, from another, a huge middle finger. Which one is it really? Let's wait and see if karma comes back for a return visit.
Even before the record business imploded, musicians regularly brainstormed about ways to get their work to potential listeners. But Carla Kihlstedt and Matthias Bossi were feeling more than the usual sense of urgency when they came up with a novel plan, a subscription Web site, Rabbit Rabbit Radio , to distribute new music by their latest band, Rabbit Rabbit."Every other conversation you had with a musician, the gist of it was: 'The business is falling apart. What are we going to do?' " Ms. Kihlstedt said by phone. "I can't tell you how many times I've worked really hard on a CD, for however many months or years, and then you hope the label does its job and gets it out, and that the stars align. But at a certain point, we got tired of complaining and began saying, 'O.K., what are we going to do?' "With some help from George Hurd, a composer and music administrator, they produced a blueprint for Rabbit Rabbit Radio and started the Web page in February 2012. The plan was to release a new song for subscribers on the first of every month. Along with the song, Ms. Kihlstedt and Mr. Bossi, who are married to each other, began posting video clips, slide shows and photo albums; information about the making of the track; essays on various subjects; and lists that might include links to clips by other musicians whose work they admire or notes about restaurants they have discovered on tour. Past releases can be explored in their online archives.Subscribers pay $2 to $5 a month. (There is no difference in access; it's a matter of paying what you can.)"In order to work," Mr. Bossi said, "we get so involved in preparing the material surrounding the song that it feels like we're putting together a magazine issue every month."So far, 18 months into the project, Rabbit Rabbit Radio has nearly 900 subscribers. Ms. Kihlstedt, 41, and Mr. Bossi, 34, who live in Dennis, Mass., said they would be happy if their subscription list grew by 500 listeners a year."Our goal is to be able to count on Rabbit Rabbit Radio as part of our monthly income," she said, noting that if you factor in Web hosting fees, site management costs and other incidentals — to say nothing of the time they put into recording the music and preparing other materials — they are barely making a profit. "But we're taking the long view and giving it three years."The first subscribers were drawn from followers of Mr. Bossi and Ms. Kihlstedt's other bands — the art-rock group Sleepytime Gorilla Museum and Causing a Tiger, an improvisatory ensemble — as well as fans of Ms. Kihlstedt's various ensembles, which include Tin Hat and 2 Foot Yard. (Ms. Kihlstedt also has a career as a classical composer; she performed her recent song cycle, "At Night We Walk in Circles and Are Consumed by Fire," with the International Contemporary Ensemble at Mostly Mozart on Saturday evening.)"We spread the initial word about the site in a very grass-roots kind of way," said Mr. Hurd, who manages the site. "We reached out to Carla and Matthias's fan base that they'd been amassing over the past couple of decades. We also created a series of original video commercials to promote each month's content, and asked our fans to share them far and wide."Rabbit Rabbit's material is varied — often lighter in spirit and more pop than Sleepytime Gorilla Museum's music, but sometimes driven and experimental as well. Sometimes a song reflects what they're up to during the month they recorded it. "Merci Vielmal," which they recorded while they were touring Europe as part of the guitarist Fred Frith's band Cosa Brava, is about crossing linguistic and geographical boundaries, and was recorded in trains and backstage at clubs in France and Switzerland. Their most recent offering, the laconic "Before the Sun," is a collaboration with the Chicago band Cheer-Accident.Thymme Jones, a member of Cheer-Accident, said that his group planned to adopt the Rabbit Rabbit Radio subscription model, starting in September."The instant I saw what they were doing," said Mr. Jones, who was a subscriber from the start, "the light bulb went off, and I thought, 'We're going to rip off this idea.' For us, it will be an interesting way of doing things differently after 25 years of releasing physical discs. And if my math is right, we have tons of people on our mailing list."John Schaefer, the host of several radio shows on WNYC that focus on new music, said the subscription model struck him as a plausible way for some musicians to supplement their performing income. "If Radiohead did this," Mr. Schaefer wrote in an e-mail, "it would go through the roof. If a local indie band did it, it might still be terrific, but I'm not sure how successful it would be. What makes it work, I think, for Carla and Matthias is that they have enough of a following to get them started and then the resulting word of mouth will hopefully sustain it."Ms. Kihlstedt and Mr. Bossi have looked at other models as well, including those like Kickstarter and ArtistShare, which encourage fans to provide money for musicians' projects. Ms. Kilhstedt used Kickstarter to raise money for a song cycle, "Necessary Monsters," and found the experience valuable, even though, she said, she went overboard with the gifts she sent to fans who contributed. (Contributors to that project, she said, were also given free subscriptions to Rabbit Rabbit Radio.) They are currently working with Fractured Atlas, an organization that helps independent artists raise money and organize their business affairs."We're about to release our 20th issue," Mr. Bossi said, pursuing his magazine analogy. "And we've gotten better at working fast and meeting our deadlines. This fall we're going to spend some time getting the word out in a bigger way, and pushing it to the next level."
It was an audacious act of Gilded Age New York. Jeannette Thurber, a wealthy patron trying to create not just a new American music school but, more broadly, a new American school of music, decided in 1891 to hire one of the greatest composers of the day: Antonin Dvorak.She offered him $15,000 a year — more than 25 times what he made at home in Prague — and promised him summers off. In exchange, she made him promise to work regular hours six days a week at her school, instruct "the most talented pupils only" and conduct concerts.After months of trans-Atlantic negotiations, they eventually struck the deal that brought Dvorak to New York City in 1892 for an eventful three-year sojourn to lead Mrs. Thurber's National Conservatory of Music of America — a period in which he composed some of his best work, including his American-inflected "New World" Symphony and Cello Concerto.The contract that brought Dvorak to the new world — six pages of gracefully handwritten clauses, bound by green ribbon — was recently discovered in some old files by one of Mrs. Thurber's great-grandsons after a death in the family. The Dvorak American Heritage Association, which purchased it for an undisclosed sum, will display it publicly for the first time on Sept. 8 at the Bohemian National Hall on East 73rd Street in Manhattan, to mark the composer's 172d birthday.If its convoluted language sometimes calls to mind another famous musical contract — it can be difficult to read all the discussions of the "party of the first part" without thinking of Groucho Marx's Otis B. Driftwood in "A Night at the Opera" — the document's enduring musical legacy makes it an object of fascination more than 120 years after it was signed."Jeannette Thurber really wanted him," said Majda Kallab Whitaker, the curator of the exhibition, which will be held in the hall's Dvorak Room, and will also display copies of negotiating letters. "It was part of her showmanship; I like to use the word impresario to describe her. She was really constantly enticing, manipulating, working with the press — the negotiation was not even complete and she was notifying the press that he'd accepted."Dvorak, then 50, was reluctant, though. His letters at the time mentioned the staggering $15,000 offer. "Should I take it? Or should I not?" he wrote in one. In another, he wrote: "What people say of America is very mixed."One of his six children, Otakar Dvorak, wrote decades later that it was his mother, Anna, who most wanted to go, to improve the large family's finances. In his book "Antonin Dvorak, My Father," Otakar Dvorak described how his mother forced a family vote at lunch one day — and how his mother acted swiftly after those in favor of the composer's going to New York carried the day."They went into the study and she gave him a pen to sign the contract," he wrote. "After he returned to the lunch table, Father declared that it was not definite as long as the contract was at home. So Mother took the contract and delivered it to the post office."Though the contract that will be displayed is signed at the bottom "Antonin Dvorak, Prague, 1892," the date at the top of the contract is not filled in — which Ms. Kallab Whitaker said indicated that the contract may indeed have been signed in haste, as Otakar suggested.The contract gives a clear sense of what both sides wanted. Mrs. Thurber sought an illustrious, esteemed figure to help put her new school on the map, and Dvorak strove to make sure he had time to compose.Mrs. Thurber promised to pay Dvorak $7,500 to the Bohemian Union Bank of Prague before his departure, and to give him the rest in installments. She promised that four months each summer would be at his "free and absolute disposal" — he spent the summer of 1893 in Spillville, Iowa, a Czech-speaking farm village — and promised him six steamer tickets, first class.Dvorak, for his part, agreed to spend three hours each day, six days a week, giving his "sole attention" to his duties as musical director of the conservatory. Mondays, Wednesdays and Fridays he was to spend two hours preparing students for concerts and to hold office hours for the remaining hour. On Tuesdays, Thursdays and Saturdays, he was to spend all three hours "giving instruction in composition and instrumentation to the most talented pupils only."And he promised to give up to six concerts a year.The exhibition serves as a reminder that Mrs. Thurber's late 19th-century vision of a music school was in many respects ahead of its time: it was open to female and black students and offered scholarships to gifted students. An African-American student there, Henry Thacker Burleigh, introduced Dvorak to spirituals, which informed his American works."I love Dvorak — he's the greatest — but in some ways the amazing hero is also Jeannette Thurber," said Michael Beckerman, a professor of music at New York University who wrote "New Worlds of Dvorak: Searching in America for the Composer's Inner Life." "If you wrote a novel about somebody that progressive in the 1880s and '90s, people would think you were making it up."Not everything worked out as planned. The Panic of 1893 soon ate into the Thurber family fortune, and the promised payments to Dvorak became irregular. Scholars believe that when Dvorak returned to Prague a few years later, he was still owed several thousand dollars.In the end, Ms. Kallab Whitaker said, the contract served both parties."Jeannette Thurber herself said that bringing Dvorak here was the greatest source of pride in her 35-odd-year career at the conservatory," she said. "And Dvorak, certainly, it's considered that he wrote some of his best pieces here, and he had to know that. He had ample time to explore his ideas here, and was prolific. He has to have been satisfied with it. He was anxious to get home, but he did a lot here."
The contract that brought Antonin Dvorak to New York to lead the National Conservatory of Music of America allowed him to earn more than 25 times what he had been earning in Prague, and opened a very fruitful period of his career in which he wrote some of his best-loved works, including the "New World" Symphony and the Cello Concerto. While its details have long been known to scholars, one of the original signed contracts — discovered recently by the great-grandson of the conservatory's founder, Jeannette Thurber, and purchased by the Dvorak American Heritage Association — will be displayed publicly for the first time on Sept. 8 at the Bohemian National Hall at 321 East 73rd Street in Manhattan.Following are excerpts from the handwritten contract:"That the said party of the first part hereby agrees and contracts to pay the said party of the second part a salary of the rate of fifteen thousand dollars a year for two years....""To give his sole attention during each eight months from the 23rd day of September to the 23rd day of May which shall form the scholastic year of the said party of the first part for three hours every day for the performance of the above mentioned duties. This arrangement of such duties and the hours which they shall respectively occupy on each day in every week to be in accordance with the following table.Monday. Two hours to be given to the preparation of the students for the performances and concerts of the said party of the first part and one hour for business consultation....Tuesday. The whole three hours to be devoted in giving instruction in composition and instrumentation to the most talented pupils only.Wednesday and Friday. The three hours to be occupied in the same manner as on Monday.Thursday and Saturday. The three hours to be occupied in the same manner as on Tuesday.""And it is mutually agreed that in further consideration of the salary before mentioned the said party of the second part shall conduct such number of concerts as he may be required not exceeding six in each scholastic year as above defined.""It is mutually agreed that the remaining four months in each year not forming part of the said scholastic year namely from the 23rd day of May to the 22nd day of September shall be at the free and absolute disposal of the said party of the second part and during such period the said party of the second part shall be in no way bound by the conditions and stipulations herein contained or otherwise by reason of this agreements."
Marian McPartland, who died on Tuesday at 95 , was an erudite jazz pianist whose career stretched back to the heyday of 52nd Street. But she will be best remembered for "Marian McPartland's Piano Jazz," the public radio show she hosted for more than 30 years, featuring duets and conversation with an array of musicians.Some of those guests, like Eubie Blake, were her elders, others her accomplished peers. And some grew up listening to the show. That was the case for Norah Jones, who was an aspiring jazz pianist in Texas before she moved to New York and made her name as a singer-songwriter.Ms. Jones, 34, first appeared on "Piano Jazz" shortly after releasing her debut album, "Come Away With Me" (Blue Note), which earned eight Grammy Awards. "It made me happy because I had listened to Marian for so long," she said. "My mom and her ended up becoming friends, writing letters for the last 10 years."Speaking by phone from her apartment in Brooklyn, Ms. Jones reflected on both Ms. McPartland and the show. Here are some excerpts:FIRST LISTEN My first exposure to Marian McPartland actually wasn't through "Piano Jazz." When I was 14 or 15, my mom took me to a free concert in Dallas with Marian and her trio. I was already into jazz and going to a performing arts school. But up until then I hadn't seen a lot of women perform jazz, certainly no women instrumentalists. And to see this lady who was my grandmother's age up there, playing with a piano trio, was just the coolest thing I'd ever seen.I went to school that week, and I had a teacher, Kent Ellingson, who had every "Piano Jazz" show on cassette. So I dubbed all the tapes, and listened to almost all of them.PLAYING WITH HER I was actually on her show twice. I like how she would play one song herself, one of the artist's songs. She did that with me; she played "Don't Know Why" and completely reharmonized it. And she'll let you play something, and then you get to play together.I was really nervous, but I wasn't nervous about her not being cool. She was just the most sweet, welcoming, motherly sweetheart: polite, very British, but very warm. I remember her smile after we would finish a tune. You can kind of hear it on the radio. She says something like "Uh! That was marvelous," and you could see it on her face. It was nice, after hearing those Marianisms on the radio, to be the recipient of one.My second "Piano Jazz" was at the Tanglewood Jazz Festival in 2003. That show was probably one of the bigger shows we had done at the time. Yesterday I listened to that recording, and I sing so differently now. I still thought of myself as a jazz musician then. I really played that music; I lived it and breathed it, even though my first album was not straight-ahead jazz.WHAT SHE WAS LIKE A friend was recently telling me about some show that Marian did where the guest wasn't very respectful, and she took care of business. So maybe we should add that she was a tough broad, too.Playing jazz as a woman, back in the day, I'm sure it was hard for her. And that fact that she found this thing that she's so good at, and became really successful at age 60, that's awesome. I think music can keep you young, if you never stop using your mind in that way. That's what was so cool about her. She seemed genuinely excited about every guest, even to the end.
At the Curtis Institute of Music in Philadelphia, as at many schools around the United States, students will flock to classes this fall to begin a new academic year. Though "flock" may not be the right word for Curtis, with its minuscule current student body of 171.Curtis, according to a U.S. News & World Report survey, is the most selective conservatory in the country, admitting a mere 4 percent of applicants. Its enrollment is held to a level just high enough to maintain a symphony orchestra, an opera program and specialties in fields like composition, conducting, keyboards and guitar. In its 89-year history, fewer than 4,250 students have attended the school.So what on earth is this new Curtis course with an enrollment of 25,000 and growing?Curtis has entered a partnership with Coursera — a company based in Mountain View, Calif., that calls itself the leading provider of "massive open online courses" — to present "Exploring Beethoven's Piano Sonatas," a series of video lectures by Jonathan Biss, the noted concert pianist and a Curtis alumnus and teacher. The course is free, like those of full-time Curtis students, who study tuition free, in line with the school's founding principles. It is also open to all, decidedly unlike other Curtis courses (if only for the moment, since the school will introduce a second Coursera class in October: "From the Repertoire: Western Music History Through Performance," taught by Jonathan Coopersmith and David Ludwig).Nor does the Beethoven course purport to represent Mr. Biss's actual work at Curtis, since what he teaches is performance, at a level far beyond the reach of most struggling pianists, on an individual basis. Instead, this is, in Mr. Biss's description, simply a course "designed for students of all backgrounds who have a desire to learn more about Beethoven and his world.""I expected that maybe 500 people would sign up," he said in a recent interview at his Upper West Side apartment. And that expectation would accord with conventional wisdom, that classical music aficionados, thought to be generally older and more conservative than the rest of the population, are, if not resistant to the Internet and the latest electronic gadgets, still not entirely comfortable with them.But Mr. Biss's 25,000 students indicate that this conventional wisdom may no longer hold, if indeed it ever did. There is also a fast-developing market in classical-music apps for iPads, notably those from the British app designer Touch Press, one of which has sold more than half a million copies. More on those later.Mr. Biss's preoccupation with Beethoven extends back to early childhood, when he would hear his parents, the violinist and violist Paul Biss and the violinist Miriam Fried, playing the composer's music. He himself came to the piano sonatas at 9 or so."There has been no time since then when I wasn't working on something for at least 10 minutes a day," he said.He also developed a particular fondness for the music of Schumann, which he performed throughout the 2012-13 season. He has recorded some of it and written about it, notably in a Kindle Single e-book from RosettaBooks, "A Pianist Under the Influence." "Most of what I know about myself," he wrote there, "I have learned from playing Schumann.""But when you play a few notes of Beethoven," Mr. Biss said the other day, "he wipes out everything else. I'm not saying it's a matter of greatness. It's the force of his personality."In any case, it is Beethoven whom Mr. Biss is now engaged with over the long term. He is recording all 32 piano sonatas for the Onyx label, which recently released the second of nine CDs and recorded the third. Around the time of the first release, early last year, Mr. Biss published his first Kindle Single, "Beethoven's Shadow," also from RosettaBooks.Mr. Biss's Curtis course consists of five weekly lectures of roughly an hour each. To judge from the first, the only one available for previewing, he speaks engagingly while sitting at the piano, smoothly folding in illustrations on the keyboard. There are periodic review questions, in keeping with Coursera's format, but no exams. Each student completing the course will receive a "statement of accomplishment."
It's pretty easy to spot Ty Segall's influences. This singer-songwriter, raised in Laguna Beach, Calif., has Neil Young's name tattooed on his right arm and the logo from Black Sabbath's 1972 album "Vol. 4" inked on his left. His music is likewise a recognizable combination of disparate sources, displaying a remarkable ability to synthesize different elements of pre-1980s rock — heavy '60s garage-rock riffs, harmonies that evoke the Beatles or early Tyrannosaurus Rex, and a punk velocity — into fresh and catchy pop nuggets.Though only 26, Mr. Segall is a veteran of the Bay Area's garage-rock scene, having issued more than a dozen albums since 2008, including three in 2012 alone. But his new album, "Sleeper," released last week on Drag City Records, reveals a markedly different approach, eschewing the roaring maelstrom of his previous work in favor of gentle psychedelic folk. "Sleeper" is his most personal collection, recorded in his bedroom soon after his father died of cancer and his subsequent estrangement from his mother. This week Mr. Segall will perform these new songs in an acoustic setting at the Music Hall of Williamsburg and the Bowery Ballroom.On a recent afternoon, Mr. Segall spoke by phone with Mike Rubin from his new home in Los Angeles, where he moved from San Francisco after recording "Sleeper." These are excerpts from the conversation.Q. "Sleeper" is acoustic, more stripped down than your other work. Why?A. There wasn't any intention behind it, which is the weird thing. It's not like I set out to do an acoustic or mellow thing. It kind of just fit what was happening. It wasn't like a decision, it was kind of more of a response.A song like "Crazy" sounds so delicate, almost naked compared to raucous earlier songs like "Skin" or "Happy Creeps."That one was one of the weirdest ones for me, because I strummed those chords and started singing that chorus within four or five minutes, and then went into my room, and the verses were just on the spot. It kind of almost wasn't a process, that song.It was more just therapeutic, really. It just was necessary for me to put that out there, recording a song or writing it down on a piece of paper to get it out of my head and body, so I could move on to other things.Has your mother heard the record?I don't know. I haven't given it to her. I haven't talked to her. I'm sure she'll probably hear it. I hope she hears it, 'cause she needs to wake up and change what she does with her life. I'm a bit bitter about that relationship. I don't want to go into details, 'cause that's not classy. That's another reason I was like, "Should I put this out?" I'm directly calling out my mother and saying "Crazy" is about her. You only have one mother, technically, so that's pretty intense, but that's the thing. If she hears it and decides that she wants to change what she's doing with her life and wants to rethink what's going on, then there you go, that's great.Have you played these songs live? What's the reaction been?I was pretty freaked out that it would go horribly wrong, but it's been really, really cool that people are down to try something new out with you. It's funny, in Santa Cruz, people were stage-diving to acoustic songs.Why have you been so prolific?That's just what I do. Half-needing to do it as an exercise of the mind, and half an exercise of a daily routine. That's my job. When I was younger, it was more like: "I don't know how long I'm going to be doing it for. I need to do as much as I can, because who knows when my luck will run out?" It was more like a race, but now it's different. It's an exercise, therapy, my daily vitamins, my daily dose, and it's kind of necessary for my brain. Dinner tastes better when you record a song. Just like when you work a hard day at a job, you know? Dinner's going to taste better. It's like any other routine. It's good for your brain and your body.
SOUTH YARMOUTH, Mass. — There's a moment in "Learning to Listen: The Jazz Journey of Gary Burton," an autobiography due out on Sept. 3 from Berklee Press, that depicts the author's earliest encounter with Miles Davis. It happened at a summer jazz festival in Mr. Burton's home state, Indiana, and probably could have gone a little better.The year was 1959. Mr. Burton was 16, a precocious vibraphonist enrolled in the first Stan Kenton Jazz Camp. Davis was playing the festival with his sextet, which had just made the album "Kind of Blue." "As he paced around on the grass behind the stage," Mr. Burton writes, "I snapped his photo with my Brownie camera, flashing the bulb in his face, to which he simply replied, sarcastically, 'Thanks, kid.' "It's only a passing exchange in the book, but it captures something essential about Mr. Burton. "I've always been something of an outsider," he said recently, within the first two minutes of an interview on Cape Cod. "I came from a farm town, playing an instrument most people don't even know. I was this young kid, and all the members of the bands I played in were in their 40s. And I was gay, although I hadn't quite figured it out at the time."What's emphatically true of Mr. Burton, who also just released an excellent album, "Guided Tour" (Mack Avenue), is that he now fits the profile of an ultimate insider and savors his stature. He has won seven Grammy Awards, sharing all but one with the pianist Chick Corea. (They received their most recent this year.) He played a pioneering role in the birth of jazz-rock. His bands have been incubators for important younger artists, including the guitarist Pat Metheny. During a more than 30-year affiliation with the Berklee College of Music in Boston, he helped change the game for jazz education, which has in turn transformed the broader landscape of the music.Partly as a result, the sound of jazz's ascendant mainstream — a music at once harmonically sophisticated, rhythmically streamlined and un-self-consciously earnest about blending traditions and source materials — bears Mr. Burton's influence. "Most young players today aren't coming from one school or another; they're coming from a wider place," said the saxophonist Joe Lovano, who holds the Gary Burton Chair in Jazz Performance at Berklee. "Gary was always coming from that wide place."Mr. Burton, who turned 70 this year, lives in Fort Lauderdale, Fla. He has done little to cultivate the air of mystique of Miles Davis and other major figures in jazz. His is an approachable sort of enlightenment, easy to grasp and easier to take for granted. "My upbringing was always: Be nice, be courteous, try to make people feel good," he said. Often when he meets people for the first time, they're surprised to learn that he's a jazz musician. "You look like a schoolteacher," they tell him."Learning to Listen" sheds new light on his unusual entree to jazz. He happened to grow up in a town with a marimba and vibraphone teacher, and he began lessons at the age of 6. His family developed a traveling act around him, playing state fairs and rural talent shows. (Among his tricks was a version of "Flight of the Bumblebee," jackhammered on the marimba while blindfolded.)By his teens, Mr. Burton had become a fixture at local honky-tonks and jam sessions. One of the players he impressed was the saxophonist Boots Randolph, who arranged an introduction to Hank Garland, the great Nashville session guitarist.Garland, who had been thinking about making a jazz album with vibraphone, invited Mr. Burton to spend a summer in Nashville. They nearly played the Newport Jazz Festival that summer, with a contingent including the guitarist Chet Atkins (a riot threw a wrench in that plan), and the jazz album that Garland eventually released, "Jazz Winds From a New Direction," became a minor classic. Through the interventions of Atkins, Mr. Burton landed his own record deal with RCA. So it happened that two of his first jazz mentors were, in fact, not jazz musicians but legends of country music.He made his debut album, "New Vibe Man in Town" (1961), while studying at Berklee. And it wasn't long before he found top-flight work as a sideman, first with the pianist George Shearing and then with the tenor saxophonist Stan Getz, who had just recorded "Getz/Gilberto," another album of remarkable synthesis between jazz and a different musical tradition. Its crossover success meant that Mr. Burton soon found himself on tour with one of the hottest groups in jazz.
SECAUCUS, N.J. — The quest for the lost Benjamin Britten score — an orchestration of Chopin piano music he made in 1941 for the ballet "Les Sylphides" — had moved to a warehouse here.The searchers combed through the cavernous building, where American Ballet Theater's sets and boxed-up tutus hibernate between productions. A gryphon-headed boat from "The Sleeping Beauty" was rolled aside, revealing some old steamer trunks labeled "Agnes de Mille" and, perhaps less intriguingly, the minutes of long-concluded board meetings."I think it might be in here," David LaMarche, Ballet Theater's conductor and music administrator, said as he pulled a clear plastic box off a lower shelf. Soon he and David Carp, the orchestra's librarian, were rummaging through pages of an uncredited orchestration of "Les Sylphides," looking for the telltale signs suggesting that it could, indeed, be the instrumental parts of the lost Britten version.The eureka moment came when they found the second trumpet part. There, right on the top of the page, a set of neat block letters proclaimed: "ARR. BY BENJAMIN BRITTEN." The part, which matched an unlabeled conductor's score discovered earlier this summer, suggested that Britten's long-lost version might have been found.Now Ballet Theater is waiting for Britten experts to weigh in on the rediscovered score. If it is deemed to be Britten's — as some who have seen it say appears likely, though not every link in the chain of custody is strong — Ballet Theater plans to use it when the company brings "Les Sylphides" to the David H. Koch Theater this fall, reviving it just in time for Britten's centenary season."We're very excited," said Richard Jarman, the general director of the Britten-Pears Foundation, which will examine the score and has offered to recreate any missing parts for Ballet Theater's orchestra from the recently found conductor's score. "We just published a catalog of Britten's works, and 'Sylphides' is mentioned as missing. If we can restore this work, I think it would be great."The hunt for the lost Britten score, which disappeared a few decades ago, was set in motion by David Vaughan, the dance historian, who fondly recalled seeing Ballet Theater perform "Les Sylphides" to the Britten orchestration in London in the mid-1950s. Several years ago, after Ballet Theater danced "Sylphides" to an arrangement by Roy Douglas, Mr. Vaughan wrote Mr. LaMarche and asked what had become of the Britten version.His query set off the chain of events that eventually led to Secaucus."It's been an interesting sort of detective story," said Mr. Vaughan, 89. "There were all these red herrings.""Les Sylphides" is an abstract, dreamlike, Romantic ballet set to orchestrations of Chopin piano music that was a basic part of the repertory for much of the 20th century.It was called "Chopiniana" when Michel Fokine first choreographed it in St. Petersburg in 1907, to music orchestrated by Glazunov. Another version with that title, from 1908, included new choreography by Fokine and orchestration by Maurice Keller, has lived on in Russia. Diaghilev renamed it "Les Sylphides" when the Ballets Russes performed it in Paris in 1909, using a new orchestration by several composers, including Stravinsky. Mr. Douglas, a British composer and arranger who once said he had been "disgusted and horrified by the many bad orchestrations of Chopin's music for the ballet 'Les Sylphides,' " made his own orchestration in 1936, which is now commonly used.When the hunt for the Britten score began, even its origins were shrouded in mystery.Some publications suggested, erroneously, that it had been commissioned by Lincoln Kirstein, who had founded the School of American Ballet, and who went on to found New York City Ballet, with George Balanchine. (Around that same time, Kirstein did commission some Rossini orchestrations from Britten for a Balanchine ballet, "Divertimento.")That theory was debunked this month when Daisy Pommer, a librarian at the Jerome Robbins Dance Division of the New York Public Library for the Performing Arts, unearthed the original Jan. 29, 1941, contract, in which Ballet Presentations Inc., which presented Ballet Theater performances in those days, offered Britten $300 for a "Sylphides" orchestration, and all future rights to it."It is understood that Mr. Britten will reorchestrate this ballet in accordance with the instructions received at this office the other day and that he will deliver the score on February 8th at the latest," the contract stated.The work had its premiere a few days after Britten's deadline, at a Thursday matinee on Feb. 13. "Specially orchestrated for Ballet Theater by Benjamin BRITTEN," the program read. A program for the season said that "the sharp, incisive qualities of the music of Mr. Britten corresponded in our opinion to what the music of Chopin required."Tracking down the music was not easy. A listed publisher of the orchestration had no record of it when Mr. LaMarche called.
The World Music Institute has laid off its longtime publicist and co-founder, Helene Browning, because of declining donations, Karen Sander, the group's executive director, said on Tuesday.News of Ms. Browning's departure came as the institute was announcing the lineup for its 29th season. Anoushka Shankar, Angelique Kidjo and Diego el Cigala are among the musicians featured in four concert series and three weekend festivals, starting in October.Ms. Browning's husband, Robert, founded the institute with her in 1985 and built it into a widely copied and influential force in New York cultural circles. He was the dry but thoughtful executive director, she was the hard-driving publicist, and they ran the organization together for more than two decades, winning praise from fellow arts presenters, musicians and critics for advancing the cause of traditional world music nationwide.When Mr. Browning retired in 2011 at the age of 70 and Ms. Sander took the reins, Ms. Browning stayed on as publicist, saying she wanted to keep working for at least three more years.But Ms. Sander said in an interview that a steady decline in donations had squeezed the institute's annual $1.1 million budget in recent years. This summer, she said, she was forced to cut two of the six full-time staff members and reduce the hours of part-time workers. She said the institute could no longer afford a full-time publicist and needed to hire a full-time fund-raiser instead. The decision to ask Ms. Browning to leave, she said, was "a tough one.""It's unfortunate we had to cut back on staffing; nobody wants to do that," she said. "But the best way to honor the legacy the Brownings created is to move the organization forward and sustain the organization."Ms. Browning did not respond to telephone and e-mail messages seeking comment. On Sunday she sent an e-mail to reporters, saying: "As you might have heard, I am no longer with World Music Institute, the organization I co-founded and worked with for 28 years. I will be involved in various music production projects in the future."The institute's season opens on Oct. 4 at Symphony Space in Manhattan with Christine Salem, the folk singer from Réunion Island in the Indian Ocean, who is known for her efforts to preserve the maloya, a nearly extinct music rooted in the work songs of the island's African slaves. The season will end on June 21 with Farruquito, the celebrated flamenco dancer, appearing at the Skirball Center for the Performing Arts on the New York University campus.As in past years, the nonprofit institute's season includes a series of three concerts devoted to classical Indian music. Ms. Shankar, the sitarist and composer, will lead off the Masters of Indian Music series on Nov. 16 at the Skirball Center.A full schedule can be found at worldmusicinstitute.org, the institution's Web site.
During a symposium in Juilliard's Peter Jay Sharp Theater on Wednesday afternoon, audience members listened intently to a 1947 recording of the tenor Richard Tucker singing the Jewish prayer "Yiru Eineinu," his voice hauntingly expressive and soulful as he sang the melismatic music."It was as if the Met Opera became a synagogue, and I mean that in the best possible way," the tenor Neil Shicoff said during the symposium, explaining how Tucker transferred the emotion of his cantorial singing to his operatic performances. "There was always intensity and heart," Mr. Shicoff, whose father was a cantor, added.This year the city is celebrating the birth centenary of Tucker, who sang dozens of leading roles at the Metropolitan Opera in more than 700 performances. His remarkable voice, legacy and Jewish heritage were the focus of a panel discussion hosted by the soprano Renée Fleming and featuring Mr. Shicoff, Barry Tucker (one of Tucker's sons) and Justice Ruth Bader Ginsburg, an opera enthusiast who heard the elder Mr. Tucker many times throughout his career. The event was part of a lineup of activities on Wednesday, designated Richard Tucker Day by Mayor Michael R. Bloomberg.Richard Tucker was born in Brooklyn on Aug. 28, 1913, to parents from Eastern Europe. He held full-time cantorships in the Bronx and Brooklyn and also worked as a salesman for the Reliable Silk Company in Manhattan's garment district. He entered the Met's "Auditions of the Air" in 1941 and lost. Shortly afterward, Edward Johnson, then the Met's general manager, heard Tucker during an unannounced visit to the Brooklyn Jewish Center and was so impressed that he offered him another chance to audition: Tucker made his Met debut in 1945 as Enzo in "La Gioconda."Tucker became a house mainstay, widely admired for the warmth and passion of his sweetly lyrical voice — with its tight vibrato, impeccable, consistent technique and ringing top notes — and the excitement he brought to his interpretations. Justice Ginsburg, who first heard Tucker sing at the old Met, cited an oft-repeated criticism that Tucker couldn't act. "But he acted with his voice," she said.Two recently released box sets from Sony celebrate the power and intensity of Tucker's voice in religious, popular and operatic selections. A 14-CD set includes six discs of sacred and secular Jewish music, including a potent one titled "Cantorial Jewels" that highlights the Jewish prayer heard at the symposium.The other eight releases feature Tucker singing Broadway hits and Neapolitan songs, among others. A 10-CD set of opera excerpts ranges from studio sessions in 1947 to his 1967 "Celeste Aida," featuring along the way many of the lyric French and Italian roles with which he cemented his reputation.On one of the discs, all of which include original LP sleeves, the notes read, "American audiences and critics, traditionally prejudiced against domestic tenors as against domestic wines, have had to change their tune."Ms. Fleming said she is often asked, "Who are all the great American tenors?," to which she responds, "Very few." An important part of Tucker's legacy is a foundation established in his name in 1975 to offer emerging American artists awards, grants and performance opportunities.Recipients of awards from the Richard Tucker Music Foundation, a reliable scout of vocal talent, include a who's who of major American singers, including Ms. Fleming, Stephanie Blythe, Matthew Polenzani, Patricia Racette and Joyce DiDonato, all of whom are to perform at the annual Richard Tucker gala at Avery Fisher Hall in November.More recent winners of Tucker awards, including the tenor Stephen Costello and the soprano Ailyn Pérez, performed on Wednesday evening at the Naumburg Bandshell in Central Park, accompanied by Brian Zeger. In addition to the usual perils of outdoor performances, the singers had to contend with the rain and — at the start and end of the program — the loud music and cheers from another concert taking place near the bandshell.Nonetheless, a substantial crowd, sitting under umbrellas, responded enthusiastically. Tucker was a much-admired Verdi interpreter at the Met, so it seemed fitting that the program included several arias by the composer. After a brief introduction from Ms. Fleming, Mr. Costello and Ms. Pérez (who are married) opened the program with the Act I duet from Verdi's "Rigoletto." Mr. Costello also offered a stellar rendition of "Parmi veder le lagrime" from "Rigoletto," and Ms. Pérez concluded the event (which was cut short to accommodate the less-than-ideal conditions) with an expressive "Ah, fors'e lui" from "La Traviata." Erin Morley, the recipient of a career grant from the Tucker foundation, demonstrated nimble coloratura in Olympia's aria from "Tales of Hoffmann," and the bass-baritone Brandon Cedel impressed with "Vi Ravisso" from "La Sonnambula."The event also provided a welcome chance to hear the mezzo-soprano Jamie Barton, who won the prestigious Cardiff Singer of the World competition this year, performing selections including "Acerba voluttà" from Cilea's "Adriana Lecouvreur." In her rendition of that aria at the band shell, she impressed soggy listeners with her earthy low notes, alluring dark-hued timbre and expressive top range.All these young singers have undoubtedly benefited from the Tucker foundation support and name, although during the afternoon symposium Mr. Shicoff said that even with a letter of recommendation from Tucker, he wasn't accepted into Juilliard.At the end of a panel that was rich with anecdotes about the tenor as artist, colleague and family man, Barry Tucker called his father's life a "rags to riches story." He said his father "never forgot who he was" and "was a very strong person about religion and morals."The symposium concluded with a poignant recording of Tucker singing Canio in "Pagliacci," filmed just a few months before his death at 61 from a heart attack.
He brokered peace in Northern Ireland and spent two frustrating years as an envoy in the Middle East. Now George J. Mitchell, the former senator from Maine, is trying to bring peace to the Midwest, as the mediator in the Minnesota Orchestra's bitter labor dispute.The acrimony there will test his diplomacy skills as the orchestra hurtles toward a Sept. 15 deadline that is likely to determine its fate, and whether it is able to retain its acclaimed music director, Osmo Vanska.The orchestra's musicians have been locked out by management since they rejected deep pay cuts last October. The festering dispute silenced the ensemble's entire 2012-13 season, forced the cancellation of a September recording session for its Grammy-nominated Sibelius cycle, and could force it to cancel a pair of crucial Carnegie Hall concerts in November.Mr. Vanska has threatened to resign if the Carnegie concerts are canceled. To ensure that the musicians are ready for Carnegie, the orchestra and Mr. Vanska said this week, the players would have to be back at work for the proverbial practice, practice, practice by Sept. 30. For that to happen, the orchestra said, the sides would need to reach an agreement by Sept. 15.The lingering dispute has pained music lovers and dealt a blow to the psyche of Minneapolitans, silencing their beloved local orchestra just as it was gaining in stature nationally, and calling into question the idea of "Minnesota nice" with its hardball tactics."This has been a real catastrophe," Mayor R. T. Rybak of Minneapolis said in an interview, explaining that it has deeply upset people in a region that takes the arts seriously, and hurt business at local restaurants and hotels. "It's shaken the confidence of the civic community in an institution that has survived depressions, wars and everything else."Mr. Mitchell was called in to mediate this summer after key political figures, including Gov. Mark Dayton of Minnesota, urged both sides to find a resolution.A proposal Mr. Mitchell put forward to bring the players back to work — for two months at their old salaries, and for two more months at a 6 percent cut — was accepted by musicians but rejected by management, which said it would widen the deficit without guaranteeing a full season. (Mr. Mitchell declined a request for comment.)The standoff began last year, when the orchestra, whose endowment suffered in the recession and which has been running deficits, proposed a contract cutting the base pay of the musicians by nearly a third, to $78,000 a year from $113,000. (The average pay would have been higher.) When the players rejected that, after about six months of talks, but did not offer a counterproposal, management locked them out when the contract expired on Oct. 1.Since then, the state of the negotiations might best be described as minimalism interrupted by loud bursts of dissonance.Management insists that costs must be curbed substantially to make the orchestra sustainable, while musicians warn that deep cuts could change its very nature.Michael Henson, the president and chief executive of the orchestra, said in an interview that he was "puzzled and amazed" that a resolution had proved elusive, and that the institution could not afford to keep running deficits and sap its endowment."There's no point having a wonderful orchestra that buries its head in the sand and has to declare bankruptcy in three years' time," he said. "Part of what we're trying to do is be responsible stewards for the long-term benefit of the musicians, to ensure that they have continuity of employment."But musicians warn that this attempt to fix the orchestra's finances could effectively destroy it if the ensemble loses another season, recording deals, longtime musicians and, very possibly, its music director.Timothy Zavadil, a clarinetist who is the chairman of the musicians' negotiating committee, said that the orchestra had become a draw for talented musicians."Our concern now is that, with the proposals that our board and management are putting forth — the drastic reductions in pay, the work rules changes — we will lose our status as a destination orchestra," he said. "The conditions that led us to develop our signature sound will be lost if this turns into an orchestra where people want to spend a few years while they're practicing to move on to another one."As the musicians saw their paychecks stopped, some collected unemployment, some played local concerts, and others retired or took leaves to play with other orchestras. More than 20 have left the ensemble over the last two years; some have taken temporary jobs that will allow them to return, but others may have left for good. The musicians posted a photograph of the orchestra, with the members who left whited out, on a Web page that calls them the "ghosts" of the lockout.Mr. Henson, the orchestra president, said that any musicians who do not return can be replaced. "When we get up and running again," he said, "as other orchestras in this position have, we will advertise for the jobs that we need to replace, and I'm sure we will get an astonishing bunch of individuals who will want to perform and live in this great city."Adding to the discord is a $52 million renovation of Orchestra Hall in Minneapolis that has just been completed. Though the construction was done with funds raised for that purpose, it has left some questioning the expense as management tries to cut pay. Mr. Zavadil said that "the juxtaposition of being locked out while they are doing a $52 million building renovation is what has really, I think, incensed our fans."There was some movement this week when management offered to give the players two months at their old salaries, and then two years with a cut in base pay of nearly a quarter. The musicians said the offer resembled one they recently rejected. But the offer, made outside of Mr. Mitchell's mediation process, may spur new talks.Mayor Rybak recalled a concert he helped arrange in February to celebrate the orchestra's Grammy nomination for its recording of Sibelius's Second and Fifth Symphonies."The beauty of it was there were musicians, board members, community members, focused on what we need to do more of: the art," he said. "I just hope that everybody who's negotiating hears that Sibelius recording in the background, and says that that great sound shouldn't be shut off because grown-ups can't solve a problem."
MERIDEN, N.H. — The singer, songwriter and multi-instrumentalist Will Sheff founded the indie-rock band Okkervil River in Austin, Tex., in 1998 and now lives in Brooklyn. But memories of his years growing up in this bucolic New England hamlet in the 1980s have never been far from his mind, so when it came time to make a new CD, he decided to return home — in song and in person.The result is "The Silver Gymnasium," a song cycle about the joys and uncertainties of childhood. Full of compositions addressing friendship, preadolescent awkwardness and the mystery of the ordinary, it is a record written and performed in a style meant to evoke, Mr. Sheff said, songs he liked when he was 10 and listening to Casey Kasem's "American Top 40" as his parents drove to church on Sunday mornings."I always knew I wanted to write about this town again in a big way," Mr. Sheff, 37, said in an interview at the campus of the Kimball Union Academy, where his father taught and on whose grounds the family lived. "There is something about childhood that is magical and special, despite the fact that it gets revisited in art in ways that are often very twee or precious, which is something I really wanted to avoid."The new CD, recorded in Texas and Brooklyn and to be released on Tuesday, stands in sharp contrast to the band's previous record, "I Am Very Far" (2011), which Mr. Sheff produced himself and describes as "a bristling, pushing-people-away kind of record." This time, he decided, it was important that both music and lyrics be more accessible.That meant bringing in an outside set of ears to prevent the record from becoming too hermetic: the producer John Agnello, who has worked with Sonic Youth, Dinosaur Jr., Son Volt and Kurt Vile. At their first meeting, Mr. Sheff and Mr. Agnello bonded over their common fondness for '60s bands like the Kinks, and quickly agreed on the approach they would take."We talked a lot about process, how you record live, don't fix everything, minimize overdubs, do your arrangements beforehand and try to stay analog and away from the grid," Mr. Agnello said. "We also talked about taking the wasted space out of songs, making them more immediate to people's taste, and how songs need choruses."Mr. Sheff's work has always displayed a literary bent — "Okkervil River" is the title of a short story by Tatyana Tolstaya — so he didn't flinch when it was suggested to him that "The Silver Gymnasium" was a kind of aural bildungsroman. In response, he rattled off a list of authors, like Proust and Faulkner, and books, like Roald Dahl's "Danny, the Champion of the World" and Daniel Pinkwater's "Lizard Music," that were "things I was trying to recall with this record."Jonathan Meiburg was an early member of Okkervil River who now leads the band Shearwater. He remains a friend and neighbor of Mr. Sheff's and performs on the new record, which he describes as "an elaborate and stylized exercise in nostalgia.""There has always been a really powerful element of that in Will's music, going back to the first Okkervil record," which, he pointed out, included a song called "Listening to Otis Redding at Home During Christmas." "Will can be acerbic and witty, but he also has a very tender and sentimental side, and when that comes out, as it does here, he produces some of his best stuff.""The Silver Gymnasium" is the band's first recording for its new label, ATO Records, whose other artists include My Morning Jacket, Alabama Shakes, Drive-By Truckers and Gogol Bordello. Mr. Sheff said he was drawn to ATO because it "tapped into a different kind of audience" from his own, and when Jon Salter, the company's general manager, first heard a demo version of the record, he noted an atmosphere that he likened to "what summer camp felt like when the breeze came through, something everyone can relate to.""I feel like this is their 'Yankee Hotel Foxtrot' moment," Mr. Salter continued, referring to the CD that transformed Wilco from a group with a cult following into a commercial success. "I've kept an eye on this band as it evolved and knew it had a good pre-existing fan base, so my attitude was, 'Why don't we try to expand on that?' "The new CD comes with an elaborate map of Meriden, created by the artist William Schaff, a longtime collaborator. Mr. Sheff said that the cartographic insert, in the style of a child's treasure map and showing local landmarks mentioned or evoked in the songs, so inspired him that he had it blown up and brought into the recording studio so that he could look at it while the songs were being recorded.Mr. Schaff said, "Will is a true storyteller, with a wonderful sense of detail, and he's definitely inviting people into his life in a way he's never really done before.""He came to me really prepared for this," he added, "with thick folders of stuff about Meriden and the things he experienced as a child. Since I also grew up in New England in the 1980s, all it took to transport me back to a certain world was for Will to mention VHS tapes he saw or the old Cutlass Wagon his family had."Mr. Sheff is so enamored of the project that he has begun making what he envisions as a 30-minute film based on one of the tracks on the new CD, "Down Down the Deep River." He shot for five days here early this month, the first time he had spent any extended period of time in Meriden since graduating from high school, and plans to return in October and December to take advantage of the change of seasons."This film has become a weird passion for me," he said. "I've never directed before, so this is kind of me indulging desires from my childhood, wanting to be a filmmaker or a special-effects designer. I can't make 1987 come back, but this is the closest thing I can get to that."The day before the shoot began, he took a visitor on a walking tour of Meriden, population 524, pointing out locations that will appear in the film or on the map or are otherwise significant to him. He stopped at the two houses on Main Street in which he lived as a boy; the local Grange Hall; the library that was "my refuge as a kid"; the woods where he once hunted orange newts; and the church he used to sneak into and play the organ.Of course, there also had to be a visit to the real Silver Gymnasium, on campus. It turns out to be a standard-issue high school athletic center, or so it seemed to an outsider, but one that seemed magical to Mr. Sheff because of a curtain that concealed a stage, employed for plays and as a hiding place."It makes me want to be a kid again," he remarked afterward. "That's how I want everyone to feel."
DETROIT — On the lawn outside Motown Records' former headquarters here, a historical marker honors the pivotal role that the song "Money (That's What I Want)" played in building the Motown empire. With its hypnotic piano riff and unabashedly materialistic refrain, "Money," recorded in 1959, was the first national success for the label that came to be known as "Hitsville U.S.A.," giving the fledgling company credibility and a vital infusion of cash.Over the years, "Money" has generated millions of dollars in publishing royalties. It was recorded by both the Beatles and the Rolling Stones, has been widely used in films and advertisements and is now featured in "Motown: The Musical" on Broadway. But the pianist and singer Barrett Strong, who first recorded "Money" and, according to records at the United States Copyright Office in Washington, was originally listed as a writer of the song, says that he has never seen a penny of those profits.Unbeknown to Mr. Strong, who also helped write many other Motown hits, his name was removed from the copyright registration for "Money" three years after the song was written, restored in 1987 when the copyright was renewed, then removed again the next year — his name literally crossed out.Documents at the copyright office show that all of these moves came at the direction of Motown executives, who dispute Mr. Strong's claim of authorship. Berry Gordy Jr., Motown's founder, declined requests for an interview, but his lawyers contend that the original registration resulted from a clerical error, and that Mr. Strong passed up numerous opportunities to assert his claim.Mr. Strong said he learned of the alterations only late in 2010 and has been struggling ever since to have his authorship officially reinstated. At stake: his ability to share in the lucrative royalties from the song's use. But his efforts have been blocked by a provision of copyright law that says he relinquished his rights by failing to act in a timely fashion to contest Motown's action.Mr. Strong's predicament illustrates a little-known oddity in the American copyright system, one that record and music publishing companies have not hesitated to exploit. The United States Copyright Office, a division of the Library of Congress, does not notify authors of changes in registrations, and until recently the only way to check on any alterations was to go to Washington and visit the archives personally."For 50 years, I had no idea about any of this," Mr. Strong, 72, said in an interview here, in which he acknowledged his lack of business acumen. "It was hidden from me. So how do they expect me to have acted to protect myself? It's crazy and unfair."The long and complicated tale of "Money" begins, in Mr. Strong's telling, with a simple but mesmerizing piano riff that came to him more than half a century ago as he was working as a session musician in a recording studio here. He was 18, a Mississippi native who had grown up in Detroit dreaming of a music career and had just been signed to a contract with Mr. Gordy, who was both his label president and his personal manager — an arrangement unthinkable today because of its inherent conflict of interest, but not unheard-of at the time."We were doing another session, and I just happened to be sitting there playing the piano," he recalled. "I was playing 'What'd I Say,' by Ray Charles, and the groove spun off of that."As Mr. Strong was polishing the riff, the recording engineer, Robert Bateman, recalls becoming increasingly animated. "And when I get excited, the very first thing I do is call Berry," Mr. Bateman said at an event at the Hard Rock Cafe in 2010. " 'Whoa, Berry, you've got to hear this, you've got to hear this, you've got to hear this.' "The guitarist on the "Money" sessions was Eugene Grew, who recalls taking musical direction from Mr. Strong. "We sat there, practicing, and Barrett said, 'Do this,' and, 'Do that,' " Mr. Grew said in an interview here. "It's a real simple figure, over and over. Barrett showed me what to play and then Berry came by."Once the instrumental track was recorded, Mr. Strong said, Janie Bradford, who had written songs with Mr. Gordy for Jackie Wilson, helped on the lyrics. But Mr. Strong said he also contributed words.On Nov. 12, 1959, Motown's new song-publishing company, Jobete Music, of which Mr. Gordy was the sole owner, registered "Money (That's What I Want)" with the United States Copyright Office. That filing, bearing Ms. Bradford's signature, designated Mr. Strong as an "author of words & music," with Ms. Bradford also getting a credit for words and Mr. Gordy for words and music.
The fall season is looming, but plenty of ambitious artists are not content to wait for any official starter's pistol to sound, and this week three of them come to the stylish Bleecker Street nightclub Le Poisson Rouge. Two are coming together. On Tuesday, the excellent young pianists Ran Dank and Soyeon Kate Lee present an evening of works for piano duo, including the premiere of Frederic Rzewski's "Four Hands," as well as Brahms's 16 Waltzes, Op. 39 and an arrangement of Stravinsky's "Rite of Spring."Then on Friday, Mohammed Fairouz, a talented and industrious composer, arrives for a showcase of his new and recent pieces, as performed by the pianist Kathleen Supové, the clarinetist David Krakauer, the Voxare String Quartet and others. Compositions by Daniel Bernard Roumain, Matt Marks and Du Yun complete a most promising bill. (7:30 p.m., Tuesday, 8 p.m. Friday, 158 Bleecker Street, near Thompson Street, Greenwich Village, 212-505-3474, lepoissonrouge.com.)
As a member of the Memphis group Three 6 Mafia, the rapper Juicy J memorably collected an Oscar in 2006, for "It's Hard Out Here for a Pimp." And his career has continued to follow a series of unexpected turns, from occasional actor to Twitter star (more than one million followers) to, lately, solo artist. On the heels of the platinum single "Bandz a Make Her Dance," featuring Lil Wayne and 2 Chainz, his third solo album and major label debut, "Stay Trippy," was released late last month on Kemosabe/Columbia Records. A few years ago, he had never performed onstage alone; now he is completing a sold-out, 40-city tour."The solo thing just happened out of nowhere," he said, by telephone from Los Angeles, where he had just landed after a concert in Las Vegas. "I wasn't really planning to be a solo artist. I was trying to bring back the Three 6 Mafia buzz, so I was doing my own mixtapes. I put out 'Bandz a Make Her Dance' on Twitter, and then it blew up, and here I am."At 35, Juicy J is a hip-hop veteran, a foundation of the Southern rap scene and a mentor to younger rappers like Wiz Khalifa, a producer on "Stay Trippy." "I met Wiz on Twitter," Juicy J said. "I had listened to his mixtapes, watched his stuff on YouTube, and then I reached out to him on Twitter. We exchanged numbers, then we met up in California and became best friends."Juicy J raps about strip clubs, smoking pot and boozing — and he's authentic to the lifestyle. "I'm still drunk," he announced in the early-morning phone call. He wasn't apologizing or boasting, just acknowledging: "This is the life. This is what I chose." But it didn't stop him from talking seriously about his ambitions. As for where he keeps his Oscar, he said: "I keep it in a safe. I definitely got it." He spoke with Melena Ryzik about his work ethic, rapping with his brother and why he still listens to demos. These are excerpts from the conversation.Q. This solo album is your first release with Wiz Khalifa, but you've been working with his Taylor Gang crew for a while. What drew you?A. He made me an owner of his company so, I mean, like, why not? That was his idea. He was like, "Yo Juicy, I want to make you a third owner of the record label, because I feel like you know music, and you can find talent, and you've been in the game for more than 15 years."You grew up being interested in the music business, right?Yes, ma'am. I used to read music books when I was 13. My mom was working at a library. She's a librarian. I would get my mom to check out any kind of books that had anything about the music industry. I read a lot about royalties, publishing, marketing, stuff like that. The only biography I read was about Al Bell, of Stax Records. I wanted to follow in the footsteps of Al Bell.How do you keep motivated?I work on holidays, I work on birthdays, I work on New Year's. I work. I keep my ears to the streets. I love a lot of these new up-and-coming young cats, because they remind me of me coming up, hustling. I like stuff to be different. I want to work with Swizz Beatz, I want to work with Pharrell [Williams]. I think Pharrell's a genius, he makes hits, he's legendary.How do you hear new artists?People are always sending me stuff. I just discovered this new cat on Twitter, a guy named Marcus Cruz, 18 years old. He's super talented. He's focused. He's a smart kid. He was at one of my shows, and he kept hitting me on Twitter, like, "Yo, man, listen to my song, listen to my song." And I was like, "O.K." It was so dope. So I've been working with him. I signed him. I'm being a coach to him. I don't try to ignore demo tapes. Once upon a time, I made demos, too. You never know what you can find.You have lots of guests on this album, like ASAP Rocky and Young Jeezy. And you also have your brother, Project Pat, who you started with in Three 6 Mafia. Were you ever competitive about who was better?No, we always worked together. Project Pat always had my back, he always gave me good advice, and I would love him for that. When my motivation was down, he was the one telling me, "You can do this." I'm the one started him rapping. I told him he had a unique style. My mom always told us, growing up, stick together. That's what it's all about.Especially after "Bandz a Make Her Dance," which is about getting strippers to shake it with stacks of banded money, you've kind of become the patron saint of strip clubs.My whole life is not about strip clubs and drinking and partying. I'm a businessman at the end of the day. I want everybody to understand that. I actually work. I'm in the studio 24/7. It's definitely a grind. I'm an old G in the game, and want people to understand that and learn from it. I've been in the business 15 years, and I'm still hustling. I got enough money to retire, but I love music, so I keep doing it. I got an Oscar, but I would love to win a Grammy. I just got off the plane, I'm still intoxicated, but I'm doing an interview with you, and I'm making a lot of sense. If you're in the music business you've got to be built for this. I sleep, dream music. That's it.What are you going to do when we get off the phone?I'm probably going to get me a mimosa and listen to some Barry White.
PLAINFIELD, Mass. — On a recent sunny afternoon, Matt Haimovitz entered a carpentry workshop here that doubles as a music studio and gently pulled the door shut. The garden of the 19th-century farmhouse echoed with the shouts of children. But the newest family member was quietly leaning against the wall. It was darker than its sibling next to it and covered in pockmarks, but Mr. Haimovitz cupped his hand around its neck with loving pride: "This is my Beethoven cello."Mr. Haimovitz is one of the leading cellists of his generation and equally well known for his ardent interpretations of the classics as for boundary-pushing projects involving electronics and collaborations with unusual instruments. For 25 years, he has played a spectacular Goffriller cello made in 1710 that has a rich, golden sound.But this summer, he trawled auction sites in search of a second instrument, settling on an anonymous Bohemian cello from around 1770 with generously sized f-holes and a 19th-century tailpiece. Fitted with gut strings tuned to a lower Beethoven-era A of 430 Hz, this is the instrument Mr. Haimovitz will use on Sept. 10 for a performance of the complete Beethoven sonatas, with Christopher O'Riley on fortepiano, at the International Beethoven Project's Love 2013 festival in Chicago.Mr. Haimovitz and Mr. O'Riley last collaborated on a recording and concert tour titled "Shuffle.Play.Listen" that tossed together music by Stravinsky and Janacek, Radiohead and Arcade Fire. The most popular YouTube video of Mr. Haimovitz is of his bow-shredding solo-cello transcription of Jimi Hendrix's "Star-Spangled Banner." So why is Mr. Haimovitz's conversation now peppered with the kind of period details that normally consume early-music specialists?Plucking a string, he marveled at the rich resonance that lingered for several seconds. "I love shifting on these strings," he enthused as he ran his finger up the yellow-brown strings, which he imports from a string maker in Italy. Its workshop, he said, is next to a slaughterhouse so that the sheep gut is processed fresh, without the need for preservatives."If you can control those slides, you can get all kinds of vivid portamenti," he said referring to the left-hand shifts that, when audible, can become an expressive part of a melody. "On the steel strings, the vibrato kicks in much more, because it takes more work to get the string down on the fingerboard, and you're sustaining more on the bow. With the gut strings, you have to let it breathe and resonate."Mr. Haimovitz is part of a growing number of string players who are experimenting with period instruments, even though they are not part of the early-music scene. It's a quiet revolt against the trench wars of previous decades, when a player had to take sides: on one hand, the unreformed mainstream, playing on steel strings with modern bow; on the other, the Birkenstock-wearing early-music movement with its Baroque bows, gut strings and archaic tuning systems.To some, those boundaries are still real, and hotly debated. The British violinist Nigel Kennedy caused a stir this summer when he laced his program notes for a Bach recital with barbs against the "so-called authentic" movement that he said had "pushed Bach into a ghetto."But in the United States, a growing number of musicians are drawn to the heightened expressive potential of period instruments. For centuries, instrument makers, players and composers formed a kind of circular bio-system in which technological advances and stylistic developments fed off one another. But as musicians today learn to master a repertory spanning four centuries, questions of performance practice and instrument choice become vital — and demand to be addressed anew with each concert.On Sept. 1, Johnny Gandelsman will present a recital of works for solo violin at the Ravinia Festival in Illinois, including works by Biber, Philip Glass and Bach's Partita in D with its profoundly melancholic Chaconne. In February, Mr. Gandelsman performed that Chaconne at the Helicon Foundation in New York using — for the first time — a Baroque bow. One of the foundation's missions is to allow musicians to try out familiar repertory with unfamiliar period instruments."It was as if the bow was telling me how to play the music," said Mr. Gandelsman, who plays with the string quartet Brooklyn Rider as well as with the Silk Road Ensemble. "For years, I was experimenting with my bow hold. All that time, I was searching for something lighter, more dancey." He found it in the gentle convex curve of the Baroque bow; the modern bow is longer, and slightly concave. The greater resonance of the gut strings also makes it easier to reveal the lower voices in Bach's contrapuntal writing, he said, adding: "I spend a lot of my time as a musician trying things I have not been officially trained to do, whether it's improvisation, fiddling and now, occasionally, Baroque violin. I do it because I love the music, and I want to understand how it works."
SAN FRANCISCO — The first thing to know about Linda Ronstadt is that if you ring the bell at her home here, on a sedate street with views of the ocean, she'll answer the door herself. At least she did on a recent Monday morning.She wore a pink hoodie and jeans, her short dark hair framing the oval face that ornamented album and magazine covers throughout the 1970s and '80s, when Ms. Ronstadt was rock 'n' roll's biggest and most alluring female star, with albums like "Heart Like a Wheel" and "Living in the U.S.A." that helped define the polished music of her era.In the living room, near the Yamaha baby grand, Ms. Ronstadt settled into a chair, rested her white high-top sneakers on an ottoman and discussed her new book, "Simple Dreams: A Musical Memoir," which is being published this month.In recent years, Ms. Ronstadt has drawn more attention for her outspoken politics, decidedly liberal, than for her music. Full of opinions — don't get her started on current immigration law — she pours them forth in a fluent, hyper-articulate rush.But for many, she remains her generation's premier female pop vocalist, and they wonder why she hasn't released an album since 2006 or appeared in concert since her mariachi show in 2009. For a trouper like Ms. Ronstadt, a steady presence for 40 years, silence so prolonged must have a reason. True, she is 67, but age hasn't stopped contemporaries like Bob Dylan, Neil Young and Emmylou Harris."I can't do it, because of my health," Ms. Ronstadt said. "I have Parkinson's." (The news was first reported in the AARP Magazine online on Aug. 23.) She held out a slightly trembling hand. Her vocal cords are also affected. "I can't sing at all," she said, matter-of-factly. "I'm truly not able. I can't sing 'Happy Birthday,' really."She had been aware for more than a decade that something was wrong, but those closest to her suspected it might be just another instance of the performance anxiety for which she is well known. "You can sing," her former manager and longtime producer, Peter Asher, remembered telling her. "You're crazy. Don't be insecure." But, as usual, he added, "Linda was right." She got the news in June. Fearful of doctors, she had put off going to a neurologist until a guitarist friend, observing the unsteady hands, said she must go. "I never in a million years thought I had Parkinson's, not in a million years," she said. "Now I don't know what to do. I have to find a support group. I have to call Michael Pollan. He's responsible for all this." (Mr. Pollan, the brother-in-law of Michael J. Fox, who also has Parkinson's, said Ms. Ronstadt has not discussed her illness with him.)By "all this" she meant not her health, but the book, which was completed before doctors confirmed that she has Parkinson's. "I never wanted to write a book," she said. "I never wanted anyone else to write a book. I thought, 'Let it end when it ends.' " She also wasn't sure she was up to the task. A voracious reader who can quote Henry James verbatim, Ms. Ronstadt has, if anything, too much respect for the written word. But at dinner one night, Mr. Pollan, the journalist and author, urged her to reconsider. She told him: "I don't have any craft. I don't have any skill. And he said everybody has at least one good story in them that they can pull out."There was another fact to weigh, her dwindling savings. Ms. Ronstadt released many albums but wrote very few songs, so her royalty checks are small. "Writers make all the money," she said. Her most memorable hits — "You're No Good," "Heart Like a Wheel," "Blue Bayou" — were written by others. "I was making good money when I was touring," she said. But now "I just can't do it.""I can't make one note," she said. "I have a hard time calling the cab at night."And so a book, and the advance it would bring, began to make sense. Ms. Ronstadt read Plácido Domingo's memoir and Rosanne Cash's, and liked both. She also liked Keith Richards's "Life" (she's in it) and was impressed by how well his co-writer, James Fox, captured his voice. But her own meeting with a prospective collaborator didn't work: "I knew I would never give him any information. I'm too good at dodging questions."
Donating her file cabinet, full of old journals, letters and zines to New York University's Fales Library archive was a bittersweet move for Kathleen Hanna. A singer and founder of the riot grrrl band Bikini Kill and the feminist electro-pop act Le Tigre, Ms. Hanna had been a den mother to contemporary-girl culture for a generation, but she was still only a midcareer artist, too young to grapple with archiving her work. The donation helped legitimize the riot grrrl movement.But Ms. Hanna, 44, had more personal reasons for securing her legacy: She wasn't sure how much longer she'd be around.Timing has played a big part in Ms. Hanna's creative life since she emerged from the DIY scene in Olympia, Wash., in the early 1990s. The brief but influential riot grrrl movement seemed to arrive at just the right moment, during debates about workplace harassment and young women's sexuality, fresh issues that still resonate today. But over the last few years, even with a '90s revival in full swing and her view in high demand, Ms. Hanna had all but disappeared from public life.The reason for her absence, as she is just beginning to reveal, was illness, depression and artistic flux. "I'm still not sure, day to day, if I'm going to wake up and be really sick," she said.Late in 2010, after six years of a mysterious and debilitating illness that often left her too weak to move or speak, she was finally diagnosed with late-stage Lyme disease. She underwent two years of intensive therapy. Now on the mend, Ms. Hanna is returning in a big way.She resurrected a 1997 solo project, Julie Ruin, as a band, the Julie Ruin; its debut album, "Run Fast," is to be released Tuesday on TJR Records, a label formed by Ms. Hanna and her band mates. For the first time, the group is touring nationally, beginning with a sold-out show at the Bowery Ballroom on Tuesday. And a documentary about her, "The Punk Singer," which has been making the festival rounds since it had its premiere to warm reviews at South by Southwest this spring, is due to be in theaters in November.Seeing these projects come to fruition at once is stressful but empowering, Ms. Hanna said. "I am like somebody who maxed out their credit cards because they thought they were going to die," she said, "and I lived."Walking through Chelsea recently, she fretted about a girly bit of overshare. Whether some overwrought teenage poetry was on view, in her bubble-letter handwriting, at the Fales's Riot Girl Collection, where Ms. Hanna donated her work in 2010. That material and others were anthologized in "The Riot Grrrl Collection," an anthology published this summer. Ms. Hanna further tells her story — including sexual abuse and naming Nirvana's hit "Smells Like Teen Spirit" — in the documentary, directed by Sini Anderson. Footage of her bopping onstage in her trademark high ponytail masked her illness; she announced a retirement of sorts from Le Tigre in 2005.The Julie Ruin was reborn during her illness, as a way for Ms. Hanna to connect to her artistic identity. "I was like: 'Is this who I am now, this sick person? This isn't me,' " she said in an interview in a cafe not far from her Flatiron apartment, one of two homes she shares with her husband Adam Horovitz, a k a Ad-Rock of the Beastie Boys. He encouraged her to sing as much as she could. "When I would practice and I would feel O.K., I saw me again," she said.She conceived the group as what she called her "dream band," with players from different walks of her life: on bass, her Bikini Kill band mate Kathi Wilcox; on guitar, Sara Landeau, an instructor at the Willie Mae Rock Camp for Girls, where Ms. Hanna occasionally teaches; on drums, her friend Carmine Covelli; and Kenny Mellman, Herb of the cabaret act Kiki & Herb, as a keyboardist and songwriter. They rehearsed casually around town and at Ms. Hanna's New Jersey home — "I can't call it jamming, because I hate that; I don't jam," she said — without considering where it would lead.According to Ms. Wilcox, "When she approached me to join the band, she was sort of like, 'We may never tour, we may never make a record, but we're just doing this now for fun, because I need to.' "But Ms. Hanna arrived with some songs intact — including one, "Just My Kind," written for Christina Aguilera — and though she didn't have an overarching sound in mind, she knew what she liked. "I know I love sexy surf guitars, I know I love loud snare," she said. "I love really simple repeating bass lines, and I love weird mad scientist keyboard sounds."Mr. Mellman, a musical savant and a voracious consumer of new bands, gave himself the task of keeping the Julie Ruin up-to-date. "The last thing I wanted was for it to start sounding like a '90s revival," he said.The album, which the group created for about $50,000, is energetically punky, with new-wave synths and beats. (James Murphy of LCD Soundsystem mixed "Just My Kind"; Ms. Hanna did the same for the single, "Oh Come On.") Lyrically, the songs take a dark turn. The title track is about tumultuous girlhood. "Party City" is defiant about death. There are several peppy numbers about euthanasia."It sounds really cute," Mr. Mellman said. "Then it's like the kitten with the claws."Ms. Hanna said she has always loved juxtaposing the sweet and sad with silly. And writing without a specific political agenda was a release: Bikini Kill and Le Tigre covered that ground, she said, and a new generation of artists and writers, including Pussy Riot, are taking up the cause. Ms. Hanna has found acolytes in the likes of Tavi Gevinson, publisher of the youth magazine Rookie.More leaps may be in her future. She is designing for an as-yet-unnamed fashion label with Ms. Wilcox. With her husband, she has created a TV comedy starring the downtown performers Bridget Everett, Neal Medlyn and Murray Hill; they are shopping the script. She thinks about writing country songs and doing a one-woman show at 60.Being forced to take artistic stock because of her illness wasn't easy. "I have to live with historicizing myself maybe a little bit too soon," she said. "I mean, I'm 44, I'm not 80."Then again, she said, "it's really freeing. I'm not some young 20-year-old ingénue who's reinventing the wheel. In a way, the pressure is off. I'm just happy to be here." Her contribution has been documented. "So now I can do whatever I want, and trust that I'm a good artist."
It was supposed to be the bigger, better party. Electric Zoo 2013 was the fifth annual Labor Day weekend of electronic dance music on Randalls Island, and its promoter, Made Event, had expanded it by adding another stage with additional headliners. But after two concertgoers died , apparently from using MDMA (known in different formulations as Molly or Ecstasy), Made Event followed the recommendation of the mayor's office and abruptly canceled Sunday, the third day of the festival. Last week, the House of Blues in Boston closed temporarily after drug overdoses following a show by Zedd, who would have been one of Sunday's Electric Zoo headliners.The tone of the festival had already changed on Saturday. My shoulder bag was searched far more thoroughly on the way in than on Friday, and through the day, Made Events representatives made sober announcements onstage urging people to rest, hydrate, get help for anyone in trouble and not to overdo alcohol and drugs — the last of which drew some laughs. MDMA, though it's dangerous in excess like any drug, has long been associated with dance music; it makes people happy, energetic and affectionate, and since getting the innocuous name Molly it has been turning up in lyrics — which D.J.'s often sample and add into mixes.Last year, at the Ultra Music Festival, introducing the D.J.-producer Avicii (who headlined Electric Zoo on Friday), Madonna — whose 2012 album was called "MDNA" — asked the audience, "How many people in this crowd have seen Molly?" (She later insisted it wasn't a drug reference.) At Electric Zoo the word was all over T-shirts; one group of five people had coordinated bright yellow ones with a single letter on each: M, O, L, L, Y. It's part of the dance-music landscape — unremarkable, until people die.And that news casts a sorrowful shadow over what was supposed to be a celebration. Electronic dance music is purposefully, single-mindedly life affirming, all about being alive in the moment, awash in sensation. Hip-hop, rock, R&B and, of course, the blues are well aware of struggle, sadness, mortality, memory and anticipation, as they tell stories and fill their song forms; electronic dance music takes place in an eternal present.There, the visceral, body-shaking impact of deep bass, the hypnotic repetitiveness of the beat, the pealing purity or larger-than-life roughness of the electronic sounds, the lyrics about joy and letting go and feeling love, the dazzling and dizzying lights and the communal energy of a dance floor are all mechanisms for fully experiencing the here and now, kinetically and immediately. Mechanisms evolve — technology has given them a lot more flash and firepower in the digital era — but the aspiration they satisfy may well be hard-wired into our bodies. With or without MDMA, electronic dance music makes for joyful, sociable crowds pumping up the endorphins.Even though it was cut short, Electric Zoo still offered nearly 100 sets over its first two days, a sweeping survey of dance music. A small, generally underattended tent held die-hards of deep house and techno — John Digweed, Justin Martin vs. Eats Everything, Claude VonStroke, Cassy, Green Velvet, Scuba — playing seamless, incrementally evolving, mesmerizing sets. On the big stages, it brought back many regulars who headline festivals worldwide: Avicii, David Guetta, Tiesto, Benny Benassi, Above & Beyond, Hardwell.They play the house and trance music whose bouncing, marching beats now also pulsate in Top 10 pop. And because they are now in demand as remixers of pop hits, they can largely string together their own efforts, nearly all moving at the same beats per minute. Hardwell made his set seesaw between earnest vocals and stark, stomping beats; Tiesto modulated smoothly, playing what sounded like one long anthem with a parade of different vocalists. Other house D.J.'s, less eager for singalongs, built different kinds of sets: Sander van Doorn with one dramatic, intensifying, minor-key instrumental wavelet after another, and Madeon with dozens of quick segues from hook to hook, often merely seconds long.The dominance of house and trance as "big-room" dance music has lately been challenged by dubstep: originally an arty, murky British style that Americans have turned into a swerving, lurching assault, switching from full speed to half speed or unleashing a blast of distortion without warning. Over the last year, dubstep's most brazen effect — the skidding, shuddering, deep-diving trick called the drop — has made its way into TV commercials and movie trailers; trance and house D.J.'s have also learned it, and more than a few sets at Electric Zoo interrupted the cheerful, steady, head-bobbing momentum of house with a stretch of dubstep.But the dubstep D.J.'s, some of whom also had main-stage spots this year, strove to stay ahead of formula. Flux Pavilion, Datsik, Dog Blood, UZ and Bassnectar reached toward dubstep's reggae underpinnings, drew on hip-hop, grabbed some of punk-rock's momentum and aimed for the unexpected; Bassnectar even tried a remix of Nina Simone's "Feelin' Good." Dubstep is also dealing with an upstart challenge: trap music, emerging out of hip-hop over the last decade. Dubstep is dense and bass loving; trap is hollow, with sparse bass lines, nasal synthesizer riffs and spatters of snare drum.The crisp sounds of trap turned up during sets of dubstep, hip-hop and house, and they have made a fluent convert of R L Grime, the new moniker of a house D.J. called Clockwork. One of Electric Zoo's most head-turning sets was by Baauer, the trap D.J. whose "Harlem Shake" became a YouTube phenomenon but who shouldn't be dismissed as a novelty. His set repeatedly leapfrogged across tempos and genres: sometimes funny, sometimes jolting, giving dancers a challenge they were eager to accept. It was the kind of party Electric Zoo was supposed to be — one that should have ended with everyone home safely.
A couple of years ago, when the Pixies were almost 300 concerts into their second life as reunited heroes of alternative rock, they played a casino in Canada. The symbolism stopped them for a moment: had the Pixies succumbed to stereotype and become an oldies act?"It was like, Ha ha, here we are at the casino," Charles Thompson, a k a Black Francis, the lead singer, said in an interview recently. "Is this the shape of things to come?"Now, taking a step they had put off since returning in 2004, the Pixies are finally releasing the equivalent of a new album, their first in 22 years. After teasing fans in June with a new song, "Bagboy," the band issued the four-song "EP-1" early on Tuesday, the first in a series of mini-releases it plans to put out sporadically over the next 15 months.Selling new material on the reunion circuit is never easy, and the bar is high for the Pixies, whose juxtaposition of the jagged, sweet and darkly comic on albums like "Surfer Rosa" (1988) and "Doolittle" (1989) have influenced generations of bands. But the new music also comes just weeks after the announcement that Kim Deal, the bassist and perhaps most beloved member, was leaving the group, raising the question of whether fans will accept the Pixies without her.New music was always on the bucket list for the Pixies, even if the members were ambivalent about it. In 2004, the band released two songs, "Bam Thwok" and a cover of Warren Zevon's "Ain't That Pretty at All," but nothing followed.For a while, it didn't seem to matter. The reunited band, which also includes the guitarist Joey Santiago and the drummer David Lovering, has played 324 concerts around the world, and sold about $65 million in tickets, according to its management. Eventually, though, some new fuel was needed to keep the train moving and the musicians feeling inspired."If we're going to keep touring like this, we need some kind of new story, a new life, something," Mr. Thompson said over lunch on a weekend day trip to Manhattan from western Massachusetts, where he lives with his wife and five children.Last fall, the band booked a studio in the bucolic Welsh countryside with Gil Norton, who produced three of the Pixies' five original studio albums. According to the remaining Pixies, Ms. Deal — who clashed with Mr. Thompson in the band's first incarnation — was present at the start of the sessions but then abruptly announced that she could not continue. Through a spokeswoman, Ms. Deal declined to comment. (She is currently on a reunion tour with her own band, the Breeders.)"It took us three days to mourn about it," Mr. Santiago said of Ms. Deal's departure, and then the men decided to continue without her."I hate to say it, but I'm not going to let one snafu get in the way," he added in a recent interview after a rehearsal in Los Angeles with Mr. Lovering. "It's time to put on the guitar. It's time to shine. No one is going to take that away from me."To help the band find its sound after so many years, Mr. Norton gave them a riddle. Referring to an old Pixies song, he had them imagine that for all this time they had been off playing on the Planet of Sound, and only now returning to Earth.The results are less screamy and uptight than the old Pixies. But plenty of their defining obsessions are still there, like the twangy surf guitar and sci-fi surrealism on "Andro Queen." Mr. Santiago, who in his non-Pixies career has made music for television and film, said that he "scored" his parts to add outer-space atmospherics."Another Toe in the Ocean" and "What Goes Boom" are more straightforward rock, but on "Indie Cindy" — for which the band also released a video on Tuesday — the band uses some of the sudden dynamic shifts that were its most recognizable signature. Mr. Thompson describes the track as a love song that reflects the anxiety of trying to seduce his audience all over again. "Indie Cindy, be in love with me," he sings. "I beg for you to carry me.""It's all about self-doubt," Mr. Thompson explained. "It says to the audience: 'I don't know if this romance has still got what it needs to happen again. I don't know if you'll accept me; I don't know if I accept you. But we have this memory. Can we do it again?' "For the recording sessions, the band recruited Simon Archer, a k a Ding, who has played with PJ Harvey and the Fall. Kim Shattuck of the band the Muffs will fill in on the band's latest tour, which comes to the Bowery Ballroom and the Music Hall of Williamsburg this month.The band will not say how many more releases are in store, but, like "EP-1," they are to come out through the Pixies' Web site, with no advance notice. The EP's, with artwork by Vaughan Oliver, the band's longtime designer, will be available as downloads and as a 10-inch vinyl record. No longer on any label, the band now controls its business itself and has become a model of online marketing.When asked why they decided to release music this way, the band and its advisers say that the album is a tired format that is tied to the needs of the old music business. "When you're an artist like the Pixies, you don't have to play by those rules," said Richard Jones, the band's manager. Mr. Thompson also acknowledges that it is a way to avoid somewhat the pressure of the Big Comeback Album.The news of Ms. Deal's departure was met with sadness but not much outrage online; maybe it was expected, sooner or later. But whether fans will embrace the new music and lineup is another story."The whole charm of the reunion was that Kim and Charles had put their differences aside to play together again," said Charles Aaron, the editor at large of Spin. "It made you feel like it was about the music and not just the money. Now that she's left again, it's going to be hard for a lot of people to take this seriously as the Pixies."If "Bagboy" is any indication, fans are still curious. The song was released as a free download just two weeks after the announcement of Ms. Deal's departure. The first tweet came 22 seconds after the song was released, Mr. Jones said, and within 17 minutes, the song was being played on BBC radio. On Tuesday, "Indie Cindy" also made its way onto Twitter's list of trending topics.The Pixies' tour begins on Monday in Los Angeles, and most of the shows the band has announced so far have sold out."All we can do," Mr. Lovering added, "is go forward and just prove ourselves."
Benjamin Britten fans have plenty to look forward to in the coming months, with a multitude of centennial celebrations taking place.Trinity Wall Street is contributing to the festivities with a five-month festival featuring his orchestral, vocal and chamberworks. On Sunday a candlelit concert includes Julian Wachner conducting the Choir of Trinity Wall Street in Britten's "Sacred and Profane." On Thursday afternoon, the program features Britten's Serenade for Tenor, Horn and Strings and the song cycle "Les Illuminations." (8 p.m., Sunday, St. Paul's Chapel, Broadway at Fulton Street; 1 p.m., Thursday, Trinity Church, Broadway at Wall Street, Lower Manhattan, 212-602-0800, trinitywallstreet.org.)Opera Omnia, a plucky little company that specializes in Baroque repertory, presents Monteverdi's "Return of Ulysses" at the Baryshnikov Arts Center. Avi Stein conducts a period instrument orchestra and cast that includes the mezzo-soprano Hai-Ting Chinn. The production uses an English translation of the story, based on Homer's "Odyssey." (7:30 p.m., Tuesday through Thursday, 50 West 37th Street, Manhattan, 866-811-4111, operaomnia.org.)
"There's nothing that I will not try,"  Janelle Monáe  said by phone from a car traversing Maryland. The album she is releasing on Tuesday, "The Electric Lady" (Bad Boy), bears her out. Its 19 tracks hint at Stevie Wonder and spy-movie soundtracks, Jimi Hendrix and hip-hop, reggae and gospel. It has guest appearances by Prince, Erykah Badu and Esperanza Spalding. Her goal, Ms. Monáe said, was "showing and showcasing how incredible R&B music can be." She added, "I wanted to make sure that I was creating a very diverse album that was deeply rooted in R&B music."And then there's the album's overarching concept, which follows through on Ms. Monáe's 2007 EP, "Metropolis: Suite I (The Chase)" and her 2010 major-label debut album, "The ArchAndroid." In the lineage of sci-fi-loving, high-concept musicians like Sun Ra, George Clinton and David Bowie, Ms. Monáe is a trouper whose songs dance to big ideas. Onstage, in her chosen garb of a tuxedo and pompadoured hair, she often moves from snappy fast footwork to stage-diving."The Electric Lady" extends, with Suites IV and V, the tale of Cindi Mayweather, a fugitive android in danger of being disassembled. It's a prequel that examines how Cindi got into trouble: falling in love, though it also delves into being an outsider, surviving the ghetto and dancing through adversity. "I'm a woman, I'm African-American, I'm part android," Ms. Monáe said. "I have to make sure I'm speaking for the underdog.""What would the electric lady think about love, and what would she think about politics, religion, community and sexuality?" Ms. Monáe added. "It's important when you're out being an electric lady and trying to change the world to make time for love and to go after it.""The ArchAndroid" was widely praised but has sold fewer than 200,000 copies; Ms. Monáe reached a much wider audience as the guest singer on the hit single by Fun, "We Are Young." Love songs — particularly a ballad she sings on "The Electric Lady" with Miguel, "Prime Time" — improve Ms. Monáe's odds of mainstream radio play on her own."I want all my songs to be played on the radio," she said. "When I was writing them, I wasn't thinking about that. But at the end of the day, you just want to give somebody something fresh. You want to give them music to draw them into the whole story. I want as many people to hear this album as possible, because I think that people who are working, people in their car listening to the radio — they need to be healed, too."
Before Haim was Haim, a rock band made up of three sisters, its members — Este, Danielle and Alana, surnamed Haim — were three-fifths of Rockinhaim, a covers band made up of three sisters and their parents."Playing in a family band really was the best lesson in songwriting," Danielle said one afternoon last month. "It taught us what classic songs were, how they worked." The sisters were calling from Los Angeles, where they live and were raised, and they were on their way to the doctor — Este at the wheel — having finally become sick after a tumultuous summer on tour through Europe. Their doctor, for what it's worth, is a distant relative, too.In Haim (rhymes with "rhyme"), Este, 27, plays bass; Danielle, 24, plays guitar; and Alana, the baby at 21, plays guitar and keyboards. Danielle sings lead, and the others harmonize. (The group's drummer, Dash Hutton, is not known to have Haim blood.)Their parents were fans of Prince, Earth, Wind & Fire, the Cars, Tina Turner — the rock and soul of the late 1970s and early 1980s. "It's not a conscious thing," Danielle said, "but we definitely pulled from those influences."Certainly, the songs on the group's exuberant and riveting full-length debut album, "Days Are Gone" (Columbia), have a lot in common with the music of that time. It was produced largely by the band with Ariel Rechtshaid, who's one of a small clique of recent savants who have figured out how to deliver the immediacy of pop but also the refined distance of indie rock."Days Are Gone," full of reverb, chubby synthesizers and crisp digitized percussion, harks back to the early to mid 1980s, when club music was making its mark on radio rock. The music is lean and direct, with enough nostalgic haze to pass for commentary.But Haim isn't trying to be obscure, and pure pop courses through its history. The two older sisters were briefly in a prefab major-label pop group in the mid-2000s, and Alana recalled gazing longingly at the extravagant pop idols of the late 1990s and wondering, "Is that what it's like to be a grown-up?"Not quite, but maybe a little. Pop stars don't look the way they used to. Maybe there's even hope for Mom and Dad. At shows, one of them may join the kids onstage for a bit. And at home, their father might knock on the door while they're noodling around, "and he'll say, 'I have a great idea for a drum part,' " Danielle said. "Sometimes it works, and sometimes it's like, 'This is like Miami Sound Machine.' "
"Not on the outside looking in," Gregory Porter crows in passing during "The 'In' Crowd," one of the few cover songs on "Liquid Spirit," his soulful and assured new album. And in case you didn't detect the mix of pride, validation and relief in that ad-libbed status report, Mr. Porter soon offers another one — "It feels nice" — that forms a malleable refrain as the tune struts to a close.Mr. Porter, 42, is a jazz singer of thrilling presence, a booming baritone with a gift for earthy refinement and soaring uplift. "Liquid Spirit," due out on Sept. 17, is his first release on Blue Note Records, which has been a home to Dianne Reeves, Cassandra Wilson, Kurt Elling and Bobby McFerrin. The album will bring a substantial boost to his profile, which had already been on an upward trajectory over the last several years.Naturally, Mr. Porter isn't the type to put it that way. "I'm a spiritual kind of thinker, in terms of the business," he said from his home in Brooklyn last month, the morning after his rousing debut at the Newport Jazz Festival. "Spiritually, Blue Note is where a lot of the heavies in music have resided. It's a cool place to be."Mr. Porter grew up in California, where his mother was a preacher in the Church of God in Christ. Each of his first two albums, on Motéma Music, earned him a Grammy nomination: first in the category of best jazz vocal album and then in the category of best traditional R&B performance. Those genre terms are restrictive, but they do clarify his identity as an artist who builds on the legacies of Bill Withers and Abbey Lincoln."Liquid Spirit" has songs that sound like Withers ("Hey Laura," a downcast romantic entreaty) and like Lincoln ("When Love Was King," a straight-back allegorical tale). It also has a tune by Lincoln and Max Roach ("Lonesome Lover"), and a manifesto of sorts in "Musical Genocide," which casts an unapologetic look backward at what Mr. Porter upholds as a more enlightened musical era."I don't consider myself particularly political," he said. "The human condition is political. What I'm missing is, in those songs from the '70s somebody was always talking about Mama and progress and the situation on the ground. It was just real-life stories. That's what I'm talking about in that song."Mr. Porter practices what he preaches. "Free," one of the new album's most emphatic testimonials, is literally a song about Mama and progress. And there's a reason Mr. Porter, who named his first album "Water," has returned to that motif."My mother used to always talk about this water, this renewing, this cleansing, this flow of energy," he said. "I'm not speaking of the Gospel in every aspect. Sometimes it's love, which is liquid spirit." He added: "The energy of the song, 'Liquid Spirit,' comes from people saying, 'Where can I find more music like this?' So there's a thirst for it."
There are no wrong notes on "Coming Apart," the first album by Body/Head, a duo of the musicians Kim Gordon and Bill Nace. Nor is there a possibility of any.The music rests on root chords, drones, feedback and repeated patterns from two guitars. Hers in the left channel, his in the right. Surrounded by open space, without drums, Ms. Gordon — who was for 30 years a member of Sonic Youth, as well as a kind of residing conscience for the '80s and '90s generation of alternative rock, particularly its women — sings in her changeable voice, a whisper and a disembodied chant and a polite or powerful call. In the absence of beats or melodic hooks, every song has an arc of compressed drama and forms its own calm, closed system: Wherever her voice or guitar goes works effectively within it.In the days when Sonic Youth was one of the world's most influential bands — the most experimental pop group, or vice versa — Ms. Gordon used to defuse interviewers by saying she didn't consider herself a musician. She still does this. During a recent conversation, I asked her whether she identified with the sound of the bass, which she played in the group for most of its history. "I don't know," she said. "I guess I did, but I didn't really ever feel like a competent bass player. I still don't really feel like a bass player."We were in the lobby of the Mercer Hotel in SoHo. She'd come from Northampton, Mass., where she has lived since 1999, most of that time with Thurston Moore of Sonic Youth; they were married in 1984 and separated in 2011. Ms. Gordon, 60, wore a denim dress and looked less imposing than most people in the room. She has a much friendlier face in person than in photographs; she is evenhanded and avoids making grand pronouncements."I wasn't trained as a musician," she went on. "But I did grow up listening to a lot of jazz records, and John Coltrane." The Body/Head song "Abstract," she explained, has a similar structure to the music on Coltrane's album "Meditations": "you have a theme, and it falls apart, and then it comes back."This nonmusicianship idea could have to do with the conceptual-art tradition she came from, in which so much art was a form of commentary, analyzing or questioning its function. It definitely has to do with the No Wave scene she encountered when she moved to New York at the end of the '70s. One of its credos, as the guitarist and de facto No Wave historian Alan Licht put it recently, was "the musicality of the nonmusician" — the notion that "if you put an instrument in an interesting person's hands they will do something interesting with it."The strength of the album, which comes out from Matador on Tuesday, is not all Ms. Gordon's doing. Mr. Nace, a 36-year old musician from Northampton who told me his ears were changed in high school by Sonic Youth's album 1987 album "Sister," is a big part of it.But "Coming Apart" has a weird magic that seems directly traceable to early Sonic Youth, before the band started making more functional rock music, and especially Ms. Gordon's part in it: the polytonal and sometimes arrhythmic stretches of songs like "Early American" and "Shaking Hell." Her notes, played and sung, had weird shape and timing and sometimes pitch, but they gave the music dread, resonance and power. ("It was about hearing the vibration," she said of her role in the band, "or the open string, the overtones in the bass, and how it interacted with the other instruments.") This kind of weird magic is what shook me most about Sonic Youth when I first saw it in 1983, and this is what I hear on "Coming Apart."Andrya Ambro of Talk Normal, a young New York band whose sound connects with that early '80s downtown clangor, uses the words "freedom" and "voracity" to describe Ms. Gordon's sound. Lee Ranaldo of Sonic Youth wrote in an e-mail that though he and Mr. Moore learned guitar in traditional ways, Ms. Gordon's playing "starts at a free and liberated point." The bassist Mike Watt, an old friend of Ms. Gordon's, said that Ms. Gordon "paints with sound and emotion to make music — she doesn't execute riffs or exhibit motifs." Her musical essence, he added, is "not something you find in Bass Player magazine."
New York City Opera , which was founded 70 years ago to bring opera to the masses, will be forced to cancel most of its current season and all of its next season if it fails to raise $20 million by year's end, company officials say.The cash crisis that City Opera is trying to overcome threatens the very survival of a company that has made opera accessible and cultivated important singers over the years, including Beverly Sills, Plácido Domingo and Renée Fleming. And it raises the question of whether New York will again be able to count itself among cultural capitals like Berlin and London that can support more than one major opera company."The company's been living on the edge and hand-to-mouth for a number of years, and we've gotten through our own share of financial troubles," George Steel, the company's general manager and artistic director, said in a telephone interview last week. "We've had balanced budgets for the last two years, and we've been doing, I think, incredible work onstage. But we can't forge ahead without a significant infusion of capital."The company's $20 million fund-raising goal is nearly twice the $11.5 million it reported raising last year. And it is more than the troupe was able to raise in better times, before the recession, and before its squeezed finances forced it to abandon its old home in Lincoln Center, where it used to give more than 100 performances a season. The company has led a nomadic existence since leaving Lincoln Center in 2011, performing fewer than 20 times a year, often to critical praise, at theaters around the city.The company is still preparing to go ahead next week with the highly anticipated American premiere of Mark-Anthony Turnage's opera "Anna Nicole," a coproduction with the Brooklyn Academy of Music.But it will cancel the other productions it has planned for this season — Johann Christian Bach's "Endimione," Bartok's "Bluebeard's Castle" and Mozart's "Marriage of Figaro" — if it cannot raise $7 million by Sept. 30, Mr. Steel said.He added that City Opera will cancel its entire 2014-15 season if it cannot raise an additional $13 million by the end of December.Mr. Steel said that while the company had been able to scale back expenses, renegotiate its union contracts and balance its budget in recent seasons, it doesn't have the money on hand to pay for coming productions."We lack a few critical things, and have for a number of years," he said. "We don't have much return from our endowment, we don't have any operating capital, and we don't have any credit. So what money we have at the beginning of the month is the amount of money we can spend."Charles R. Wall, the opera company's chairman, said that the $20 million goal was "more than we've ever raised, as far as I know," but that he was hopeful that with hard work and the support of a few major patrons, it could be met. He said it would have to be."You can't run the opera on a hope and a prayer," he said in an interview. "You've got to pay bills. And you've got to raise the money to pay them. That's the simplest way I can put it. And you cannot spend what you do not have."City Opera had planned to spend $10.5 million on the current season, but so far has gotten commitments for only a little more than $3 million.Mr. Steel shared the news Sunday with the orchestra, which opposed the move from Lincoln Center and which has seen its pay cut significantly. The players were once guaranteed a weekly salary for 29 weeks but are now paid by the performance and the rehearsal.Gail Kruvand, the chairwoman of the orchestra committee, said that the move from Lincoln Center had alienated patrons and audience members alike and noted that the company was presenting fewer performances than at any time in its history. She said that the orchestra committee was calling for the resignation of Mr. Steel and for the board to begin searching for a successor.Mr. Wall said: "George has, and always has had, the complete support of the board, as he should have. He's done a heroic job."The 21st century has been cruel to the finances of City Opera, which Mayor Fiorello La Guardia called "the people's opera" when it was founded in 1943.The company began running mounting deficits in 2003. After flirting with leaving Lincoln Center for artistic reasons, it decided to stay when its longtime home, the New York State Theater, was given a major renovation and renamed for its benefactor, David H. Koch.But going dark for the 2008-9 season while the theater was being rebuilt proved costly. The company lost a year's worth of ticket sales just as its deficits were growing unmanageable.That season, the troupe raided its endowment, withdrawing $24 million to pay off loans and cover expenses. The move, coming just when the endowment was already depleted by investment losses brought on by the financial crisis, had long-term repercussions: While the endowment once provided the company with more than $3 million a year in investment income, it now produces less than $200,000 a year.Last year, City Opera made more from its Thrift Shop on East 23rd Street in Manhattan than from its endowment. The company promised to repay the endowment in stages but has yet to make any repayments, Mr. Steel said.At that same time, the troupe experienced a damaging leadership crisis. It had hired Gerard Mortier, the iconoclastic impresario who was then the director of the Paris Opera, as its new general manager and artistic director in 2007. But Mr. Mortier ended up resigning before he even officially assumed the post when he found out that his operating budget would be only a little more than half of what he had been led to expect.When Mr. Steel took over in 2009, City Opera's finances were reeling. In 2011, he announced that the company could no longer afford to stay in the newly renovated Koch Theater, which included improved acoustics the troupe had long sought.While the company raised $17 million in the fiscal year ending in June 2011 — a record — contributions fell off again after the company left Lincoln Center and drastically scaled back its productions."When you have a smaller aggregate audience, you have fewer people attending the company and fewer potential asks," Mr. Steel said of the fund-raising difficulties.Now, in a move that harks back to the company's populist roots and underscores the start-up mentality City Opera has tried to tap as it works to reinvent itself, the company will seek to raise $1 million of the $7 million it needs to raise by the end of the month through an online Kickstarter campaign.Mr. Steel voiced optimism that the troupe was poised to survive."We've been spending a lot of time trying to get the company in good shape, and we have a lean business model, we've managed to right-size the organization, we have two years of balanced budgets, we have a much more streamlined administration, we have much better union contracts, and we're making fantastic art," he said. "But what we cannot do without is a significant infusion of capital."
The electronic dance music business, propelled by huge festivals featuring star D.J.'s and psychedelic light shows, has grown to an estimated worth of $4.5 billion, a number that is luring both Wall Street investors and mainstream corporate sponsors. Yet a recent string of drug-related deaths has highlighted the risks not only to fans, but to the businesses looking to profit from the craze.Since March, at least seven young people attending dance events around the country have died after exhibiting symptoms consistent with overdoses from MDMA and other so-called party drugs, often called ecstasy or molly. This month, the Electric Zoo festival on Randalls Island was shut down at the request of New York City officials after two patrons died, apparently from MDMA overdoses, officials said.Executives say that deaths like these have the potential to scare off investors and the corporate sponsors that are eager to reach the genre's young, affluent and technologically connected fans.The ecstasy-related deaths come just weeks before an expected initial public offering by SFX Entertainment, a new company whose fortunes are predicated on sponsorship and media deals for electronic dance music, or E.D.M. According to its prospectus, SFX wants to raise as much as $300 million through its I.P.O., much of it to acquire promoters like Made Event, the company behind Electric Zoo.Festivals draw tens of thousands or even hundreds of thousands of fans to see well-known D.J.'s like David Guetta, Tiesto and Deadmau5, with top festivals charging up to $300 for two or three days of music. Defenders of the dance world say they are being singled out by the news media. Drugs and overdoses, they say, have long been associated with popular music. For example, 10 people have died since 2002 at the Bonnaroo festival in Tennessee, many from drug-related causes."The scrutiny that this is going to come under because of the stock market deal with SFX, it's like a magnifying glass that's unfair," said Amy Thomson, the manager behind Swedish House Mafia, one of the genre's most successful acts.Robert F. X. Sillerman, the chief executive of SFX, said in an interview that his company was committed to providing a safe environment, and that as dance music "has grown from uncontrollable rave parties to professionally run festivals and events, it in fact provides the opportunity to provide health and safety guidance."He declined to discuss business details, citing the mandatory "quiet period" before the I.P.O. But TomorrowWorld, a festival near Atlanta this month in which SFX is a majority partner, is working with DanceSafe, a nonprofit group, to provide educational information about the dangers of drug use, said Shawn Kent, one of the executives behind the event.SFX seemed to anticipate the need for greater medical care when it appointed to its board Dr. Andrew N. Bazos, an orthopedic surgeon with experience in "comprehensive medical coverage for large-capacity venues," according to its prospectus.Drugs have been linked to the mythology and slang of dance culture for decades, and the current ecstasy scare reflects an earlier wave in the 1990s when cities around the country cracked down on illegal raves. Today, stars like Miley Cyrus and Kanye West allude to molly in songs, and the term turns up repeatedly at festivals, on T-shirts, banners or body paint.Among the deaths in recent months is that of Matthew Rybarczyk, a 20-year-old from Staten Island, who collapsed with a 107-degree temperature at a Governors Island rave on July 14.When Mr. Rybarczyk's grandmother saw him in the hospital the next morning, he was contorted unrecognizably and was bleeding from his nose and mouth; he died 14 hours later. The medical examiner found methylone in his system, an ecstasylike drug sometimes sold as molly."It was the saddest thing of all to watch him die," his grandmother, Peggy Rybarczyk, said. "He went to have a good time and he never came home."A growing history of drug-related deaths has not slowed the genre's popularity. In 2010, a 15-year-old girl died from an overdose of ecstasy at Electric Daisy Carnival in Los Angeles, but the festival has since spread around the country and even to London. This year, Live Nation Entertainment, the world's biggest concert company, bought half of Insomniac, the company behind the festival, for a reported $50 million.In an interview, Pasquale Rotella, Insomniac's founder, defended his company's security measures, and said that dance promoters, to some degree, "inherit societal problems."But he and others in the industry admitted that the negative perceptions had kept away sponsorship money."If you look at dance festivals in general, you don't typically see a ton of branding yet," said Edward H. Shapiro, a lawyer who works with dance acts. "Part of that has been this notion that it isn't an environment that is ripe for really big brands to participate in."Many of the most prominent branding deals in the electronic dance music world have been tied to artists, including Absolut Vodka with Swedish House Mafia, and Pepsi with the D.J. Calvin Harris. But for even the most popular dance festivals, the sponsor rosters are dwarfed by those of comparable rock and pop events, like Lollapalooza or Coachella.The sponsors of Electric Zoo this year included Coors Light and Blue Moon beers, owned by Molson Coors; Vita Coco, a coconut water drink; and Hi-Chew, a fruit-flavored snack. Constellation Brands, whose Pacifico beer was also a supporter, said in a statement that its sponsorships "are focused on providing a peaceful, safe and responsible environment for fans 21-and-older to enjoy our product, and are made on a case-by-case basis." Other sponsors have not commented.Most major festival promoters have zero-tolerance drug policies, and their sites have security checks, free water stations, first-aid tents and ambulances on call. Such measures are essential for insurance purposes and are often required by state law for any large gathering.No promoter can prevent all drugs from entering a festival site, nor can do they do anything about drugs consumed before an attendee walks through the gate. Yet many in the dance world think promoters and stars need to do more to discourage it."I don't think we should be scared of saying 'don't do drugs,' " said A-Trak, a top D.J. "There is this sort of elephant in the room, where people are scared to say, 'That stuff is dangerous and don't mess around.' "But Armin van Buuren, another popular D.J., said that Electric Zoo was one of the better-run festivals he had attended, with plenty of security and medical personnel."For some reason we have the stamp of drug misuse and I think that it's unfair," he said. "It ruins the party for a lot of other people."
In the lucrative world of music copyright, it may be something of a watershed moment: on Friday, after six years of legal wrangling and decades after he wrote the lyrics to the hit song "YMCA," Victor Willis will gain control of his share of the copyright to that song and others he wrote when he was the lead singer of the 1970s disco group the Village People.Mr. Willis, who dressed as a policeman during the group's heyday, was able to recapture those songs, thanks to a little-known provision of copyright legislation that went into effect in 1978. That law granted musicians and songwriters what are known as "termination rights," allowing them to recover control of their creations after 35 years, even if they had originally signed away their rights.It is possible, maybe even likely, that other artists who also wrote or recorded songs in 1978 have, after invoking their termination rights, quietly signed new deals with record labels and song publishing companies. But Mr. Willis appears to be the first artist associated with a hit song from that era to announce publicly that he has used his termination rights to regain control of his work."YMCA" is one of 33 songs whose copyright Mr. Willis was seeking to recover when he first went to court. Hits like "In the Navy" and "Go West" are part of that group, but another well-known song whose lyrics Mr. Willis wrote, "Macho Man," was excluded because it was written just before the 1978 law went into effect.In a telephone interview from his home in Southern California, Mr. Willis said he has not yet decided how best to exploit the song catalog. "I've had lots of offers, from record and publishing companies, a lot of stuff, but I haven't made up my mind how it's going to be handled."He added, however, that he is thinking of prohibiting the Village People — the band still exists and is touring this month and next, though with largely different members — from singing any of his songs, at least in the United States. Under American law, copyright holders have a right to control the performance of a work at any "place open to the public or at a place where a substantial number of persons outside of a normal circle of a family and its social acquaintances are gathered." This designation applies not only to concert halls, but also to arenas and ballparks like Yankee Stadium, where "YMCA" and other Village People songs are perennial favorites."I learned over the years that there are some awesome powers associated with copyright ownership," Mr. Willis said. "You can stop somebody from performing your music if you want to, and I might object to some usages."Song publishing and record companies have consistently opposed artists' efforts to invoke termination rights, which have the potential to affect a company's bottom line severely. They argue that, in many cases, songs and recordings belong to them in perpetuity, rather than to the artists, because they are "works for hire," created not by independent contractors but by artists who are, in essence, their employees.That was initially one of the arguments invoked against Mr. Willis in Federal District Court in Los Angeles. "We hired this guy," Stewart L. Levy, a lawyer for the companies that controlled the Village People song catalog, said last year. "He was an employee. We gave them the material and a studio to record in and controlled what was recorded, where, what hours and what they did." Eventually, though, that argument was withdrawn. If the "work for hire" doctrine can't be made to apply to a prefab group like the Village People, it stands little chance of surviving a test against other artists who emerged in the 1970s and who always had a much greater degree of autonomy, like Bruce Springsteen, the Eagles, Billy Joel and Parliament-Funkadelic.That does not mean that the litigation over the Village People catalog is over, however. Though Mr. Willis's songwriting partner Jacques Morali died in 1991, a third name, that of the French record producer Henri Belolo, appears as a co-writer on "YMCA" and other songs, and the distribution of songwriting credits and revenues is now in court."The termination is going to occur," said Jonathan Ross, one of Mr. Willis's lawyers. "What is in dispute is how much he is getting back, one-half or one-third."In an e-mail he sent from Europe, Mr. Levy challenged that interpretation. "Since an appeal of the court's decision permitting such reversion has yet to be taken, it is far from certain that Mr. Willis will, at the end of the day, ever gain control over any share of the copyrights in the disputed songs." As a result, he maintained, any "article on his recapture is, therefore, premature and misleading."Mr. Willis had declined interview requests during earlier stages of the dispute, but said he decided to speak out now so as to alert other artists, both established and emerging, to protect their copyrights. He said it was only because his wife is a lawyer that he became aware of his termination rights."I'm hoping that other artists will get a good lawyer and get back the works that a lot of us gave away when we were younger, before we knew what was going on," he said. "When you're young, you just want to get out there and aren't really paying attention to what's on paper. I never even read one contract they put in front of me, and that's a big mistake."
As a child growing up in Switzerland, Jens Kruger was so fascinated by a broken tenor banjo owned by his father — actually, just the neck of it — that he nailed strings to it and silently taught himself the fingering for several chords. When his mother bought him a proper banjo at about the age of 10, Mr. Kruger said, "I could finally hear how all these chords sounded."These days, Mr. Kruger, 50, who composes bluegrass music and plays banjo in a trio called the Kruger Brothers, can presumably afford better equipment. He has been named the winner of the fourth annual Steve Martin Prize for Excellence in Banjo and Bluegrass, a $50,000 award created by that multifaceted actor and musician, and chosen by judges including Mr. Martin, Pete Wernick, Béla Fleck and other musicians.Mr. Kruger, who lives in North Carolina, grew up a German citizen in Switzerland, where, he said, "we didn't make much distinction between all the different music forms.""It was just all American music," he said in a telephone interview. "It wasn't that we looked at it as old-time or bluegrass or country-western or Dixieland. It all melted together."But "to be German immigrants in Switzerland, it wasn't the easiest thing," he said. "When we sang German folk songs, they didn't go over well.""American folk music was like the neutral ground, strangely enough," Mr. Kruger said. "When we sang 'You Are My Sunshine' and things like that, that would be much better accepted."At the age of 19, in 1982, Mr. Kruger was performing with Bill Monroe in the United States, playing on the stage of the Grand Ole Opry and meeting musical idols like Chet Atkins and Dolly Parton.Now he performs with his brother, Uwe, a guitarist and vocalist, and the bassist Joel Landsberg, in the Kruger Brothers. Jens Kruger is also a composer of nontraditional bluegrass pieces, including the symphonic works like "Music From the Spring," which made its debut in 2007 with the Bangor Symphony Orchestra, and "Spirit of the Rockies," which had its debut in 2011 at the Banff Center in Alberta.Mr. Martin praised Mr. Kruger in a telephone interview as "one of the great technicians" of bluegrass as well as "a very emotional player."In previous years, winners of the Steve Martin Prize have joined Mr. Martin in a TV performance on CBS's "Late Show With David Letterman."This year, Mr. Martin said, he was trying to come up with an arrangement where the Kruger Brothers "can perform on their own, because they have stuff that is so complicated.""They could do better without me," he said.But getting the banjo back on television in some form was crucial to the prize, Mr. Martin said."It's a great American instrument," he said. "And every time it appears on television, there's this little boost. That's really what the prize was about. I think $50,000 gets attention, and $49.95 wouldn't have."
CHICO MacMURTRIE, a Brooklyn-based artist, has been building robots for nearly three decades. His creations do not vacuum the house, teach foreign languages to children or try to take over the world; they were designed to play music, mainly syncopated rhythms, and perhaps evoke some thought about humanity.Most are abstract creatures, from knee high to larger than life size, controlled by a concert of computers, pneumatic actuators and small motors. Though they were all made for different installations around the world, the robots have in common a sort of whimsical darkness, born of the contrast between the brutality of their machinery and the innocence of their awkward movements. One robot, for example, plucks its own stringed body, while others hop around on the floor in a manner not unlike children playing leapfrog.Now, MacMurtrie has assembled his sizable collection into an orchestra that will perform for the first time on the East Coast, in what Mr. MacMurtrie calls the "Robotic Church." Three free shows will take place on Sunday, Sept. 22, at 111 Pioneer Street in Red Hook, Brooklyn. Additional concerts are planned for the weekends through Oct. 27. Times are listed on the Robotic Church Facebook page. Seating will be limited, and visitors are asked to make reservations on the Facebook page.The site is the former Norwegian Seamen's Church, a 19th-century building that Mr. MacMurtrie has used as the studio for Amorphic Robot Works, the robotic sculpture group he runs, since 2001. Some of the church's original white plaster walls and trim work remain, leaving hints of the building's Protestant origins, but the ceiling is a vast dark space with exposed rafters.Mr. MacMurtrie has repurposed the space for what he calls robotic "masses," drawing inspiration for the installation's religious theme from the building's original use. Its ecclesiastical architecture inspired him to present his mechanical creations in corners and on walls, in front where a preacher would stand and even in the balcony, where they are intended to evoke saints in a chapel."The 'Robotic Church' is about taking this society of machines that have traveled around the world and putting them into a permanent home," said Mr. MacMurtrie, a native of Bisbee, Ariz., who made his first robot sculpture in 1987 for an M.F.A. thesis at the University of California, Los Angeles.Working with his wife, Luise Kaunert — who manages many of his shows — and a small staff, he composes each "mass" by computer. During the concert, more than a dozen robots are programmed to rise up and join in an incremental buildup of sound, creating what Mr. MacMurtrie said he hopes will be a viscerally uplifting experience.The robots share an organic quality that mimics the human body's imperfect nature. Many of their faces resemble impressions of a tortured soul, formed from vacuum-molded plastic, melted metal or bent and soldered wires. In spots, cuts and welds parallel the scars and deformities that life can write upon skin and bone."As our human society is being taken over by technology, we have to reflect and think about the human condition," Mr. MacMurtrie said.The "performers" include Transparent Body, who affects a sort of tap dance on a metal sheet; lights shine from within its plastic body and face. Queeko, a childlike form, stands about a foot tall and plays a drum that sounds like a slightly unbalanced washing machine.There's String Body, which has banjo strings in its neck that are plucked by a motor-driven pick.The arms and legs of String Body contain bass strings that can change pitch with its movement, and across its rib cage are stretched harp strings.House Player, a human-size robot with a pair of large mallets, plays a giant xylophone whose keys are made from thick planks of wood. One of the more sympathetic characters is Tumbling Man. It weighs in at about 200 pounds and kicks up a row as it tries to stand, but continually falls forward. Its steel feet strike the metal floor of the church with a resounding thud. Its struggle, Mr. MacMurtrie said, is among the most identifiably "human."As other robots perform, Rope Climber works its way up a thick rope hanging from the ceiling."They're kind of a tribe of machines that evolved one from another," Mr. MacMurtrie said. "The pieces themselves were my teachers. Each time I built one, I would learn something for the next step."During a visit to his workshop last month, Mr. MacMurtrie, Ms. Kaunert and their team were busy readying the robots' various MIDI sequences as well as the pneumatic air-supply hoses and computer cables the robots depend on. The group can run the whole show without loud compressor motors switching on mid-performance.But there was plenty of noise: a cacophony of drumming, thumping, chiming, metallic thuds and atonal string notes, accompanied by the hisses of the pneumatic rams that operate many of the robots' body parts, creating the show's complex sonic texture. Two men in a control booth high above the floor work the computers, making the air-dependent machines come alive at the right times.Mr. MacMurtrie tested out the robots' credibility as metallic clergy on Aug. 17, when he and his wife held a wedding ceremony for family and friends from the East Coast and Europe. (They had officially tied the knot in December at Brooklyn Borough Hall.) After Ms. Kaunert's uncle, a retired minister, delivered the blessing, the robots were activated for celebratory drumming.
WASHINGTON — When Herbie Hancock learned he was one of the five artists to be honored this year by the John F. Kennedy Center for the Performing Arts, the surprise, he said, brought him to the verge of tears. "And that doesn't happen to me very often.""To think that they would put me on the list with people I have loved and respected for so many years, it's shocking," said Mr. Hancock, a 73-year-old master jazz pianist who has won 14 Grammys and an Oscar. "It was like a dream, hard to believe and humbling."The musicians Billy Joel and Carlos Santana, the actress Shirley MacLaine and the soprano Martina Arroyo will also receive the 36th honors medal in December, the Kennedy Center announced Thursday.The annual award is presented for lifetime contributions to American culture in dance, music, theater, opera, Film or television. David M. Rubenstein, the Kennedy Center chairman, said the honorees "have spent their lives elevating the cultural vibrancy of our nation and the world."This class of recipients is the first since the Kennedy Center revamped its selection process this year, in response to criticism that the process lacked transparency and had yielded only two Latino winners.The medals will be presented at a dinner at the State Department on Dec. 7, followed the next day by a reception at the White House and tribute performances at the Kennedy Center. The performances will be taped and broadcast on Dec. 29 on CBS."It's better than Fourth of July, Christmas, Thanksgiving and Valentine's," said Mr. Santana, 66, who is receiving the award 50 years after he arrived in San Francisco from Tijuana, Mexico.He made a name for himself in the Bay Area at a time, he said, when it was "ground zero for the consciousness revolution." But he shot to fame after his band performed at the Woodstock concert in 1969. Since then, he has racked up 10 Grammys and sold more than 100 million records with music that blends Afro-Cuban styles with blues, jazz and rock.Ms. MacLaine, 79, has won an Oscar, several Golden Globes and a lifetime achievement award from the American Film Institute for a career full of notable performances in films like "The Apartment" in 1960 and "Terms of Endearment" in 1983. But the Kennedy Center medal, she said, is special recognition."The others are for a part you did or for how you interpreted a character, but this is about how you've interpreted yourself," she said.Mr. Joel's lyricism and piano skills earned him the nickname "Piano Man" — the title of his signature song — as he churned out decades of hits like the singles "Allentown" and "Only the Good Die Young." Mr. Joel, 64, said in a statement that he was honored to be among an "illustrious roster of outstanding musicians."Mr. Hancock pushed jazz into the electronic age and fused it with funk, hip-hop and pop.Ms. Arroyo, 76, pursued opera against her mother's urgings to find a more practical skill. She became a star in 1965 after she replaced Birgit Nilsson in a production of "Aida" and has performed around the world.Before Ms. Arroyo and Mr. Santana, the actress Chita Rivera and the opera star Plácido Domingo were the only Latinos among 185 artists who had received the award since it was created in 1978 with a single criterion: excellence.After an internal review, the Kennedy Center expanded its artists' committee, which picks the nominees, and began accepting recommendations from the public. It also created a committee that includes two previous winners, Ms. Rivera and the cellist Yo-Yo Ma, to narrow the list of nominees for the Kennedy Center board, which makes the final decisions.
Crossing the Line , a rich multidisciplinary festival produced annually by the French Institute Alliance Française, opens on Thursday with the United States premiere of "Systema Occam," a richly sensual work by the French composer Éliane Radigue and the visual artist Xavier Veilhan. Ms. Radigue, an electronic-music pioneer whose elemental works reach New York far too infrequently, has recently turned her attention to creating intensely focused pieces for acoustic instruments. "Systema Occam" involves Rhodri Davies, an arresting Welsh harpist.The cellist Charles Curtis, among the first beneficiaries of Ms. Radigue's shift in focus, will play her music alongside works by other composers on Friday at the Issue Project Room. The next night, Mr. Curtis will introduce a new piece by the San Francisco composer Tashi Wada, during a concert shared with the electronic-music duo Pitreleh. (8 p.m., Thursday, Florence Gould Hall, French Institute Alliance Française, 55 East 59th Street, Manhattan, 212-355-6160, fiaf.org. 8 p.m., Friday and Saturday, Issue Project Room, 22 Boerum Place, near Livingston Street, Downtown Brooklyn, 718-330-0313, issueprojectroom.org.)
The Londoner Archy Marshall, better known by his latest stage name, King Krule , recorded his first demo at the age of 8. "I wrote about escaping the city," he said, "living in the countryside, on a farm," and about animals. "That's kind of how Zoo Kid," as he was called when he released his first single , "came about." Music he composed at 12 was eventually posted online. "If someone dug hard enough, they could find my voice, unbroken, over like a speed-garage-indie track," Mr. Marshall, now 19, said, laughing.Under his current moniker — inspired not by Donkey Kong, as the Internet would have it, but by King Creole — he released his debut album, "6 Feet Beneath the Moon," on True Panther/XL last month. Sometimes called "darkwave," it has drawn praise for its late-night-in-the-city textures and spare ballads. He's in the midst of a headlining international tour, including a recent sold-out show at the Bowery Ballroom.The guitar-driven King Krule single "Easy Easy" is a big leap, in terms of production, from his earliest recordings, made on an outdated laptop with old, unforgiving software. "You couldn't save on it," he said. "So I had to literally spend nights — from getting home from school at like 6 till about 6 in the morning — just trying to complete one song." The core of his sound, his mature baritone, is at odds with his stage presence, a skinny 6-foot-1-inch kid in an oversize suit.Before his Bowery show, confident and nervy, open about emotional letdowns and bouncy in his sneakers, he spoke with Melena Ryzik about going through puberty on tape and using his music to get girls. These are excerpts from the conversation.Q. You had a rough time with education, and ended up at the performing arts Brit School, which taught Adele and Amy Winehouse.A. When I got there, it was almost like a savior. I studied music there for two years, and then I moved to art, and when I done art, I dropped out. It educated me in all these different cultural references. It taught me so much about world music. Stuff like Buena Vista Social Club and Fela Kuti were quite a main thing to my childhood. As soon as I reached an age where I realized that Fela was singing in English, when I got past his accent, I loved the rawness of it, and the funk and the rhythm and the melody. He definitely spoke to me, a lot, because he was fighting out against this sort of establishment, and I was always trying to fight out against the establishment that I was in.What did you think when your voice changed?I was 14, 15. Right away I was like, [expletive] I can't hit these notes anymore. My voice became more and more sandy. [It] degraded into the layers of a croissant. It became flaky and dry.Do you listen to people with similar voices?I'm always listening, to develop. Screamin' Jay Hawkins is one of the main ones. Someone told me he discovered his voice by just recording really drunk. Mine was just adolescence. It was listening to Eddie Cochran and Gene Vincent and Elvis Presley and Paul Weller. And shouting.You've written songs about depression and suicide. Is that a way of documenting what you're going through? Is it therapeutic?It's both. Especially with the live, just the way I curve words, it's about expression. It's so emotive, to be able to release these words into a mike. It really emphasizes this insane tingle down my spine whenever I play. I used to do it just to calm myself. And when I realized I could write lyrics and let someone that I knew listen to them, but not know that the song was about them — say it was a girl. I could write this song about how I feel about this girl, I could play it to them. I just loved it, because all of the words would speak to them. I could see them slowly falling in love with me. I was like: This is great, this [expletive] really works.
MINNEAPOLIS — A deadline from management to settle a nearly yearlong lockout of the Minnesota Orchestra players expired on Sunday, but both sides appeared willing to continue negotiations.In a statement released on Sunday evening, management said: "The board has offered a further revision to its compromise proposal that seeks to end the lockout and result in a multiyear contract, and discussions involving the mediator have been ongoing this weekend. We are currently awaiting word from the musicians regarding the proposal. We will share further news as soon as we are able to do so on Monday."The players went ahead with their own concert in the Lake Harriet Band Shell on Sunday afternoon, playing for an enthusiastic and obviously sympathetic audience of thousands. Manny Laureano, the principal trumpeter, conducted Weber's "Freischütz" Overture and Tchaikovsky's Fifth Symphony."It appears the other side has returned to the mediation process," Blois Olson, the players' spokesman, said in a news conference before the concert. "We still have a long way to go."George J. Mitchell, the former senator from Maine, has been acting as a mediator in the dispute. Osmo Vanska, the orchestra's music director, has threatened to resign if the players are not rehearsing by Sept. 30 to ensure an orderly start to their new season and time enough to prepare for important concerts in Carnegie Hall in early November. Management had said that in order to meet that schedule, an agreement would have to be in place by Sunday.Anthony Ross, the orchestra's principal cellist, announced that the players were planning their own fall season. On Oct. 4 and 5, he said, the pianist Emanuel Ax, who is scheduled to perform in the orchestra's subscription season on those dates, would perform concertos with the locked-out players. Mr. Ross did not seem to hold out much hope that the lockout, which began on Oct. 1, 2012, would end by then.
In the video for "Crooked," the K-pop star G-Dragon — effortlessly lissome, his hair Warhol-white — does a lot of running, some staggering, some mean-mugging, some dancing and a little aggressive flirting.But mostly he changes clothes. He cycles through at least two-dozen outfits: a tight cotton-candy-blue double-breasted suit; a drapey leopard-print top; a distressed black motorcycle jacket; a huge black fur coat with a face dyed on the back; a tattered white punk T-shirt with tight chain-festooned jeans straight from Trash and Vaudeville.The song? The song is fine.These are the trade-offs sometimes required in K-pop, a genre that plays fast and loose with visual excess, a tendency that has only served G-Dragon, the most electric member of the long-running boy band BigBang, well."Crooked" appears on the recently released "Coup D'Etat" (YG), the second full G-Dragon album and the first since he emerged as the genre's style vanguard. At its best, K-pop is gloriously synthetic, and G-Dragon is a miraculous canvas to work with. He morphs easily into almost any style, he moves with panache and confidence, and he has a perpetual sense of theater about him. His is a version of pop stardom all but abandoned in this country.Peak G-Dragon came last year in the form of "Crayon," a pneumatic-intensity thumper with a Southern rap backbone. The song was gleeful chaos, and the video was a cultural treasure — hilarious, dizzying, and full of retina-frying explosions of color."Crayon," which appeared on the EP "One of a Kind," set an almost impossibly high bar. Nothing on the sometimes ambitious, sometimes comfortable "Coup D'Etat" bests that, although the album does show G-Dragon trying a range of styles. "Black" is mellow early-1990s R&B, and convincing. "R.O.D." opens with roots reggae and ends up with neutered dubstep, the sort of song the reconstituted No Doubt could be making. "Runaway" has some of the shriek of 1980s arena rock. And "Niliria" samples a Korean folk song before shifting gears into fire-alarm-urgent club music.Throughout, G-Dragon is a slithery presence — he doesn't leave as much of a mark on the ear as the eye. He's got a reedy voice that is typically made even more needling with digital manipulation. His singing is thin, verging on cute. His rapping, though, as with "Black" and "Niliria," is nimble and bouncy, and has a faint outline of tension — his emphases fall in all the right places.Whether K-pop needs American saturation is open for debate. It's done relatively well here without much effort — top acts have begun to play arena shows, thanks to fan bases cultivated largely online. But "Coup D'Etat," though largely in Korean, is perhaps the K-pop album with America most heavily on its mind and in its credits, thanks to a clutch of collaborations with American stars. Diplo and Baauer produced the title track, which has a couple of echoes of Baauer's "Harlem Shake," this year's unlikeliest pop hit. Sky Ferreira sings on "Black," a little blankly, as is her wont. And Missy Elliott continues her quixotic comeback campaign with a jubilant, slightly lazy verse on "Niliria."G-Dragon has no American male pop-star equivalent; the closest in recent memory would be Justin Timberlake from peak-era 'N Sync. His malleability is more reminiscent of female stars like Lady Gaga, Kesha and Nicki Minaj, all of whom are as much about the packaging as what's inside. Ms. Elliott may be the inadvertent blueprint for K-pop's polyvalent aesthetic, futuristic and borrowing widely. (She and G-Dragon performed "Niliria" at a convention in Los Angeles last month.)Much of the time K-pop is importing pop ideas from here, although its splicing of them into something different is unique. It's a surprise that the recent song interpolating Rick Ross's "Hustlin' " doesn't come from G-Dragon but rather his far tamer BigBang band mate Seungri, on "Gotta Talk to U," from his less imaginative EP, "Let's Talk About Love."Occasionally all that borrowing can reveal a glaring lack of context. A couple of months ago G-Dragon posted a photo of himself in black face paint to Instagram, causing a small firestorm; later, a representative said it wasn't meant to be blackface, but was part of a photo shoot in which he wore several colors of face paint.It was a rare misstep in presentation for G-Dragon, who appears far more mindful of how he looks than how he sounds. But he's capable of exciting musical synthesis, and the more he lets his appearance inform his music, the better off he'll be. Before long, it's likely the borrowing will be going in the other direction, with the world learning from him.
The saxophone is the most ambiguous of instruments. Though ubiquitous in jazz and pop, it has long remained on the fringes of classical music, brought in for the occasional "Bolero," but rarely afforded the spotlight. When it finds its way into the orchestra, it often functions as a jazzy outsider, an ambassador of pop.Few contemporary composers are better poised to trade on the saxophone's ambivalent status than John Adams, who long ago mastered the art of moving nimbly between the classical and pop worlds. Mr. Adams has toyed with the instrument ever since he introduced a saxophone quartet into his opera "Nixon in China" a quarter-century ago. And in recent years, Mr. Adams has rediscovered the saxophone and its midcentury jazz legacy, even as he has distanced himself from young composers who draw on the commercial music of their own era.When the soloist Timothy McAllister and the Baltimore Symphony Orchestra give the United States premiere of Mr. Adams's Saxophone Concerto on Friday at Meyerhoff Symphony Hall in Baltimore, it will be an auspicious event for the large but often overlooked world of classical saxophonists. Those who miss the Baltimore performances can hear the concerto performed by Mr. McAllister and the St. Louis Symphony Orchestra in a live online broadcast on Oct. 5; Nonesuch will release a recording next spring.This new work grew out of Mr. Adams's lifelong love for the slippery sound of the sax, and also took inspiration from the virtuoso technique of Mr. McAllister, who is a professor at the Bienen School of Music at Northwestern, and, at 40, one of the foremost saxophonists of his generation.In 2009, Mr. Adams heard Mr. McAllister play "City Noir," Mr. Adams's jazz-inflected symphonic work with a major saxophone part, and decided he had to write more for him.In a recent phone interview, Mr. Adams eagerly extolled Mr. McAllister's strengths. "You find that with great artists that the details, the actual technical details of the instrument — the reed, the mouthpiece, the pads and all of those little, tiny, minuscule physical details — are so important," Mr. Adams said. "On the one hand, that impressed me, and the other was just his absolute, indefatigable willingness to just do anything."Mr. McAllister seized the opportunity. "For me, personally, Adams has been No. 1 — he's been, for me, the No. 1 goal of someone we need to get a piece from," he said recently. "It's still Adams at the core: deep polyrhythmic structures, these huge, giant, kind of glacial forms. That's really exciting, to hear these trademarks about his music and then referencing the saxophone in these multiple settings."The saxophone has autobiographical implications for Mr. Adams, who says that it has always been "a part of my musical genealogy." His father played alto in swing bands in the 1930s, and Mr. Adams dabbled with the sax in his youth. (His main instrument was clarinet.)Though the saxophone has its own classical repertory, Mr. Adams sought out models from jazz. Stan Getz's 1961 album, "Focus," and the compilation "Charlie Parker With Strings" were particular inspirations."The sound of the saxophone with the orchestra, particularly with the string orchestra, is just magical," Mr. Adams said. "It always puzzled me that there were so few saxophone concertos, and certainly no really great saxophone concerto in the way that there's the Mozart Clarinet Concerto."There are, in fact, more than a few saxophone concertos — just none that are regularly performed by symphony orchestras. (The best-known are by relatively obscure composers like Glazunov and Ibert.)Invented by Adolphe Sax in 1846 for military bands, the saxophone had a few early classical advocates, like Berlioz. But snobbery and intonation issues mostly kept the instrument out of the orchestra. Instead, saxophones found their way into American dance bands in the 1910s, and became core members of swing bands, as well as the instruments of choice for jazz soloists.
Two years ago the Swedish D.J., producer and denim model Avicii released "Levels," a clangorous and joyful club anthem that was a global hit so vast that it reinforced the fact that the United States isn't really the center of global pop, at least not the way it once was.America has no real radio infrastructure for dance music, which means even a song like "Levels" has little hope of moving beyond the Electric Daisy Carnival circuit and into the broader pop consciousness, although everywhere else that's exactly where it resided. At least in this country, American sonic imperialism still works.But a lot has changed since "Levels." Dance music is becoming normalized, even here, and has been seeping into other genres, from traditional pop to R&B. D.J.-producers like Calvin Harris, by working with superstars like Rihanna, are beginning to gain a dollop of the respect they garner elsewhere.Into that environment arrives Avicii's full-length debut album, "True" (PRMD/Island), which, thanks to the success of "Levels," has the whiff of a fait accompli about it. At least it did until the Ultra Music Festival in March, when Avicii turned his high-profile set into a roots jam session, to the befuddlement of almost everyone, and the outright anger of many. I'm sure someone would have screamed "Judas!" if they'd gotten the joke."Hey, you got your bluegrass in my techno!" is a perfectly valid complaint most of the time. And yes, on a few songs on "True," with the help of the bluegrass stalwart Dan Tyminski and the longtime country songwriter Mac Davis, that is more or less what Avicii attempts.But don't see "True" as the album in which dance music imports the sounds of the American heartland into the club in hopes of digging up new audiences, or even new ideas; see it as the one in which country takes its place front and center in global pop.That is the subtext of the guitar-laden stomper "Wake Me Up," already another huge hit that undermines American centrality in global pop, and especially the unexpectedly lovely "Hey Brother," which features the keening vocals of Mr. Tyminski. (How much of a risk is it to use the main voice from an album, the "O Brother, Where Art Thou?" soundtrack, that has sold over seven million copies in the United States?)Even though they're unexpected twists in Avicii's otherwise clean ascent, these songs don't arrive in a vacuum. They sit comfortably next to the king-size crossover country and folk of recent years — think Mumford & Sons, or the dubstep song on the last Taylor Swift album. Even Keith Urban has a fake club song on his new album. And that's to say nothing of the emergent trend of club remixes of country hits by the likes of Dee Jay Silver and DJ DU. (And yes, there was disco-country in the 1970s, for what it's worth.)Marry that to the recent impulse among a certain more classicist stripe of dance-music act to bring the genre back to organic roots — Daft Punk's last album repudiates the last couple of decades of computer music — and Avicii's musical choices feel savvy and timely. (Along with the selections of his manager, Ash Pournouri, who receives a writing credit on almost every song on this album.)That Avicii is testing himself, and his public, is clear. "Heart Upon My Sleeve," which features vocals from Dan Reynolds of the alt-rock preservers Imagine Dragons, opens up like an acoustic Queensryche song. "Shame on Me" is swing music, more or less, and a less successful hybrid than Avicii's roots experiments.Compared with "Wake Me Up" and "Hey Brother," the rest of "True" doesn't offer much challenge, even if it is thoroughly effective in places. "Dear Boy" is completely straightforward electro-infused house, and it's sharp. "Lay Me Down," produced in part by Nile Rodgers, who is having a banner year, and featuring a bracing vocal by Adam Lambert, is completely valid modern disco, faithful to the genre as it once was but not a slavish throwback. It's another escape into yesteryear by an artist carrying today — and tomorrow — on his shoulders.
Bill Callahan may be easiest to describe by what he isn't quite: a folkie; a country singer; a cloistered, primitivist weirdo with a four-track recorder; a poet or some other kind of words-only artist. Over the last 23 years, on a string of records made almost exclusively for the Chicago label Drag City, you sense that he's walked past those doors, revising his ideas, waiting, looking for something.He's found it. Listen through his astonishing new album, "Dream River," and you will hear, lined up neatly, his trademarks. They've been floating around in his work recently, though perhaps not so deliberately; they didn't seem like trademarks until now. But "Dream River" is evidence of a system, a working formula.Here is Mr. Callahan's baritone voice, floating lightly in middle range and making quick and confident deep dives, putting strange bends on a phrase. Here is an image of a man alone in a hotel room; images of eagles and water — in fact, of an eagle flying over water, "alive and enjoying the ride." (The idea of motion for its own sake is another Callahan trademark.) A rippling phase effect on Mr. Callahan's rhythm-guitar strumming, like Waylon Jennings had in the mid-'70s. A small band with minimal percussion — sometimes only congas and clave sticks — playing spacious and ominous live arrangements in waltz or habanera, through songs that pause and turn in strange places. Words or expressions ritually expressed in twos or threes. And a narrative action first described and then imitated, like this, from the album's first track, "The Sing":The only words I've said today are beer and thank youMr. Callahan is now 47 and has been based in Austin, Tex., for almost a decade. In the frequently scrappy or bitter music he made under the name Smog beginning in 1990, and then since he started using his own name on records in 2007, he's been changing ensembles, sounds and strategies, making his work more country or less, more minimal or less, more disruptive or less. His work has suggested a great struggle to make songs that are both emotionally affecting and explosions of implied meaning: a kind of semantic-epistemological-metaphysical event. He seems to want to put everything in them now: love, death, fear, patience, transfiguration. He just doesn't want to say any of it outright.This level of subtlety is not common in pop. Plenty of songwriters are oblique, but Mr. Callahan wants to connect. His records are literary without having a lot of words; they're methodical slow drips of charged ideas that settle in the brain like a long poem or a novel. This one in particular is almost transparent: a wind blows through it. With a group of Austin musicians that has become more stable over the last few albums, he's made a complex procedure sound easy.Mr. Callahan's introverted voice, refined as it has become over the years, may never lose its essential awkwardness; he can still use it perversely. (This record's final song, "Winter Road," has a smash closer on paper: "I have learned when things are beautiful/ to just keep on." Yet he stretches out "are" and "just," the two dullest words of the couplet, into long froggy croaks over an F-minor chord; it's a weirdly flat-footed move at an important moment.) He has a unified band sound now, and has let his lead-line instrumental players take major roles in it: Beth Galiger on flute brings a hopeful sound to a heavy-hearted scene, and Matt Kinsey, on electric guitar, is miraculous. Using echo and delay pedals and a tremolo bar, Mr. Kinsey keeps creeping in, bursting like a pink sky, and slipping away. His work on this record feels like one continuous performance, and one of the best by anyone I have heard this year.Mr. Callahan has said that he cares about putting a kind of buried story line in his records, from song to song. I don't know about that, but there is a single consciousness that holds together "Dream River." There's always a force threatening to drag the narrator under in these songs: an icy road, a storm, a mate's deep sleep, gravity. His characters are confused without admitting it, and they're infantile around love, abjectly grateful for its power, seeking or offering it impulsively. On "Javelin Unlanding" he sings:Alone alone aloneLove is central to the record anyway, through all the subterfuge and indirection. This is an album in which a song that's actually about flying ("Small Plane") is, one level deeper, about a trusting relationship, and possibly an even better song about sex. Yet the next song, "Spring," is explicitly about sex (the key couplet is "All I want to do is to make love to you/ in the fertile dirt"), but points to something else, something bigger and darker.What is it? Disappointment, decay. "We call it spring, though things are dying," he sings. Then he rights himself: "The true spring is in you/ the true spring is in you."
On Friday evening, the Minnesota Orchestra will hold a fund-raising ball in Orchestra Hall, which is just reopening after renovations costing some $50 million. Besides acoustical improvements intended to help musicians hear one another better onstage and expanded facilities for the players backstage, the face-lift includes a large and attractive new lobby that the orchestra and renters of the hall will be able to use to entertain patrons.From an upper level on Friday, wealthy donors will look out at the skyline through an array of floor-to-ceiling windows. And at street level, they will look out at a demonstration through a low-slung row of windows extending the length of the facade: a rally by supporters of the orchestra's players, who have been locked out of their jobs for almost a year, protesting the musicians' treatment by the orchestra's management and board.Such, at least, was the prospect held up by the players at a concert they arranged on their own at the Lake Harriet Band Shell here on Sunday.For the players, who have rejected two proposed contracts — one that would have cut their salaries by a third, another by a quarter — the lobby itself, costing some $30 million, has become a symbol. Though money was raised specifically for the renovation project, the players cast the lobby expenditure as a misappropriation of funds that might better be directed toward their remuneration and welfare.The lockout, which began last Oct. 1 and wiped out an entire season of concerts, now jeopardizes the start of another, which is to include four concerts of Sibelius at Carnegie Hall conducted by Osmo Vanska, the orchestra's music director. It also jeopardizes Mr. Vanska's tenure, since he has threatened to resign if the first two Carnegie concerts, in early November, are canceled.He has said that to prepare adequately for the new season and for the Carnegie concerts, the players will have to be rehearsing by Sept. 30. The administration said that for that to happen, the players would have to have agreed to a new contract by last Sunday.That deadline has now been extended, day to day through most of a week, as both sides continue to work with a mediator, George J. Mitchell, the former senator from Maine who is also a seasoned diplomat, though not necessarily where unions are involved. The orchestra's season, the Carnegie concerts and Mr. Vanska's tenure continue to hang in the balance.Is this a time for a gala celebration, fund-raiser or not?"The ball raises $1 million," said Michael Henson, the orchestra's president and chief executive. "If we canceled it, we'd be $1 million worse off."The players are planning a fall season of their own, beginning with concerts on Oct. 4 and 5 featuring the pianist Emanuel Ax, according to their Web site. What is more, said their spokesman, Blois Olson, there has been "soft interest" from unspecified quarters in the notion of having the players stage their own Sibelius concerts with Mr. Vanska at Carnegie, free of management involvement, as unlikely as that may seem.
The pianist and composer Muhal Richard Abrams, who just turned 83, has always had roughly equal use for communion and solitude. Nearly 50 years ago he laid the groundwork for the Association for the Advancement of Creative Musicians, one of the great collectivist institutions in African-American music. And yet his own creative metabolism suggests a rugged self-containment, impervious to outside influence.So there's more than a casual symmetry in the format for his concert on Thursday in Brooklyn at Roulette, which kicks off the 25th season of Interpretations, the new-music series run by Thomas Buckner. Mr. Abrams will perform the first half alone at the piano, most likely as a long-form improvisation. The second half will feature an ensemble with two other pianists, Amina Claudine Myers and Joseph Kubera; four vocalists, including Mr. Buckner, a baritone; and a chamberlike cohort of violin, cello, clarinet, electronics and percussion. The program's title is "Dialogue Social," a phrase that fits. (8 p.m., Thursday, 509 Atlantic Avenue, at Third Avenue, Boerum Hill, 917-267-0363, roulette.org; $15, $10 for students.)
"Factory Floor" (DFA), the self-titled debut album by an English electronic trio, is a present-day blast from an austere past. At the end of the 1970s, the combination of art-punk aesthetics, primitive electronic instruments, do-it-yourself budgets and a British recession spawned dance music that prided itself on using a few brittle, melody-defying sounds — the fewer the better — to get dance floors moving. Even then, the music had an abstinent spirit, proudly renouncing easy pleasures. Now that plush, rounded sounds and huge beats are available with a key click, it's even more contrarian to build tracks from a handful of tinny sounds, unexaggerated percussion, bits of static, stray guitar sounds and deadpan vocals: "What is a good place to start?" goes the opening cut.Factory Floor, a trio since 2009 and a duo before that, established its post-punk bona fides by collaborating with industrial-rock pioneers, but it trades on rigor and rhythm, not nostalgia. With repetition and fractures, tiny noises amid stark silences, Factory Floor generates extraordinary propulsion in its dark, empty spaces.BUILD ME UP FROM BONESSarah Jarosz sings "Fuel the Fire," a song on her third studio album, "Build Me Up From Bones" (Sugar Hill), with some of the breaks and sharpness of deep Appalachia; it's a modal, irregular fiddle tune filled out by banjo and mandolin. But it's hardly traditional. She's singing about desire, as she does through much of the album. And partway through the song, it turns away from realistic acoustic recording to manipulate echoes and reverberation. Ms. Jarosz, 22, is expanding her beloved Americana roots in both sound and message. Her lyrics have a mystical streak, projecting love and loneliness across the landscape and the sky. And the string-band heritage matters to her, but so does what she can convey, here and now with her chosen instruments and modern technology, about "the way I feel inside."THE BONES OF WHAT YOU BELIEVEOn the debut album by the Scottish band Chvrches, "The Bones of What You Believe" (Glassnote), the synthesizers gleam with artificial precision; so, at first, do the vocals, chopped into perfectly pitched samples over a majestic beat and swirling major chords. But then a human factor kicks in as Lauren Mayberry, the lead singer, warns: "We've come as far as we're ever gonna get/Until you realize that you should go." In the next song, "We Sink," a perky dance beat carries her promise: "I'll be a thorn in your side till you die." Then comes "Gun," hinting at domestic violence before she vows, "I will be a gun/And it's you I'll come for." Chvrches get much of its sonic palette from trance: the shimmering timbres, the pealing arpeggios, the indefatigably smiley-faced beat. But "The Bones of What You Believe" turns trance's reassurance inside out; it's an album of breakup and near-breakup songs, in which love and longing are less likely to be a Utopia than a trap.The Malian singer Rokia Traoré has a gentle voice with a steely core, one that's revealed more clearly than ever on "Beautiful Africa" (Nonesuch). The album was produced by John Parish, who does for Ms. Traoré what he's done for P. J. Harvey and Eels: stripping away all unnecessary prettiness, focusing on a handful of instruments and a fully exposed voice, scratches and all. The album captures songs as they meditate, like "Mélancolie," or spontaneously combust, like "Kouma," about seduction and betrayal, and "Sikey," about defying caste.Ms. Traoré, the well-traveled daughter of a diplomat, finely gauges her musical hybrids. Most of her songs have at their center a running dialogue between electric guitar and the Malian n'goni, a likely ancestor of the banjo. But when she gets to the title song of "Beautiful Africa" — a trilingual indictment of war across Africa, including Mali's troubles — the wah-wah comes out and things get funky.Justin Vernon isn't big on brand maintenance. After winning the Best New Artist Grammy Award as Bon Iver and collaborating with Kanye West under his own name, he has tucked himself back into the lineup of Volcano Choir, his continuing collaboration with the Milwaukee instrumental rock band Collections of Colonies of Bees. Volcano Choir's debut album, "Unmap" in 2009, leaned toward the serene patterns of interlocking guitars that Collections often record on their own albums, with Mr. Vernon's voice floating amid the ripples. The patterns are still there on Volcano Choir's "Repave" (Jagjaguwar). But now Volcano Choir puts Mr. Vernon's voice and words up front and builds something like songs around them, often with crescendos marching toward full-scale choruses — enough to make the often inscrutable lyrics sound passionate enough to be worth puzzling out.Insecurity, guilt, confusion and doggedness — set to winsome melodies or gnarled guitar chords and run through battered equipment — were the makings of some of the best indie-rock of the early 1990s. On "Defend Yourself" (Joyful Noise), Sebadoh's first studio album since 1999, Lou Barlow still has them all. The reason is set out in the album's opening song, "I Will," which sounds more sanguine than what its lyrics reveal. It's about his leaving his wife (of 25 years) for a new love. For the rest of the album he wrestles with regrets, resentments and self-justifications. Sebadoh's other songwriter, Jason Loewenstein, stands by his buddy, with punkier, more angular rockers: "Know that you've beaten yourself senseless/How do you feel now?" The guitars sound as raw as the emotions.
As James Levine prepared to return to the Metropolitan Opera House to conduct his first performance there since he was sidelined by a severe spinal injury two years ago, he invited a reporter to watch how he gets ready for the season. He rehearsed the Met Orchestra for a future Carnegie Hall concert. He held a sitzprobe — an unstaged rehearsal with the cast of Mozart's "Così Fan Tutte" — in a large rehearsal room on C Level, three floors below the Met's vast stage. He then held a piano rehearsal for singers in List Hall, the small hall off the Met's main auditorium, where latecomers are sometimes sent to wait for the next intermission.Along the way, Mr. Levine — who is conducting from a wheelchair but is full of focus, energy and enthusiasm — provided some rare insights into the approaches that have helped make him one of the world's leading opera conductors, and helped him shape the Met's orchestra and singers in 2,442 performances over more than 40 years. Here are some of them:In rehearsals, Mr. Levine did not stint on praise, and usually prefaced suggestions that might sound like criticism with something positive."Folks, you are as hot as you can be," he told the orchestra after it ran through the overture to Verdi's "Vespri Siciliani." He paused during a reading of Elliott Carter's "Variations for Orchestra" to tell them, "Oh, boy, it was good up to there." He liberally used his free hand, the one not holding the baton, to flash thumbs-up signs or, from time to time, to kiss his fingers. And he often singled out particular sections of the orchestra, saying things like, "Trombones, that sound was tremendous!" or, "Celli, it was great."He could still be demanding in trying to draw the sound he wanted from the orchestra, or from singers, as he ran through small sections again and again and again. At one point, he interrupted a singer with a question: "I've changed the tempo already — can you take the one I've got?"But, more often, he was quick to praise, especially in the "Così" rehearsals. "Were you happy up to there?" he asked Isabel Leonard, the mezzo-soprano singing Dorabella, after she performed her aria "Smanie implacabili." "I was thrilled. You got a big range of melodrama in and out, so that it's funny and it's frightening and it's full of sharp contrasts and it really works. It's a sensational piece, an aria not like any others."And he brought one rehearsal to a halt after Matthew Polenzani, the lyric tenor playing Ferrando, sang the aria "Un' aura amorosa" and won a sustained ovation from the orchestra."That's a piece of singing, isn't it?" Mr. Levine asked. The next day, at the piano rehearsal, he told Mr. Polenzani: "The aria was the best-sung I've ever heard it. Just wonderful."Mr. Polenzani said in an interview that Mr. Levine's manner helped him draw great performances out of musicians and singers."He loves the people in this orchestra, and it's obvious when you hear him talking to them," he said. "Never a harsh word. His harshest word is still delivered with a teacherly air, rather than a, 'Could you please just ...' You never hear that from him."It is not a universal approach, Mr. Polenzani noted. "I've seen it so many times, terrible examples of conductors who can't give a single bravo," he said. "I've actually said to people — friendly, sitting around at a bar, just chatting — you'll get a lot more out of your singers, if you somehow give them the idea that they're doing some things that you like. Nobody wants to work for somebody who doesn't like them. We're just going to not like you back."But singers like working with Mr. Levine. "He never gives you a note without first telling you that he likes what's going on," Mr. Polenzani said. "It's, 'Listen, Matt, it's really fantastic, what I could use a little more of is ...' "Mr. Levine does not always rely on musical terminology when telling the Met Orchestra what he's looking for.Consider his instructions to the players during a recent rehearsal of a particularly fiery passage in the overture to Verdi's "Vespri Siciliani," which they plan to play at a concert in Carnegie Hall in October. "Everything stormy," Mr. Levine told them, "everything with a maximum of turmoil and conflict — you know, mobs that are killing each other, for what they think are very good reasons."
When James Levine comes home on Tuesday night for his first performance at the Metropolitan Opera since he fell and damaged his spine more than two years ago, he will conduct Mozart's "Così Fan Tutte" from a wheelchair-accessible orchestra pit, with new lifts and ramps to help him steer his chair to the rising mechanical podium that stagehands call the "maestro lift."But if Mr. Levine's mobility is still impaired, little else seems to be, as witnessed by his focus and engagement as he has prepared for his 2,443rd performance at the Met, a company he has shaped for more than four decades. The return of Mr. Levine, who is the Met's music director, is one of the most keenly anticipated events in the opera world.During a flurry of preseason activity, Mr. Levine has led the Met Orchestra in painstakingly detailed rehearsals of Elliott Carter's tempo-shifting "Variations for Orchestra" for an October Carnegie Hall concert. ("Trombones, keep that recitative style, as if it had words.") He has coached a new generation of singers in his "Così" cast on subjects ranging from the motivations of their characters to their Italian diction to when and how to breathe. ("Don't take a big tank-up here; you don't need it.") He has spent a Sunday afternoon gauging how the singers in the Lindemann Young Artist Development Program sound from the Met's vast stage. ("Your voice sounds good in here!") He even paused during one orchestra rehearsal to ask for louder triangle notes. ("They have to be a tiny bit louder, or the after-ring just doesn't exist.")"He's back with a vengeance," said Susanna Phillips, the soprano who sings one of the female leads, Fiordiligi, in Mozart's blend of low farce and high art. Or, as one of the Met's concertmasters, David Chan, put it in an interview, "He's back to being more energetic than the rest of us put together, you know?"Mr. Levine, 70, who gets around in a motorized wheelchair and is working on his walking, said in an interview that he felt better than he had in years. He said that surgeries and therapy had helped him not only to recover from his fall, but had also freed him of the debilitating back pain he was suffering before that, which led to many cancellations and contributed to his decision in 2011 to resign as music director of the Boston Symphony Orchestra. Before that, there had been operations on his kidney and his shoulder.Mr. Levine said that he felt energized to be conducting again at the opera house that has become so closely identified with him."I worked harder than I ever had to make the rehab a success," he said."I feel terrific," he said after a recent rehearsal. "I don't have any pain, my resilience is the way you see, and I'm just thrilled that this was possible, and that it was in the cards, and that the company thought so, too."He last conducted at the Met in May 2011, leaving Brünnhilde asleep on a rock surrounded with magic fire at the end of Wagner's "Walküre." That summer, he fell in Vermont and lost sensation in his legs, leaving him unable to work for a whole year. After missing the Met's 2011-12 season, Mr. Levine wrote a letter to the members of the company, thanking them for their warm wishes, congratulating them on performances he had caught on the radio and on DVDs, and saying he expected to return. It was signed, "All my love."Last year, Mr. Levine came to the Met a few times a week to work with young artists and attend meetings. He made his big musical comeback last spring, at a Carnegie Hall concert that critics called a triumph. Now he is back conducting opera again — but he is also facing questions about how well he will be able to fulfill his other duties as the Met's music director. He acknowledged that he was not yet back to a full workload."Because I'm conducting again and I hadn't for two years — which is sort of unthinkable, the way I've lived my life — I'm concentrating quite a lot on that at the moment," he said, noting that he was still teaching young artists, attending planning meetings and working closely with the orchestra. "Gradually, as I get my sea legs back and I know what the work takes out of me and whether I need to rebalance the way I do anything — then, gradually, the array of things that I do will increase again."Peter Gelb, who said that, as the Met's general manager, he bears the ultimate responsibility for the company's artistic and administrative health, said the Met was thrilled to have Mr. Levine back in good form. "The Met is so lucky to have somebody who may be the greatest opera conductor in history here," he said. "That's a resource you don't want to lose."Mr. Levine said he was especially enjoying the chance to work with young singers. At a recent "Così" piano rehearsal, he helped Ms. Phillips, 32, navigate the vocal fireworks in the aria "Come scoglio," to make sure she had time to let a high C ring out after a series of fast runs. "Since you have this note in your voice to burn," he said, "I want to hear it."Then he reminisced about the very first time he rehearsed at the Met, in 1971, for a "Tosca" with the tenor Franco Corelli."I confess I love great high notes," Mr. Levine said, noting that many conductors in those days were reluctant to let singers hold them for long. "I came to a place where I knew, in the last act, he would take this note and make a beautiful, long diminuendo. And I held this with the orchestra. When I did it, the orchestra stopped and shuffled and applauded. I said, 'What's this?' And they said, 'It always drives us crazy — they'd cut it, other conductors.' They were all big Corelli fans, as it turned out, which I thought was very cute."Ms. Phillips — whose sister in the production, Dorabella, will be sung by Isabel Leonard, who was her real-life suite mate at Juilliard — said in an interview that she felt privileged to work with a conductor who had guided generations of great Fiordiligis."He loves this opera so much," she said. "He knows every word, he knows every ellipsis, he knows every eighth note in the second bassoon — he knows everything about this piece and he just inhabits it."That enthusiasm was clear when the lyric tenor Matthew Polenzani, singing one of the lovers, Ferrando, brought a rehearsal to a halt with a rendition of "Un' aura amorosa" that won an ovation from the orchestra. Mr. Levine called it the best he had ever heard, adding, "If I had had what you had, I'd try to sing it like that."Those moments come frequently, Mr. Levine said, even with pieces he has conducted dozens of times. "It's the opposite of growing stale," he said. "It gets actually fresher the more you do, and the more you know, the more you can distill where the energy needs to go."
It may very well be all over for New York City Opera after the buxom lady sings.City Opera's board, facing a season it cannot pay for, voted on Thursday to start bankruptcy proceedings next week and wind down the company's affairs if it fails to raise $7 million by Monday, said Risa B. Heller, a spokeswoman for the company.It appears increasingly unlikely that the opera will meet that goal: officials said that the troupe had raised only about $1.5 million since it first made an urgent appeal for the $7 million this month.Bankruptcy would bring the final curtain down on a company that was called "the people's opera" by Mayor Fiorello H. La Guardia when it was founded 70 years ago. Since then City Opera has given the premieres of important works, helped the early careers of major singers including Beverly Sills, Samuel Ramey and Plácido Domingo, and been affordable enough to introduce several generations of New Yorkers to opera.But the company's fiscal woes have mounted in recent years, and in 2011 it left its longtime home in Lincoln Center to begin a new phase of performing far fewer operas each year — often to critical acclaim — as an itinerant troupe at theaters across the city.If no one steps in to save the company, Saturday night's performance of Mark-Anthony Turnage's "Anna Nicole" — about Anna Nicole Smith, the Playboy centerfold who died in 2007 — will quite likely be the final opera performed by the troupe. The company gave its inaugural performance, of Puccini's "Tosca," in 1944. The company's demise would keep New York City from being among the ranks of cultural capitals like London and Berlin that are able to support more than one major opera company."If we don't raise the money we will have run out of options," George Steel, the company's general manager and artistic director, said in a statement. "It is impossible for the company to produce opera without a way to fund it."The troupe had originally said only that it would cancel the remainder of the current season if it failed to raise the $7 million by Monday; it had threatened to cancel next year's season if it failed to raise $13 million by the end of the year. But the board has decided that if it cannot raise the money needed to continue the current season, it will begin the process of filing for bankruptcy protection on Tuesday, company officials said.Filing for bankruptcy will allow the company to prioritize its obligations to creditors as it tries to wind down its affairs. While the scope of what the troupe owes was unclear on Thursday night, one official said that its obligations included things like pension and retirement promises, leases that might have to be broken, and contracts with vendors. There were also questions about what would happen to its endowment, which the company borrowed money from several years ago.In a nod to its populist roots, City Opera tried to get $1 million of its current fund-raising effort through an online Kickstarter campaign. But the effort failed to attract the widespread support the company had hoped for: by Thursday it had raised only $156,143 from 968 backers.City Opera had planned three more productions for this season: Johann Christian Bach's "Endimione," Bartok's "Bluebeard's Castle" and Mozart's "Marriage of Figaro."The last decade has been brutal to the troupe. Ten years ago, City Opera gave 115 performances of 17 different operas; last year, it gave just 16 performances of 4 operas.But the old model could not pay for itself: the company began running sizable deficits in 2003, and went dark for the 2008-9 season while its longtime home, the New York State Theater, was given a major renovation and renamed for its benefactor, David H. Koch. In doing so, it lost a year's worth of ticket sales. Then the company raided its endowment, withdrawing $24 million to pay off loans and cover expenses.The endowment, which once provided the company with more than $3 million a year in investment income, now produces less than $200,000 a year — which is less than City Opera makes from its Thrift Shop on East 23rd Street in Manhattan.Then the company made the difficult decision to leave Lincoln Center, went through bruising labor negotiations — its orchestra players were once guaranteed a weekly salary for 29 weeks but are now paid by the performance and the rehearsal — and drastically trimmed its season.The new City Opera has been able to balance its budget and has produced critically acclaimed work. But it has performed so little each year that it has found its audience, and its universe of potential donors, much smaller than it was in the past. And with the company's woes coinciding with a prolonged economic downturn, attracting benefactors to save City Opera has proved difficult.A bankruptcy filing would set the stage for the company to lay off its remaining workers, whose ranks have thinned over the years, officials said. Then the process of wrapping up the opera company's affairs would begin.For now the company is soldiering on, performing "Anna Nicole" at the Brooklyn Academy of Music even as the deadline has been looming.Bridget Hendrix, a soprano who has sung in the company's chorus for 32 years, said that it was a hard time for a group of musicians who had become like a family over the years. "It's difficult," she said in an interview before the bankruptcy vote was announced. "Personally, I've always put aside anything to do a performance. Once I get on stage, that's who I am, that's what I'm doing. I don't think about anything else."A veteran of the orchestra, Nancy McAlhany, a violinist who has been playing with the orchestra for more than three decades, said that the company's troubles had been devastating. "We're so heartbroken, and really, I'd have to say, in shock that it appears that this company is on the brink of nonexistence," she said in an interview before the board voted. "This company has been such a glorious experience."
After the curtain fell Saturday night on New York City Opera 's production of "Anna Nicole" at the Brooklyn Academy of Music , a few chorus members wiped their eyes as they took their bows: it would most likely be the final performance in the storied company's 70-year history.Absent the kind of deus ex machina that has saved the day in so many of the convoluted opera plots the troupe has performed over the years, City Opera will start shutting itself down next week if it fails to raise $7 million.City Opera's board voted on Thursday to begin filing for bankruptcy and start dismantling itself if that goal was not met by Monday. Going into the weekend the company had raised less than a quarter of what it said it needed to stay in business.So Saturday night's final performance of Mark-Anthony Turnage's "Anna Nicole," — an opera it produced with the Brooklyn Academy of Music about Anna Nicole Smith, the tabloid television star — was also expected to be the company's swan song.The night was very much like the death scene of an American opera company that was known for championing new works, helping start the careers of major singers including Beverly Sills and Plácido Domingo, and making opera affordable and accessible.City Opera has been struggling for years, facing mounting deficits that have forced it to raid its endowment and, in 2011, to leave its Lincoln Center home to become an itinerant troupe. It also drastically cut back on the number of operas it gave each season — from 115 performances a year a decade ago, to 16 last year. This summer its cash crisis became acute.When it was founded 70 years ago, City Opera was called "the people's opera" by Mayor Fiorello H. La Guardia. At its first performance — of Puccini's "Tosca," in 1944 — ticket prices ranged from 85 cents to $2.25.There were no curtain speeches or fund-raising appeals from the stage at Saturday night's performance, which drew a young, enthusiastic crowd. Some company members printed handouts urging people to contribute $1 toward the company's Kickstarter campaign to help raise the money it needed. "Tell Everyone," the small handouts urged.As audience members headed for the exits on Saturday night, the demise of the company seemed to be on the lips of as many people as the demise of the operatic heroine they had just witnessed.
The partnership started with an ad in an English music magazine in 1967. Liberty Records was looking for songwriters, and Bernie Taupin, a farmworker and amateur poet from Lincolnshire, sent in a sheaf of lyrics, not expecting much. Around the same time a frustrated young blues pianist named Reg Dwight auditioned for the label. An executive didn't like Mr. Dwight's material but tossed him a stack of Mr. Taupin's lyrics and said, "See what you can do with these."Since then Mr. Taupin and Mr. Dwight, who later became Elton John, have written dozens of hit songs and more than two dozen albums and have sold 250 million records. Their latest effort, "The Diving Board," a stripped-down collection of dark piano-driven songs that look backward with the heartache of advancing years, came out on Capitol Records on Tuesday; critics have called it Mr. John's best work in decades.When one thinks of great songwriting teams, one imagines them lounging in a studio with guitars and empty beer bottles or sitting at a piano together, joking, fighting, becoming excited over a tune's possibilities. But Mr. Taupin and Mr. John have always worked separately. Their songs start out as Mr. Taupin's poetic meditations, inspired by some event in his life or something he has read.He labors for weeks on his horse ranch in Southern California and delivers the lyrics fully formed to Mr. John, who goes into a studio, props the papers on the piano and churns out melodies and harmonies to fit the words at breakneck speed. "It's kind of spooky," Mr. John said in an interview. "I get bored if it takes more than 40 minutes."If Mr. John's composing style is as quick and free as Japanese calligraphy, it is also effective. In the 1970s and 1980s, the pair were a hit machine: "Your Song," "Rocket Man," "Daniel," "Crocodile Rock," "Bennie and the Jets," "I Guess That's Why They Call It the Blues," "Candle in the Wind."And though these songs have become identified with Elton John, they actually arise from the meshing of two distinctly different personalities — a rusticated, straight writer, who loves his solitude, the American West and raising horses, and an urbane, gay rock star who has a penchant for a crazy wardrobe and thrives in the spotlight."Had we been the same kind of characters I'm not sure it would have survived," Mr. Taupin said in an interview from his home in the Santa Ynez Valley. "We live very, very, very different lifestyles, obviously. I'm very much a recluse, not a social person at all."Mr. John, speaking from Las Vegas, said he learned long ago he has zero talent for writing lyrics, but Mr. Taupin's imagery has always had an uncanny way of unlocking melodies in his mind. "It is weird," said Mr. John, 66. "It's kind of twilight-zonish in a way.""Diving Board" is the first solo studio album Mr. John has made with Mr. Taupin as lyricist since 2006, though they did make a duet album, "The Union," with the pianist Leon Russell in 2010. Both records were produced by T Bone Burnett, known for his old-school, back-to-basics aesthetic. On "Diving Board" Mr. Burnett persuaded Mr. John to return to a spare piano trio sound, letting the piano dominate the arrangements as he used to in his early live shows."It stripped the songs down," Mr. John said. "It made me very relaxed."After a call from Mr. John, Mr. Taupin went to work on lyrics about six months before Mr. John went into the studio to write and record, in January 2012. Mr. Taupin, 63, a voracious reader, draws ideas from history and biographies: "Ballad of Blind Tom" is a stark portrait of Thomas Wiggins, the 19th-century black musical savant and composer who was born a slave; "A Town Called Jubilee" recreates a dust-bowl ballad; and "Oceans Away" is a tribute to World War II soldiers, dedicated to his father, Capt. Robert Taupin. The title track, a sad Nina Simone-style ballad, explores the fatal seduction of celebrity, comparing it to a high-dive act at the circus.These are serious songs for adults, not radio-ready pop hits. "We are not having to write to cater to a certain trend," Mr. Taupin said. "We're past that."Mr. John said: "I like miserable songs. What can I tell you?"
NEWARK — When the  New Jersey Symphony Orchestra  began rehearsals recently for its season opener this weekend under the baton of its music director, Jacques Lacombe, one player who has been central to the ensemble was missing onstage — one so central, in fact, that everyone used to tune to his A.But that man, James Roe, the orchestra's principal oboist for the last two years, did not leave the organization. He now leads it as president and chief executive.On a recent afternoon, Mr. Roe, 46, discussed the change in an interview. His office, a block from the performing arts center, is furnished with the standard corporate indifference, but he has added a few works of art from his own collection. A framed page of a medieval French hymnal smudged with the fingerprints of centuries past is on his desk, a quiet counterpoint to the clanging of construction outside. It is also a reminder of Mr. Roe's association with the Helicon Foundation, the Manhattan-based chamber-music society steeped in historical practice that he led as artistic director from 2006 until he was named the orchestra's top executive in June.But if the move from the stage to the executive suite involved a certain sense of dislocation, Mr. Roe said his relationships within the organization have changed only subtly. Take Mr. Lacombe, for instance."When Jacques waved his hands at me, I'd play the oboe," he said with a laugh. "Now he doesn't wave his hands at me. Our communication is much more verbal than when I was a player, but it's still his vision, and the challenge of how to achieve it."Mr. Roe's appointment to the highest level of management is part of a budding trend that has been greeted with hope throughout the orchestra world. With bitter labor disputes dominating the news about American orchestras, the arrival of a new breed of administrator intimately acquainted with the players and the music itself points to a potential change in climate.Last fall, the Milwaukee Symphony Orchestra appointed Mark Niehaus, its principal trumpeter for the last 15 years, as president and executive director. In March, Kyu-Young Kim, the principal second violinist of the St. Paul Chamber Orchestra, became its senior director of artistic planning.And beyond promotion within the ranks, a growing number of professionally trained musicians are in leadership positions across the country, among them the clarinetist Gary Ginstling, president and chief executive of the Indianapolis Symphony Orchestra; the oboist Peter Kjome, who holds the same titles at the Grand Rapids Symphony; and the violinist Katy Clark, president and executive director of the Orchestra of St. Luke's in Manhattan.With the exception of Ms. Clark, who is British-born and used to play with the BBC Symphony Orchestra, all these administrators studied at the Juilliard School in the 1990s. While there, Mr. Ginstling said: "I was singularly focused on getting a job in a great orchestra. I don't think there was an awareness that a career in the arts was something worth considering."His own path led from a freelance career as a clarinetist on the West Coast to an M.B.A., a stint working in Silicon Valley and then a return to music on the administrative side that included five years as general manager of the Cleveland Orchestra."Musicians often feel that boards and donors don't understand what they do," Mr. Ginstling said. "But the flip side is true, too, that musicians don't always understand the operational and financial issues." His background as a performing musician helps smooth communications, he said, and makes him a persuasive representative of the art to the outside world.Mr. Niehaus describes his own path as "pretty much a straight line." He began as a trumpeter with the New World Symphony in Miami Beach, a training ground for orchestral musicians where the curriculum focused on "making musicians leaders and not just pieces of a machine." After playing the trumpet for a few years with the Milwaukee orchestra, he was elected to the players' committee, later becoming its chairman and representing the musicians on other panels as well as the board, leading to his appointment as executive director last year."I'm a curious person, and I took it upon myself to look into finance and marketing trends," he said. "I wasn't a passenger — I took my role as a board member very seriously." Still, when he was first approached to apply for the post of executive director, he hesitated. "To leave the stage when you're 42 years old — normally you'd only do that if there's an injury," he said.In that regard, Mr. Kim is an exception in this crop of administrators: he still performs with the orchestra. "It's a pretty intense juggling act trying to get a lot of work done in between rehearsals," he said. "But I think it's important to have players invested in a new way in the organization and to be advocates for our art form."As senior director of artistic planning, he now makes decisions on programming, long-term planning and the engaging of conductors and soloists, a responsibility that requires him to wrestle with finances."The money situation is much more real," he said. "Being in a position where you're looking at these things changes your perspective, but in a healthy way."
The future rides a flexible continuum on "Event 2" (Bulk), a dystopian but perky concept album by this alternative hip-hop conglomerate, due out on Tuesday. As on Deltron 3030's self-titled debut, released in 2000, it's the product of a partnership among the savvy producer Dan the Automator, the fiercely intelligent rapper Del the Funky Homosapien and the ace turntablist Kid Koala — along with an oddball assortment of guests, like Damon Albarn of Gorillaz, Zach de la Rocha of Rage Against the Machine and David Chang of Momofuku. (Yes, the chef.) Lyrically the album rails against corporate and technological forces, peering back from a distant future in a tone both rueful and goofy. (Others on board: the rap parodists Lonely Island and the comedian David Cross.) Del the Funky Homosapien hasn't lost his verbose velocity, and his partners retain their gift for brooding airs and funk grandeur. But what felt ahead of its time around the turn of this millennium now scans as classicism, only tweaked to include newer co-conspirators like Emily Wells. Not that there isn't reason to look forward (or back?) to Deltron 3030's tour with a 16-piece orchestra, which reaches the Brooklyn Bowl on Oct. 9.When the alto saxophonist and composer Tim Berne has a working band, he works it hard. "Shadow Man," due out on Tuesday on ECM, is his second album with his quartet Snakeoil, featuring Oscar Noriega on clarinets, Matt Mitchell on piano and Ches Smith on drums and percussion. As with the group's 2012 debut, "Snakeoil," it's an impressive showcase for Mr. Berne's precisely gnarled ensemble writing —  and for the musicians resourceful and alert enough to make it work. There are also fine, itchy stretches of free improvisation, some involving Mr. Smith on vibraphone. "Socket" begins with a gripping fantasia by Mr. Mitchell and builds to a strategic meltdown by Mr. Noriega. And "OC/DC," which runs almost to 23 minutes, covers so much ground that it feels like a compact summation of Mr. Berne's style. Snakeoil, which plays the Jazz Standard on Oct. 16, is merely his latest vehicle. But he's making certain that it leaves its mark.Matt Mitchell, the Snakeoil pianist, just released "Fiction" (Pi), his first album as a leader, also featuring Ches Smith. It's a collection of original études designed to push the limits of ambidexterity and equilibrium, and Mr. Mitchell, whose playing descends as much from contemporary classical music as from avant-garde jazz, plunges headfirst into the effort. Some pieces, like "Dadaist Flu," tumble forth with convulsive control; others seem almost random in their machinations. But the percussive rustle of Mr. Smith, who places his emphasis carefully from one moment to the next, highlights the premeditation behind these knotty miniatures. Mr. Mitchell brought a perverse singularity of focus to their conception, but it took real-time interplay to give them a fleshed-out sense of purpose."Noam Pikelny Plays Kenny Baker Plays Bill Monroe" is the ingenious new album by Mr. Pikelny, a 32-year-old banjo virtuoso, out on Compass Records on Tuesday. It's a track-by-track remake of "Plays Bill Monroe," the 1976 album by the fiddler Kenny Baker, a longtime member of Bill Monroe's pacesetting bluegrass band. And as on that album, this one has an all-star crew: Stuart Duncan on fiddle, Ronnie McCoury on mandolin, Bryan Sutton on guitar and Mike Bub on bass. But Mr. Pikelny sharpened the challenge, adapting Baker's fiddle lines to the banjo with meticulous flair, especially on "Jerusalem Ridge" and "Big Sandy River," cornerstones of the Monroe-and-Baker alliance. He has done similar adaptive work with Punch Brothers, but this framework is an absolute boon for him: at once a token of reverence, a feat of translation and a show of dominion.Most of the songs on "Tall Tall Shadow" (Secret City), the third album by this singer-songwriter from Ontario, unfold like notes to self, even when they're addressed to a notional "you." These songs bear titles like "From Now On" and "Promise Not to Think About Love," and strike a sound that nods to Fleetwood Mac and the early Joni Mitchell. Ms. Bulat has a voice well suited to interiority, warm and honeyed, though it cuts through the reverberant throb of the music. (She produced the album with Tim Kingsbury and Mark Lawson, affiliates of Arcade Fire.) At her best she lays bare the distance between intention and action. "I was practicing what I had left to say/But I can't say now," she sings at the start of "It Can't Be You," expertly fingerpicking a charango. The chorus consists of nothing more than the title phrase, repeated six times.
In his second season as the Philadelphia Orchestra's music director, the French Canadian conductor Yannick Nézet-Séguin has already galvanized this ensemble's audiences and inspired its musicians. New Yorkers mostly know Mr. Nézet-Séguin, 38, from his appearances with the Metropolitan Opera. He brings his orchestra to Carnegie Hall for a gala concert to open the season.He is offering lighter fare, including Tchaikovsky's "Slavonic March" and Ravel's "Bolero." The violinist Joshua Bell will be the soloist in some favorite showpieces — Ravel's "Tzigane" and Saint-Saëns' Introduction and Rondo Capriccioso. (7 p.m., Wednesday, 212-247-7800, carnegiehall.org; $49-$154.)The New York Philharmonic also chose to end its season-opening gala with Ravel's "Bolero," which seems to be the go-to piece of the moment. But this week Alan Gilbert conducts Beethoven's mighty Ninth Symphony on an enticing program (the first of five performances) that will open with the American premiere of "Frieze" by the British composer Mark-Anthony Turnage, best known as the composer of the opera "Anna Nicole." (7:30 p.m. Thursday, 8 p.m., Friday and Saturday, Avery Fisher Hall, 212-875-5656, nyphil.org; $31-$153.)
The hip-hop festival Rock the Bells began in 2004 as a rebuke to what was then commercial in hip-hop: boasts about luxury consumption, the drug trade and nights in strip clubs. Rock the Bells promoted, instead, the storytelling, social consciousness and complex wordplay of the 1980s and 1990s, with headliners like Wu-Tang Clan and A Tribe Called Quest. But then hip-hop turned yet another corner. With the Internet gaining on radio as a way to build audiences, storytelling and complex concepts — not just easy hooks — made a resurgence among younger rappers.So this year's Rock the Bells X can, with a clear conscience, include not only tenacious hip-hop acts like Wu-Tang Clan, Common, Jurassic 5, KRS-One and Bone Thugs-N-Harmony, but also current hit-makers like Kendrick Lamar (as part of the group Black Hippy); J. Cole; the ASAP Mob; and, from the Odd Future collective, Earl Sweatshirt and Tyler, the Creator. It also adds a dance-music contingent: Pretty Lights and Girl Talk. And for hip-hop nostalgists (who might well abhor the idea), there's another 21st-century touch: "original virtual performances" to resurrect Eazy-E (from N.W.A.) and Ol' Dirty Bastard (from Wu-Tang Clan). (Friday and Saturday, Meadowlands Racetrack, East Rutherford, N.J.; rockthebells.net; $150 and up for both days, $99 and up for one day.)The Pop entry in the Week Ahead column this weekend previews the Rock the Bells hip-hop festival, which was scheduled for the Meadowlands Racetrack in East Rutherford, N.J., next Friday and Saturday. But after the section went to press the promoters of the festival canceled those shows, and two others in Washington, because of lackluster ticket sales.
Shortly before New York City Opera put on what will most likely be its final performance on Saturday night, Julius Rudel, the maestro who helped build and lead the company in its heyday, sat in his Manhattan apartment and, surrounded by mementos from the troupe's glory days, expressed his dismay at its probable impending demise."I would not have thought in my wildest dreams," said Mr. Rudel, 92, "that I would outlive the opera company."The walls of his apartment bear testament to the creation of a company that rose to ambitious heights. A framed program from its very first season credits him for the job he landed there 70 years ago this month: Julius Rudel, répétiteur (a musician who assists at rehearsals). A sketch shows the diabolical costume for the title role in Boito's "Mefistofele." Another shows the set of "Pelléas et Mélisande." Now Mr. Rudel is closely following the company's peril."I think it's a real operatic tragedy," said Mr. Rudel, who led City Opera for 22 eventful years, presenting daring new works and crowd-pleasing productions and conducting treasured performances with singers like Beverly Sills and, on the company's first night at its new home in Lincoln Center in 1966, a young Plácido Domingo.That sense of shock and dismay was palpable later on Saturday night at the Brooklyn Academy of Music, where the members of the company presented the final performance of Mark-Anthony Turnage's "Anna Nicole." Absent a last-minute gift of millions, it was expected to be the final performance City Opera ever gives. The opera's board voted last week to begin dissolving the company if it fails to raise the $7 million needed to finish the current season by Monday — a target that is proving elusive.Nancy McAlhany, a first violinist who has been with the company for more than three decades, said that even after all the bad news in recent years, it was difficult to believe that the troupe would really close. "I'm having trouble grasping this," she said.To opera fans, the all-but-certain demise of City Opera portends a future with fewer choices and fewer off-the-beaten-path works. To arts administrators, it offers lessons in how a series of bad management decisions over the years could ultimately prove fatal. But to the singers and musicians who make up the backbone of the company, it would mean a loss of performing traditions, the disappearance of another company that gives performers work, and farewells to colleagues who have grown close over the years.Bridget Hendrix, a soprano who started in the City Opera chorus three decades ago — her first role was as one of the cigarette-factory girls in "Carmen" — said that "the beauty of the company was that we were such a family.""We spent 12 hours a day there between rehearsals and performance — we lived there," she recalled. "The fun that we have in the dressing room, that's going to be sorely missed. Having the girls in the dressing room talking about everything, it was like group therapy. We know too much about each other."Several veterans of the company said that they feared their fate was sealed when the troupe left its Lincoln Center home in 2011 and drastically cut back on the number of performances that it gave each year. They shared some favorite memories from their tenure with the company as it stood on the brink of extinction.Stewart Rose, a principal horn player who began with the orchestra in 1977, remembered playing in the pit during his first few years while Sills, the company's reigning diva, sang performances of "Manon" and "The Merry Widow.""Just incredible," he recalled. "It was the end of her career, but it was still magical to hear her."Ms. McAlhany thought back to the company's popular production of "Mefistofele," which was originally mounted for the bass-baritone Norman Treigle but, in her era, became a star vehicle for Samuel Ramey in his prime. She recalled the dramatic flourish that Mr. Rudel used to begin the piece, with the house cloaked in darkness."The house was completely black," she said. "Julius was on the podium, and in the blackness, he had a baton with a little light on the end — very tiny. He would raise it for the upbeat, and we would play in the dark."
CHATTAHOOCHEE HILLS, Ga. — Plastic mushroom statues outnumbered hay bales last weekend on a horse farm near here, about 25 miles southwest of Atlanta. A stage designed as a massive facade of books with titles like "Beauty and the Beat" and "The Story of Us" sprouted in the center, with seven smaller stages scattered over 500 acres of rolling countryside.Each day, 50,000 festivalgoers from 75 nations, some wearing Indian headdresses and animal costumes, high-fived strangers as they moved from stage to stage. A sign beside a path warned, "Beware of snakes," but nobody seemed worried. About 30,000 camped on the grounds.From noon until midnight, D.J.'s played frenetic, percussive music nonstop. When darkness fell, crowds of bouncing, hand-waving dancers packed cheek to jowl close to the main stage and spread onto the hillside to hear star D.J.'s like Axwell and David Guetta. Screens flashed videos of the D.J.'s, while throbbing music pounded out of giant speakers. Fireworks lighted the sky in sync with the beats. Pulsating lights swept the crowd.This was the debut of TomorrowWorld, the American version of Tomorrowland, the Belgian electronic dance-music festival.Concert promoters and the authorities were carefully watching the festival because of recent drug-related deaths at other dance-music events, including two overdoses at the Electric Zoo festival in New York City over Labor Day weekend, leading to its being shut down early. That made seven deaths at dance events around the country since March, and raised concerns that the negative publicity around them could cripple these festivals, a $4.5 billion segment of the music industry.But TomorrowWorld went off with relatively few problems. As of Monday morning, its organizers said that 19 people were taken to hospitals over three days, mostly for physical injuries like ankle sprains, and that two were arrested."As a reference, I transport more people from smaller-venue sporting events, including tennis, over a three-day period," Dr. Andrew N. Bazos, of  Sports & Entertainment Physicians, who was hired to oversee the festival's medical care, said in an e-mail.The fans, mostly in their 20s and ranging from clean-cut frat boys to dreadlocked stoners, came ready to party. Chris Wageley, 26, of Venice Beach, Calif., who regularly attends music festivals like Coachella, described electronic dance music's appeal: "It's an overwhelming sensation that tingles your body. It's like the music is flowing through you."TomorrowWorld organizers advertised a zero-tolerance policy toward drugs and said that they enforced strict security, including the use of drug-sniffing dogs, and that they didn't admit anybody under 21.The security didn't seem to bother the fans, who paid at least $347 for three days' admission and extra for shuttle rides, parking, campsites and access to V.I.P. tents."I prefer it this way," said Arijana Alic, 25, of Bosnia, after security guards told her to remove her shoes and searched her bag at a festival entrance. "With this many people, you never know what's happening."Which is not to say that drugs didn't get inside. Several fans estimated that at least half the festivalgoers were using some sort of drug, mainly Molly, an MDMA-based drug that's illegal and sometimes mixed with hallucinogens like LSD."It's pretty out in the open," said Matthew Gizzy, 22, of Richmond, Va., who said he doesn't use drugs. He got free admission to the festival by working about 15 hours at tasks like refilling hand sanitizers.Other fans said using Molly is simply part of the experience, like smoking marijuana while listening to reggae or drinking a beer on St. Patrick's Day. It turns the music into a full sensory experience, not just something for the ears."It makes you hyper, makes you energetic," said Jordan, 23, of Fort Myers, Fla., adding that he hoped to find some Molly for Saturday night. "It really influences the music." (He and others agreed to talk about illegal drugs only on the condition that their last names be withheld.)Elizabeth, 22, of Deep River, Conn., said Saturday that she planned to use Molly that night. People react badly to drugs when they don't know what they're doing, she said."If you know the precautions, like staying hydrated, you should be fine," she said, noting that she'd never consider using certain other drugs, like cocaine and LSD, or mushrooms.Some fans, like Jessica Strain, 22, of New Orleans, were upset by the negative attention electronic dance-music festivals have received because of drug use. "I've been going to music festivals for years, so it breaks my heart to seek how it's turned out," she said. "Back in the day, it was better."
After 70 years, New York City Opera has folded , and people are furious about it — not just the choristers, orchestra players and other dedicated company personnel, but countless fans who have depended upon the "people's opera" for decades.The demise seems to have come so quickly. George Steel, City Opera's general manager and artistic director since 2009, is inevitably seen as the man who brought down the company, especially through his decision in 2011 to abandon its Lincoln Center home and turn the troupe into a nomadic company presenting productions on various stages in Manhattan and Brooklyn.Actually, City Opera has always been a financially shaky venture. Just read "First and Lasting Impressions," by the conductor Julius Rudel with Rebecca Paller. Mr. Rudel was with the company from the start and became director during its most ambitious and thriving decades. My favorite among his stories of the shoestring days concerns a production he conducted of Britten's "Turn of the Screw" as part of the Cambridge Music Festival in Massachusetts in 1961. The festival went bankrupt. Ever pragmatic, Mr. Rudel told the organizers that in lieu of his fee he would take the sets of the production back home to City Opera, where they were put to good use.There will be time to hash over the company's history and try to pinpoint what went wrong, especially with Mr. Steel's recent attempts at reinvention in the face of desperate financial stress. I have been thinking about an interview I had in 2008 in Paris with Gerard Mortier, the opera impresario and provocateur, who was still running the Paris National Opera at the time but had accepted the City Opera directorship. The company had piled up deficits under its previous general manager, Paul Kellogg. The New York State Theater, with a gift of $100 million from David H. Koch, was undergoing extensive renovations and would be renamed for him.The City Opera board, then led by Susan L. Baker, seemed, well, enthralled with Mr. Mortier's vision of making the company a hotbed of contemporary fare and daring productions. But to allow the renovation to be completed and to begin the new era afresh, Mr. Mortier counseled the board to drop a season of staged productions. The orchestra and chorus, under the existing contract, would still have to be paid. City Opera was going to lose a lot of money. I asked Mr. Mortier how he could have advocated that course. He said the company would have lost even more if it staged productions during the renovations, an argument that made no sense to me.With that dark year, City Opera suffered a loss of audience, momentum and identity. Just months after that interview, the company lost Mr. Mortier as well, when the board failed to raise the money he had deemed essential and he abruptly pulled out.But now is also a time to look back and be grateful. The company hooked me on Janacek through "The Cunning Little Vixen," an enchanting production with sets and costumes designed by Maurice Sendak. I did not see Beverly Sills in her 1966 breakout performance of Cleopatra in Handel's "Giulio Cesare," although I value that recording. The opera world has learned a lot more about historical performance styles since that production was introduced. Still, that high-visibility "Cesare" was an impetus to a Handel revival. And during the Kellogg years, City Opera became an important Handel house.I especially remember the arresting 2005 production of "Orlando," one of Handel's most experimental and wrenching operas. City Opera bravely championed works by living composers, including pieces that had not gotten their due, like Richard Rodney Bennett's 1965 Gothic horror tale, "The Mines of Sulphur," which faded away but then became an improbable hit at City Opera in 2005 after a tryout at the Glimmerglass Opera.The company also gave us fresh takes on standard repertory, with young, emerging singers who cared deeply about acting and embraced the chance to be part of a lively ensemble enterprise. I will never forget a vibrant and smart staging of Mozart's "Marriage of Figaro" in 1977, with Mr. Rudel in the pit. The opera was performed in a witty English translation and starred a couple of up-and-coming artists: Samuel Ramey as Figaro, and Catherine Malfitano as Susanna (who went on, as fans know, to major careers). From my excellent but inexpensive seat, I heard every word and got every joke.Still, it does seem that City Opera may have made a crucial mistake in 1965, when it left its original home at City Center on West 55th Street to take up residence at Lincoln Center. In his memoir, Mr. Rudel recalls that the "very idea" of this move was "upsetting and disturbing." He imagined that living in the shadow of the Metropolitan Opera, the "people's opera" would inevitably be perceived as the lesser company rather than an institution with its own identity and purpose. He knew that expenses would rise considerably, which is what happened. Still, a chapter later, Mr. Rudel writes of busily being involved with plans for the move to "our new and glamorous quarters." (What?)Among his successors, Mr. Kellogg, especially, thought that the biggest impediment to City Opera's success was its Lincoln Center location. The theater was too big, acoustically dull and uncomfortably close to the Met. Mr. Kellogg's fantasy was to take City Opera to a more suitable home. Imagine, say, a house of 1,200 seats in Chelsea, Upper Manhattan or, as Mr. Kellogg boldly proposed after the Sept. 11 attacks, a redeveloped World Trade Center site.Well, Mr. Steel left Lincoln Center, all right. But no matter how he presented it, the move seemed an act of desperation. Maybe things would have turned out differently if the board had brought in an opera world veteran like the director Francesca Zambello, who now runs Glimmerglass and wanted the City Opera job.But it must be said that during Mr. Steel's few years, both at the Koch Theater and on the road, he presented some impressive and exciting productions. Two of them, directed by Christopher Alden, will always be high points of my operagoing life. There was the humane and affectionate production of "A Quiet Place," Leonard Bernstein's opera, long considered a flawed and patchwork piece, but revealed here as his most deeply personal, anguished and entertaining work, and the dark, sexy and insightful production of Mozart's "Don Giovanni."Still, with the offerings so reduced (just four productions last season, for a total of 16 performances), City Opera was a shadow of what it had been in, say, 1969-70, when it presented 145 performances of 21 works, from Puccini's "Bohème" to Ginastera's "Bomarzo." Sadly, that scrappy, idealistic company really vanished a few years ago.
New York City Opera , which was founded 70 years ago to help bring opera to the masses, filed for Chapter 11 bankruptcy protection on Thursday after an urgent $7 million fund-raising appeal fell short last month.The dying opera company said in court papers filed in United States Bankruptcy Court in the Southern District of New York that its assets were worth $7.7 million — which includes the remainder of its endowment and some pledges that have not been received — and that it had liabilities of $5.6 million, including pension obligations. The company said in court papers that it was evaluating the restrictions on the endowment fund and that it would not withdraw money from it without court permission.The filings show in stark legalese the death throes of the company that George Steel, its final general manager, describes in court papers as "one of America's pre-eminent cultural institutions." The troupe, which balanced its budget over the last two years, still had an accumulated deficit of $44 million as of last year, the filing said. Its endowment, which was once $55 million, had dwindled to around $4.5 million."Because of N.Y.C. Opera's lack of liquidity, pension obligations and the many other issues listed above, N.Y.C. Opera made the difficult but necessary decision to file for Chapter 11 protection," Mr. Steel said in court papers.City Opera's biggest listed creditor after its pensions is its former housemate, New York City Ballet, the company with which it shared a Lincoln Center home for decades. City Ballet has a $1.6 million claim, according to the bankruptcy filing, related to City Opera's 2011 departure from the performance space they shared, the David H. Koch Theater. The opera's other creditors included former chorus members who are owed severance pay, the musicians' health benefits fund and the landlord of the offices that the company moved to in Lower Manhattan after leaving Lincoln Center.Several creditors said in interviews that they were not optimistic that they would get what they are owed.City Opera said that it was the beneficiary of around $600,000 of bequests from patrons who had recently died, and said it was evaluating whether, because of the filing, it is still entitled to the money and whether its use is restricted. It also proposed selling its Manhattan thrift store on East 23rd Street.In the filing, City Opera sought permission to give refunds to people who had bought tickets to the productions that they have canceled for the remainder of the season — $323,000 worth."We anticipate the court granting our motion," the opera company wrote in an e-mail to subscribers, in which it continued to ask for donations. "You can also waive your refund and donate the cost of your tickets to N.Y.C. Opera. This fully tax-deductible donation will be used to fund severance and other costs that directly support artists and staff as they transition from their employment with N.Y.C. Opera."
The soprano Deborah Voigt is still wondering whether, during a crisis in confidence, she made the right decision last month to withdraw from the season-opening production of Wagner's "Tristan und Isolde" at the Washington National Opera . She had sung Isolde to acclaim in important productions over the previous 10 years. But last month, she found the long, punishing role beyond her current vocal capacities.During a tearful meeting in her dressing room with Francesca Zambello, the artistic director of the company and a longtime colleague and friend, Ms. Voigt faced the reality that she might have to drop Isolde from her repertory, as she said later in a public statement.But reflecting on that move during a recent interview at a cafe near Lincoln Center, Ms. Voigt said that, in hindsight, she wonders whether she acted precipitously."We all have bad rehearsals," she explained. "I still had 10 days until the opening. Would things have been different? Maybe. Maybe not. I'd like to think they would have been."But the decision was made, she said, and it was a responsible call.She may not sing Isolde again, she said, or another highly challenging Wagner role, Brünnhilde, which she performed in the Metropolitan Opera's high-stakes production of the "Ring" cycle, directed by Robert Lepage and documented on a set of DVDs. Still, "you have to look forward," Ms. Voigt said, sounding rueful but optimistic.A great deal was at stake for Ms. Voigt but also for the larger world of opera with "Tristan und Isolde" in Washington. A true Wagnerian soprano with the requisite power, stamina and style does not come along very often, especially a great Isolde.Ms. Voigt made her thrilling staged debut in the role in 2003 at the Vienna State Opera, a performance conducted by Christian Thielemann. She was the first American soprano to have a new production of this touchstone German opera mounted for her at the prestigious Vienna house, and she sang with penetrating power and gleaming richness. (Her performance can be heard on a Deutsche Grammophone recording.)But in recent years, Ms. Voigt, 53, has been going through vocal changes or, as some critics have put it, vocal problems. They have complained of a hard-edged sound and shakiness on sustained tones. The shift gave pause to opera-world devotees who had assumed that Ms. Voigt, who made her Met debut in 1991, would have an exceptionally long and glorious run as a dramatic soprano. She has spoken openly in recent years — as she did during the interview — about her lifelong struggle with obesity and her decision to undergo gastric-bypass surgery in 2004.Though the procedure was successful, it did not eliminate complex emotional issues that were contributing to her problem, she said. She arrived for the interview fresh from a meeting of Alcoholics Anonymous near her new home in New Jersey."The whole foundation of A.A., the 12 steps," Ms. Voigt said, "are just good principles to live by." Alcohol "was not a problem for me," she said, "until I lost weight." Many overweight people, women in particular, she explained, have "this problem" after undergoing the surgery because "we've never really solved the issues: 'Why did I eat so much?' 'Why do I have bad relationship after bad relationship?' "She noted that she also had to adjust to her slimmer post-surgery body, which took longer than she than she had expected.The abdominal region of a dramatic soprano's body would seem a very precarious place to have surgical intervention. But Ms. Voigt felt she had no choice. "I have to think about the fact that I have a life," she explained.A lot of people "cannot grasp" that singers would do anything to jeopardize their voices, "even if they're 325 pounds and their knees are giving out and they are borderline diabetic," she said. But, "I just thought I can't do this anymore. It's not worth it."She acknowledged that her voice had changed. "I'm not sure I would attribute it to weight loss," Ms. Voigt said, "which a lot of people do. Maybe it's age. Maybe it's where the voice needed to go in order to sing some of these stentorian roles. You don't sing Brünnhilde as a full lyric soprano, but as a dramatic soprano, and that means more steel in the voice, more silver than gold.""I think I'm a more interesting artist than I was 10 years ago, just by nature of the work I've had the opportunity to do, the physical challenges I've had," she said.Singing Brünnhilde in the Met's hotly debated new "Ring" production was a high-pressure experience, but exciting over all, Ms. Voigt said. She received some positive reviews, but also many harsh ones."I judge my performances based on the audience response," she said. "And I've never felt like the general public was disappointed." The big ovations she received were heartening, she said, especially at the premiere of "Götterdämmerung," the final opera in the cycle.Regardless of whether people think that Ms. Voigt's current phase is an inevitable shift for Wagnerian sopranos in their 50s or worrisome evidence of diminished vocal capacity, opera fans are in for new kinds of roles from her, if she has her way. Some of these are considered the operatic equivalent of character parts in film; some are associated with mature singers.Ms. Voigt mentioned the embittered Dyer's Wife from Strauss's "Frau Ohne Schatten" and the Kostelnicka, the fearsome widow in Janacek's "Jenufa." The title character in Barber's Gothic melodrama "Vanessa," a self-deluded, manipulative older woman, "keeps coming up," Ms. Voigt said. And she is looking forward to singing Marie in Berg's "Wozzeck" at the Met in March, with James Levine conducting."I keep reminding myself that I'm an opera singer and opera has been incredible to me," she said. "But there are other kinds of things I'd like to do," other singing, other concerts. She is about to embark on a recital tour with the pianist Brian Zeger, a colleague and friend.She loves recitals, she said. "I get to choose the music and I get to interact with audiences in a way that singing Isolde doesn't allow you," she said. She values Mr. Zeger's knowledge of unusual repertory, she added: "He makes me look very smart with the things he finds."She would like to do more cabaret concerts and Broadway fare. Later this month she will be coaching young singers at Washington National Opera as the company's artist-in-residence.She said she was keenly looking forward to hosting the Met's live HD broadcast of Tchaikovsky's "Eugene Onegin" on Saturday afternoon, which will be carried to movie theaters in 64 countries. She has proved a natural at presiding over these popular broadcasts, bringing infectious enthusiasm and insight to her interviews with singers during intermission features.While Ms. Voigt sounded confident about her place in opera, she also seemed sanguine, whatever happens."When they write the books about my generation, I'll be there," she said. "I've made a great contribution. I'm very proud of that. Would I like it to continue? Absolutely. But it's going to be different."
The negotiations lasted more than a year and led to a strike that canceled Carnegie Hall's planned opening night for the first time in the hall's 122-year history. But after only two days, the dispute between Carnegie's management and its stagehands was settled on Friday, and the hall announced that it was fully back in business.The issues dividing Carnegie and Local 1 of the International Alliance of Theatrical Stage Employees were not the usual ones — salaries and benefits — but instead the union's role in the new educational spaces that Carnegie is building above the hall, at a cost of about $230 million, and plans to open them next fall.The union, which represents the employees who set up chairs and stands and move pianos and percussion instruments, among other things, wanted its members to work in the education wing. Carnegie employs five full-time stagehands, at an average individual compensation of more than $400,000 a year — more than most of the musicians who perform in the hall — as well as part-time workers as needed.The hall's position, voiced on Wednesday evening by both Clive Gillinson, its executive and artistic director, and Sanford I. Weill, its chairman, was that the education wing was a separate endeavor — that union stagehands were rightfully employed in concert halls but had no place in classrooms and studios. Employing union stagehands, Mr. Gillinson and Mr. Weill said, would siphon off money that should be going to education."One thing we cannot do," Mr. Gillinson added at the time, "is compromise."But on Friday morning, as pickets returned to march outside the hall for the third day, a compromise was found, and everyone declared victory."The new agreement includes limited jurisdiction for I.A.T.S.E. Local 1 in Carnegie Hall's newly created education wing," the hall said in a statement, "in ways that will enable Carnegie Hall to create a flexible, hands-on learning environment for activities serving students, young artists and teachers, ensuring that the institution can meet all its education objectives."James J. Claffey Jr., the president of Local 1, did not return phone messages left at his office and on his cellphone on Friday. But his outgoing message sounded almost jubilant: Mr. Claffey said that he was "proudly reporting that as of 12 noon today, we have a deal at Carnegie Hall, and the strike is over." He went on to describe the agreement as "a tremendous outcome, a four-year deal that everyone is proud of."The strike caused the cancellation of Wednesday night's performance by the Philadelphia Orchestra, although a concert on Thursday evening by the American Symphony Orchestra went on after union pickets were temporarily withdrawn.Both sides stepped back from the brink — an extended strike could have battered Carnegie's season while also costing the union public support — to reach an agreement that will largely preserve the education budget that Carnegie was seeking to protect.As Mr. Gillinson explained it in an interview on Friday afternoon, "limited jurisdiction" means that Carnegie will hire a union stagehand — one to start, more only if needed — to work in the education wing. Mr. Gillinson would not discuss salaries but said that this stagehand would not be paid at the same rate as those who work in the performance spaces."It is a separate agreement," he said. "It is a new person, specifically for the education center."Moreover, the education wing will not be subject to the same restrictions as the concert halls on who can move or set up equipment."The most important thing," Mr. Gillinson said, "is that it enables us to do everything we need to do in those spaces and to have the flexibility we need. The kids and teachers will be able to move chairs and music stands as they need to, and that's exactly what we wanted. But at the same time, there are certain things — heavy cases that need to be moved in and out, for instance — for which we would have to hire somebody in any case. And having a union stagehand do those things is totally appropriate. So we're in a good place."Someone who is familiar with the talks, but who declined to speak for attribution because he is involved in other union negotiations, said: "Carnegie did a good job of dealing with its needs. This is a face-saving compromise for both sides."The new position begins when the education wing opens. Mr. Gillinson said he could not give a specific date.Asked how heavy a piece of equipment needed to be before a stagehand was called, Mr. Gillinson laughed and said: "Heavy enough that a person says, 'I need some help from the union person.' Kids can bring in their instruments, use the audiovisual equipment, move things around — it will be no different than working in any education center."
In the frenzied final days of New York City Opera , when it was becoming clear that an urgent drive to raise $7 million for its very survival was failing, the general manager, George Steel, found himself scrounging for money wherever he might find it.He had lunch with Alberto W. Vilar, the onetime opera patron who had promised huge gifts to the Metropolitan Opera that failed to materialize and who was later jailed for fraud. He spoke by phone with Plácido Domingo, who sang at City Opera's first night at Lincoln Center in 1966, and who agreed to urge donors to open their checkbooks. And he spent a night at the opera last month with David H. Koch, the billionaire who paid to renovate the opera's former home at Lincoln Center, and who remained one of its biggest donors even after the company left the redone theater to save money.But there was a hitch. The opera they saw, Mark-Anthony Turnage's "Anna Nicole," tells the more-or-less true life story of Anna Nicole Smith, a former Playboy model who married an octogenarian oil tycoon, J. Howard Marshall II, and who waged a fierce battle with his heirs over his estate after he died. Mr. Marshall, it turned out, had owned 16 percent of the Koch family's business, Koch Industries. When Mr. Steel asked Mr. Koch if he could make further gifts to save the company, Mr. Koch demurred, telling Mr. Steel that the Marshall family might be less than pleased, according to a person familiar with their conversation.In the end no one rode to the rescue of City Opera, which, through a series of missteps over the past decade, had lost the confidence of the donors on whom it was increasingly dependent. The opera company, 70 years old, filed for Chapter 11 bankruptcy protection on Thursday.As it began winding down its affairs this week, interviews with current and former company officials, board members and donors made it clear that behind its optimistic public facade, the troupe had long been in even more precarious shape than it had publicly acknowledged."There was a bankruptcy attorney — not on retainer, because he's working pro bono, but already in the fold — when I took the job," Mr. Steel, who took the helm in 2009, said in an interview this week in the company's eerily empty offices in Lower Manhattan, on Broad Street near the New York Stock Exchange, after most of the staff had been laid off. "We started out leaning over the cliff," he said. "That was the starting position."A cash crisis forced City Opera to leave its Lincoln Center home — the New York State Theater, renamed the David H. Koch Theater — in 2011, when it determined it could no longer afford the fixed costs there. But doing so earned bad publicity and the ire of the troupe's former stars and unions representing orchestra players and chorus members, whose work was cut back. More critically, the move alienated donors. To save money, the company drastically cut the number of performances it gave each year — to 16 in its 2011-12 season, down from 118 five years earlier — and saw its audience plummet to 22,500 from 225,570, according to tax filings. Raising money became an even greater challenge.The troupe nearly went bust just before last Christmas, but was kept afloat by an emergency $1.5 million infusion from the Ford Foundation, the Andrew W. Mellon Foundation and Bloomberg Philanthropies. Then, in August, several gifts failed to materialize, sparking another hectic round of fund-raising to mount "Anna Nicole" in September. Charles R. Wall, the opera company's chairman, said that City Opera did not want to leave the Brooklyn Academy of Music, which was co-producing "Anna Nicole," in the lurch.But nothing was left for the rest of the season. Foundations that bailed the opera out last winter declined to give more large gifts to a company that seemed to be foundering. (Bloomberg Philanthropies agreed to pay for City Opera to hire a fund-raising consultant last month.)In the end, it was an odd twist of fate that the company founded by Mayor Fiorello H. La Guardia to make opera affordable and accessible to New Yorkers should close its doors when the current occupant of City Hall, Mayor Michael R. Bloomberg, is both a billionaire and a major patron of the arts. But as the troupe headed toward bankruptcy, Mr. Bloomberg made it clear that neither his foundation nor the city would step in to save it, telling reporters that its "business model doesn't seem to be working."Asked about Mr. Bloomberg's role, Mr. Steel said only that "there's no question but that saving New York City Opera would have been a centerpiece of the current mayor's legacy, as it was of our founding mayor's legacy."Kate D. Levin, the commissioner of the city's Department of Cultural Affairs, said that the city had been engaged with City Opera, but that the company had not been "very realistic about their financial position for a very long period of time."
"Five American Percussion Pieces" (Poon Village) is the first solo record by Mr. Winant, who may be one of the most wide-ranging musicians in North America. He's a percussionist who's worked with Sonic Youth, John Cage, Mr. Bungle, John Zorn, Lou Harrison, James Tenney, Wadada Leo Smith, Steve Reich and hundreds of names that would keep making a cumulative point about open-field maverick tendencies in the music of this country, whether it involves notes-on-paper composers, noise generators, rock improvisers, jazz-tradition players or whatever. The main thing to know about the music here, which includes pieces by Harrison, Tenney, Michael Byron and Alvin Curran, is that it is mind-clearingly beautiful. There are snare drums and microtonal bells and vibraphones and cymbals, organized into tight ensemble patterns in Harrison's "Song of Quetzalcoatl," set loose to mingle more freely in Mr. Byron's "Trackings 1," and building to and falling from a single climax in Tenney's "Having Never Written a Note for Percussion," scored for a single instrument — in this case, a gong. If you're interested in any part of the American-maverick idea, this album is part of your cultural patrimony; it's esoteric, but exciting, too.A New York flutist, Ms. Baum has been recording with expanded small bands since the late '90s; she's into tone color and timbre and the blending of languages, jazz, and 20th-century classical and Afro-Latin music. But her composing ideas have gotten particularly strong on "In This Life" (Sunnyside), a septet album written after a trip to South Asia, with a front line including trumpets, guitar and bass clarinet, and rhythm sections alternately using tabla and congas, and trap-set drums. She's capitalizing on the imagination of the musicians in her band, including the pianist John Escreet and the trumpeter Amir El-Saffar, but she's got an elegantly persuasive composing hand. There are no pedantic mixtures here; she makes what she takes from classical minimalism and Indian qawwali mix together and feel natural.In a series of self-produced recordings, the trumpeter Leron Thomas has gone from straight-ahead jazz to rock and electronic music with wild, cutting jokes about stereotypes and anxieties. "Whatever" isn't exactly the midpoint — it's a jazz record all the way, with the pianist Taylor Eigsti, the guitarist Matthew Stevens, the bassist Harish Raghavan and the drummer Eric Harland. (Those who follow jazz in New York will see those names as guarantors of quality.) But it's his best jazz record, both his most thoughtful and his sketchiest. Its music keeps breaking down into smaller groups of musicians and stubborn, cycling riffs before blooming out into patient, narrative soloing, of which some of the best is Mr. Thomas's.It's been six years since the last studio album by Melt-Banana, the Japanese band that's settled into duo-ness — just Agata and Yako, playing with nearly cartoonish precision and intensity. The new "fetch" (A-Zap) moves the tradition into a kind of pop-art grindcore with occasional dance beats, or a very fast prog-punk that isn't. It could appeal to fans of Jack White, through Agata's heroic guitar playing, warping and pitch-bending, becoming melody and rhythm; or to fans of Ponytail, with Yako's high-pitched yammering, intensely delivered and right on the beat. Melt-Banana plays Nov. 1 at Saint Vitus, in Brooklyn; part of its concert appeal used to be the question of how a live drummer could live up to the standards of the music, but the vision is so strange from the start that it might not make a difference.The San Francisco band Chrome, in the mid- to late-1970s, lay in the spaces between art-rock, punk, electronic pop, avant-garde film soundtracks and aural scrawl. It boiled down to two people — Helios Creed, with strangulated vocals and contrail guitar riffs, and Damon Edge, on anxious drums and tweaked synthesizer sounds. It seemed to be imagining its own possible audience. "Half Machine Lip Moves," from 1979, was its generally acknowledged peak, though mostly obsessives and collectors acknowledge it; one of the things that makes the record so good is how intriguing the grooves and pockets and riffs are, how close the music theoretically seems to be getting to something more universally appealing — David Bowie's sound at that moment, for example. Through crowd-sourced funds, Mr. Creed has prepared a whole new disc of "lost" recordings from that time, "Half Machine From the Sun: The Lost Tracks from '79-'80" (King of Spades). Time does only favors to Chrome: the music the band made sounds more prescient, still strange and scratchy and generative. It could still theoretically start a new movement.
CHICAGO — Claiming an ever-smaller slice of the cultural pie and with fewer media outlets to spread the word, orchestras and their conductors struggle for visibility these days. But there are signs that Riccardo Muti, the music director of the Chicago Symphony Orchestra since 2010, has solved the problem better than most.Over a few days here during the summer, he encountered an earnest young priest who tried to kiss his hand. (Mr. Muti, 72, demurred.) And a disheveled woman slumped against the facade of the Chicago Cultural Center recognized him as he walked into an event."Muti! Muti!" she croaked, stumbling toward him. "Francisco Muti!""Riccardo," he gently corrected her, and handed her a $100 bill.Fund-raising and ticket sales both reached record highs in the last fiscal year reported by the orchestra. A few weeks ago, a free concert in suburban Cicero brought over 2,000 people to a high school auditorium in torrential rain. At a music making visit last Sunday to the Illinois Youth Center, a juvenile prison in Warrenville, several teenagers there announced that they wanted to marry him.In these cautious, anxious times for classical music, fraught with labor unrest and declining subscriber rolls, the Chicago Symphony is thriving. Mr. Muti, an elder statesman with a heavy Italian accent, has been an unexpectedly galvanizing hit.He recently spent a week here rehearsing a concert version of Verdi's "Macbeth" with the orchestra, in honor of that composer's 200th birthday on Thursday. (On that day, Mr. Muti will conduct a performance here of the Verdi Requiem, which will be simulcast free online, the orchestra's first foray into Webcasting.) Mr. Muti may be the finest interpreter in the world of Verdi's works, and without question is the most influential."I couldn't even breathe, it was so fabulous," the mezzo-soprano Marilyn Horne, no stranger to Verdi, said in an interview about Mr. Muti's debut at the Metropolitan Opera with "Attila" in 2010. "His Verdi is just beyond compare. That doesn't mean he doesn't do great Beethoven or Mozart, but I love his Italianità.""Macbeth," the last performance of which is Sunday in Chicago, was an unlikely choice for the big anniversary. It's often dismissed, along with the other early Verdi operas, as an overload of oompah music. But Mr. Muti was determined to lavish on the deceptively simple score the kind of care and attention usually reserved for the hurtling, complex drama of Verdi's late "Otello," which Mr. Muti and the Chicago Symphony played with relentless precision and intensity here and at Carnegie Hall in 2011." 'Otello' has more notes," he told the "Macbeth" company during a rehearsal. "Here, in two notes we have to create the universe."After his American debut nearly 41 years ago with the Philadelphia Orchestra, Mr. Muti is fleshier, the bags under his eyes more prominent, than when Donal Henahan, writing about that 1972 performance in The New York Times, called him "an unconventionally handsome man with a Roman nose and black hair."While the hair is now charcoal gray, Mr. Muti still swoops it back in a smooth helmet, and his speech is still as much Italian as English. (His sentences tend to trail off with "et chet-era, et chet-era.") On the podium, his right hand still makes a coolly restrained beat, while his left whips up sections of instruments in crisp circles.But if much remains the same, his attitude has changed to that of an artist with nothing more to prove. A decade ago, when he was in the midst of 19 years at the helm of the Teatro alla Scala in Milan, few thought Mr. Muti, who spent the 1980s at the Philadelphia Orchestra, would ever return to a music-director position in the United States.But his tenure at La Scala ended in 2005 after a ferocious internal power struggle. Angry strikes against him over changes in the company's leadership kept forcing cancellations. After that, Chicago has been an oasis of calm. His programming skips with jovial confidence from Schubert to obscurities like Leone Sinigaglia to new composers like Anna Clyne.It's idiosyncratic, even eccentric. (Giuseppe Martucci? Really?) But in an American landscape lately dominated by 30-something maestros like Gustavo Dudamel, Yannick Nézet-Séguin and Andris Nelsons, who still need to prove themselves in the building blocks of the repertory, Mr. Muti can relax and have some fun."The world of Verdi, it's so complex," he said during an interview in his basement dressing room at Orchestra Hall after a rehearsal. "First you learn to sing his music, but the most important thing is you start to realize how a quaver, a chord, an accent can change the entire atmosphere."Mr. Muti, like Arturo Toscanini (the teacher of his teacher, Antonino Votto), has staked his career on the pursuit of fidelity to the score. Long assumed to be sentimental red-meat entertainment rather than deeply considered or intellectually stimulating, Verdi's operas were regularly subjected to the kind of radical cuts, interpolations and fudgings that were unthinkable in Mozart or Wagner. To this day, a tenor won't be cast as Manrico in "Il Trovatore" if he can't sing the role's most famous note: a high C at the end of "Di quella pira" that Verdi never wrote."So instead of operas that have a meaning, a deep meaning," he said, "they are operas of show business."
MINNEAPOLIS — By the end of a disastrous week, classical music fans in this city sorely needed something positive to hang onto, however fleetingly. And, happily, they got momentary relief over the weekend in three concerts by the players of the Minnesota Orchestra , conducted by Osmo Vanska .This latest sequence in the saga of the 110-year-old orchestra, which has worked under illustrious maestros like Eugene Ormandy, Dimitri Mitropoulos and Antal Dorati, will go down as a sad chapter in the history of American ensembles: on Sept. 28, the players, who have been locked out in a labor dispute since their last contract expired on Oct. 1, 2012, voted to reject management's fourth proposal for a new contract, this one sweetened with a $20,000 signing bonus per player. On Sept. 30, after last-ditch negotiations between management and the players had broken down, the orchestra canceled its two Sibelius concerts scheduled for Carnegie Hall in early November.Mr. Vanska, 60 and especially renowned as a Sibelius interpreter, had repeatedly stressed how important those concerts would be for him, and on Tuesday he resigned as the orchestra's music director, two years before his contract was to expire. Also on Tuesday, the composer Aaron Jay Kernis resigned as director of the orchestra's acclaimed Composer Institute, expressing "total bafflement and dismay at what has been done to allow the dismemberment of this superb orchestra at the height of its powers."By then it had become clear that the orchestra's official season-opening concert, scheduled for Friday in the newly renovated Orchestra Hall, would not take place. So the players, calling themselves the Musicians of the Minnesota Orchestra, went ahead with contingency plans to put on their own concerts on Friday and Saturday evenings at the Ted Mann Concert Hall on the campus of the University of Minnesota. They took over the program planned for the official opening — piano concertos by Beethoven (No. 3) and Mozart (No. 27), Beethoven's "Egmont" Overture and Stravinsky's "Firebird" Suite — as well as its soloist, the pianist Emanuel Ax.And finally on Thursday, the musicians announced what was by then widely expected, that Mr. Vanska would conduct the concerts as a thank you and farewell to Minnesota. The Friday and Saturday evening concerts in the 1,100-seat hall sold out quickly, and a third was added for Saturday afternoon, leaving Mr. Ax, who was donating his services, to give six concerto performances within 26 hours."I couldn't say no to the players," Mr. Ax said in an interview. "I'm so happy to see them happy for a few days. I don't have enough knowledge about anything to take sides. All I want is for this lockout to go away."Mr. Vanska, for his part, declined to be interviewed.The rehearsals with Mr. Vanska had "a bizarre air of normalness that we don't experience that often anymore," said R. Douglas Wright, the orchestra's principal trombonist, in a news conference. "It was a wonderful feeling."Mr. Vanska had shown before what remarkable results he could achieve with these players in limited rehearsal time, when he conducted them in a special concert in February to celebrate the orchestra's Grammy nomination for a recording of Sibelius's Second and Fifth Symphonies. Again on Friday, he had the group in fine form.The performances of the programmed works were excellent, but it was the encore that proved most poignant in connection with the orchestra's plight and Mr. Vanska's departure. Speaking from the stage, Mr. Vanska introduced Sibelius's "Valse Triste," describing it as a dance of death and asking the audience to withhold applause at the end. Listeners left the auditorium quietly, many in tears.So there was euphoria mingled with sadness. But what now for the Minnesota Orchestra?Little more than a year ago, it stood on the verge of real greatness. There can be little question that recent events — and especially the departure of a music director who had developed remarkable chemistry with the players — have left it diminished.Disarray is apparent just from the roster in the program book for the weekend concerts. It lists 75 players, 7 of whom are on leave (most on loan to other orchestras, one said to be "seeking other career options"), and 23 extra musicians. Twenty positions are said to be vacant."A Guide to 'Ghosts': Musicians Lost to the Lockout" on the players' Web site, which accompanies a photograph of the orchestra with missing players whited out, lists 27 musicians. Management, noting that many of them had decided to leave before the labor strife began, allows that two players have resigned and eight have initiated leaves of absence in connection with the negotiations or the lockout.That disagreement, though symptomatic of the deep distrust on both sides, is of course minor, compared with the issues central to the dispute, chiefly salaries.In the contract that expired last year, the players received a base scale of $113,000 and an average annual salary of $135,000. Management's original proposal for a new contract, made in September 2012, would have imposed severe cuts in an attempt to erase a $6 million deficit all at once: a base of $78,000 and an average salary of $89,000 (the whole estimated by management as a 33 percent cut).Management's most recent offer, made on Sept. 26, allowed for a base of $89,000 (averaged over three years) and an average salary of $104,500 (estimated as a 17.7 percent cut from 2012). This, according to management, would have eliminated only $3.6 million of the deficit.
It has become a familiar question backstage at festivals, concert halls or anywhere else that musicians gather on the road: Have you heard that amazing Cuban percussionist in New York City? Pedrito Martínez may not yet be known to the public, but among his peers, he is firmly established as a source of rhythmic delight and inspiration.Fifteen years after arriving from Havana, Mr. Martínez, 40, is a first-call player for recording sessions of all types, and his three-nights-a-week residency at Guantanamera in Manhattan has made that small restaurant-club a favorite hangout for visiting pop, rock and jazz stars. On Tuesday, he takes another step forward, with the release of his first CD as a bandleader, accompanied by a celebratory show at City Winery."Pedrito's got a unique combination of forces coming together in him," said the musician and writer Ned Sublette, author of "Cuba and Its Music." "He's a percussionist with deep drum knowledge, and also a singer and bandleader, but he's also something over and above that — the flowering of a new creative spirit of rumba, breaking out of the traditional context and taking it to a larger audience."Mr. Martínez was born and raised in a Havana neighborhood called Cayo Hueso, a traditional center of the family of African-derived rhythms known as rumba. Not only did he have uncles who played the music, but he also grew up just a block away from the Palacio de la Rumba and sneaked into that theater to watch top orchestras rehearse when he was a child.Initially, though, because Mr. Martínez could not qualify for government programs to train musicians, which are limited in number, he thought about becoming an athlete. He boxed for a while, but focused on judo, which gave him stamina and made him limber, two qualities that have served him well in coping with the physical demands of playing the congas and the two-headed batá drum, his main instruments."I never went to music school, because in Cuba, at that time, to get in, you needed a connection, some clout, and I never had that kind of connection," he said in a recent interview. "But at the same time, I'm happy with the way I learned things on the street, because they teach you things you can't learn in school."As a teenager, Mr. Martínez began working as a musician and performed with top ensembles, like those of Tata Güines and Los Muñequitos de Matanzas. But he found the routine, playing in hotels for a dollar a month, he said, enervating and demeaning."If you wanted a ham sandwich, you had to eat it on the sly, in the kitchen, because if the manager of the hotel saw you eating in front of the foreigners, you'd get fired," he recalled. "And then, at 2 in the morning, I'd have to walk home carrying my congas or my batá, because there was no bus. When I got home, there was no light, water or gas, so I'd eat some cold food, amid a terrible heat. It was the worst time of my life."In 1998, the Canadian jazz saxophonist Jane Bunnett, a frequent visitor to Havana, invited Mr. Martínez to join her touring band, which allowed him to leave Cuba. When the group got to New York, and his contract ended, he decided to stay on, "because of all the musical opportunities here," and played with local bands.Breezy, outgoing and relentlessly optimistic, Mr. Martínez said he thought making his mark would be easy. But he went to a jazz show and had an unpleasant revelation: after he was invited to jam onstage, the band, led by the trumpeter Brian Lynch, promptly launched into a tune that began in a 5/4 time signature and then shifted to 9/8, and he was lost."You hardly ever see that kind of irregular time in Cuban music, so I had no idea what to do," he recalled. "It was the biggest embarrassment I've been through as a musician, but it's what made me say to myself, 'This city is a place that can teach you a lot of things, and I'm going to learn how to play this.' "So Mr. Martínez embarked on an intense program of instruction, learning to read music and studying composition. He also took private lessons with a fellow Cuban, Román Díaz, a master percussionist and Santería priest whom he describes as a mentor.A strong religious element pervades Mr. Martínez's own music. At his home in Union City, N.J., where he lives with his wife, daughter and parents, a room is set aside as a shrine to Santería deities, and he said it is there, practicing on the batá, often used in Santería ceremonies, that he perfects many of the innovative rhythms he plays onstage.Mr. Martinez said one big challenge he faced in making the new CD, called simply "The Pedrito Martínez Group" (Motéma Music), was translating the dynamism of the band's live performances. The record includes several songs the group regularly plays live, both originals and Cuban standards, as well as Afro-Cubanized versions of Robert Johnson's "Travelling Riverside Blues" and the Jackson 5 favorite "I'll Be There."All four members of the group sing, with Mr. Martínez doing lead vocals on most tracks. The record also features guest appearances by Wynton Marsalis, John Scofield and Steve Gadd, the ace American drummer who also produced the record with Mr. Martínez."It's pretty extraordinary what they do," Mr. Gadd said. "The rhythms that Pedrito is singing are complicated themselves, and then to be able to play other complicated rhythms around that, it's special. This is a real band, singing and playing rhythmically advanced music of the highest order."When Mr. Gadd stops by Guantanamera, he occasionally joins the group onstage, but most visiting musical luminaries, perhaps as intimidated as Mr. Martínez was when he first encountered jazz, are content to remain in their seats. On successive nights last month, members of Earth, Wind & Fire and a Spanish flamenco troupe showed up, and Mr. Martínez's manager, Paul Siegel, also remembers visits by Eric Clapton, Steve Winwood, Paul Simon, Roger Waters, Billy Cobham and Stanley Clarke."Over the last six to eight years, I've taken every band I've been with to see him, because his musicality is just staggering," said the guitarist Derek Trucks, who has played with the Allman Brothers and Eric Clapton bands. "After Allmans' rehearsals, three or four of us will head there, and it's funny how many other musicians you'll see. You know that everybody is going to go through New York, so you say 'You've got to see this guy, you've got to go to Guantanamera and see Pedrito whipping it.' "
This was a sound no musician should have to suffer: the destruction of her longtime instrument. In Wu Man 's case, in June, it was a loud crack, heard from her seat as a flight attendant, trying to stow her pipa in a coat closet up front, dropped it, breaking its neck.The pipa is a Chinese lute of ancient origin, with four plucked strings and a pear-shaped body, played upright in the lap. Its back consists of a single heavy piece of wood, exquisitely curved from a rounded bottom to a tapering neck.With that neck broken clean off the body, Ms. Wu's instrument of 17 years, valued at some $50,000 and uninsured, was deemed irreparable. But thanks to US Airways, whose employee inflicted the damage, Ms. Wu has a new pipa, made in Beijing by the same master who had made her old one.She will display it proudly in Hartford on Friday and Saturday evenings, when she performs Lou Harrison's Concerto for Pipa With String Orchestra in the season-opening concerts of the Hartford Symphony Orchestra. Ms. Wu has done more than perhaps anyone else to popularize the instrument in the West, with her performances and recordings of both Western and Chinese traditional music and her work with the cellist Yo-Yo Ma's Silk Road Project."It's a story that started with anger and has a happy ending," Ms. Wu said this week in New York.The June accident occurred as she was boarding a flight from Philadelphia to New Haven to join the Kronos Quartet in a concert at the International Festival of Arts and Ideas. Unable to fit the pipa in an overhead bin, she started to strap it into an empty seat next to her, as she had often done before."The flight attendant was in a bad mood," Ms. Wu said. The attendant instructed her to remain in her seat and took the instrument to the front with fateful results."That instrument was quite special to me," Ms. Wu said. "I made my whole career with her. I call her 'her.' "She left the plane but eventually made her way to New Haven, where she played on an instrument borrowed by the festival from a pipa teacher who lived an hour and a half away. Lacking a concert-quality backup instrument, Ms. Wu has had to borrow instruments from others in recent months.When asked why she didn't have a hard carrying case for the pipa of the type commonly used for Western instruments, Ms. Wu said that good ones simply don't exist, the pipa being so distinctive in shape and not heavily traveled. She is researching ways to manufacture one, she added.Similarly, when asked why the pipa wasn't insured, she said that insurance was not readily available for an instrument that Western companies know so little about and don't know how to value. She's doing research there, too.Her subsequent dealings with US Airways were "quite a pleasant experience," she said. "I talked to the airline people every week." With help from friends but using no lawyer, she reached a settlement covering the full cost of the instrument, and the company flew her to China twice to consult with the maker on finishing touches.The terms of the settlement prevent her from revealing the cost, but she said that new instruments, varying widely in quality, can run from $15,000 to $150,000. A spokesman for the airline confirmed the details of the settlement.The new pipa is a beauty to look at, with a back of aged rosewood, a face of sycamore and frets made of bamboo. It is also a beauty to hear in Ms. Wu's hands, though she senses the need for some seasoning of the instrument and some adjusting of her own."It's comfortable," she said. "It definitely has potential, but it will take a couple of years to get my own music out of it." Clearly, she relishes the challenge.
Studio 6A, the Rockefeller Plaza home of NBC's "Late Night With Jimmy Fallon," was filled with artificial smoke and laser lights when Bard and Vegard Ylvisaker arrived. These Norwegian brothers, who had spent the previous days traveling from Oslo to London to New York, did not seem to be particularly fazed as they surveyed their surroundings, which included a squad of dancers in fox masks and makeup, two long rows of full-length mirrors and a man dressed in a head-to-toe horse costume."It's absurd," said Bard, who is 31, with a deadpan demeanor and long blond hair. "But after a while, it starts to feel like work."This has become the routine for the Ylvisaker brothers, known collectively as Ylvis (pronounced ILL-vis), for the past month, ever since they became unlikely pop music sensations with a willfully silly if undeniably catchy song called "The Fox (What Does the Fox Say?)."Over a thumping electronic beat, "The Fox" asks in pleadingly sincere tones why, if there are distinctive sounds associated with the many other animals in creation, is there not one for the fox? (As the lyrics put it: "Ducks say quack, and fish go blub and the seal goes ow ow ow ... What does the fox say?")This week, "The Fox" reached No. 6 on Billboard's Hot 100 singles chart, surpassing hits like Robin Thicke's "Blurred Lines" and Lady Gaga's "Applause." An equally mystifying video that features the photogenic Ylvisakers and other performers in a variety of animal outfits, evoking "I Am the Walrus," if it had been directed by Lars von Trier, has been viewed more than 100 million times on YouTube.But even as the song continues to grow in popularity, and Ylvis is invited to perform it on American programs like "Late Night" and the "Today" show, it is becoming both a blessing and a burden to its creators — a propitious opportunity and a prank that backfired wildly. How much further, they wonder, can they take something that was never meant to go anywhere in the first place?"This was the plan all along," the floppy-haired Vegard, 34, shouted to Mr. Fallon during a break in filming on Wednesday. They were both dressed as foxes, and something in Vegard's voice suggested he meant the opposite.In their homeland, the Ylvisaker brothers are jokesters with a loyal local following and the hosts of their own comedy talk show, "I Kveld Med Ylvis" ("Tonight With Ylvis"), on Norwegian television.They made "The Fox" with assistance from Stargate, the Norwegian-born, New York-based producing duo that has also helped create hit songs for Rihanna, Katy Perry and Wiz Khalifa — except that their track, the Ylvisakers said, was intended to be bad."From a comedian's perspective, it would be much more fun if we misused their talents," Bard said. "We go make that song, we come back to our talk show and we say, 'Sorry, guys.' "Instead, the video became an international phenomenon when it was posted in early September, racking up hundreds of thousands of views by the day and catching the attention of Warner Music, which had already signed Ylvis to the Norwegian arm of the company."The Fox" made its debut at No. 29 on the Billboard Hot 100 singles chart, helped by a revised ranking system that accounts for a song's online activity. Warner was particularly impressed by actual sales of the song — about 75,000 copies a week, says Peter Gray, senior vice president for promotion at Warner Brothers Records — achieved without radio play or a costly marketing campaign."There are a lot of hit songs that people have put major muscle and campaigns behind, for months and months, that aren't selling half of that, or a quarter of that," Mr. Gray said.On the strength of "The Fox," Ylvis was booked on "The Ellen DeGeneres Show" and at the iHeartRadio festival in Las Vegas last month, performing on a bill with artists like Justin Timberlake and Miley Cyrus. But what the band intends to do with this momentum remains an open question.Mr. Gray said that Ylvis could be challenged by "the perception of novelty, which I suppose allows people to pass something off as silly, as opposed to being taken seriously as art."Such a fate, it could be argued, befell Psy, the Korean rapper who had a surprise worldwide hit with the song "Gangnam Style" (and the goofy dancing in its accompanying video), but who did not match this feat with his follow-up single, "Gentleman." But, Mr. Gray said: "I would say this: Once a name, always a threat. If Psy writes another hit song, or if Ylvis writes another hit song, the door is open for them." Though there is no current plan to release a full-length Ylvis album, Mr. Gray said, "A hit song changes everything."For Ylvis, "This is a big chance," Bard said, but promoting "The Fox" requires him and Vegard to leave their wives and young children at home for days at a time, and prevents them from working on their Norwegian TV show. For the time being, Bard said, "We tried to push all our work on our colleagues."As they made their way from NBC headquarters to SoHo, the Ylvisakers said they were satisfied and relieved by their appearance on "Late Night," where the house band, the Roots, had joined in on "The Fox."Before that evening's performance of the song, Bard said, "We never rehearsed it, because it was never supposed to be a live thing."Vegard added, "It's not like a story; it's just a bunch of animal sounds."He said it was inevitable that enthusiasm for "The Fox" would wane. "You can't be amazed for an entire month," he said. "At some point, it has to level off."Whenever that happens, Bard said he would be prepared."There might come a song about wolves from Denmark in the next week, and then, suddenly, we're off the hook," he said. "That's O.K. Even if that happens, it's been fun."
Jess Wolfe and Holly Laessig are not sisters, or even related in any way, but they have been merrily twinned as the frontwomen of the indie band Lucius for nearly a decade. Both 28, they met as students at the Berklee College of Music and then, post-graduation, moved to Brooklyn in 2007 to forge a musical career. "We knew we wanted to work together and sing together and write together," Ms. Laessig said. "But we were just kind of experimental, and that's why it took so long to come into what we are now." After assembling a band through friends and neighbors, their first album as a five-piece, "Wildewoman," is due Tuesday from Mom + Pop Music. But their act — with Andrew Burri, Peter Lalish and Ms. Wolfe's husband, Dan Molad, on drums, guitars and bass — has already earned fans for its girl-group harmonies and resourceful rhythms; for their Tiny Desk concert on NPR, they turned an empty cashew container into a drum. They've performed with Wilco, and worked as jingle writers and in commercials. (Those were their voices in the Mercedes ad with Willem Dafoe broadcast during the "Breaking Bad" finale.)Synchronicity is big for them. For three years, they've costumed and styled themselves identically. "Holly always says that we're dressing the sound," Ms. Wolfe said. "If you're listening on a record, you might not know that it's two voices singing in unison. Because we're never really singing apart." Luckily, they share an aesthetic — hard-working, vintage-soul-loving misfits — and an ability to pull off mod eyeliner. Offstage, they don't coordinate "all the time," they said — in unison. Over a breakfast slice of lemon pie at a bakery in Brooklyn, Ms. Laessig, near right, who grew up near Cleveland, and Ms. Wolfe, from Los Angeles, spoke with Melena Ryzik about their matching influences and hairstyles. These are excerpts from the conversation.Q. How did you hit it off so quickly in college?Jess Wolfe I had a party, and we were drunkenly talking about inspirations and influences, and they were very similar — Sam Cooke, Otis Redding, David Bowie, the Beatles. And we were like, "We should rearrange the White album and just do our own female version." We started with "Happiness Is a Warm Gun."You live in Ditmas Park, which has a lot of musicians.Wolfe When we first moved to Ditmas, we lived in this Victorian mansion that we found on Craigslist and knew nothing of the history of the house. But we opened the door, and it was like vintage organs and a grand Steinway piano from the '20s. It was just serendipitous, really wild. So we lived there for two years, and we wrote most of the songs on that piano. We had all of our friends come and play on the record.Holly Laessig By the way, "mansion" was, keep in mind, nine musicians, one kitchen.Onstage, your drums are split in two. How did that happen?Laessig We were practicing in [Ms. Wolfe and Mr. Molad's] apartment, and the neighbors downstairs had been complaining about the drumming. So at one of the rehearsals, we said we'll do it super broken down, and Dan will just play two drums. We tried it, and we were like, "That's kind of cool." And then, when Andy Burri came on, we thought: 'Well, maybe you guys could do them at the same time. You could be on both sides of the stage. It could extend upon this whole Rorschach thing.Laessig It's like a wildebeest. When I was little, my mom used to call me a wilde-child, a wilde-girl. So we were talking about being a young girl and being kind of wild and taking your own path, and how we've carried over into womanhood, doing that.Wolfe And all the people that we surround ourselves with, the women in our lives and the girls, that share that sentiment.Do you have the same hairdresser?Laessig She does one hair first and then, like, the other one sits next to, and she kind of references.
Ben Vida played acoustic guitar and trumpet in the Chicago minimalist quartet Town & Country, which for nearly 10 years used repetition, drones and delicate, drumless sonorities to get to intense places carefully, like post-prog chamber music, or a Slint-Morton Feldman collaboration.These days, he's making abstract electronic music that combines digital and analog synthesizers — methodical and strange and delicate and often beautiful — sometimes evoking sounds in nature or the world of acoustic instruments, but twisted and morphed. He'll be playing a new piece, "Damaged Particulates," this week. (8 p.m. Thursday, Issue Project Room, 22 Boerum Place, Downtown Brooklyn, 718-330-0313, issueprojectroom.org; $10 suggested donation.)
Visitors browsing through the YouTube channel of the pianist Valentina Lisitsa can watch her in hundreds of videos. There are live webcams of her practicing at her home in North Carolina, long blonde hair tossing and brow furrowed in concentration as she reads through new works. There she is in a red gown playing Schumann's "Traumerei" at a concert in Seoul, and recording Rachmaninoff's Concerto No. 3 at the Abbey Road Studios in London.Ms. Lisitsa, 43, resurrected a completely stalled career through YouTube. Since posting her first video in 2007, she has attracted more than 62 million views and some 105,000 subscribers to her channel. This Ukrainian-born pianist now has a busy calendar and a contract with Decca, which recently released her new Liszt disc. She will open the 92nd Street Y's fall season on Saturday with a program of Rachmaninoff, Shostakovich, Chopin and Liszt; the works were selected by an online vote."I was sitting alone in North Carolina eating potato chips, blaming everyone, blaming my parents," Ms. Lisitsa said in a recent interview in Manhattan. "It's a sinkhole, and it's very difficult to get out. It's only when you stop trying to find faults and start doing something constructive that you will survive." She added, "It's just good for you as a human not to dwell on your disasters."Casually dressed in jeans, glittery flip-flops and an orange shirt she had bought for her son, Ms. Lisitsa was frazzled but gregarious after a trip to New York from Paris. She spoke about the low points in her career, including a Christmas when her application to perform in a concert at a nursing home was rejected and a stint selling housewares on eBay.Ms. Lisitsa's eureka moment came when reading a child's version of "1,001 Nights" to her son, Benjamin, now 8. "There were all those beautiful women, like another blonde Russian pianist," she said. "They all got killed after the first night. This one did not. Why not? She came with a story. You have to invent your story. You can call it gimmicky, but whatever works. Something that stops making you a commodity."Earlier in her career, Ms. Lisitsa said, she felt like a commodity herself, an "easily interchangeable" female musician who could be called upon at the last minute to wear a fancy gown and trot out Tchaikovsky and Rachmaninoff.She had begun her career as a duo pianist with her husband, Alexei Kuznetsoff. After winning a competition in 1991, they obtained management, but the engagements dried up. "We were naïve and thought that if you play well, people will notice you," she said. "But music is a luxury product, and if you see a Mont Blanc pen or Rolex watch in Walmart, people will just pass by. It has to come with a certain package, and you have to have your own audience."After a midlife crisis when she considered quitting music, Ms. Lisitsa decided to be proactive. Her husband filmed her playing Chopin's 24 Études, which they released as a DVD on Amazon.com in 2007. The couple were initially irritated when people uploaded sections to YouTube, but they decided to upload the entire DVD themselves as a promotion. The tactic worked, and sales increased. They took another gamble when they spent their life savings to hire the London Symphony Orchestra so Ms. Lisitsa could record the four Rachmaninoff concertos, which Decca has now released.Niall O'Rourke, the creative director at Decca's London office, said Ms. Lisitsa's use of YouTube was new territory for the label's classical artists. "It's more of pop approach," he said, noting the success of Justin Bieber and others discovered on YouTube. "Valentina was on our radar, and when we saw how many YouTube followers she had, we wondered how to tap into that fan base. It was an experiment." Other classical musicians, like the violinist Hilary Hahn (with whom Ms. Lisitsa recorded sonatas by Ives), are certainly active on YouTube, but Ms. Lisitsa is one of the first to have built a highly successful career via the medium.On a video called "I Hate Rachmaninoff," Ms. Lisitsa describes how she rebelled against his music when pressured to perform it in competitions in Ukraine, saying, "I didn't want to touch his music with dirty, competition hands." In Rachmaninoff and the other works she has recorded, she is passionate, communicative and deeply expressive. Reviewing her performance of the Liszt Concerto with the Warsaw Philharmonic, Steve Smith wrote in The New York Times that "Ms. Lisitsa's range of colors and expressive shadings was consistently impressive; in the second movement she executed trills with an attention-grabbing precision."While speaking to the audience at her Live From the Albert Hall concert (which was recorded for CD and DVD), she self-deprecatingly remarked that her microphone would need a Slavic filter to process her heavy accent, before joking about the soccer match between England and Ukraine taking place at the same time as the concert.Ms. Lisitsa grew up in Kiev, Ukraine, where she began playing at 3. Her mother, Valentina, a seamstress, encouraged her to become a music teacher. After studies at the Kiev Conservatory and a stint as a serious chess player, the pianist and her husband immigrated to America. After living in Indiana and Miami Beach, they bought a house in a rural, wooded area east of Raleigh. One video on her channel is called "Practicing Piano in North Carolina During Hurricane Irene."Below the video are Ms. Lisitsa's comments about the experience. She actively engages her fans on social media. Unlike the polite feeds of some other classical artists, Ms. Lisitsa, a self-described "contrarian," is argumentative and outspoken, tweeting about politics and berating concert promoters who have irked her.
The Royal Opera House in London has announced that part of its lineup from the 2013-14 season will be simulcast for the first time in more than 500 movie theaters in the United States. The series begins with Puccini's "Turandot" on Oct. 24 and 27. The other works scheduled for 2013 are Puccini's "Tosca" on Nov. 7 and 10 and Verdi's "Vêpres Siciliennes" on Dec. 5 and 8. Also planned are Wagner's "Parisfal" (Jan. 9 and 12); Puccini's "Bohème" (Feb. 6 and 9) and "Manon Lescaut" (July 17 and 20); Mozart's "Don Giovanni" (March 13 and 16); Verdi's "Nabucco" (April 3 and 6) and "La Traviata" (May 8 and 11). Tickets are at screenvision.com/roh.
At the beginning, there is only the voice of Jeremy Irons. Then, the sound of strings: high, sparkling filaments of sound that dance around the narrator's voice like dust particles catching the light.There is a whispering of wings in the silence of the night.They're coming. With feathers as white as snow and faces as bright as the moonlight:"Angel Heart" is a tender and emotionally astute children's story told in words and music. Last month it was released as an audiobook CD; on Monday it will be performed live at Zankel Hall with the actor Chris Noth as narrator. The text is by Cornelia Funke, the best-selling author of children's books including the "Inkheart" trilogy and the "MirrorWorld" novels. Mirada, the multimedia storytelling company founded by the director Guillermo del Toro, the cinematographer Guillermo Navarro, the producer Javier Jimenez and the director Mathew Cullen, will bring out a related app in early 2014.But in its original audio format, "Angel Heart" (Oxingale Records) is a story designed to enter the mind via the ear, bypassing text and image to slip straight into the imagination of a young mind on the threshold of sleep. Weaving in familiar songs from far-flung corners of the earth into a tale of grief and healing, it has both the simplicity and the dark undertow of a fairy tale.The story follows a young girl whose heart — we don't know why — is "broken into a thousand pieces." An angel finds her weeping bitterly by the side of a pond and guides her on a journey on which they encounter a number of fantastical creatures. At the end of a night of travel to the four points of the compass, the girl's heart is mended; she has learned to remember and to forget, to be strong and to dare to love again. The angel's work is done.The idea for the project originated with the Montreal-based composer Luna Pearl Woolf and the soprano Lisa Delan, who is also featured as one of the singers on the recording. The cast on the CD includes other leading figures from the world of classical music: the mezzo-sopranos Frederica von Stade and Zheng Cao (who died in February); the countertenor Daniel Taylor; the baritone Sanford Sylvan; the all-cello ensemble Uccello, led by Matt Haimovitz; and the mandolinists Caterina Lichtenberg and Mike Marshall. The sound world they create in sensitive arrangements of lullabies and songs and original compositions by Ms. Woolf combines the comforting familiarity of folk song with the rich timbres and textures of classical music.As a children's story told through classical music, "Angel Heart" fits into the tradition of Prokofiev's "Peter and the Wolf." But Ms. Woolf's atmospheric music serves a different purpose: in place of the narrative drama of Prokofiev's work, her compositions add psychological nuances and emotional depth through ever-changing textures. The eight-member cello ensemble produces a dazzling variety of sounds, from the rich and earthy to the ethereal, while Mr. Haimovitz's lush solos evoke the girl's heartache and yearning."It's so subtle yet so visual," Ms. Funke said of Ms. Woolf's music. "I had tears in my eyes when I heard it."Ms. Funke, who is German and lives in Los Angeles, said the invitation to create a story linking the songs was "like somebody placing a magical thing on my doorstep." It also brought new challenges: "Angel Heart" is her first book for young children and the first she wrote in a language other than her mother tongue."I wanted every word to be right for the music," she said. "It was the first time I wrote in English — so when Jeremy Irons read it without complaining, I was very happy."Ms. Woolf, who is the mother of two daughters ages 3 and 6, said the project grew out of what she saw as a gap in the market. "We didn't see music for kids that embraced what we love about classical music — the fact that it can tell a story in just the music, the fact that there can be voices of this kind of quality that are still soothing," she said.Ms. Woolf said that what touched her most in Ms. Funke's story was "the idea that you can heal by reclaiming your innocence, the self-confidence you had when you don't know any different.""Watching my kids grow," she said, "I see that as something that has to be treasured."Although "Angel Heart" is marketed as a bedtime story for young children, its allegorical quality makes it suited for all ages. Much is left unsaid in the story, including the cause of the girl's heartache. Ms. Funke said the nature of some of the songs Ms. Woolf gave her to work with suggested romantic love. In "Angel Heart," much of the poignancy comes from the way the themes of romantic and maternal love weave in and out."The ability of younger children to understand eternal truths and raw emotions without intellectualizing them is quite amazing," Ms. Funke said. "If you say to a small child, here is a girl and her heart is shattered in pieces, they get it. Many of them get the concept of romantic love. They watch their parents, wondering, do they love each other? They already know the fear of divorce. They understand so much more about grown-ups than we think."
When Theo Spielberg decided it was time to get serious about starting a rock group, he only had to look across the hallway of his family's home to find a lead singer. Joined in his bedroom by his sister Sasha, he grabbed his guitar and started plunking out a chord progression he'd been toying with since college, while she sang a pleading and melodic vocal about unspecified desires.The creation of this song, "Opossum," which brought them their earliest national exposure and the backing of a major music company, occurred so rapidly that the siblings, who call their band Wardell, are still half-astounded and half-embarrassed to talk about it three years later."It happened really quickly," Ms. Spielberg said recently, sitting next to her brother in the 39th-floor Manhattan offices of Roc Nation, the powerful entertainment company that manages their band. "Like, in an hour."All their work since, Mr. Spielberg added, "has been pretty much a struggle, compared to how easy that was.""If you try too hard," he said, "it never comes."These are familiar rites of passage for fledgling bands like Wardell, which descended on New York by the dozens this week for the CMJ Music Marathon.But they take on outsize significance for the Spielbergs, for a reason as simple and as complicated as their surname.They are children of Steven Spielberg, the Academy Award-winning filmmaker and producer, and his wife, the actress Kate Capshaw — facts they cannot deny or explain away."We don't know otherwise," Mr. Spielberg said, more apologetic than angry."It's not like he's been hustling lots of small rock clubs — 'You've got to see these kids,' " Mr. Spielberg said with a laugh. "Although that would be really funny."Diminutive and giggly, Mr. Spielberg, 25, and Ms. Spielberg, 23, do not carry themselves like petulant show business scions; they are exuberant, earnest and unknowing, for all that is good and bad about those qualities.But in indie rock, a self-scrutinizing milieu where an artist's lineage is as important as his or her sound, and any hints of privilege are rooted out like weeds, it's not yet clear where Wardell might fit in — whether there is room for a band that is figuring itself out on its feet, trying to determine what it is without falling back on the obvious quality that makes it stand out."I would say a lot of music journalists aren't taking them too seriously right now," Christopher R. Weingarten, a senior editor at Spin magazine, said. Not because "they're children of a billionaire," he said, but because "the sounds they're mining were the flavor of the month, in our world, two years ago."But even if what Wardell does is not setting the cognoscenti afire, Mr. Weingarten said, "there's clearly an audience for this, and these guys are rising at a perfect time."On Tuesday night, Ms. Spielberg took center stage at the small but well-filled Glasslands club in Williamsburg, Brooklyn, twirling and gyrating to her own soulful vocals, while Mr. Spielberg and a trio of backing musicians provided a contemporary guitar-band sound. (Tellingly, the set included a cover of "Bette Davis Eyes," a straight-faced take on a work of '80s kitsch with a nod to Hollywood royalty.)Earlier that day, the Spielbergs spoke about their separate musical upbringings: Mr. Spielberg doted on bands like the Clash and the Strokes, while Ms. Spielberg went from Christina Aguilera to Fiona Apple, after an early detour into classic rock. ("You're like the only 7-year-old in history," Mr. Spielberg said teasingly to his sister, "that was into the Eagles.")Though the siblings had played around at performing together, from late-night childhood puppet shows to middle school covers of Brenton Wood's "Oogum Boogum," they say they did not become serious about being a band until 2010, and did not feel ready to play live shows until last year.This timetable accelerated when "Opossum" was named an NPR Song of the Day at the end of 2011, bringing the band to the attention of Roc Nation. (Roc Nation declined to comment for this article.) Wardell — which is both Theo Spielberg's middle name and a nickname of Ms. Capshaw's — made its South by Southwest debut in March; released an EP, "Brother/Sister"; and is now booked by the same agency that handles rising stars like Lorde and Passion Pit.
When New York City Opera went belly up recently, many aficionados turned to Gotham Chamber Opera. Like City Opera in its prime, Gotham stands for unusual repertory, creative productions and rising young singers. With intriguing shows in locations that have ranged from the Brooklyn Botanic Garden to a Lower East Side burlesque club, it is an agile, adventurous company that may benefit from audiences and donors freed by City Opera's demise, a silver lining in a storm cloud.
"Somebody gotta survive," August Alsina says in one of the spoken interludes on his debut major label EP, "Downtown: Life Under the Gun" (Radio Killa/Def Jam). He's just finished tearfully telling the story of how he learned about the murder of his brother, after singing a song, "Don't Forget About Me," about broken families and broken dreams. Mr. Alsina is from New Orleans, and wears it heavily — about half of this often great EP is given over to such pained stories, making it a rare issues-oriented R&B release. He's got a thin but affecting voice, hitting hard on "Downtown," where he sings, "Cut so deep when they put him in the hearse/ Never saw 25, had to put him in the dirt." Some of these songs also appeared on Mr. Alsina's mixtape "The Product 2," which featured "Shoot or Die," a tough remix of Justin Timberlake's "Suit & Tie" that was a far cry from Mr. Alsina's 2011 mixtape, "Untitled," with its tender covers of Frank Ocean and Adele. Survival amid harshness is Mr. Alsina's game now, and he's winning.Which Danny Brown is your favorite? "Old" (Fool's Gold) has options. There are, among others, the straightforward and wise tough talker on "Gremlins," the quietly reflective memoirist of "Lonely" and "Clean Up," the wackadoodle dance music toaster of "Dip" and the shrill-voiced, taste-defying experimentalist of "Handstand." With all these styles packed in tight, "Old" ends up being a maybe-inadvertent career retrospective for Mr. Brown, echoing his speedy and jagged evolution over the past few years. An accomplished, flexible rapper, Mr. Brown does slap-happy and dazed-and-confused and down-and-out with equal comfort, or maybe discomfort — especially in his later incarnations, he's been a disorienting listen, with a squirrelly voice that zigs and zags. That style is a far cry from his rougher early mixtapes, though after listening to his harrowing stories of navigating the universe of Detroit drug fiends on "Torture," everything that followed sounds like a strategy of escape.Oh, that squealing feedback. It comes right at the beginning of "Everyone I Hate Should Be Killed," the opening track on Oozing Wound's debut album, "Retrash" (Thrill Jockey), the equivalent of holding your breath and closing your eyes in anticipation of getting punched. Soon enough, the fists come: Oozing Wound is plain, taut, dumb thrash metal, which is to say, it's firm, and aggressive, and heavy on logic and structure. The band includes the singer and guitarist Zack Weil, the bassist Kevin Cribbin and the drummer Kyle Reynolds, all of whom have done duty in other Chicago thrashy bands. Here they play it straight — the drumming and bass are fast and hard, the guitars manic and urgent, the vocals shriek. In a couple of places, though, the group transcends, like about two-thirds of the way through "New York Bands," where the drums build in fervor as they're cut through with charged, deliberate guitar. Eventually Mr. Weil screams, and the band begins to exhale slowly into another feedback squeal, the collapse after the punch.With each passing year since Aaliyah's death, her shadow has only grown longer. Her languorous, breathy approach to R&B was a revelation in its time, aided by mind-bending, rhythm-reconstituting production by Timbaland, who used Aaliyah as his muse. In modern spaces where R&B is being reimagined and remolded, her presence is more powerful than any more traditionally powerful soul singer. That's true for Drake, who's masterfully incorporated her into the bloodline of mainstream hip-hop, and it goes for a young generation of singers who hold her up as a vocal model.In the same way Aaliyah brought reserve to the role of traditional soul titan, Kelela — from Los Angeles via Washington — does the same for the divas of the saccharine, bubbly club music of the early 1990s on her debut mixtape, "Cut 4 Me." She floats elegantly and easily over the beats here, which are largely provided by modern club innovators like Kingdom, Nguzunguzu and Jam City. Her voice connotes restraint and sensuality all at once, especially on the dramatic "Go All Night (Let Me Roll)," and she manages to tame the squiggly production on "Keep It Cool."Where Kelela is ethereal and chill, Jessy Lanza is sultry and damp on her debut album, "Pull My Hair Back" (Hyperdub). Ms. Lanza, who is Canadian, moves with purpose and authority in and around the rhythms on this album which, produced by her with Jeremy Greenspan of Junior Boys, in places nods explicitly to Timbaland's skittish production. Ms. Lanza is a more direct singer than Kelela, but her Aaliyah nods come in the sweetness of her voice — even when Ms. Lanza is in the thick of it, she sounds like a dream.
In the video for "Roar," the first single from Katy Perry's new record "Prism," Ms. Perry plays a young woman going native in the jungle after a plane crash, learning to live with wild animals. "I got the eye of the tiger," she sings, borrowing a line from Survivor, "Louder than a lion." In her performance of "Roar" at the recent MTV Video Music Awards, she played a boxer in a ring; that setup made sense of the song's "I am the champion" line, borrowed from Queen.Amazingly, none of that matters. What really matters is the promotion for the song on "Good Morning America," which started nearly a month after its release and continued for six more weeks up to Capitol's release, coming Tuesday, of "Prism." It encouraged high schools around the United States to send in films of their students performing a version of "Roar." Many of those films involved cheerleaders. The song hit its target.The stars of "Roar" are the rhythm-chant of the tom-toms, which naturally translates to a drum line ensemble, and the short, yelled "hey!" of a spirit squad. Both come with a cavernous echo — basically, the sound of a high-school gym. (The jungle and the boxing ring, it turns out, were elaborate decoys.) The song, with its processional tempo, space for collective dancing and signaling, and careful buildups of drama and pressure, seems perfectly designed for pep rallies: even better if the home team is the Tigers or the Lions. It's a self-empowerment anthem, good for inducing physical activity. And yet by the standards of Ms. Perry and her team, it's slight and derivative.Ms. Perry, who turns 29 this week, has begun her post-bubble-gum longevity plan.  She's feeling the necessity, perhaps, of making songs for motivation and solace, that aren't in a completely parallel world to student ambition, résumé building, job searches, family planning, divorce and stress avoidance — the normal round of commitments and disappointments."Firework," her show-them-what-you're-worth hit of 2010, was just the beginning; her brief career in the early oughts as Katy Hudson, young singer of inspirational Christian pop, seems relevant to this current shift. And so while keeping a partial grip on the cartooned, airbrushed party world of her past hits, she's started to tailor her work for American rites of passage: the spirit rally, the birthday, the wedding dance, and the psycho-spiritual crisis.   So far, it's an unsteady operation. "Prism" is so full of cliché that it almost radiates insecurity, the opposite of the intended message.She's still using the same producing team for many of her songs that she has since 2008: Dr. Luke, Max Martin, and Cirkut. (Bonnie McKee, the songwriting collaborator who helped her with three hits from her last record, "Teenage Dream," from 2010, is back again for a third of "Prism.") But where her records used to sound crammed tight into a small space, stylishly and sometimes brilliantly limited by audio tricks and short-range burlesque jokes, now they're starting to intimate openness: echo, big drums, stadium choruses, eternity, making it count, living by the truth. Her voice, broader and stronger now, can carry this move; it's as if another room had opened within it.Ms. Perry has described "Prism" as "more vulnerable and raw and stripped-down" than "Teenage Dream." That earlier record was arch behind its enormous smile, very aware of its own fake funk and synthetic bubbliness; it became a container for No. 1 singles — five, as many as on Michael Jackson's "Bad." There has up to this point been something appealing about Ms. Perry's determined interest in Day-Glo teenage-girl aesthetics, a stance so good-natured and almost academic that she can resemble a librarian reading silly stories to children about people who go to parties and forget to go home, or grown women who turn into teenagers. This has been Ms. Perry's value: she's a professional with a firm sense of boundaries. She's not a demagogue or the leader of a social movement. She's not Lady Gaga, creating cabaret-theater hyperbole. She's not Miley Cyrus, enacting transgression and waiting for the echo. This is not her own life. She's not a witness or a medium. She just works here.
In Performance: Nico Muhly: Nico Muhly performs an excerpt from "I'm Only Sixteen" from his opera "Two Boys." He is accompanied by the tenor Paul Appleby.Mr. Cremo, director of the Metropolitan Opera's commissioning program, invited two people to the dress rehearsal at the English National Opera: his brother, to get the perspective of someone who wasn't an operagoer, and his 19-year-old nephew, to learn whether the plot — which involves crime and identity on the Internet — rang true for a teenager who had grown up online."I was grilling him about whether he bought the technological stuff," Mr. Cremo recalled. "But it was the narrative that he had questions about."He wasn't alone. Many audience members and critics, myself included, agreed that while the opera, which has its American premiere at the Met on Monday, contained much that was beautiful, intelligent and intriguing, it also had problems that ranged from a sluggish beginning to an unfocused central character."I'm so happy to change stuff," Mr. Muhly, 32, spiky-haired and exuberant, said in a recent interview at the Met. "I'm not in any way like, 'This is my precious.' "After six years of development and two years of strategic adjustments aimed at reworking the version performed in London, the stakes could hardly be higher for the Met. "Two Boys" is the first opera to be produced through the recently renamed Met/LCT New Works Program, which commissions operas under the shared auspices of the Met and Lincoln Center Theater. Announced with great fanfare early in 2006, the program has struggled, with fewer than half of the original dozen composers making it even to the workshop phase so far."Opera is a life decision," Mr. Muhly said. "It's not something you casually happen into. It wasn't something that I always wanted to do; it wasn't like when I was a kid I was hoping, 'Someday.' Composers are making very large statements with operas. They bear a huge weight. So I'm lucky that the Met approached me. You can't be, like, shopping a thing around.""Two Boys" is also among the starkest tests New York has had of contemporary opera's ability to draw a wide audience. The Met has lately presented a heartening quantity of new and recent works, but while they have been difficult sells, most have had the benefit of being written by prominent living artists like John Adams and Philip Glass. "The Tempest," the 2004 Thomas Adès opera produced by the Met last year, was based on one of Shakespeare's most beloved plays even if it lacked a major-name composer.But Mr. Muhly, the youngest composer the Met has ever commissioned, is even less known to most operagoers than Mr. Adès. Born in Vermont in 1981, he graduated from Columbia University in 2003 and the Juilliard School's master's program in 2004.An assistant to Mr. Glass while in college, Mr. Muhly shared his taste for collaboration — the more, the merrier. He began writing music for dances by the choreographer Benjamin Millepied and working as a performer, arranger and conductor for pop artists like Björk and Antony Hegarty, of Antony and the Johnsons, while also churning out orchestral and chamber commissions.Mr. Muhly's furiously prolific output has won him many fans, but they're not the Met's traditional audience. His opera is based on an obscure true-crime story and features a talented but unstarry cast.All in all, "Two Boys" poses a rare challenge for the company and its general manager, Peter Gelb, one of the most gifted marketers in opera. The Met is responding with a vigorous campaign to raise Mr. Muhly's operatic profile and bring in new audiences. The effort includes TV spots alongside unlikely shows like "Catfish" — to which the opera's plot bears a resemblance — and "The Walking Dead.""I really do believe it will bring an audience to the theater," Mr. Gelb said in an interview. "It may not be overnight. A lot of it is going to be word of mouth. I think people have to hear the music.""Two Boys" might never have happened, at least not at the Met, had it not been for another opera that took a rockier path through the company's commissioning process. Mr. Muhly came onto the Met's radar when he was asked to assist with the piano reduction for a piece that the pop songwriter Rufus Wainwright was developing through the new works program."That's when I met Nico for the first time," Mr. Gelb said. "He was playing the piano for scenes from Rufus's opera in early spring 2007."By the time Mr. Wainwright parted ways with the Met in 2008 over disagreements about his work, Mr. Muhly had been offered his own place in the program.
Theo Wargo/Getty Images; Chad Batka for The New York Times; Michael Buckner/Getty Images for J/P Haitian Relief Organization and Cinema for PeaceHis schedule crowded and his list of collaborators long, Nico Muhly has many other projects planned for this year and next in addition to "Two Boys," opening on Monday at the Metropolitan Opera. His recent New York premieres have ranged from the melancholy score for the choreographer Benjamin Millepied's "Neverwhere," which had its debut with New York City Ballet last month, to sensitive music for a new production of "The Glass Menagerie," now on Broadway. Here is a look at nine other Muhly projects, from arrangements for an Icelandic pop artist's lushly wistful new album to songs for an eminent mezzo-soprano and pianist.'FOR NOW I AM WINTER' The arrangements for this recently released album by the Icelandic musician and producer Olafur Arnalds (Mercury Classics); Mr. Arnalds is touring it now.'KILL YOUR DARLINGS' The score for this John Krokidas film about Allen Ginsberg, Jack Kerouac and William S. Burroughs that opened last week.'IN 27 PIECES: THE HILARY HAHN ENCORES' One of the encores for this violinist's new album, to be released on Nov. 11.'RECORDARE, DOMINE' A new a cappella piece for Tallis Scholars. The group will perform it on Nov. 16 at Alice Tully Hall as part of Lincoln Center's White Light Festival.'21C LIEDERABEND, OP. 3' A piece in the Festival of Contemporary Art Song, at the Brooklyn Academy of Music, on Nov. 23.'YOU CAN'T GET THERE FROM HERE' A New York premiere. The pianist Simone Dinnerstein will perform this work in her recital at the Miller Theater at Columbia University on Jan. 23.'AIRE DU JEU' Four choreographers will create works to Mr. Muhly's music in the Festival International at Les Subsistances in Lyon, France (Jan. 28 to Feb 1).'SO MANY THINGS' A new work for mezzo-soprano and piano, inspired by Brahms, to be performed by Anne Sofie von Otter and Emanuel Ax on Jan. 28 at Carnegie Hall (part of a United States tour).'COLLECTED STORIES: LOVE/LOSS' Mr. Muhly will perform on a program that includes his surreal folk ballad "The Only Tune" on April 24 at Carnegie Hall as part of the composer David Lang's residency at the hall this season.
In 2004, Arcade Fire was the new band everyone wanted to see at the CMJ Music Marathon, the annual New York showcase that packs more than 1,300 club sets into five days. Arcade Fire became the decade's quintessential CMJ success story , as glowing reviews and word of mouth from the band's independent-label debut album and small Lower East Side club shows propelled it onto radio and, eventually, to arena shows and an Album of the Year Grammy Award for its 2010 release, "The Suburbs."This year's CMJ, the 33rd, ended on Saturday, and Arcade Fire was once again the talk of the festival. But this time, the band was upstaging the marathon with two non-CMJ shows in Bushwick, Brooklyn, while baby bands with hopes of being the next Arcade Fire played show after show on the Lower East Side and in Williamsburg.CMJ originally stood for College Media Journal, which was originally a newsletter (now a Web site) tabulating college-radio airplay back in the pre-Internet era, when college and public radio were the essential outlets for new and adventurous music. The Internet has changed all that, making radio a far less exclusive gatekeeper, and the CMJ marathon has developed multiple personalities as a result. It's still a parade of indie rock that's proudly separate from the pop mainstream or hoping to improve it. But it also brings out bands aiming not for college radio but for pop ears, going for catchiness above all and hoping to gain the attention of soundtrack music supervisors, advertisers and record labels looking for instant hits. I heard, and fled, more than a few perky formula bands.Commercial and arty ambitions can overlap, of course — and in some of CMJ's most promising sets, they did. Those musicians used the programmed beats and synthetic sounds that are the vocabulary of current pop and R&B in service of more individual ideas. Kelela, a singer in Los Angeles, floated R&B vocal turns over slow, radically sparse tracks: a thud, a lone sustained bass tone, a crackle or a tick, little more, for music that was emotionally exposed over beats that kicked just enough. Wet, from New York, played majestically downcast love songs topped by vocals with an unexpected Celtic and country tinge. A Washington duo, Gems, used equally stately tempos and lusher arrangements in songs that lingered over their heartaches. Empress Of, the Brooklyn songwriter Lorely Rodriguez, looped and layered her vocals over electronic tracks that conjured dizzying obsession. A different approach came from a Los Angeles band, Stag, which used programmed sounds to create unlikely tangents in what might have been singer-songwriter pop.CMJ was full of local bands — not only because there are so many worthwhile musicians in New York, but also because this is a belt-tightening era, and many bands prefer to make their showcase trek to the larger South by Southwest festival during spring break in Austin, Tex. Yet CMJ also draws acts from abroad that (with and without government support) see it as a chance to reach an American audience.Some of the best acts at this year's CMJ were imported. Courtney Barnett, from Australia, arrived with songs that match terse yet wildly unpredictable storytelling with rock that works up the scrappy momentum of the Velvet Underground, driven by her own electric guitar. Kirin J. Callinan, another Australian, led a trio from within a semicircle of effects pedals, summoning jackhammer industrial beats or fortresses of reverb around his deep, theatrical singing.Joanna Gruesome, from Wales, had a true punk spirit, in songs that could be flippantly deadpan most of the way through, then explode with a scream and even more frazzled guitars. Another British band, Hookworms, were a mesmerizing, controlled onslaught of neo-psychedelic guitar drone.CMJ is always full of throwbacks and revivalists; college radio is a sanctuary for the archival minded. The Dutch songwriter Jacco Gardner offered impressively meticulous time-capsule psychedelic pop pegged very clearly to 1966-67, down to the wavery analog keyboard tones. Spires, from New York, played a noisier, janglier flavor of garage psychedelia, in songs that kept clear melodies amid the fuzztone. Beach Day, from Florida, had Kimmy Drake belting more straightforward garage-rock songs with titles like "Boys." The Preatures, from Australia, mingled 1960s rock and late-1970s post-punk in peppy songs driven by a neat mesh of guitar parts. Bots, a duo of brothers on drums and bass, looked back to 1960s garage-rock and Jimi Hendrix — and, perhaps, sideways to the Black Keys. Clear Plastic Masks, formed in New York and now in Nashville, brought the squall of late-1960s blues-rock and a touch of roots-rock to smart, literate songs.There were more recent revivalists for more recent eras, too, like the Norwegian bassist and singer Maya Vik summoning the 1980s Minneapolis funk of Prince and Janet Jackson, and the Drowners, from New York, harking back only a decade to the Strokes.The proudly intelligent indie-rock that was once a college-radio staple survives at CMJ. J. Fernandez, a band from Chicago, drew on the motoric patterns of bands like Stereolab and the shifty meters of progressive rock in songs that were modest on the surface but gently insistent. Zula, from New York, built pointillistic structures with a mainspring of Minimalism.And there were outliers, too. One was Public Service Broadcasting, a high-concept duo from London. One played drums, the other handled banjo, guitar, laptop and keyboards; their songs, filled with optimistic aspiration, got vocals from snippets of movie dialogue. Even their stage patter — "Thank you, New York!" — was sampled. Another was U.S. Girls, the project of Meg Remy, who piles up samples of radio broadcasts and other noises for a deliberately murky, revisionist take on the meaning of girl groups.Many of the showcases I saw were in half-empty rooms — perhaps because so many of the bands can be seen regularly in New York, perhaps because I was seeking out newer bands. Meanwhile, Arcade Fire packed them in.Arcade Fire's two shows in Brooklyn — under the transparent pseudonym the Reflektors, promoting an album due Oct. 29 called "Reflektor" — weren't part of CMJ. They were a stunt that called for fans to arrive in "mandatory" formal wear or costumes for shows at a giant art gallery in a former industrial building in Bushwick, 299 Meserole. There, the setup was for a dance party, with D.J. music blaring before and after Arcade Fire's live set."Reflektor" is produced by James Murphy, whose band LCD Soundsystem drew knowingly on the late-1970s and early-1980s era of dance music, when disco met punk. The earnest Arcade Fire was out to lighten up its image, wearing glittery clothes and playing new, triumphally upbeat songs (though the lyrics tell a different story). While a 10-song set that ended suddenly with no encore felt skimpy, the roars that greeted Arcade Fire through the show were a sign that eccentric, heartfelt music could still reach a significant audience. That possibility is what sustains the CMJ Music Marathon, whether or not any of this year's hopefuls ever gets that far.
VIENNA — Any director who stages "La Fanciulla del West" has got to be tempted to tamper with its setting. Puccini based his opera on David Belasco's play, "The Girl of the Golden West," about the blossoming of true love in a California mining town during the gold rush, circa 1850.Yet golden or otherwise, the West is so deeply woven into the fabric of the opera that comparisons with Western imagery is inevitable. There is a saloon where whiskey is drunk "neat," a hero-bandit who overcomes his deviant ways, a high-stakes poker game and, finally, a ride into the proverbial sunset.For Puccini admirers, "Fanciulla"— the first opera to have its world premiere at the Metropolitan opera, in 1910 — is a work of great musical richness but one eclipsed by the popularity of operas the composer wrote earlier. Yet its story is constructed around a familiar operatic love-triangle. Minnie, a woman who exists amidst a throng of miners, may lack the vulnerability of other Puccini's soprano heroines, but her love for the tenor, Dick Johnson, redeems him from his criminal past, while the baritone, Sheriff Jack Rance, lusts after her in vain.By rights, "La Fanciulla del West" ought to be accepted as readily as "Madama Butterfly" and "Turandot," as an opera with an exotic setting reinforced by dabs of local color, but its Western details keep emerging as cliché-ridden distractions. It would be a fool's errand to insist on downplaying them, but at least a production can avoid matching them with an equally cliché-ridden set. Marco Arturo Marelli, in his generally persuasive new production at the Vienna Staatsoper, updates the action to roughly the present day yet keeps it securely rooted in the West. Puccini's saloon operates from a trailer wheeled into a three-tiered encampment made of corrugated metal, where miners not only carouse but also freshen up after the day's work and hang out. A nostalgic song, which makes one of the minders homesick, is heard from a cassette player, yet Sheriff Rance wears a fancy black Western shirt, and Act 3 brings a panoramic view of an unmistakably Western vista (Mr. Marelli also designed the sets and lighting).No less a figure than the twelve-tone master Anton Webern in a letter to his mentor Arnold Schönberg, extolled the score of "Fanciulla" for its "entirely original sound throughout — brilliant, every bar a surprise." It is full of modernistic touches, which are worked into Puccini's overall style so skillfully that they might be overlooked. Even Debussy turns up as an influence (Puccini saw "Pelléas et Mélisande" and was taken by it) — music based on whole-tone scales is frequent. Time and again you think you know what is coming harmonically, only to hear a chord of unexpected complexity instead. The Americanisms built into the music are also appealing, including a cakewalk and a simple but infectious waltz that has the hint of a folk song and accompanies Minnie and Dick Johnson's first dance. The orchestration is brilliantly colorful.The Staatsoper offers a glorious opportunity to hear the music. The orchestra (whose members also constitute the Vienna Philharmonic) plays superbly under Franz Welser-Möst, who knows how to shield the voices from it yet lets it resound excitingly as the occasion demands. And the singers could hardly be better.Nina Stemme, best known for her splendid Wagnerian portrayals, shifts to Minnie with ease. Although curiously costumed (by Dagmar Niefind) — she bounces in at her first entrance with red hair and overalls looking like Raggedy Ann — she soon has an arresting moment when, in teaching the miners about the bible, she becomes transfixed by the concept of forgiveness of sin, thereby foreshadowing the transformation of Dick Johnson. Ms. Stemme goes on to chart the development of Minnie's character into a mature woman convincingly, and her voice — rich and true — sounds every bit as idiomatic in Puccini's music as it does in Wagner's.Jonas Kaufmann, with ample experience balancing German roles with Italian ones, sings Dick with burnished tone that is possessed of both heft and ring. It is hard to imagine the waltz tune sung more ardently, and one admires the beauty and restraint, in lieu of grandstanding, that Mr. Kaufmann brings to the opera's one distinct aria, "Ch'ella mi creda," sung as it appears he is about to be lynched.The character of Jack Rance is tricky, because his frustrated passion for Minnie is so strong that it can deflect the emotional focus away from the lovers. First, Rance loses a rigged poker game meant to decide Minnie and Dick's fate, then he must watch helplessly as they achieve happiness together. Tomasz Konieczny sings strongly, with a snarl to the voice as appropriate, but Mr. Marelli errs centering on Rance at the end, who points a gun to his head as if suicide is next.Better to have the lovers simply sail off together, as they do literally here in a colorful hot air balloon. It must be Mr. Marelli's way of acknowledging the Hollywood-like ending, but it is modest compared with Nikolaus Lehnhoff's staging in Amsterdam four ago (to be seen at the Paris Opera this season), which had a blond and glamorous Minnie, dressed in a strapless gown, make her third act entrance descending a staircase while MGM's roaring lion was projected above. In any case, "Fanciulla" will always summon visions of Hollywood, and perhaps once in a while, if you can't beat them, it may indeed make sense to join them.
SARATOGA SPRINGS, N.Y. — The first sign that Caffè Lena is different from other joints where guitars are strummed and coffee is sipped comes before you even enter the place. Next to it, off a picturesque side street here, runs Lena Lane, an alleyway commemorating the club and the woman who ran it and became a local legend.Since 1960, tiny, unprepossessing Caffè Lena has hosted thousands of folk musicians, from first timers at the weekly open mike to Arlo Guthrie, Don McLean, Kate and Anna McGarrigle, and Bob Dylan, who, by most accounts, played his first out-of-town show there after arriving in New York City.Now Caffè Lena and its proprietor, Lena Spencer, who died in 1989, are being celebrated with an exhaustively researched coffee-table book, CD boxed set and an audio archive destined for the Library of Congress. Together they make a case for the club as a landmark outpost of folk music in America, and for Spencer as a sharp-eyed and nurturing force for the music.The book, "Caffè Lena: Inside America's Legendary Folk Music Coffeehouse," just published by powerHouse Books, is the result of 11 years of work by Jocelyn Arem, 31, who first walked up the club's narrow staircase on an open mike night as a sophomore at nearby Skidmore College.Ms. Arem said she quickly traced the hospitality and camaraderie of the place back to Spencer, a daughter of Italian immigrants who founded the club with her husband, Bill, a sculptor; they had vague, beatnik-era plans of making enough money from the venture to coast in Europe for a while. Her husband soon left, but she kept the doors open — barely, at times — and built a reputation for earning the trust of top musicians. The club calls itself the oldest continuously running folk coffeehouse in the country."There's a spirit of family here that's different," Ms. Arem said. "Lena insisted that performers stay with her, and she fed them. When people came here, they let their guard down, and as artists, they feel they can tap into parts of their creative selves that they can't in other places."The book's very existence highlights one of the little-told stories of the folk movement: its spread beyond the well-trod centers of Greenwich Village, Boston and San Francisco into Middle America."Caffè Lena was one of those iconic places that were strategically placed around the country and actually made it possible for the folk-song revival to happen," said Peggy Bulger, the former director of the American Folklife Center at the Library of Congress. (She also performed at the cafe at the age of 15, she said, opening for the Greenbriar Boys.)The book tells that story through testimonials collected by Ms. Arem and hundreds of photographs of artists who passed through the club, starting with the very first, Jackie Washington (now known as Jack Landron), in May 1960. Mr. Dylan is seen performing and hanging out in 1962, looking as if he had just stepped off the cover of his first album. Pete Seeger, Dave Van Ronk, Bernice Johnson Reagon and others fill out the '60s glory years, on to the present day with Ani DiFranco, Sarah Lee Guthrie (Arlo's daughter), Mary Gauthier and the rock band the Figgs.For the album "Live at Caffè Lena: Music From America's Legendary Coffeehouse, 1967-2013," which was released last month by Tompkins Square, Ms. Arem recovered tapes of more than 700 shows from various private sources, including more than one dusty basement in upstate New York. These will all go to the Library of Congress archive.The 47 tracks chosen for the set went through audio restoration with the help of Steve Rosenthal, a Grammy-winning producer in New York. Ms. Arem, who financed the 11-year project through various grants and donations, said she hit the phones "like Erin Brockovich" to clear rights for the songs, which include a striking a cappella performance by Jean Ritchie in 1969 and tracks by cafe fixtures like Anna McGarrigle, Utah Phillips and Rosalie Sorrels. (Spencer herself sings a Noël Coward nugget, "Dear Little Café," in 1972.)The connecting thread through it all is Spencer, who largely gave up acting to run the club (though she landed a small role as Slatternly Woman in the 1987 film "Ironweed"). Locals knew her as a chain-smoking constant in the back of the room, which looks much the same today as it did decades ago: a plainly decorated, L-shaped space one flight up a narrow staircase, with room for just 85 people. The finances of the club were always shaky, and eventually Spencer lost her apartment and began living at the cafe. She died at 66, after a fall down the stairs.Artists came to revere her for her insight and generosity. In the book, Mr. McLean recalls her paying him $300 for an engagement instead of the $150 he was owed because, she told him, he "did so well." David Amram, the polymath composer who began his career playing jazz and classical music in the 1950s, said in a recent interview that his own music shifted after Spencer suggested in 1969 that he perform in the simpler folk-song idiom.After her death, the club was organized under a nonprofit organization, which now owns the small building and some adjacent property. It is raising money for $1.25 million in renovations that would finally, after five decades, put in an elevator and make other improvements.On a recent Saturday night, Caffè Lena was as scrappy as ever — although the audience was largely white haired — for a sold-out show by the Dyer Switch Band, a local bluegrass group. Young waitresses served tea and cookies, and the chairman of the cafe's board handled the sound check.Earlier that day, Mr. Amram, 82, visited the club on his way to the nearby Saratoga Performing Arts Center, where he was playing with Willie Nelson as part of this year's Farm Aid festival. He looked around and said he still felt the magic from the time he first walked up the stairs."It reminded me of the Café Bohemia, my first job in New York in 1955, with Charles Mingus," he said, and how "this humble little place was suddenly turned into a temple of art for that evening."
Few chamber groups deploy their musicians as oddly as the Bowed Piano Ensemble . The 10 players, students led by the composer Stephen Scott , stand around, and sometimes under, a concert grand, armed with items of all kinds — nylon fishing line, piano hammers, guitar picks, strips of paper, rolls of plumber's tape — and reach into the instrument to draw sounds from its strings. The music is tactile and otherworldly, sometimes percussive and often lyrical.Mr. Scott formed the ensemble in 1977 as an outgrowth of a new-music group he directed at Colorado College in Colorado Springs, where he has taught since 1969. He has written prolifically for the group, which has released albums of his music on the New Albion and Albany labels, with a new installment, "Ice & Fire," due next month on Navona.The ensemble will play music from "Ice & Fire," as well as older works, on Saturday evening at the Allen Room in what will probably be its final New York concert. Mr. Scott, 69, plans to retire at the end of the academic year, and as he put it, "Nobody has stepped up to say, 'I'd like to take over when you quit.' "He will, he added, continue to compose, probably for more standard forces. He already has an opera in the works. And perhaps with his post-retirement career in mind, Mr. Scott has expanded his scoring slightly over the last decade."Afternoon of a Fire," which opens the new CD, commemorates the 2012 Waldo Canyon fire near Colorado Springs and uses American Indian flutes. And his program on Saturday includes music from two song cycles, "Paisajes Audibles" (2002) and "The Deep Spaces" (2005), with the soprano Victoria Hansen, his wife, as the soloist, as well as "Lyric Suite" (2011), which has a solo line for Thomas Stacy, the former English hornist for the New York Philharmonic."I heard Stephen's ensemble on the radio one night as I drove home after a Philharmonic concert," Mr. Stacy said, "and I was intrigued by the sound. He's created something that's truly one of a kind, and I could imagine the sensuous, melodic English horn sailing over the sound that this group produces. So I looked him up on the Internet and asked him to write something for me."Mr. Scott did not invent the idea of playing the piano by manipulating the strings directly — as opposed to using the keyboard — or by otherwise tampering with the instrument's innards. Early in the 20th century, composers like Erik Satie, in "Piège de Méduse," and Heitor Villa-Lobos, in "Chôros No. 8," instructed pianists to weave paper between the piano's strings. And John Cage began writing for what he called a "prepared piano" — with pieces of metal, plastic and other materials inserted into the instrument's mechanism — in the 1930s. Composers since then have regularly asked players to reach into the piano to strum, pluck or strike the strings.But most composers who have tinkered inside the box have expected pianists mainly to use the keyboard to produce their sounds. What sets Mr. Scott apart is that his music, composed over several decades, ignores the 88 keys. His players go directly for the piano's guts, and listening to his music without seeing the ensemble, you would not guess that it was produced on a piano — or, for that matter, on any conventional instrument.Mr. Scott writes in an accessible post-Minimalist style that has evolved considerably since the early 1980s, when his first recorded pieces used chugging, repeating figures that show Steve Reich's influence, as well as droning, sometimes harmonically dense organlike sounds. He took a while to find a style that suited him. As a student, first as a boy in his native Corvallis, Ore., and then at the University of Oregon and Brown University, he played clarinet and saxophone, and his heroes were jazz musicians — Charlie Parker, Miles Davis, Thelonious Monk, Gil Evans, Oliver Nelson and John Coltrane are the ones he readily names.In 1970 he went to Ghana to study polyrhythmic drumming, and met Mr. Reich, who was there to do the same. Mr. Scott studied drumming in other African countries as well, and when he returned to Colorado, where he had just started teaching, he fell under the spell of Mr. Reich's and Terry Riley's Minimalist ensemble works."I was searching for my voice, as most composers do at some point," Mr. Scott said in a Skype interview from his office in Colorado Springs. "You can write 12-tone pieces and sound like 200 other composers, and I was engaged in that for a while, as a lot of us were."But I became interested in a trend, in those days, of writing for masses of similar instruments — 40 flutes, or dozens of tubas. I was intrigued by that, but I didn't want to duplicate what other composers were doing. And it occurred to me that using a piano, I could create an ensemble that was homogeneous and heterogeneous at the same time." As the director of a new-music ensemble at the college, he had no trouble finding students eager to experiment. They began by making simple tools like nylon filament, which when pulled across the piano's strings acts in much the same way a bow does on a stringed instrument. Popsicle sticks with horsehair attached are used similarly but draw a different kind of sound. From there, the arsenal grew."A lot of good ideas have come from the students," Mr. Scott said. "Some have an interest in engineering, or carpentry. A lot of them like to tinker with things. They're kind of my research assistants."All of the tools the group uses are handmade, and when Mr. Scott is invited to perform one of his works at another college, he insists that the students there make their bows, hammers and other devices too. To make it (relatively) easy for the players to find the right notes inside the piano, the strings are color coded according to pitch."If we're playing a lyrical melody," he explained, "we have to work the way handbell players work, with each individual playing a single note at exactly the right time, rhythmically and dynamically."Mr. Scott said that giving up the ensemble felt bittersweet. "Maybe I'll hang out a shingle, advertising myself as someone who can assemble and coach this kind of group," he said. "I have some experience with it."
In the annals of American music in the 20th century, no record label had a more unlikely origin or trajectory than Paramount Records. Founded in 1917 as a subsidiary of the Wisconsin Chair Company, which was eager to supply content for the phonographs it had begun to manufacture, Paramount took a scattershot approach to its business, recording more than 10,000 tracks of blues, gospel, hot jazz, treacly pop, and hillbilly and ethnic music before going bust during the Depression.So it seems appropriate that a new Paramount boxed set, due out on Tuesday, is literally that: an oak box, stamped with the Wisconsin Chair Company's logo, that mimics one of the "talking machines" Paramount's parent produced. The cabinet of curiosities even comes with what initially seems to be a key for a vintage phonograph — but which, in a distinctly 21st-century touch, turns out to be a flash drive stocked with, among other things, 800 tracks of music in MP3 format."We wanted to highlight a whole menagerie of things," said Jack White, formerly of the White Stripes and now the leader of Dead Weather, who played a role in both the design of the set and the selection of the tracks. "This Paramount music, I wanted to make it as appealing as possible to somebody in a physical, tactile way, all of that, the smell, everything, so as to lead you into the incredible stories that are contained in the music."The set, "The Rise and Fall of Paramount Records," is a joint project of Mr. White's Third Man label and Revenant Records, founded by the guitarist John Fahey and run since his death in 2001 by Dean Blackwood. It draws from Paramount's first decade and includes recordings by major figures like Jelly Roll Morton, King Oliver, Fletcher Henderson, Alberta Hunter, Ma Rainey and Blind Lemon Jefferson, as well as oddities from first-time performers who faded into history.Spectacular though it may be, "The Rise and Fall of Paramount" is only the latest example of a trend that has been gaining ground in American music over the last decade. As pop drifts further and further from its roots in blues and country, some contrarian listeners are moving in the opposite direction, seeking out artists from the earliest years of the recording era.One result has been a conspicuous increase in reissue projects on labels that exist specifically for that purpose or, like Smithsonian Folkways, have partially embraced it. Some of those labels, like Yazoo and Origin Jazz Library, as well as Ace and Document in Britain, have been around since the vinyl era, but others, most notably the Atlanta-based Dust to Digital label, are purely products of the CD era."What we are always trying to do is fill in gaps," said Lance Ledbetter of Dust to Digital, whose first project, a six-CD compilation of early 20th-century religious music called "Goodbye Babylon," was released 10 years ago Sunday. "The younger generation wants to be transported. It's easy for them to be jaded because everything is one search away. But they go into a shop and see one of our sets of never-before-reissued music, and they say, 'This isn't like something I downloaded or saw on YouTube.' It's opening up their world to a whole new music."Reflecting that awareness, a National Recording Preservation Foundation, authorized by Congress, recently began operating, aided by a $200,000 donation from Mr. White, who also sits on its board. Gerald Seligman, the executive director of the nonprofit foundation, suggested that digitized vintage reissues not only sound infinitely better than they used to back in the era of turntables, when every scratch and hiss was magnified, but retain an appealing authenticity that can be enhanced with the proper packaging."Before the multitrack era, performances were done live in the studio," he noted. "So there is a kind of immediacy and honesty to those recordings that makes them feel like a person in a room.""Music has been cheapened to the point that many people expect it to be free," he continued. "When your competition is free, you've got to think about who wants this material and what they want with it. Deluxe packaging means it will be expensive," but some people have "a certain nostalgia for the physical object."The Paramount set, limited to 5,000 copies and carrying a list price of $400, takes that concept to a new level. In addition to the 800 digital tracks, the package includes a six-LP vinyl sampler, encased in a wood album with laser-etched titling.The set also comes with two books. One, in large paperback format and called a "field manual," is a kind of encyclopedia, offering 360 pages of biographies of Paramount artists as well as a list of all the tracks they recorded for the label, along with the date and place of recording and the names, when known, of the musicians who played on the track.
How do you want your jolts? Steady state, like a finger stuck in a socket? Or frantic, angular and quick changing, like a haywire carnival ride? Both kinds are available this week from experienced administrators of their chosen thrills: Thee Oh Sees , from San Francisco, and Melt-Banana, from Tokyo.Thee Oh Sees have taken garage-rock and merged it with a kinetic Minimalism. Their songs bear down: sustain, riff, repeat repeat repeat. Somewhere in the welter are lyrics with horror tales and existential questions, but they'd have to be read before or afterward; onstage, it's all jitter, drone and buzz. Arrive early; Thee Oh Sees' sets are as short as they are intense. (7 p.m. Tuesday, Irving Plaza, 17 Irving Place, at 15th Street, Manhattan, 212-777-6800, irvingplaza.com; $24.70.)Melt-Banana is a definitive noise-rock band: the high-voiced singer and lyricist Yasuko Onuki and the wildly changeable guitarist Ichirou Agata. Together they create hyperactive, virtuosic songs that pound, sputter, shriek, squeal and zap, which doesn't stop them from being catchy. (8 p.m. Friday, Saint Vitus, 1120 Manhattan Avenue, Greenpoint, Brooklyn, saintvitusbar.com; $17.)
"Like everybody else, I think I'm never going to die," the composer and diarist Ned Rorem said, warming instantly to the subject of a recent interview: his 90th birthday. "That's sort of an unrealistic answer, and 90 is realistic," he continued. "Everyone else can be 90, but not me."Along with the quips came a more practical explanation for the resilience of an artist who had long embodied flaming youth, beauty and an intellectual bon vivant milieu. "I come from a long-lived Norwegian family," he said. "My father was up there, and so was Mother."Mr. Rorem, even now a quick wit who looks considerably younger than his years, was sitting in an empty classroom at the Juilliard School late one afternoon before his birthday, which was Wednesday. It was a homecoming of sorts, despite the relocated campus. After studies at Northwestern in Evanston, Ill., and at the Curtis Institute in Philadelphia, Mr. Rorem completed his formal education at Juilliard during the late 1940s when it was in Morningside Heights."I went to Curtis for just one year, and then I met somebody and moved to New York," he said. "My father was not amused by that. But I went to Juilliard and got a master's degree."Yet it was not nostalgia that drew Mr. Rorem to Juilliard for an interview about events surrounding his milestone birthday. It was a convenient place to meet up with Steven Blier, an accompanist and vocal coach on the Juilliard faculty, and Michael Barrett, a pianist, conductor and arts executive. Mr. Blier and Mr. Barrett are also the founders and directors of the New York Festival of Song, which will pay homage to Mr. Rorem in three concerts, starting on Friday in Providence, R.I.Classical music dotes on big anniversaries, as this year's Verdi, Wagner and Britten celebrations have proved. Mr. Rorem's birthday has occasioned less fanfare, seemingly confirming his oft-repeated assertions about the invisibility of living composers.Still, tributes have come. "Evidence of Things Not Seen," a 1997 magnum-opus song cycle commissioned by the Festival of Song and the Library of Congress, was presented on Mr. Rorem's birthday at the Curtis Institute and at Covent Garden in London. On Tuesday in Amsterdam, the mezzo-soprano Christianne Stotijn will give the premiere of "How Like a Winter," a wistful setting of three Shakespeare sonnets that Mr. Rorem wrote over the summer.On Friday, the baritone Phillip Cheah and the pianist Trudy Chan perform Mr. Rorem's songs at the Church of St. Luke in the Fields in New York. That same night, the Festival of Song unveils its own tribute, "Ned Is Ninety," at Brown University. The program, which features the mezzo-soprano Kate Lindsey and the baritone Andrew Garland, travels to the Isabella Stewart Gardner Museum in Boston on Nov. 3, and arrives at Merkin Concert Hall in New York on Nov. 5."Our Town," Mr. Rorem's 2005 opera based on the Thornton Wilder play, has been staged this year at Drake University in Des Moines; at the Central City Opera in Colorado; and at the Monadnock Music Festival in Peterborough, N.H. The character Emily Webb's climactic final monologue in the opera has become standard fare for soprano auditions, Mr. Blier told Mr. Rorem."You know you've succeeded, Ned, when you have 'the' in front of your name: 'We'll hear the Puccini and the Rorem,' " Mr. Blier said."Also, that means it makes money, and that's all that counts for me," Mr. Rorem replied, his wry smile indicating a fib.Performances of Mr. Rorem's instrumental works are harder to track. Thomas Piercy, a clarinetist, recently gave two New York recitals honoring Mr. Rorem, and will present another in Japan in November. A new Naxos CD by Carolyn Enger features piano works Mr. Rorem wrote from 1978 to 2001, affectionate portraits of friends and family members, including several for his longtime partner, James Holmes, an organist and choir director who died of cancer and complications of AIDS in 1999.His orchestral oeuvre, including three symphonies, concertos and "Air Music," which won the Pulitzer Prize for music in 1976, is conspicuous in its absence. Still, it makes sense that most of the activity surrounding his birthday involves his songs, of which there are more than 500. No other American composer has achieved comparable distinction in the genre."I'm basically not at home except with vocal music," Mr. Rorem said. "I don't know why. I can sing, but nobody wants to hear me." Challenged on that, he softened his assertion: "I'm not as at ease with nonvocal music as with vocal. I knew a lot of vocalists. I think I got my Social Security number as an accompanist, and I'd accompany classes. Does Éva Gauthier's name mean anything to you?"Mr. Blier and Mr. Barrett nodded. Mr. Rorem, who had been a copyist for Virgil Thomson, went to work for Gauthier, a Canadian-American mezzo-soprano and a revered pedagogue, in 1947. "What a fantastic teacher, if 'teacher' means one whose enthusiasm is transferable — who leads horses to water and makes them drink," Mr. Rorem wrote of Gauthier in the liner notes for "But Yesterday Is Not Today," an art-song anthology album released by New World Records.That year, he published his first song, "The Lordly Hudson," based on a Paul Goodman poem. He later included it among the 32 selections on "Songs of Ned Rorem," a 1964 LP issued on Columbia Records, now available on CD from Other Minds. For the teenage Mr. Blier, the LP offered a revelation.Growing up in New York, Mr. Blier explained, he had assumed that art song was a European phenomenon. "Then I came across Ned, and he wrote 'The Lordly Hudson,' " he said, "and it took me a little while to realize that he actually meant my Hudson. It was not the Hudson in England or, God forbid, Canada. It was very affirming to me to know about him."Mr. Rorem's scandalous published diaries, now available as e-books from Open Road Media, also resonated. "I remember going to Doubleday's on 57th and Fifth and picking up 'The Paris Diaries,' " Mr. Blier said. "I really looked around to make sure that no one had seen me pick up this book. I had not been told anything good about homosexuals — they were dangerous, predatory, aberrant — and I thought that I might be one of these."Coming out was not an easy prospect for Mr. Blier. "The idea that Ned had written a song about my river, and that he shared my secret, was huge for me," he said.Mr. Barrett admitted that he was not as taken with Mr. Rorem's work initially. "When I came to New York in my early 20s, Ned was pretty much a fixture," he said. "He was one of our American composers who was out there writing a lot of music, and every time there was a premiere it got reviewed." But after beginning a long professional association with Leonard Bernstein in 1982, Mr. Barrett quickly absorbed Bernstein's esteem for Mr. Rorem's music. When Mr. Barrett and Mr. Blier inaugurated their fledgling festival in 1988, Mr. Rorem was a formative bond.
"In the solo concerto musical interest is aroused and sustained on the basis of an opposition between one instrument and many," Abraham Veinus wrote in "The Concerto," a 1944 study. "In this sense it has been described as a musical reflection of the everyday and ever-engrossing human drama of the individual lost in, emerging from, and pitted against the multitude." From Vivaldi's groundbreaking "Estro Armonico" of 1711 to today, attributes of theater have adhered to the genre."Up-close," created in 2010 by Michel van der Aa, puts an intriguing new spin on that ancient notion. "I kept on getting ideas that I couldn't just say in music," he said from his home in Amsterdam during an interview conducted on Skype. "I needed these extra layers to tell the things I wanted to tell."It feels oddly appropriate to interrogate Mr. van der Aa through a computer screen, since his best-known works require musicians to interact meaningfully with companions and counterparts present solely on film. "Up-close," which will have its American premiere on Monday at the Manhattan Center as part of Lincoln Center's White Light Festival, provides a cello soloist with an enigmatic alter ego: a silent woman who appears in a film written and directed by Mr. van der Aa.The music is sophisticated yet approachable, with assertive rhythms, pungent harmonies and seamless shifts between acoustic and electronic sounds. Thanks to the film, it is also something more. Last November, "Up-close" won the Grawemeyer Award for Music Composition, presented annually by the University of Louisville."It's a virtuoso cello concerto but also a fascinating multimedia experience that defies simple classification," Marc Satterwhite, the award director, said in a news release. "It really creates its own genre."Mr. van der Aa, now 43, began his musical career as a rock guitarist, then trained as a recording engineer at the Royal Conservatory in The Hague. A growing interest in larger forms led him to study composition. Among his teachers was Louis Andriessen, who engaged Mr. van der Aa to create electronic interludes for "Writing to Vermeer," the opera Mr. Andriessen created with the filmmaker Peter Greenaway.Adept at mixing live and recorded sounds, Mr. van der Aa showed a penchant for illusion in pieces like "Oog" ("Eye"), from 1995, in which a cellist sometimes pretends to play sounds actually emanating from a tape. Incorporating visual elements directly into his compositions, he explained, came gradually."I started writing down more and more visual notes in my scores, things like 'Freeze your bow on your strings,' " he said. "It started to become a very important layer in my story — in my vocabulary, really."In 2002, he took a year off to study at the New York Film Academy, shooting on 16-millimeter film and editing by hand at a desk. Material from "Passage," a short film he made at the academy, would resurface years later in "Transit" (2009), a haunting meditation on aging and isolation."What I found is that there are so many similarities between filmmaking and composing: the way you handle time, the way you handle phrasing, the editing of the film," he said. "I've always been a very visual person, so for me, it was a very natural way to work.""One" (2002), a monodrama he completed after finishing at the academy, established the intricate dance of live and filmed performers he has extended in two increasingly elaborate operas, "After Life" (2006) and "Sunken Garden" (2012). He applied similar methods in "Up-close," composed for the cellist Sol Gabetta and the Amsterdam Sinfonietta.Originally — and aptly, given its cinematic character — "Up-close" was set to have its American debut in the Los Angeles Philharmonic's Green Umbrella new-music series in January. But when Jane Moss, the Lincoln Center vice president for programming, expressed an interest in producing "Up-close" for White Light, the orchestra graciously ceded the premiere."We are always interested in concert performances that have other dimensions related to them," Ms. Moss said. "Up-close," she explained, represented a perfect project for the festival in its intimations of interior life, aging and mortality. "It's a very interesting mirroring exercise," she said. "I would describe it as the film sort of mirroring what's going on onstage.""Up-close" requires its participants to be keenly aware of what is happening on screen, the soloist most of all. Kaori Yamagami, who will perform with the Orpheus Chamber Orchestra on Monday, comes to her role prepared: She was the principal cellist of the Amsterdam Sinfonietta during the original tour and has been the soloist in four subsequent performances.Negotiating the size and shape of each new stage is of paramount importance for accurate timing, she explained in a telephone interview. She likened the atmosphere of the piece to a horror film and a mystery, full of loneliness and isolation — sensations she sometimes has to convey through nonmusical means."The instructions in the score are, 'Stand suddenly and look far away,' " Ms. Yamagami said. "If I took that too literally, I could just sort of stand and look with squinted eyes toward the audience. But I think in those moments, especially what's going on in the texture underneath me in the music and in the film, it's quite a scary moment."Monday's concert includes "Oog," "Transit" and a third chamber piece, "Memo," all played by members of the International Contemporary Ensemble. More of Mr. van der Aa's music will reach New York on Nov. 23, when a portion of "After Life" is featured in a program called "21c Liederabend, op. 3" at the Brooklyn Academy of Music. With the flurry of attention, he knows that he could be cast as a novelty."First and foremost, I'm a composer," he said, noting that he regularly writes pieces with no multimedia content. "When I have an idea, I think: 'O.K., what do I want to translate with this piece? And do I need a string quartet, or do I need 3-D screens and six electric guitars?' "Presenters are keen on multimedia, Mr. van der Aa confirmed, but music dictates its own terms. "I think it's absolutely legit for people to write a beautiful symphony or string quartet," he said, "which could be much more relevant and connected to this time than a piece with a film."
The Bolshoi Ballet has drawn more notice recently in the United States for the offstage acid attack on its artistic director, Sergei Filin, than for its onstage artistry and virtuosity, but that could change next year when the company plans a series of tour dates in Washington and New York.The themes of betrayal and vengeance will be back onstage, where they belong, when the company returns to Washington from May 20 through 25 to dance "Giselle" at the Kennedy Center. (The ballet, with choreography by Jean Coralli, Jules Perrot and Marius Petipa, and staging by Yuri Grigorovich, tells the tale of a peasant girl, an aristocratic seducer and a bevy of ghosts of jilted maidens bent on revenge.)The company's plans for New York City were less clear. The Bolshoi announced this year that it plans to visit New York from July 12 through 28, to dance "Swan Lake," "Don Quixote" and "Spartacus," and to give a concert performance of "The Tsar's Bride," the opera by Rimsky-Korsakov. There was speculation that the troupe would perform at Lincoln Center, but officials there said it would be premature to comment on the Bolshoi's plans for New York and were less than forthcoming about what the holdup might be. Officials at the Bolshoi did not immediately respond to calls or an email seeking more information about the tour schedule.At the end of July, though, the Bolshoi plans to head to upstate New York to dance "Don Quixote" at the Saratoga Performing Arts Center from July 30 through Aug. 1, officials at the center said.The Bolshoi's appearances in Washington in May will be the troupe's first since 2012, when it danced "Coppélia" there. In a review of that performance, Alastair Macaulay of The New York Times wrote that "its meeting of music, dance and story brings out the sweetness and brio of the Bolshoi."Since then, the Bolshoi has been categorized more by tumult, culminating in the attack, which nearly blinded Mr. Filin. A Bolshoi dancer, Pavel Dmitrichenko, was charged with orchestrating the attack, which took place in January; he pleaded not guilty, saying he had arranged for two men to beat Mr. Filin but did not know that acid would be thrown in his face.The first public hearing in his case began last week, but was then postponed. In the wake of the attack, Nikolai Tsiskaridze, a popular Bolshoi dancer who had clashed with the theater's leadership, had his contract terminated, and the company's longtime general director, Anatoly Iksanov, was ousted. On Monday Mr. Tsiskaridze was appointed the acting director of the Vaganova Ballet Academy in St. Petersburg, one of the oldest and most prestigious dance schools in the world.
When Sanford I. Weill bought a 360-acre estate in California wine country three years ago, the area had plenty of attractions — gourmet cuisine, fine hotels, a beautiful climate — everything but a major concert hall for the culturally inclined Mr. Weill. Fund-raising problems and the economic downturn had stalled the completion of the nearby Green Music Center 's auditorium at Sonoma State University.So in 2011, Mr. Weill, the former Citigroup chief executive and longtime chairman of Carnegie Hall, and his wife, Joan, donated $12 million to finish the hall, and Mr. Weill became chairman of the center. Now he is bringing in his own man to run it, putting up the money to hire Zarin Mehta, the former president of the New York Philharmonic.The university planned to announce on Thursday that Mr. Mehta will take on the title of executive director, which he will share with Larry Furukawa-Schlereth, the university's chief financial officer.Mr. Mehta "can build this place to be something unique and make it well known on a global basis," Mr. Weill said in an interview.The Weills will pay 80 percent of Mr. Mehta's $300,000 annual salary to the university, which will cover the rest — an unconventional arrangement for an arts organization. What's also unusual is that Mr. Mehta does not plan to move to California.These and other factors raise questions about just how the whole thing is actually going to work. It's unclear whether Mr. Mehta can run the center from afar; whether the center's current operating budget of about $9 million will continue to cover the cost of top-tier talent (the Philharmonic's budget is $72 million by comparison); and whether Mr. Zarin and Mr. Furukawa-Schlereth will comfortably share power. The scale of Mr. Weill's effort and investment speaks to his ambitions for the hall, in Rohnert Park, Calif., and to the level of his influence. In its first year the center — which will ultimately cost a total of $150 million — has attracted prominent names in classical music. (It also presents opera, world music and jazz; Lyle Lovett is performing next month.) The pianist Lang Lang gave the first performance at the hall in September 2012, the soprano Renée Fleming opened this year's season, and the cellist Yo-Yo Ma performed in January. Each season will also include regular performances by the San Francisco Symphony and the Santa Rosa Symphony.In its first season, the 1,400-seat hall was the site of 32 concerts, which sold at about 80 percent capacity. The center's Joan and Sanford I. Weill Hall, as it is now called, was designed by William Rawn and was modeled after Mr. Rawn's Seiji Ozawa Hall at Tanglewood, with a back wall that can open onto the landscaped Weill Lawn.Mr. Mehta says it was the high aspirations for the center and encouragement from Mr. Lang that prompted him to take the job, although he didn't really need a new full-time gig; at 75, he was enjoying being close to his family and being a consultant to music groups in Chicago, to which he returned in 2012 after 12 years at the Philharmonic. Before coming to New York, he was president and chief executive of the Ravinia Festival, in suburban Chicago, where he is a lifetime trustee."It's the opportunity to create a public, to create culture," Mr. Mehta said in an interview. "I will be there as long as it takes to make this thing a huge success, because the people merit it." His portfolio at the center will include artistic issues, sales, marketing and development.Mr. Furukawa-Schlereth said he felt fortunate to have Mr. Mehta as a partner. "I never thought we'd able to find someone of his extraordinary talent and intelligence and experience to come work with us in this brand-new venture," he said.Mr. Weill said he was unconcerned about the potential geographical hurdles facing Mr. Mehta. "The best managers travel," he said. "Music is a global business with people all over the place. He will be out there as much as he absolutely has to be — whether it's 110 percent of the time or 50 percent of the time."In addition to Weill Hall, the music center includes the 250-seat Schroeder Hall, which is expected to open next year. Still to be raised is $2.5 million for the MasterCard Performing Arts Pavilion, an open-air space scheduled to open in 2015 to which the credit card company contributed $15 million.The music center supports itself through ticket sales, board contributions and annual giving, Mr. Furukawa-Schlereth said; the university pays for utilities and maintenance. Mr. Weill said he hoped to expand the board to 50 from 27 with people from the North Bay area, San Francisco and Silicon Valley. Most board members are expected to contribute $50,000 a year each.As to whether the Green Center will compete with Carnegie Hall for Mr. Weill's attentions — and pocketbook — Mr. Weill said: "We're 3,000 miles apart. I think they can enhance each other."The Green Center is already collaborating on educational programs with the Weill Music Institute at Carnegie Hall.Despite his role as the driving force behind the center, Mr. Weill said its success would not depend on him. "That wouldn't be a good business model," he said. "I really believe in leading by example."
"Does there really need to be another awards show?" Spike Jonze recently wondered aloud. "If there's going to be one, why?"This was a reasonable sentiment that Mr. Jonze, the veteran director of music videos and feature films, happened to verbalize as he was overseeing a new music awards show.Relaxing in an upstairs office at Steiner Studios in Brooklyn, Mr. Jonze was taking a break on Tuesday afternoon from his duties as the creative director of the YouTube Music Awards, an online celebration of pop music and performers that will debut on Sunday.When the curtain rises on this awards show, which will be held at Pier 36 in Manhattan and shown on the YouTube website, it will be the latest entry in a field of congratulatory broadcasts already dominated by the Grammy Awards, the MTV Video Music Awards, the Billboard Music Awards and the American Music Awards, among many others.But if done correctly — or even not so correctly — the event presents other substantial opportunities for YouTube and its corporate parent, Google: a chance to show that they can create the kind of content that was once broadcast television's exclusive domain and that produces the unexpected, you-had-to-be-there viral moments that online audiences thrive on."It's an important time for us to celebrate what YouTube's role is in the music ecosystem," said Danielle Tiedt, the website's vice president for marketing."I think YouTube stands at a really interesting place," she added, "where it not only is the water cooler, where the conversation happens and propagates, but certainly can be part of making the moments that lead to those conversations."One floor below Mr. Jonze's office, a 5,600-square-foot soundstage had been overrun by artists and crew preparing feverishly but harmoniously for a live event that they had never attempted and whose commencement was five days away.Along the studio's perimeter, directors like James Larese, Chris Milk and Ray Tintori and the French graffiti artist Fafi were clustered around laptops, reviewing plans for performances by Eminem, Avicii and M.I.A.In one corner, an enthusiastic choreographer was leading a squad of young dancers through a routine that will accompany an Arcade Fire number. In another corner, members of the band OK Go were conferring with Jason Schwartzman, the actor and a co-host of the awards show, figuring out how to paint his face and clothing to blend in with a picture of a mythical beast projected on the wall.For Mr. Jonze, there was not much time for philosophical deliberations on why the YouTube Music Awards should exist; he and his collaborators were sufficiently happy to have a star-studded lineup of artists and a 90-minute canvas to do with as they wished."We've been given a lot of room to make a mess," Mr. Jonze said. "Hopefully, it'll be a fun mess."Mr. Jonze said he was approached about six months ago to take charge of the YouTube show, which will give out awards in six categories, like Artist of the Year and Response of the Year, with winners chosen by online vote. (The event is also being produced by Vice Media and Sunset Lane Entertainment.)Over the last month, as Mr. Jonze finished his new movie, "Her," and presented it at the New York Film Festival, he became entrenched in his work on the awards show. He helped recruit its hosts, Mr. Schwartzman and Reggie Watts, the musician and comedian, as well as directors like Mr. Milk, who came to New York a month ago for a conference on the future of storytelling — not necessarily to help out Mr. Jonze."The whole thing is like a game of pickup basketball," Mr. Jonze explained. "Whoever's nearby is playing."Mr. Milk said the goal of each artist's performance was to create an original music video in a live setting. "It will never be as polished as a regular music video," he said, "but it will have all the spontaneity and humanity of a live performance. In theory."Some of these videos, Mr. Milk said, "are more narrative, story-based.""Some," he continued, "are more just about focusing on one performance. We have a video where —— "Mr. Jonze interrupted him and indicated the reporter in the room. "Don't tell him any of the ideas," he said.Mr. Schwartzman said that he and Mr. Watts had been deliberately but willingly excluded from writing sessions so that their dialogue during the show would not sound programmed."Spike was like, 'Why don't we just not have scripts?' " Mr. Schwartzman said. "That sounded kind of fun. Then it became, why don't you throw stuff at us that we don't know is coming, to keep it spontaneous?"As a tight, protective cap was being fitted around his head and chin, Mr. Schwartzman was asked if he was comfortable with knowing so few details about the show."Do I look like a guy who's not cool with it?" he answered.YouTube's rivals in the awards show arena seemed to welcome the competition, though some cautioned that the site would face challenges as a web-only content company."If you're asking, 'How do we compete with a TV show, or how do we do a TV-like show?,' then you're not really creating something endemic to a medium," said Dermot McCormack, an MTV Networks executive who is the head of connected content for the Viacom Music and Logo group.Mr. McCormack pointed to MTV's own efforts with a digital event called the O Music Awards, which emphasizes stunts like a 24-hour drumming marathon performed by the rock musician Andrew W. K."We were afforded that luxury," Mr. McCormack said, "because we already have that great show called the VMAs that drives pop culture and creates moments."Bill Werde, the editorial director of Billboard, said that "there's always room for more good entertainment," whether on television or online, and that a viewership could be drawn to an awards show that rejoices in "the unexpected and the spontaneously weird.""There's a great hunger, by YouTube and other online platforms, for the sort of moments created by an awards show," Mr. Werde said. "People want to see a more honest slice of their favorite celebrities. The way to get closest to that is to take away some of the safety nets."Ms. Tiedt of YouTube declined to say how much the company was spending on the awards show. ("It certainly is not free," she said.)The success of the event, she added, would not be measured by its immediate viewership, but in weeks' worth of online views and comments and other signs that YouTube is becoming increasingly integral to music fans."We're looking for a long-term brand perception and a long-term belief," Ms. Tiedt said. "That doesn't need to happen in the moment."Mr. Jonze said his creative decisions were not influenced by corporate pronouncements but "more out of not wanting to be boring than any prerequired thing."Whatever the show turns out to be, he said, "It's so awesomely not broadcast television."Adding three words that seem to forgive so much, he said, "It's the Internet."
The mid-1990s had room for all sorts of unlikely rock stars. Indie rock and grunge had — how to put it politely? — wiped the glamour off the guys with guitars. Once those modes had been mainstreamed, the genre's stars could be just, you know, dudes. Resilient dudes at that. Two of the most dudely are in the midst of whodathunkit comebacks.As the frontman of Live, Ed Kowalczyk was the ur-emoter of the era, his innards pushing against his skin as he throatily sang about love. He has a new album, "The Flood and the Mercy" (Soul Whisper/Harbour/Caroline), and two catalog-spanning shows at Joe's Pub. Watch out for bulging blood vessels. (9:30 p.m. Wednesday and Thursday, 425 Lafayette Street, at Astor Place, East Village, joespub.com; $25.)On the calmer side is Glen Phillips, frontman for the gentlest band of that time, Toad the Wet Sprocket, which plays Bowery Ballroom to celebrate its first album in 16 years, "New Constellation" (Abe's), as winningly tepid as its best old material. It was financed with help from Kickstarter, no less — the dudes abide. (8 p.m., Wednesday, 6 Delancey Street, near the Bowery, Lower East Side; boweryballroom.com; $30. Sold out.)
When the D.J. duo Nervo, the Australian twins Olivia and Miriam Nervo , first began spinning three years ago, they used to shock people just by showing up."We would arrive at the airport, and someone would pick us up, and they would be like, 'You're Nervo?' " said Olivia, who goes by Liv.The promoters couldn't believe that the D.J.'s weren't men but young, attractive women.Nervo now perform regularly at major festivals and clubs, but the sisters are still the rare female breakout in electronic dance music. In a new reader-generated poll in DJ Magazine of the top 100 D.J.'s, Nervo is No. 16, one of only three female-led acts on the list. Last year, it was the only one.About five years after the latest wave of electronic dance music, or E.D.M., became big business in the United States, and 26 years after Anita Sarko was called "the Queen of the Discotheque Deejays" by The New York Times, the D.J. booth is still very much a male realm. Male headliners dominate superclubs like Hakkasan in Las Vegas and Pacha in New York. Only a handful of women appear at megafestivals like New York's recent Electric Zoo, which has booked about a dozen acts with women over its five-year history. There has yet to be a woman on Forbes magazine's list of the highest-paid D.J.'s. "Commercial E.D.M. is overwhelmingly bro-dominated," said the longtime dance music journalist and D.J. Philip Sherburne.Cassy Britton, better known as Cassy, a D.J. and producer from Vienna who played Oct. 26 at the Brooklyn club Output as part of her quarterly residency there, called the scene "a boy's club, in a sense.""No woman is in that top level," she said. "So, there is not one woman that makes a lot of money in D.J.-ing. Not one."The male and female D.J.'s, promoters and label executives interviewed cited a number of possible reasons for why there are no female Tiestos, including an industry predominantly run by men, a lack of female role models and mentors of either gender, and a grueling lifestyle that is disruptive to having a family. And, many said, even though readily available software has made making music easier to learn, women still aren't as prone to knob twiddling as their male counterparts.But in spite of the odds, the Nervo sisters and Ms. Britton are enjoying a rising profile, along with female D.J.'s like the London techno artist Nicole Moudaber, the British dark-house purveyor Maya Jane Coles, the German techno jock Tini and the Russian techno D.J. Nina Kraviz.In August, Ms. Britton, 39, put out a mix CD for a long-running series from Fabric, the respected London club. She is only the fourth woman with a Fabric mix, out of 72 editions in all. She studied classical guitar for seven years, has been spinning and producing since the late 1990s, and like top male D.J.'s, writes and produces her own records, sometimes collaborating with prominent techno artists like Steve Bug, the duo Swayzak and Ricardo Villalobos. Electric Indigo, another female D.J., was her mentor, even as Ms. Britton said she herself faced resistance from male peers."Most of the boys I was hanging out with, they were just getting stoned and being experts in all labels and releases, and they weren't really putting themselves out there," she said. "I was putting myself out there. I think that's what they hated — that I would get somewhere and they would know so much more about everything."She moved to Berlin in 2003 and became a resident at the Panorama Bar inside Berghain, the famed Berlin club. Her sound, a gritty, funk-infused hybrid of deep house and techno, plays well in big clubs as well as in more intimate venues. Ms. Britton is also currently a resident at Rex Club in Paris, and Trouw in Amsterdam, and has been playing at Fabric since 2005."She is an exceptional D.J., not just an exceptional 'female D.J.,' " Leo Belchetz, the label manager at Fabric Records, wrote in an email. "We have actually been trying to get Cassy onto the series for a couple of years. But each time there has been something that has got in the way — either an alternative release commitment or she was moving home. (She is infamously nomadic!)"Ms. Britton plays three or four gigs in different cities, sometimes in different countries, every week; in the weeks leading up to her October Output date, she was scheduled to spin in Paris, Boston, Munich and Amsterdam. This summer, she couldn't answer a basic query: Where is home?"Very good question," she said by phone from a hotel room in Florence, Italy. "I don't live anywhere anymore.""This job is an extremely bizarre job," she added. "I was married, I got a divorce, and I'm sure it all has to do with my job."
PORT CHESTER, N.Y. — Phil Lesh has logged countless miles on the road as the bassist of the Grateful Dead and, since the late 1990s, in various post-Dead ensembles. But at 73, he is looking for a change."I'm done with one-nighters," he said before a Phil Lesh and Friends show on Friday at the Capitol Theater here. "I've been on the road now for 46 years, and I've gotten go to a point where I'm jealous of all the time that I waste on buses and sitting around waiting to go on."Grayed and wiry, and still visibly in love with music, Mr. Lesh said he had been searching for a way to play regular concerts yet avoid the grinding tedium of the road. He has found it with an unusual deal to work exclusively with one promoter for 2014, putting on 45 shows in just a handful of venues.The plan — an indie-scale version of the megadeals that stars like Jay Z and Madonna have made with Live Nation Entertainment — will pair Mr. Lesh with Peter Shapiro, a big Grateful Dead fan who owns the Capitol and runs the Brooklyn Bowl, the combination bowling alley-rock club in Williamsburg that is setting up branches next year in Las Vegas and London.After a kickoff show in Williamsburg on Nov. 14, the series will start in earnest in early April with the first of at least 30 concerts through the year at the Capitol. A 1920s movie palace with room for about 2,000 people, the Capitol is hallowed by Grateful Dead fans for 18 shows the band played there in 1970 and 1971."Some venues are an active impediment to good shows, but some just feel like a collaborator in the magic," said Gary Lambert, a host on Sirius XM Radio's Grateful Dead channel. "For whatever reason, the Cap felt that way for the Dead."Mr. Shapiro, 41, reopened the theater a year ago and has spent well over $2 million to turn it into a Deadhead paradise, with clear sound and 10 high-definition projectors that make the walls a never-ending swirl of psychedelic lights.Aside from the Capitol shows, Mr. Lesh will play the Las Vegas outpost of the Brooklyn Bowl on April 20, as well as Mr. Shapiro's Lockn' festival in Arrington, Va., in September; the only shows he will play not connected with Mr. Shapiro are those at Mr. Lesh's own club, Terrapin Crossroads, in San Rafael, Calif.The arrangement gives Mr. Shapiro control of the ticket sales, merchandising and recorded music rights from the concerts, in exchange for guaranteed payments to Mr. Lesh. (Exact terms were not disclosed.) Some special fan offerings are in the works, like "bowling with Phil" V.I.P. packages and posters each night that add up in a comic-strip-like sequence.In his dressing room at the Capitol — where he kept a mattress on the floor, to rest up before shows during the four-night run — Mr. Lesh praised the work Mr. Shapiro has done renovating the theater and said the deal would give him the freedom to tinker with lineups and make each night interesting."I'm not retiring, and I'm not slowing down," Mr. Lesh said, sitting with his wife, Jill, who also acts as his manager. "I'm pretty sure I want to make music till I can't breathe anymore. I just want to do it within the most focused possible way. The future looks really exciting."Since the Capitol reopened last fall, Mr. Lesh has already played there 19 times, and for almost any other act, another 30 within a year would be overkill. On Friday night, however, the sold-out theater was a kaleidoscope of tie-dyed, ponytailed fans dancing their way through Grateful Dead classics like "Truckin' " and "Shakedown Street."Mr. Shapiro said he expected the exclusivity of the deal to bring out fans from every corner of the country."I understand the thinking of a Deadhead out there," he said. "I don't think they can get enough of it."
In the continuing sitcom that is popular music — and also in real life — Sting and Paul Simon once lived in the same building on the Upper West Side of Manhattan, they recalled in a recent telephone conversation."For 20 years, this guy would be borrowing things all the time," Sting said, in a tone of mocking complaint. "Then I heard he was a songwriter."Mr. Simon responded with similar facetiousness, "As soon as he got a chance, he moved up, hierarchically, into more elite buildings."Now these improbable former neighbors are about to become unlikely tour mates. On Tuesday, Sting and Mr. Simon are to announce that they will appear together on a North American tour, during which they will perform several of their best-known songs individually and as a duo. Eighteen dates are scheduled from Feb. 8 through March 16, with additional dates expected to be announced.The musicians said that they were as surprised as anyone to find themselves on the same bill."Paul and I both share this abiding curiosity about music and where it's going," Sting said. "We don't really know where this is going. We don't really have a clue how this is going to pan out."Audiences got an early taste of the potential collaboration when Mr. Simon and Sting appeared together in May at a benefit for the Robin Hood Foundation, where they performed acoustic versions of "The Boxer" and "Fields of Gold.""After we finished it," Mr. Simon said of that set, "we both looked at each other and said: 'Wow. That's pretty interesting.' "The two singer-songwriters will be backed up by their respective bands on the tour, for which presale tickets will go on sale on Wednesday at their websites, sting.com and paulsimon.com; general sales for most performances, including a March 4 appearance at Madison Square Garden in Manhattan, will begin next Tuesday.The tour has a simple title, "Paul Simon & Sting: On Stage Together," not a clever mash-up of their song or album titles. (Though when put on the spot, Mr. Simon suggested "The Sound of Every Breath," to which Sting responded: "That's it! You've got it.")The impetus for the tour, they said, was a spirit of musical exploration and not a music-industry executive who saw dollar signs by combining their fan bases."I don't have any of those guys in my life anymore," Mr. Simon said. "I'm not even sure I have a fan base anymore.""There you go," Mr. Simon said. "Then I'm your fan."
How many Nashville stalwarts does it take to keep Taylor Swift in country music? That's the question that was asked again and again at the 47th annual Country Music Association Awards on Wednesday night.Is it five, the number that performed her song "Red" with her, a group that included the genre consciences Alison Krauss and Vince Gill as well as the highly regarded mandolinist Sam Bush? Is it eight, the number of genre superstars — Tim McGraw, Faith Hill, Keith Urban, George Strait, Brad Paisley, the members of Rascal Flatts — who assembled onstage to bestow upon Ms. Swift the Pinnacle Award, a prize that had only been given once before, to Garth Brooks? Or is it 6,000, the approximate number of voting members of the Country Music Association, who perhaps collectively understand that, without awards like this, Ms. Swift may leave them all behind for good?Remember when the sugar-sweet Ms. Swift was the biggest threat at country music's doorstep? That was just a few years ago, when the notion that a teenage blond female star could remake the genre was perceived as both a delusion and an affront. Now it's a fait accompli, and the only way for country music to respond to her — and for her to engage with country music, a dance partner she now only sometimes favors — is to fete her endlessly, to let her be serious in addition to frilly, to weave her even more tightly into the fabric of Nashville.And so, even though apart from the Pinnacle, Ms. Swift didn't win any major awards at this show — she shared in two smaller ones — the night was still built around her. She is country music's cash cow, its creative engine, its ambassador to the wider world. And besides, there are more insidious incursions to address.Most of the rest of this show, which was broadcast live on ABC from the Bridgestone Arena in Nashville, showed a genre in the act of sorting out where it stands in the broader pop economy. It featured its established frat wing, which has become a home for tepid hip-hop hybridization, as seen in the show-opening medley of Luke Bryan's "That's My Kind of Night" and Florida Georgia Line's "Cruise." Florida Georgia Line, an odorless, flavorless duo, won two awards, vocal duo of the year and single of the year.Serving as an implicit reply to this lightweight movement was Eric Church, who debuted an aggrieved new song, "The Outsiders," and who only moves closer to country's center the more he complains about it. The genial roots outfit Zac Brown Band tested out a restless, muscled new song, "Day for the Dead." Even Mr. Bryan tried to distance himself from the cotton candy of his own making with an invested performance, aided by the rising singer Chris Stapleton, of "Drink a Beer," an anthem about loss.During this show, in which performances outpaced awards by about two to one, that was one of a handful of affecting moments. There was also the celebration of George Jones, who died in April, by Alan Jackson and Mr. Strait, two of Nashville's reigning elders and two of its most mannered personalities, who sang an uncommonly naked version of "He Stopped Loving Her Today." Kenny Rogers received a warm tribute from Rascal Flatts, Jennifer Nettles and Darius Rucker. And song of the year was won by the deeply moving "I Drive Your Truck," sung by Lee Brice and written by Jessi Alexander, Connie Harrington and Jimmy Yeary.The married couple Blake Shelton and Miranda Lambert continued their dominance in the male and female vocalist of the year categories, each winning for the fourth year straight. (Mr. Shelton also won album of the year.) Mr. Strait won entertainer of the year, the night's top award, though it felt like a charitable gift for an artist staring down his twilight. Among the performances, there was elegant power country from Mr. Paisley, the Band Perry and the duo of Ms. Lambert and Mr. Urban. And Carrie Underwood sang a characteristically electric and overwhelming medley. On the sleepy side were Mr. McGraw, Lady Antebellum, Hunter Hayes with Jason Mraz, and Little Big Town, which won vocal group of the year.The show was hosted as usual by Mr. Paisley and Ms. Underwood, whose opening comedy routine, with its musical numbers about country-star squabbles and Obamacare, was far more charming than most award-show banter. They also directed a few cheap shots at Miley Cyrus, who is continuing her reign as 2013's most razz-able celebrity. But don't forget that in this crowd, Ms. Cyrus isn't just a scourge, she's also a prodigal daughter. Had she played her cards differently, she could have been Ms. Swift.For now, at least, Ms. Cyrus is a contagion, and Nashville loves to attack en masse. But it has limited powers. It never neutralized Ms. Swift, who had six nominations, the most of the night and the same number as the rookie Kacey Musgraves, whose songs about the beauty of tolerance and the hypocrisy of intolerance have given country music a ripple of progressivism this year.It was a tough night for Ms. Musgraves. During her performance of "Follow Your Arrow," her lyric about rolling a joint was bleeped out. And she lost in five categories; the cameras caught her with a deeply dissatisfied look as Ms. Lambert accepted the award for best female vocalist. But she did win new artist of the year, and maybe that's not such an inauspicious start. Back in 2007, when that prize was called the Horizon Award, it was taken home by Ms. Swift.
Though she is beloved of connoisseurs and critics, the Italian soprano Anna Caterina Antonacci remains little known among a broader New York public. It's not for lack of talent, since she is an artist of singular gifts and refined temperament. But her local performances have been limited to just two concerts: one in February 1999, the other in April 2012. Unconventional and intense, Ms. Antonacci has become a specialist in the intimate affair, comfortable and potent in the early-music repertory.
After the Curtain: What happens to the characters in Mozart's popular "Così Fan Tutte" when the curtain goes down? The love stories in the opera end so inconclusively that questions remain even for the cast.Most opera fans are intensely involved with the characters of great operas. We are protective of them, even the evil ones.There is a lively realm of fan fiction focused on movie and television characters, in which viewers share ideas on how some breakup or betrayal might turn out. Opera fans, by contrast, are fixated on characters who have been around for generations, even centuries. The plots of favorite operas have long been cemented in our minds.Yet we, too, like to speculate on what happens after the final curtain falls. Several recent books grapple with Puccini's "Madama Butterfly," imagining what happens to the 3-year-old boy, nicknamed Trouble, born to the caddish Lieutenant Pinkerton and Cio-Cio San, the geisha who commits suicide. Online, opera lovers are pretty playful about their fantasies of what might happen in favorite works, especially Wagner's epic "Ring." One wag envisions a fifth installment to the cycle in which the Rhinemaidens, fed up after years of devotion and celibacy, open a classy brothel where clients must pay for services in gold.So, like many opera fans, I have long had strong feelings about what happens to certain characters when the curtain goes down.Take "Rigoletto," which on Monday returns to the Met in Michael Mayer's production, introduced last season. The staging zaps the story from 16th-century Mantua to the Las Vegas Strip during the early '60s. The tenor Matthew Polenzani, a house favorite, will sing his first Duke at the Met.In the last moments of the opera as traditionally staged, Rigoletto, a hunchbacked jester, hears the lecherous Duke of Mantua singing in the distance. Rigoletto realizes that the body in the sack he is dragging to the river cannot be the Duke, whose assassination he ordered to avenge his daughter's honor. To his horror, it is his daughter, Gilda, who, in the throes of passion and shame, has sacrificed herself for the Duke.But what happens after the opera ends? Will Rigoletto try again to have the Duke killed? Or kill himself?Will the Duke continue his life of entitlement and debauchery, seducing any woman who intrigues him?"The Duke is a letch without honor and integrity," Mr. Polenzani said in an interview, when asked to imagine what comes next for his character. "He lives solely to satisfy whatever desire he has. When Gilda dies at the end, is he sad? No. 1, I'm not even certain he would know she is dead. It was a conquest."If he got with her again, he said, it would be just because he was feeling randy and she was there.Now, that is one tough assessment. Mr. Polenzani, of course, can claim insights into the Duke that trump mine. Still, I disagree.Maybe I'm a softy, but I think the Duke will find out what Gilda did and be shaken by it. He will probably go on womanizing. But future conquests will feel increasingly empty. Gilda will weigh on him. I take my clues from Verdi's music. To me, it seems impossible that the man who, pretending to be a student, romances Gilda in such tender phrases is faking it just to have sex.Another opera I've been pondering since it returned to the Met this fall is Mozart's "Così Fan Tutte," the third and last opera he wrote with the librettist Lorenzo da Ponte. The ending of "Così" is intentionally ambiguous.To recap the story: A cynical old bachelor, Don Alfonso, tired of hearing his young officer friends Ferrando and Guglielmo boasting about the faithfulness of their fiancées, challenges them to a wager. The young men will tell their girlfriends that they have been ordered to war and then reappear in exotic disguises to try to seduce each other's beloveds.Alas, they succeed; Alfonso is proved right. The men are indignant; the women guilt-ridden. But Alfonso urges the two couples to accept human nature and get married anyway. The libretto, however, leaves the pairing of partners uncertain. Do the original couples reunite? Or will the women now stay with the men who won them so easily?These questions were raised with the cast members who recently finished four performances of "Così" in the Met's revival of Lesley Koenig's production, conducted triumphantly by James Levine in his return to the pit after more than two years away because of health problems. This cast reassembles in April, again with Mr. Levine, for more performances.In this production, Mr. Polenzani sings Ferrando and the baritone Rodion Pogossov is his friend Guglielmo. The soprano Susanna Phillips is Fiordiligi, who, when the opera begins, is engaged to Guglielmo; the mezzo-soprano Isabel Leonard sings Dorabella, Fiordiligi's sister, who has promised herself to Ferrando.
Lady Gaga the relentless is back in full force on "Artpop" (Streamline/Interscope), her third full-length studio album of new songs. It took hip surgery, for injuries that she had aggravated onstage, to knock her off her tour and sideline her from media exposure for a few months earlier this year. But in summer the next push began with a single, "Applause," that simultaneously reaffirmed her need for the love of her audience and announced her new pivot to align herself with the (visual) art world, singing, "Pop culture was in art, now art's in pop culture, in me."My misgivings started then. Wasn't she an artist already?Lady Gaga, born Stefani Germanotta, has certainly worked like one, mingling the generalized and the personal, the accessible and the inexplicable, the attention-getting and the head-scratching, the market-savvy and the strange. As strong as her commercial imperatives were, they only emboldened her nutty streak. When she emerged, Lady Gaga didn't separate pop culture and art. Like the best pop stars, she made the mass media her gallery space.Her multimillion-selling singles, like "Bad Romance" and "Paparazzi," joined catchy choruses to verses that probed obsessions and contradictions, showing where desire, ambition, self-realization and self-destruction could converge. Atop her music, in video clips and public appearances, she piled on a nonstop, nearly superhuman fashion show and a public image that expanded to embrace misfit, outcast, unappreciated and sexually nonconformist "little monsters," as she named her fans.But "Artpop" positions her in a more rarefied zone: with the kind of performance and gallery artists more likely to be seen at the Brooklyn Academy of Music than at an arena concert.Of course musicians are artists, creating impractical works out of intuition, compulsion and craft. And of course there are affinities among all the arts. Musicians and visual artists exploring in tandem found the synergies of Stravinsky and Diaghilev, the Velvet Underground and Andy Warhol, Black Flag and Ray Pettibon; art colleges have incubated maverick musicians like John Lennon, David Bowie, M.I.A. and the members of Roxy Music, Talking Heads and Sonic Youth. But those were contemporaries working with street-level contemporaries, at least at the beginning. Pop's newer fine-art infatuation has more to do with stars meeting stars and luxury brands doing co-promotions.The cover of "Artpop" is a sculpture of a blond Lady Gaga cupping her breasts and holding a big shiny blue sphere between her legs. It's by the pop artist Jeff Koons, who is renowned for his blown-up renditions of ephemeral and banal objects like the steel "Balloon Dog (Orange)" that Christie's expects to sell on Tuesday — a day after the planned release of "Artpop" — for $35 million to $55 million. It's a portrait of a pop star by an art star — but it's stiff and detached.Lady Gaga has also announced collaborations with avant-garde elders like the theater artist Robert Wilson and the performance artist Marina Abramovic, who has lately also turned up alongside Jay-Z. On her Facebook page, Lady Gaga wrote that "Artpop" would be released with an app that she described as "a musical and visual engineering system that combines music, art, fashion and technology with a new interactive worldwide community — 'the auras.' " She went on, "Altering the human experience with social media, we bring art culture into pop in a reverse Warholian expedition."The music on "Artpop" isn't as convoluted. "My artpop could mean anything," Lady Gaga sings in the title song, and most of the time, it means putting the four-on-the-floor thrust of mainstream club music behind the kind of big pop hooks that made her a superstar.Lady Gaga conquered the world with "The Fame," her 2008 album of rocked-up dance tunes, and its EP sequel, "The Fame Monster," in 2009. Then her 2011 "Born This Way" made its predecessors sound temperate. In songs that juggled Christian imagery and pagan rocker, Lady Gaga piled on vocal bluster and musical excesses remembered from decades past. Sales of "Born This Way" didn't match those of her debut album — in part because its songs didn't dovetail as well with radio formats — but they still added up to millions worldwide.Now with "Artpop," Lady Gaga turns oddly defensive, reacting to her endless media brouhaha instead of leading it. She advertised "Applause" with a pre-emptive, heavy-handedly ironic video clip called "Lady Gaga Is Over." In the title song of "Artpop," she dismisses the notion of a commercial downturn, singing, "I tried to sell myself but I am really laughing/Because I just love the music not the bling." She reiterates the sentiment in "Jewels & Drugs," a misfired attempt at hip-hop, insisting, "Don't want your money, want your love." And the lyrics of her current single, "Do What U Want," with its chorus "Do what you want with my body," are directed not to a lover but to media coverage printing things "that makes me want to scream"; "my body" is her image, separate from her mind or heart. R. Kelly joins her to sympathize about the "crazy schedule, fast life" of a fellow star before he offers his come-on.The album teases with promises of candor. Its opener, "Aura," pauses its thumping beat as Lady Gaga croons, "Do you want to see the girl who lives behind the aura?" (The lyrics also, unwisely, play with the metaphor of a burqa.) Elsewhere, songs touch repeatedly on thoughts of addiction: to intoxicants, to attention, to lust, to love. "Dope" is an Elton John-style piano ballad that works up to wrenching, belting melodrama as she sings about trying to give up bad habits because "I need you more than dope." She and her co-producer, Rick Rubin, apparently didn't apply pitch correction to the vocal, lending some intimacy to the stadium-sized emotions; "you" might be a lover, or her audience.But for most of the album, the music is a fortress — more elaborate than "Born This Way" and decidedly less retro, pumping so insistently it sometimes forgets to breathe. Lady Gaga's main songwriting collaborator is DJ White Shadow (Paul Blair), whose productions often top booming drum tracks with rock guitars. She also enlisted Zedd (Anton Zaslavski), a German electronic dance music producer who had his own million-selling single with "Clarity" in 2012; in his tracks, thumping beats and buzzing, abrasive bass lines drive the verses to gleaming, club-anthem choruses.There are still some sparks of eccentricity. "Venus," a mutating, episodic dance-floor track produced by Lady Gaga herself, starts with a quotation from Sun Ra (who shares songwriting credit) before the singer presents herself as the goddess of love in the "seashell bikini" painted by Botticelli.But for much of the album, "Artpop" also seems to be working off a checklist that Lady Gaga chants in "Aura": "tech dance sex art pop." For gender-blurring sexuality, there's "G.U.Y." (which stands for "girl under you"), "Manicure" and "Sexxx Dreams," which fantasizes — to echoes of 1980s Janet Jackson — about getting "nasty" and "trashy" with someone whose boyfriend is out of town. For pop, there's a booming, cheerless, cheerleader-chant song, "Mary Jane Holland," that's nearly a single entendre about marijuana.Not on the checklist, but definitely on the agenda for trademark reinforcement, are songs about clothes. Lady Gaga's shallowest thoughts to date about style are in "Donatella"— an oddly backhanded tribute to her friend Donatella Versace, delivered in a nasal comic sneer — and "Fashion!," produced by Will.i.am and David Guetta to mimic David Bowie's "Let's Dance" while Lady Gaga sings, "Looking good and feeling fine," sounding like a jingle.What's missing from too much of "Artpop" is Lady Gaga's old conviction that pop, in its 21st-century configuration as music plus video plus social media plus celebrity, could tell every story she wanted to tell, all at once, trashy and transcendent. Her stage spectaculars have already built arty superstructures on her songs: sexy, disruptive, funny, unsettling ones. Validation from the fine-arts world — a much more elitist, insular place than pop's mass market — shouldn't matter anywhere nearly as much as stirring the passions of the little monsters.
SEATTLE — The day in May 2012 that Mary Lambert received the phone call inviting her to collaborate with the hip-hop duo Macklemore & Ryan Lewis, she popped a bottle of Champagne with a saber, kissed the picture of President Obama in her house here, and set to work.Six months earlier, she'd given herself two years to focus on her music career before going to graduate school to become a teacher. Until then, she'd been singing coffeehouse folk pop and had also found success as a spoken-word poet tackling deeply personal subject matter.Macklemore & Ryan Lewis found Ms. Lambert through common Seattle friends and asked her to contribute to  "Same Love," a hip-hop anthem about gay rights and marriage equality. For Ms. Lambert, who is gay, it represented an opportunity to bring all her worlds together: "The very pragmatic part of the song was there, but I wanted to provide a context of love and heart — that's sort of my thing."She said this in an interview at the Avast! Recording Company, the studio here where she was working on arrangements for "Bloom," the song that she hopes will move her beyond the long shadow cast by "Same Love," which went to No. 11 on the Billboard Hot 100 last summer, catapulting Ms. Lambert, who is 24, far beyond local renown.She has sung the song on tour with Macklemore & Ryan Lewis, as she will Wednesday through Friday at the Theater at Madison Square Garden. She has sung it on the MTV Video Music Awards, ending in a climactic, vivid face-off with Jennifer Hudson. Sometimes, when she hears it on the radio, she changes the station, "which I never thought I would do," she said with a gasp.And she used the chorus of "Same Love" as the foundation for "She Keeps Me Warm," her own single, which has sold tens of thousands of copies of its own, even though she made it reluctantly. "I didn't want to make the song, but I knew there was a need for it," said Ms. Lambert, who disarms with directness and genuine good cheer.The tender "She Keeps Me Warm" takes the conceit of "Same Love" and reclaims it for Ms. Lambert. Implicitly, it also moves the conversation about gay rights out of the mouth of a straight artist. Ms. Lambert, though, is sensitive about the criticisms of "Same Love": that Macklemore was, in essence, straight-splaining, hogging the platform to talk about oppression through the lens of, and by virtue of, his own privilege."I heard the track go through some changes — where he was originally going to do this from a 13-year-old gay boy's perspective, to edit himself and say 'No, no, this is not the way to do it,' " she said. "He's so aware of his privilege."It didn't help, though, that when she went onstage with the duo to accept the prize at the Video Music Awards for best video with a social message, Ms. Lambert didn't speak. "A part of me kind of retreated," she acknowledged.But otherwise, her learning curve has been steep, her confidence ascendant. She originally didn't receive any songwriting royalties for "Same Love," but her contract was amended after the initial success of the song. She recently split with her girlfriend of three years, a difficult choice, but one that reflected her newfound maturity, allowing her to move beyond old "codependent" ways of being. "I've never been so independent in my life," she said.She grew up poor in Everett, Wash., was given a diagnosis of bipolar disorder, and went through a period of drug and alcohol abuse, a time, she said, when she was struggling to come to terms with a series of traumas, including a gang rape at 17, and a pattern of molestation by her father when she was a small child.She now deals directly with these things through her art, especially her poetry, some of which she collected in a recent chapbook, "500 tips for fat girls," full of severe and humane poems.She also uses her poetry during her live shows, to devastating effect. "I want to create a safe space for people to feel like they can access these things that they don't usually access, which is a lot to ask for at a show," Ms. Lambert says, describing her concerts as places of "mutual health and nourishment."
The machine is coming back to the Metropolitan Opera, which plans to mount a revival of Robert Lepage's high-tech, polarizing and glitch-prone "Ring" cycle in the 2018-19 season to showcase its next Brünnhilde: the soprano Christine Goerke. She was offered the role after her breakout success last week in Strauss's fairy tale opera "Die Frau Ohne Schatten."Peter Gelb, the Met's general manager, said he decided to cast Ms. Goerke as Brünnhilde after hearing her sing the role of the Dyer's Wife on Thursday in "Frau": a portrayal that was greeted with what he called "one of the great ovations I have heard in recent years at the Met" and that won lavish praise from several leading critics."After she sang in 'Frau' the other night, it just made me realize that we'd better invite her sooner rather than later," Mr. Gelb said in an interview. "Because I don't want anybody else stealing her from us."Ms. Goerke's portrayal of the Dyer's Wife — which she will repeat several times this month — was hailed as a "breakthrough night" by Anthony Tommasini of The New York Times. Alex Ross, a critic for The New Yorker, wrote on his blog that "she proved herself the most potent dramatic soprano to appear at the Met since — well, let's not jinx her by naming names." The Met's orchestra posted a note of congratulations about the huge ovation to Ms. Goerke on Twitter — where her handle is @HeldenMommy — writing, "That was a ROAR."Mr. Gelb's announcement dispelled any lingering doubts about whether the Met would bring back Mr. Lepage's $16 million "Ring," which featured dazzling projections, stunt doubles and what came to be known as "the machine": a 90,000-pound set of 24 long planks that rotated around an axis and had a stubborn habit of creaking and, at times, of malfunctioning.It was a polarizing production, so vast in scale that its ups and downs were chronicled in a documentary, "Wagner's Dream." Critics gave it decidedly mixed reviews. Mr. Tommasini called it "frustrating," praising breathtaking moments but warning that many of the effects were not worth the distractions they created. Mr. Ross called it "the most witless and wasteful production in modern operatic history."But Mr. Gelb said that while the production was disliked by some critics, he believed that large segments of the public enjoyed it immensely. And he said that the production would be fine-tuned, and possibly re-engineered, "to make sure it is functioning in tiptop shape when it returns, hopefully this time with its mechanism a little quieter than before."Ms. Goerke (pronounced GERK-eh) is scheduled to sing Brünnhilde in Houston and in at least one other house before bringing the role to the Met. The Met plans to cast her in several major parts in the coming seasons, Mr. Gelb said, including the title roles in Puccini's "Turandot" and Strauss's "Elektra" and the role of Ortrud in Wagner's "Lohengrin," for which they plan to revive the stylized Robert Wilson production."We're really looking at her as kind of the go-to dramatic soprano for these big Strauss-Wagnerian roles," Mr. Gelb said.Although the deal to cast Ms. Goerke as Brünnhilde was essentially made on Friday — after Sarah Billinghurst, the Met's assistant manager for artistic affairs, called Ms. Goerke's manager — she did not learn of it until Monday, when she received the news at the Metropolitan Opera Guild's luncheon celebrating James Levine's return to the Met."I am overjoyed," Ms. Goerke, 44, said in a brief interview, just minutes after she had heard that she had been asked. "I said: 'Oh, that's interesting — please tell him yes! And thank you so much!' "For Ms. Goerke, the chance to sing one of the most celebrated — and challenging — dramatic soprano roles will be a milestone. She was part of the Met's Lindemann Young Artist Development Program in the 1990s, won the Richard Tucker Award in 2001, and initially made a name for herself singing Handel and Mozart. After having some vocal problems a decade ago, which she spoke about in an interview with Opera News, she worked on a new technique and emerged as a major dramatic soprano.The first time she sang Wagner, she said, it was as the Third Norn in "Götterdämmerung," conducted by Mr. Levine, weaving the rope of destiny until it breaks at the beginning of the opera."You know, we busted our rope and skulked offstage, but in fact, while the other two were in their dressing rooms, I was just standing on the side of the stage, listening to the Prologue, just thinking, 'Some day, some day, some day,' " she recalled. "And holy moly, some day is here."Mr. Levine praised Ms. Goerke at the Opera Guild lunch, where she sang "O don fatale" from Verdi's "Don Carlo," filling in at the last moment for Dolora Zajick, who was indisposed."Did you hear that first performance of 'Frau' the other night?" he asked, during his remarks. "If you didn't, run, do not walk, to hear one, at least one." He said that her emergence as a dramatic soprano "just thrills me to bits."But she did not seem to have many prima donna airs. When some gusts of air-conditioning sent sheets of music in disarray as Craig Rutenberg, the Met's director of music administration, accompanied the bass-baritone Eric Owens on the piano, Ms. Goerke jumped onto the stage. With no fuss, she served as Mr. Rutenberg's page turner.
Embracing a landscape where cross-genre collaboration is the rule, the contemporary chamber music series Ear Heart Music continues its season at Roulette on Monday with the Brooklyn dance company Skybetter & Associates, joined by the new Ear Heart Music Ensemble in works set to music by Johann Johannsson, Henryk Gorecki and David Lang. (8 p.m., 509 Atlantic Avenue, near Third Avenue, Boerum Hill, Brooklyn, roulette.org , 917-267-0363.)Mr. Lang, who holds this season's Debs Composer's Chair at Carnegie Hall, begins his residency with two concerts at Zankel Hall. The first, on Wednesday, features rising ensembles in new works by Carlos Iturralde, Mary Kouyoumdjian, Robert Honstein and Nicholas Deyoe. (The performance caps a six-day workshop in which Mr. Lang will be a mentor to the ensembles and composers.) On Saturday, So Percussion will play Mr. Lang's "the so-called laws of nature" on a program with works by the electronic-music duo Matmos ("so-called remix," based on Mr. Lang) and the composer and guitarist Bryce Dessner. (7:30 p.m. Wednesday and 9 p.m. Saturday, carnegiehall.org, 212-247-7800.)
A reading from the Gospel according to John: "In the world ye shall have tribulation: but be of good cheer; I have overcome the world." It wouldn't be a stretch to see somebody hawking that verse on a T-shirt outside Kanye West's irreverent "Yeezus" tour, which stops in New York this week.Befitting the album for which it's named — "Yeezus" (Roc-A-Fella/Def Jam), a rawboned and deliriously profane affair — the tour frames Mr. West in torment and in triumph, with messianic fervor. Its stagecraft has included a costumed Jesus figure, along with Mr. West in crucifixion pose, bathed in a heavenly shaft of light.The tour itself has endured earthly trials: Part of the set was damaged, resulting in cancellations and postponements. This week's shows are among the first since it resumed, and Mr. West may derive special satisfaction from a track called "Send It Up," one line in particular: "Yeezus just rose again." (8 p.m. Tuesday and Wednesday, Barclays Center, 620 Atlantic Avenue, Brooklyn, 800-745-3000, barclayscenter.com; 8 p.m. Saturday and Nov. 24, Madison Square Garden, 800-745-3000, ticketmaster.com.)
BUZZSAWS were buzzing, hammers were hammering, and a sea of empty display racks awaited their wares one morning this week in a cavernous storefront in Williamsburg, Brooklyn. It was a typical scene of retail construction in every way except for what was coming: a record store.When it opens on Monday, Rough Trade NYC — a branch of the London shop that has been an independent tastemaker since 1976 — will be the biggest record store in New York City, an ambitious bet on CDs and vinyl at a time when thousands of other music retailers have closed, and the music industry over all looks to a largely digital future."We feel we've got a model that works," said Stephen Godfroy, a co-owner of the store. "This is a place where you will actually want to spend time."Rough Trade NYC, on a not-quite-postindustrial block of North Ninth Street, near the East River, is the kind of place that most music fans had given up hope for in New York: an airy 15,000-square-foot temple to record retail, with a coffee counter and a 300-person-capacity performance space with a bar that will present concerts almost daily.In the planning for four years, Rough Trade NYC has the enthusiastic support of record labels, which see vibrant independent shops like it — including the hangar-size Amoeba Music in California and the small but influential Other Music in the East Village — as not only sales outlets but also social spots that counter the perception that the record industry is dying."We're a little jealous of Amoeba," said Daniel Glass of Glassnote Records, an ear-to-the-ground music executive in New York since the 1970s. "This is going to be a terrific moment for music. It reminds me of when Tower opened up at Fourth and Broadway."Like almost everything in the music business, the role of record stores has shifted in the last decade. Once a retail staple, with anchor chains in malls and mom-and-pops around every college campus, record shops have been decimated in most areas. Tower closed its 89 American outlets in 2006; Virgin shut down its last Megastore in North America in 2009; and, in Britain this year, the once-mighty HMV chain shuttered dozens of stores while in receivership.Meanwhile, shops like Rough Trade have quietly thrived, helped by a resurgence of vinyl sales and by cultivating an anticorporate, fan-centered attitude. Record Store Day, held each April since 2008, has also focused promotional efforts through one-day-only record releases. (Record Store Day's satellite event, Back to Black Friday, will be held next Friday.)"If you create an atmosphere that is conducive to spending time, then people will buy a record, whether it's on their first visit, or maybe second or third," Mr. Godfroy said.But surviving in the current market is not as easy as stocking collectible products and adding a cafe. Almighty Music Marketing, a company that maintains a retail database, says that more than 300 music shops have opened since 2009. Yet, in New York, another batch has gone to the vinyl graveyard over the last year or two, among them Bleecker Bob's, Rockit Scientist, Tropicalia in Furs, Gimme Gimme and Big City. Still, Williamsburg and Greenpoint are dotted with stores, including Academy Record Annex, Permanent Records and Record Grouch.Mike Dreese, a founder of Newbury Comics, a chain of nearly 30 music and pop-culture shops in New England, praised Rough Trade as "the real deal" and credited the original London store with supplying punk records that helped him establish his own business in the late 1970s. But he noted the risks of a venture on the scale of Rough Trade NYC."I believe they will have a rip-roaring success for a year or two," Mr. Dreese said, "but the real question is three or four years out, what happens to this market."Rough Trade opened its first shop just as London's punk scene was exploding, and the tiny store developed a rare authority to define cool by being picky about what it stocked. Its founder, Geoff Travis, soon started a record label by the same name, and the two businesses split in 1982. The shop's fortunes have fluctuated over the years, but it has flourished since 2007 with the opening of Rough Trade East, a 5,500-square-foot branch in London's East End that has a coffee bar and a stage for in-store performances. Since then, Mr. Godfroy said, Rough Trade has had double-digit sales growth each year.To make what Mr. Godfroy calls a "destination-store experience," Rough Trade NYC has gone with an industrial-chic design, its interior walls lined with the metal from 16 old shipping containers, and murals of fashionable album covers (Arcade Fire, the Velvet Underground) hand-painted over exposed brick. Concerts will take place in a spacious separate room in back, some of them free (or free with a purchase), and others booked and sold by the powerhouse local promoter the Bowery Presents.The store also includes what it calls simply "the room," a combination promotional zone and rotating art installation. For the first undertaking in the space, Glassnote will use 3-D projectors to recreate the bedroom of the rapper Childish Gambino (who is also the actor Donald Glover, a star of the NBC show "Community"), in a design that Mr. Glass likened to the almost uncomfortably intimate work of the British artist Tracey Emin.Touches like these can give brick-and-mortar stores an identity in a market that has become dominated by the Internet, said Martin Mills, chairman of the independent record company Beggars Group."As more and more business moves online and also to the malls," Mr. Mills wrote in an email, "there is an increasing countervailing human demand for community, for localness, for tangible beauty, for specialist knowledge, for range, for retail experiences that are not price-dependent but make you feel good."Rough Trade NYC is majority-owned by the British store, whose investors also include Beggars through its XL label. (Making things even more confusing, the Rough Trade label — still separate from the stores — is half-owned by Beggars.)Mr. Godfroy declined to reveal the construction costs of Rough Trade NYC, but he did share some of the "hugely frustrating" experience of settling on the location and dealing with the complications of New York building permits. Rough Trade had originally hoped to open the store two years ago, he said.If it is successful, though, Mr. Godfroy said that he hopes the Brooklyn store can be "an epicenter of change.""There is a way to retail music in a way that's popular, viable, profitable and exciting," he said. "It's not rocket science, it really isn't. You're selling something that people love. You just have to do it in a way that's faithful to the art and to the public."Time will tell whether that way includes coffee and concerts.The next two weeks are big ones for New York record lovers. Besides the opening of Rough Trade NYC on Monday, WFMU's annual record fair is returning after a one-year absence, and Back to Black Friday, one of the two Record Store Day events of the year, is coming next Friday.The Fair Outside of eBay, your best bet for finding that $60 tropicália LP or limited edition Iron Maiden picture-disc is WFMU's Record Fair, which benefits that famously eclectic, noncommercial radio station based in Jersey City. The fair, which has dozens of dealers as well as live performances and film screenings, was canceled last year in the wake of Hurricane Sandy but makes its return this weekend to the Metropolitan Pavilion, 125 West 18th Street, in Chelsea. For more information: wfmu.org/recfair.The Shops Record Store Day has been supporting independent shops each April since 2008 with one-day-only records that lead to lines around the block at some stores. It has since expanded to include an event the day after Thanksgiving. This year will feature special releases by Bob Dylan, Elvis Costello and the Roots, Nirvana, Queens of the Stone Age and Nick Lowe. More information, including a list of participating stores, is at recordstoreday.com. Rough Trade NYC will carry some Back to Black Friday releases, but Stephen Godfroy, one of the owners of the shop, said, "The main thing for us is that we're just glad to be open."
CHANCE OF RAIN Few electronic musicians are pivoting as hard or as frequently as Laurel Halo. In early shows, this classically trained musician was almost a shadow, her music and her presence fully obscure. But while there are vestiges of that self on her often spectacular new album, "Chance of Rain" (Hyperdub), especially on the brief piano pieces that serve as bookends, it is otherwise a huge leap away from her hermetic and distant early EPs and also from her 2012 debut album, "Quarantine," which showcased her woozy, odd-angled singing. For the first time, her productions are immediate and forceful, like on the utterly insistent "Thrax," full of wobbly bass; the pulverizing "Oneiroi"; the hymnlike industrial noise of "Melt"; and most striking, "Ainnome," which has the throb of late 1990s house and techno — and also its sweat.SHE'S GONE For years, Ali Koehler has been a journeywoman drummer for bands — Vivian Girls, Best Coast — which don't ask much of the job. It's a good recipe for anonymity, or a feeling of alienation from one's work. But Ms. Koehler has been storing her feelings up. This much is clear from "She's Gone" (Don Giovanni), the debut album from Upset, the new band in which she leaves the drums behind and steps out in front. On this bright, economical and often biting album, she's an adept singer, and an even more adept lyricist. Her cheery tone belies the fact that she's painting herself as an aggrieved outsider on these songs, which channel snotty mid-1980s rock and early 2000s pop-punk. (Patty Schemel, late of Hole, does the drumming.) Mostly, Ms. Koehler is singing about bitter rivalries and resentments, taking on the role of someone long unjustly minimized, saying all the things she hasn't ever been given the chance to.FEEL GOOD There's unlikely to be a lusher, more soothing R&B release this year than "Feel Good" (Odd Future), the second album by the Internet, the partnership of Syd the Kyd and Matt Martians. It's pure exhale, this album, which is far closer in spirit to Erykah Badu's psychedelic phase and the neo-soul of the late 1990s, but with more lust, than to almost anything of the current moment. Syd has matured into a sultry, striking singer, as heard on "Shadow Dance," where her voice oozes out slowly and sweetly. Produced by the band along with Chad Hugo of the Neptunes and Mike Einziger, the music is aquatic slo-mo funk full of keyboards that sparkle and drums that hit crisply. The guest singers Yuna and Jesse Boykins III ease into the mood well, but this is Syd's party, dreamlike and breathy.SOUTH MEMPHIS KINGPIN From Memphis, Young Dolph is a gloriously declarative rapper, straightforward in his rhymes, which sometimes boast but mostly just state facts, with a rubbery, blurry flow. On the entertaining "South Memphis Kingpin" (available at youngdolph.com), the latest in a slew of strong mixtapes, he's a Lothario and a hustler, usually at the same time, with a hint of a self-aware sense of humor. On "At tha House," he makes it clear he gets it from his parents: "My mama just caught me tipsy/Said she brought me in and she'll take me out." This release arrives at a good moment for Memphis — see also Yo Gotti's long-delayed "I Am" (Epic), and also the work of Lil Lody and Zed Zilla. And Young Dolph is mindful of his city's history. One of this mixtape's highlights is "So Good," sort of a love song, which comes with a frazzled beat by the hometown hero DJ Squeeky."Shawty, let's go another round," Ian Isiah sings on "The Love Champion," the title track of his new EP (available at soundcloud.com/ianisiah). And he means it. He sings the line over and over, as if swept up in sexual reverie, as if it might never end. Repetition and endlessness is a recurring theme on these sensual songs, full of R. Kelly-esque raunch, heavily preoccupied with the body and what can be done with and to it. Mr. Isiah uses heavy AutoTune on his vocals, and his songs mine late-2000s R&B — especially the excellent "Sweat," produced by Brenmar — with light shades of dancehall in the delivery. Mr. Isiah's directness is refreshing. He sings as if he were totally unable to stop himself, and without a good reason to.
Darkness delivered sweetly: That's what drew together the improbable partnership of gentle-voiced Norah Jones and pop-punk arena rocker Billie Joe Armstrong, who leads Green Day . They decided to remake, of all things, an entire album from 1958: the Everly Brothers' "Songs Our Daddy Taught Us" (Cadence).The Everlys' original is a contender for the most morbid album of the early rock 'n' roll era. It arrived soon after their huge 1957 hits, "Bye Bye Love" and "Wake Up Little Suzie," both of which appeared on their 1958 debut album. Within less than a year, Don and Phil Everly released "Songs Our Daddy Taught Us," an unamplified album of stark traditional ballads and old country songs. The lyrics tell stories that feature dead and dying parents, lovers united only in death, a dying child, prisoners, cheating lovers and a few murders."We did some strange albums in our time," Phil Everly said by telephone from California. "That one stands out because of the sparseness and the fact that the songs were our heritage."The tribute by Mr. Armstrong and Ms. Jones, "Foreverly" (Reprise), treats the songs respectfully, filling out the arrangements and usually keeping the Everly Brothers' harmonies. While it adds an understated rhythm section, it lets the songs stay haunted. "Foreverly" is due for release on Monday, and Ms. Jones and Mr. Armstrong were in New York recently to talk about it.They were an asymmetrical team for a conversation at, of all places, the venerable theater-district restaurant Sardi's, in a booth presided over by caricatures of Katharine and Audrey Hepburn. They were relaxed with each other, regularly proffering mutual admiration. Yet they still made an odd pair: the ultra-skinny Mr. Armstrong, 41, wearing a cropped leather jacket with his black hair in a punkabilly updo of tangled curls, and Ms. Jones, 34, a dark-eyed, round-faced girl next door wearing a casual sweater.Still, Ms. Jones's most recent solo album, "Little Broken Hearts," has a dulcet murder ballad of its own, "Miriam," while Mr. Armstrong has prized melody and narrative in Green Day's songs. If these two multimillion-selling, Grammy-winning singers were going to intersect, an album of Everly Brothers songs is a plausible spot."Songs Our Daddy Taught Us" could hardly be more sparse or ghostly. Its arrangements use just the close-harmony voices of Don and Phil Everly, backed by a lightly strummed guitar and a bass fiddle. Among the songs are folk standards like "Roving Gambler," about a man who seduces and abandons a woman and kills a man at a card game; "I'm Here to Get My Baby Out of Jail," in which a mother bails out her son and then dies; and "Down in the Willow Garden," about a wastrel who murders his girlfriend."Perfect for the holiday season," Mr. Armstrong said.But both took the music seriously. "It's almost like a meditation," Ms. Jones said. "Their voices are at times high and childlike in the most beautiful way, but these songs are so dark. There's an innocence to their recordings, definitely. But that innocence, juxtaposed with the cheating lovers and everything — it's just creepy when you hear it."The Everly Brothers, rooted in Kentucky, had been performing songs like those since they were children, appearing daily on a live family radio show at 6 a.m. They were more concerned with melody and harmony than what the words meant."I never thought about it too much as a kid when we first learned them," said Phil Everly, 74, two years younger than his brother. "Those songs go back quite a bit. They're real live songs about real things that were going on in people's lives."The album's severely minimal arrangements, Mr. Everly explained, reflected "the way you'd sing those songs on your porch."Mr. Armstrong said he discovered the Everlys' album a few years ago and got the idea of rerecording the songs with a woman. But he was hugely prolific with Green Day in 2012, releasing three albums within six months: "Uno!," "Dos!" and "Tre!" Green Day toured internationally through much of 2013, and it's headed to Australia next year. But while blasting Green Day songs, as he has since the 1980s, Mr. Armstrong had also been considering the opposite end of the volume spectrum."Having big guitars and Marshalls for so many years, it kind of leaves your ears ringing," he said. "I love the power of playing quiet.""Me too," Ms. Jones said with a giggle; playing quietly is what she does.Mr. Armstrong's wife, Adrienne, was the one who suggested Ms. Jones as a duet partner. Mr. Armstrong had met Ms. Jones at the 2005 Grammy Awards, where her duet with Ray Charles on his album "Genius Loves Company" beat out Green Day's "American Idiot" for record of the year and album of the year. ("American Idiot" was named best rock album.) On the broadcast, they stood side by side with Stevie Wonder, Bono and Alicia Keys in an awkward all-star rendition of the Beatles' "Across the Universe." But they had not been in contact until Mr. Armstrong proposed "Foreverly.""I've been asked to collaborate a lot, but I've never been asked to do a whole record like this," Ms. Jones said.
A little over a month ago, I was up in the Balcony section of the Metropolitan Opera watching a performance of Bellini's "Norma." It's not a part of the Met I spend much time in anymore, but when I was young, I sat for many nights in my favorite spot at the center of the balcony's front row. From up there, I would feel like the captain at the bow of a ship, the empty space of the theater sprawling out beneath me, and the proscenium looming fearsomely high ahead.My parents didn't particularly like opera, so at the end of the performances, my father would be waiting in the car on 65th Street for the drive back to Long Island. I loved leaving the theater almost as much as the opera itself, because it meant I got to skip down the corkscrew stairs from the upper levels. I don't mean the grand, exposed main staircase in the lobby, but the red-velvet-lined ones on either side of the house, cozily cryptlike. I'd race down after the performances, accelerating as I passed the Dress Circle and Grand Tier, running my hand against the soft walls in the dim light before emerging into the cold.That feeling of worn velvet is as much a part of my memories as any of the singers I heard. But I no longer climb up and down those stairs with any frequency, because I don't often end up in the Met's upper tiers. The seats for reviewers from The New York Times are in the orchestra: Row L, Seats 1 and 3; come say hi!While this is, of course, a great privilege, I got it in mind to see what things were like up in my old stamping grounds, and perhaps to experience parts of the Met I'd never explored. What do different angles bring to watching an opera?Answering this question became the bedfellow of another idea I'd had: to see how an opera changes — and doesn't — over the course of a run. Does it matter which performance of a given opera you see? That's a question that haunts me as a critic who generally gets a single shot before rendering judgment. Without a previews period, opera singers, unlike actors, are essentially shoved in front of the spotlight. I wanted to see if this system shortchanged the artists I was reviewing.And so it was that on a recent Friday evening, I found myself watching my ninth performance of "Norma" in just over a month. This season's run of Bellini's masterpiece, conducted by Riccardo Frizza, fit my logistical bill: long enough to get a decent sampling but concentrated in a single period.There was also the built-in drama of a cast change. The run began with six more or less impressive, if safe, performances with the first-night cast, including the veteran soprano Sondra Radvanovsky in the title role of a Druid priestess, and the mezzo-soprano Kate Aldrich as Adalgisa, her acolyte turned romantic competition. This was followed by two unexpectedly thrilling evenings featuring a pair of rising singers, the soprano Angela Meade and the mezzo Jamie Barton. (Ms. Radvanovsky and Ms. Aldrich returned, for good measure, for the final performance.)I don't want to exaggerate the challenge my project posed, but neither would I like to underestimate it. While "Norma" isn't the longest work, it's no slouch, and nine is never a small number when it comes to opera. In what I came to call my Month of Living Normally — from the Sept. 30 premiere to the final performance on Nov. 1 — I spent about 30 hours at the Met watching the opera from nine different vantage points, a "Ring" cycle and a half.My marathon wasn't made easier by the Met's production, originally directed in 2001 by John Copley, which grew more mystifying with each performance and from each new angle. John Conklin's set is strewn with a few Stonehenge-like rocks; enormous James Turrell-ish circles of light alternately dilate and constrict in the background. Ms. Radvanovsky was burdened with a risibly glittering blue gown, on whose train she tripped and fell during the fifth performance. The chorus, so crucial to Bellini's vision of a drama that confronts the political with the personal, was moved around in awkward, uninspired formations. It was not a show that revealed new depths nine times over.
Brass and percussion players from the Dallas Symphony Orchestra were to have presented a half-hour prelude to The 50th, the city's official commemoration of the anniversary of the assassination of John F. Kennedy, which took place at noon on Friday outdoors in Dealey Plaza, the site of the shooting. The short concert, which was to have begun with Leonard Bernstein's "Fanfare for the Inauguration of J.F.K.," fell victim to the cold, wind and rain (actually, sleet at times).There was still music woven into the event itself, performed by the Dallas Metro Police Pipes and Drums and the United States Naval Academy Men's Glee Club. And there were other musical memorials over the weekend.Apart from the Dallas Symphony program presented Thursday through Sunday (and already reviewed in these pages), the most notable classical tribute was a chamber concert presented at City Performance Hall on Saturday evening as part of the Soundings series of the Nasher Sculpture Center. It featured the Brentano String Quartet, the clarinetist Charles Neidich and the pianist Seth Knopp in works by Messiaen, Cage and Steven Mackey.It also included recorded material: Theodore Bikel reading Jorge Luis Borges's "In Memoriam, J.F.K."; sounds from Kennedy's funeral (drumbeats, hoofbeats, bagpipes); the words of John and Robert Kennedy punctuating Messiaen's "Quartet for the End of Time"; the words of President Kennedy, Walter Cronkite and individual citizens framing Cage's "4'33"."The Messiaen work, a rapt and soulful look ahead to the last days as envisioned in the Book of Revelation, was beautifully performed by Mr. Neidich, Mr. Knopp and two Brentano members: Mark Steinberg, violinist, and Nina Lee, cellist. The mute "4'33"," which Cage called "Silent Prayer," when conceiving it, was enacted by Brentano players, one taking the stage for each of its three movements and sitting in cumulative silence, which was finally broken, all too predictably, by the ringing of a cellphone.The Brentano players concluded the evening with Mr. Mackey's "One Red Rose," which was written for the anniversary and had its premiere in New York in February. Named for a phrase from a Secret Service agent's description of the presidential limousine after the shooting, this compelling work, in Mr. Mackey's words, "explores the dialectic between the personal and the public": the personal, presumably, in its first section, Five Short Studies, intimate character pieces that are variously reflective, probing, anxious; public in its second section, the anguished Fugue and Fantasy; and in its third, the Anthem and Aria, still agitated but straining to look beyond."The World Is Very Different Now," the young Conrad Tao's new piece in the Dallas Symphony program, also plays personal against public, taking its origin, in Mr. Tao's words, from "the many devastatingly personal stories that use J.F.K.'s assassination as a starting point," responses to "a seemingly inexplicable act of public violence." The demarcations here are not so clear, and it was hard to take the measure of the piece at all on first hearing, since the performance was overwhelmed by strong but distracting visual images from a film commissioned for these performances but not an integral part of the work.So I went back to hear Mr. Tao's piece again on Friday evening, this time with eyes firmly closed, and it proved shapely and powerful, especially in its haunting, accepting if not optimistic coda. At 19, Mr. Tao knows his way around a large orchestra (here including scrap metal as percussion) as well as many an elder master.He was helped immeasurably by the Dallas Symphony and Jaap van Zweden, its music director since 2008, who performed superbly in both concerts. So it came as no surprise on Sunday, when the orchestra announced that Mr. van Zweden's contract had just been extended for three years, to 2019.
LOS ANGELES — Who knew that the star of Mozart's "The Magic Flute" could be a gangly black cat? In the Los Angeles Opera's irresistible new production , which opened on Saturday at the Dorothy Chandler Pavilion here, the mischievous bird catcher Papageno has traded feathers for a feline that leaps from tree to tree, fends off angry dogs and gets captured in a bell jar, radiating charisma all the while.Oh, I forgot to mention that, like everything in this "Magic Flute" besides the singers, the charming cat is merely a cartoon projected on a flat screen. The human performers, their faces painted silent-film white, don't run the show here; they are fitted into a fanciful vision of animation from the 1920s. The three boys who guide Papageno and the prince Tamino on their journey seem to pop out of a basket held aloft by enormous moths. The head of the soprano Erika Miklosa, singing the Queen of the Night's stratospheric high notes, looks as if it's been planted atop an enormous spider with writhing, piercing claws.So clever is the concept, by Suzanne Andrade and Paul Barritt, the principals of the British theater group 1927, and their co-director Barrie Kosky, and so precise the execution that all of this imagery is persuasive. Both the humor and seriousness of "The Magic Flute" are done full justice by the production's gleefully yet gently macabre aesthetic. (If you know the classic Disney short "The Skeleton Dance," you get the idea.)Monostatos, the Moorish servant who wants the captive princess Pamina for himself, is made up as F. W. Murnau's Nosferatu. Tamino's magic flute has been reimagined as a fairy trailing musical notes, reminiscent of some hyperactive sequences from Baz Luhrmann's "Moulin Rouge." As Christopher Koelsch, the company's president and chief executive, said in an interview, the production is an ideal marriage of Weimar and Hollywood: of Berlin, where the production originated this year at the adventurous Komische Oper, and Los Angeles.This time last year, there were no plans to bring it here. The Los Angeles Opera had scheduled a fifth revival of its well-liked 1993 Peter Hall production of "The Magic Flute." But Mr. Koelsch was tipped off to the Berlin version and traveled there to see it in January, where he became convinced it was right for his company. "It felt like it would be a terrible missed opportunity if we didn't pursue it," he said.He got James Conlon, the music director here and the "Flute" conductor, and Plácido Domingo, the general manager, on board. The enterprising Minnesota Opera was already interested in the show, so the two companies joined forces — and budgets — to bring it to America; it opens in Minnesota in April.While it's not unheard-of for a theater to change productions with little time to spare, it's usually an unhappy necessity rather than a deliberate choice. But the Los Angeles Opera's late switch — this new "Flute" was not officially announced until June — should be a positive example for the opera world, where artistic choices can be encased in amber up to five years in advance. Companies should be eagerly looking for new singers and stagings that can be presented in a matter of months rather than years. (O.K., I'd accept maybe a year or two.)This new "Flute" shows that the results can be worth the rush and risk. Few things tend to get stale more quickly than animated projections, but this production stays miraculously fresh, sustaining surprise and delight in its two and a half hours. There is a steady influx of new images, from the solemn parade of mechanical animals in front of Sarastro's temple to the flowers that grow when Pamina waters the ground with Papageno's tears during their duet, "Bei Männern welche Liebe fühlen." Fetching men and women, representing the mates for whom the singers long, emerge from the blooms.But I agreed with my guest at the performance when she said, joking only a little, that Papageno's cat was the only character with which she felt an emotional connection. The production's most radical intervention is to remove the opera's dialogue and replace it with cleverly rendered intertitles — underscored, as if at a silent film, by excerpts from two of Mozart's keyboard fantasias.The idea is legitimate and in keeping with the overall concept, but it has a chilly effect. The opera takes on the feel of a hit parade, a concert with dazzling visuals but a lack of heart; it was easy to be impressed but harder to care. As always in "The Magic Flute," the hapless, endearing Papageno has it easiest in terms of audience sympathy; particularly with an adorable tabby in tow, the steady-voiced baritone Rodion Pogossov, forlorn in a mustard-color suit, savvily earned attention.The rising soprano Janai Brugger, tone creamy and phrasing elegant, found feeling within the constraints of the production's stylization, her hair in an Expressionist-era Louise Brooks bob and her body flinching eloquently under the burden of Pamina's suffering. Attempting his first Tamino, the tenor Lawrence Brownlee had more trouble than she did asserting personality, with singing that was classy but staid. (The company deserves great credit for casting a black romantic leading couple, still extremely unusual in opera.) Mr. Conlon led a performance, and particularly a radiant chorus, whose liveliness matched the show's energy, propulsive even when meditative.Shortcomings and all, this production points the way toward a freer, more experimental style of producing opera, even in a mainstream context. It's true there are limitations on what might be possible in an age of caution. As Mr. Koelsch said, "I don't think you want the reputation of your company being, so freewheeling that you can't make a decision."But there is lots of middle ground between being indecisive and being stodgy. If companies can make this kind of agility an integral part of their missions, and get their donors on board for the ride, there is no reason occasions like this ingenious "Magic Flute" need be rarities.
DEEP catalog keeps getting deeper in the annual outpouring of boxed sets. The latest collections are less likely to be anthologies of hits — that's been done — than plunges into the archives. Superstars are represented by alternate versions, outtakes, live tracks, remixes and official versions of long-bootlegged material. Unknowns, meanwhile, get a new hearing, as compilers and collectors work through the holdings of ever more obscure labels and producers. Annotators, for their part, piece together stories, and art directors enjoy creating packages larger than a CD case. Here, the critics of The New York Times delve into the year's notable boxed sets. Prices may vary, depending on where the purchase is made.THE BAND: 'LIVE AT THE ACADEMY OF MUSIC 1971' The Band's 1972 live album, "Rock of Ages," was recorded on the last four nights of 1971 at the Academy of Music in New York, when the group teamed up with a horn section arranged by Allen Toussaint. The Band was absolutely in its prime, with Robbie Robertson's guitar making every solo sting, and the horns punching up its R&B side. An expanded reissue in 2001 added, among other songs, the group's four encores with Bob Dylan from New Year's Eve. Now there's more: a new, polished Bob Clearmountain mix of the expanded "Rock of Ages" tracks in the two-disc version and, in the deluxe box, pricey extras for die-hard fans: the complete New Year's Eve concert (repeating 11 songs, in less spacious so-called soundboard mixes, from the other discs) and a DVD with 5.1 surround mixes of the "Rock of Ages" set (though audiophiles would prefer even higher resolution) and two live film clips from Dec. 30. (Capitol, two CDs, $19.99; four CDs, one DVD, 48-page hardbound book, $109.99.) JON PARELESTHE BEACH BOYS: 'MADE IN CALIFORNIA' The Beach Boys have traced a long arc over a five-decade career: high school California pop exuberance, psychedelic innovation and introspection, craftsmanlike persistence and nostalgia. Originally planned for the Beach Boys' 50th anniversary in 2012, but delayed, this boxed set surrounds the hits — often, for variety, in recent stereo mixes or old mono versions — with material for collectors, notably the long-bootlegged Dennis Wilson song "(Wouldn't It Be Nice to) Live Again." It also culls from the sprawling "Smile Sessions" set and includes live recordings of unusual concert material like "Friends" and "Little Bird." The rarest rarities fill the sixth disc: Brian Wilson's solo recordings of "California Feelin' " and "Surf's Up," instrumental backing tracks, youthful 1964 recordings from BBC studios. For the many Beach Boys fans obsessed with the way the songs were assembled, this set offers plenty of fascinating nuggets. More casual listeners should be impressed, in the many tracks of unaccompanied or fully exposed vocals, at how precisely the Beach Boys harmonized in the decades before pitch correction. (Capitol, six CDs, $149.99.) JON PARELESERIC CLAPTON: 'GIVE ME STRENGTH: THE '74/'75 RECORDINGS,' 'MTV UNPLUGGED (DELUXE EDITION)' Each of these reissues captures a key moment of rejuvenation for Eric Clapton, the first chronicling his post-heroin emergence as a viable solo artist, and the second padding out the blockbuster that warded off midcareer obsolescence. "Give Me Strength" is the more instructive collection, encompassing a pair of studio albums ("461 Ocean Boulevard" and its shakier follow-up, "There's One in Every Crowd"); an acclaimed live album ("E.C. Was Here"); and a small assortment of outtakes and previously unreleased live tracks. A Blu-ray disc has surround sound and quadraphonic mixes of the studio albums, but the greater trove is the expanded live material that puts Mr. Clapton's guitar playing squarely in the spotlight. But note, too, how "Lonesome Road Blues (Walkin' Down the Road)" — a castoff from the sessions for "461 Ocean Boulevard" — points toward the laid-back acoustic sound of "MTV Unplugged." That 1992 album, which won six Grammy Awards and has sold more than 10 million copies, is best remembered for introducing "Tears in Heaven," which Mr. Clapton wrote after the tragic death of his young son. "MTV Unplugged (Deluxe Edition)" includes the album, a DVD of the concert broadcast (with rehearsal footage), and a few tracks that didn't make the cut — but nothing you didn't already know. ("Give Me Strength," Universal, five CDs, one Blu-ray disc, $69.92. "Unplugged (Deluxe Edition)," Reprise, one CD, one DVD, $24.98.) NATE CHINEN'COOLER THAN ICE: ARCTIC RECORDS AND THE RISE OF PHILLY SOUL' The talent pool for the independent Philadelphia soul label Arctic Records in the 1960s included Kenny Gamble, Daryl Hall, Harold Melvin & the Blue Notes, and Barbara Mason, whose 1965 "Yes, I'm Ready" was the label's big pop hit. Arctic didn't have many of those, but a majority of the singles it released — presented in numerical order in this boxed set, most with both A and B sides — have craftsmanship and spirit. Arctic's producers and songwriters were very clearly looking toward Motown or, far less often, to Stax. But their knockoffs were spiffy — not just the perpetually devoted Ms. Mason, but more obscure figures like Dee Dee Barnes, Kenny Hamber and a high-octane gospel singer, Mary De Loach. And in songs from Mr. Gamble and Honey & the Bees, there are harbingers of the close-harmony Philly soul of the 1970s. (Jamie/Guyden, six CDs, six 45-r.p.m. singles, $149.98.) JON PARELES'THE COMPLETE CHICK WEBB & ELLA FITZGERALD DECCA SESSIONS (1934-41)' This large and thoroughly researched boxed set might be the most direct recorded representation of what mid-'30s, peak-period Harlem swing sounded like. (Recorded, as opposed to performed: Witnesses have said there was a difference, and if you weren't hearing bands at the Savoy, you'll never really know.) Chick Webb, the drummer and bandleader, was God to most other swing drummers, with his behind-the-beat propulsion and tight fills: a master of what Artie Shaw called "controlled abandon." The set also shows the rapid evolution of Ella Fitzgerald — in about a year, starting from mid-1935 — from an ingénue to a great singer in control of her own style. But be warned: You will be listening not only to bruising excellence but also to abject corniness, including "Gotta Pebble in My Shoe" and "My Wubba Dolly." The '30s, warts and all. (Mosaic, eight CDs, $136.) BEN RATLIFFBOB DYLAN: 'THE BOOTLEG SERIES, VOL. 10: ANOTHER SELF PORTRAIT' Bob Dylan released "Self Portrait" in 1970 in a petulant moment, determined to puncture the overweening expectations that had come to plague him. It was a perverse hodgepodge: mostly cover versions gooped up with strings and backup vocals, along with a few live tracks from his 1969 Isle of Wight Festival performance with the Band, his first concert since 1966. "Another Self Portrait" has second thoughts; it brings to light some intriguing tidbits, but no revelations. It strips the sweetening from some "Self Portrait" tracks, revealing wholehearted vocals, and it gathers other recordings from 1969 to '71: alternate takes from "Nashville Skyline" (sounding fairly similar); alternate versions from "New Morning" (generally quite different, including two introspective takes on "Went to See the Gypsy"); and traditional songs left off "Self Portrait" (including a hair-raising "House Carpenter" and a crooned "Pretty Saro"). "Another Self Portrait" hints that before "Self Portrait" curdled, it could have been Mr. Dylan's reflections on his contemporaries and on the Tennessee of Appalachia, Nashville country and Elvis Presley (whom he mimics at times). The more expensive packages include a remastered "Self Portrait" and, in its priciest version, a rowdy gem that deserves a separate release: the full Isle of Wight set. (Columbia, two CDs, $19.99; three LPs and two CDs, $89.99; four CDs and two hardcover books, $119.99.) JON PARELESGRATEFUL DEAD: 'SUNSHINE DAYDREAM' If you know the Grateful Dead's live recordings more than a little bit, you will know about Veneta, Oregon, 8/27/72. (In a New York Times reader poll a few years ago, it came in as the group's third-greatest concert.) Played on the grounds of the Oregon Country Fair, the gig was a benefit for the nearby Springfield Creamery, owned by Ken Kesey's brother Chuck. You may also have watched, in some form of bootlegged, poor-quality video transfer, parts of "Sunshine Daydream," a film made about the concert: footage of the stage being built out of logs; water supply problems in tremendous summer heat; and many, many naked celebrants. The cleaned-up recording as well as the fully remastered and re-edited film were both finally issued this year as one boxed set, and it's tempting to say that this is all you need to know about the group: Americanist avant-garde dance-band mysticism that, over the course of a long day, goes way out and comes back in. Good price, too. (Rhino, three CDs and one DVD, $32.99.) BEN RATLIFF'ENJOY THE EXPERIENCE: HOMEMADE RECORDS 1958-1992' Nowadays, it's easy to make a record at home and invite the world to listen. Five decades ago, the recording and the distribution were tougher, but people still felt the urge to be heard. The songs on "Enjoy the Experience," an anthology of whimsical and sometimes entertaining selections from private-press releases, are all over the place in genre and quality, but the real gems come in the heavily annotated booklet, with its stories of sister keyboard-competition winners, gospel trumpeters and records made solely to sit in a warehouse as part of a tax scam. This album serves as a companion piece to the book of the same title, which is full of even taller tales. (Now-Again, two CDs, $15.04.) JON CARAMANICAVAN MORRISON: 'MOONDANCE' ﻿Van Morrison's 1970 album "Moondance" breezes along, bringing to earth the supernal blend of soul, jazz, folk, country and Irish music that Mr. Morrison forged for its 1968 predecessor "Astral Weeks." Yet behind the ease was work: the rehearsals, fine-tuning and chemistry-seeking that are documented on material from the studio sessions behind the album: one CD on the Expanded version, three on the Deluxe. (Both packages also include a remastered "Moondance" album; Deluxe also holds a high-resolution Blu-ray disc of stereo and 5.1 mixes.) Mr. Morrison was largely recording live with his full band, including the horn section that's laced through the arrangements; it was all or nothing. The sessions reveal that before he achieved the poise of the "Moondance" album, he blew off steam in more boisterous material, including a newly unearthed song, "I Shall Sing," while the single "Moondance" went through a much jazzier incarnation as well. The takes also show that for all the improvisational flavor of Mr. Morrison's vocals, he had clear plans about melody and phrasing. Listening behind the scenes only proves that he made the right choices. (Rhino, Expanded, two CDs, $24.99; Deluxe, four CDs and one Blu-ray disc, $69.99.) JON PARELESTHE CLASH: 'SOUND SYSTEM' A band with global politics, ferocious stage energy, intuitive smarts about fashion and advertising, and one of the all-time great learning curves? A band like that would last longer these days. The Clash — inspired by the culture of West London squatters, the Sex Pistols, Central American rebel movements, the Antillean music of the Notting Hill carnival and its members' own wide-angle understanding of American gospel, rockabilly, jazz, and hip-hop — ran hot and basically burned out after five and a half years. Herewith, packaged in a cardboard-reproduction boombox, Columbia reissues nearly everything the band put out between 1976 and 1982. That includes not just the remastered albums, but also early demos, promotional videos, official badges and reproduced fan-club magazines: the "Armagideon Times," in two volumes, as well as a third with new reminiscences. (Missing is the live material from the film "Rude Boy," a semi-documentary with a story line that the band disavowed as well as the "London Calling" demos widely known as the "Vanilla Tapes.") Three observations: After 1979, the rhythm section made it all work. The B sides were important. And "Sandinista!" — even with all its experimental bagginess and doggerel — sounds even stronger now, when most bands don't know how to make single albums, let alone triples. (Columbia: 11 CDs, one DVD, magazines, stickers, badges, etc., $249.98.) BEN RATLIFFWOODY GUTHRIE: 'AMERICAN RADICAL PATRIOT' The first four discs of "American Radical Patriot" tell a familiar story about Woody Guthrie: the singer as empathetic chronicler and interpreter of the American folk tradition. They comprise the complete Library of Congress recordings of Guthrie — undertaken in 1940 by Alan Lomax — and the songs are peppered with striking interviews. But the remainder of this set is given over to a handful of quixotic collections of songs, in essence commissions from the government Guthrie made a career of agitating against. The songs inspired by the Bonneville Power Authority fit cleanly into his catalog, but things begin to turn left with songs recorded in support of the anti-fascist war effort: "Whoopy Ti-Yi, Get Along, Mr. Hitler," anyone? Those are followed by what would from someone else be considered novelty songs about venereal disease. So then: Woody Guthrie, American pragmatic patriot, maybe? (Rounder, six CDs, one DVD and one 10-inch record, $89.49.) JON CARAMANICADONNY HATHAWAY: 'NEVER MY LOVE — THE ANTHOLOGY' "Zyxygy Concerto," a four-part, 20-minute suite for piano and orchestra recorded in 1973, is the unexpected find on this collection. Somber, triumphal, shimmering and lushly Romantic, it's a grand statement from a musician whose ambitions weren't contained by the funk and R&B that made him a touchstone for the neo-soul generation. The six albums Hathaway released from 1970 to '73 meld deep gospel roots with classical training, jazz agility, social consciousness and an ardent, supple, melisma-loving voice. But Hathaway suffered from mental illness and deep insecurity; he released no new solo recordings after 1974, and only Roberta Flack, with whom he had made a best-selling duet album, coaxed more duets from him before he died, apparently of suicide, in 1979. This anthology has a disc of unreleased tracks — an expansive version of the Association's hit "Never My Love," extended instrumental workouts, Motown-style songs from the late 1960s, instrumentals awaiting vocals — along with a live set from 1971 (culminating in 14 absorbing minutes of "The Ghetto") and a disc of the Hathaway-Flack duets. A disc titled "Favorites" sidesteps previous anthologies by turning, often, to mono versions or radio edits of his best-known songs. Hathaway's official recordings are still his best introduction, but this collection underscores the loss. (Rhino, four CDs, $49.99.) JON PARELESLEE HAZLEWOOD: 'LEE HAZLEWOOD INDUSTRIES: THERE'S A DREAM I'VE BEEN SAVING, 1966-1971)' The producer, songwriter, singer and legendary eccentric Lee Hazlewood parlayed his early hits — notably "These Boots Are Made for Walkin' " — into his own label, Lee Hazlewood Industries, which spent five profligate years in search of a hit. It signed groups like the Kitchen Cinq, the Surprise Package, the Aggregation and Honey Ltd., and recorded them with some of Los Angeles's top musicians and arrangers. They wrapped elaborate productions around what are now artifacts of wistfully orchestral and then, as of 1968, gleefully fuzz-toned psychedelic pop. The label also continued Mr. Hazlewood's own recording career of country-rooted, existentially downhearted, easy-listening story-songs and duets with women including Ann-Margret, with whom he made an album. Two discs hold Mr. Hazlewood's own songs and duets; two more sample the label's signings, including one song from its most significant group: Gram Parsons's International Submarine Band. The DVD is his loose-limbed precursor to music videos, "Cowboy in Sweden." For dedicated novelty-seekers, the deluxe box digitizes all of the label's releases onto DVDs — except, alas, the International Submarine Band. (Light in the Attic, four CDs, one DVD, 172-page hardcover book, etc., $80; Deluxe four CDs, four DVDs, 172-page hardcover book, $180.) JON PARELES'HOUSTON RAP' "Houston Rap," the book, is a handsome collection of photos by Peter Beste and interviews by Lance Scott Walker that capture the city's hip-hop history in full. But the deluxe bundle edition is where the goodies are — an additional book of interviews, a vinyl pressing of DJ Screw's album "All Screwed Up," a seven-inch single with DJ Screw remixing UGK on one side and Fat Pat on the other, and most exciting, a DVD of "Fat Pat: Ghetto Dreams," a hard-to-come-by late-'90s document of the hip-hop scene on Houston's south side. It showcases the candy-painted cars, the molasses-slow music and, ultimately, the casualties: Fat Pat was shot dead in 1998, and, in 2000, DJ Screw died of a codeine overdose. (Sinecure, two books, one LP, one seven-inch single and one DVD, $150.) JON CARAMANICA'I AM THE CENTER: PRIVATE ISSUE NEW AGE MUSIC IN AMERICA, 1950-1990' Among the most spectacularly odd and transfixing historical anthologies in recent memory, "I Am the Center" collects widely in the too often neglected area of new age music. This is soothing, sometimes disorienting music, from the dynamic harps on Joel Andrews's "Seraphic Borealis" to the giddy flutes on Joanna Brouk's "Lifting Off" to the breathtaking "Formentera Sunset Clouds" by the genre elder Iasos, who is also the subject of his own new stand-alone collection, "Celestial Soul Portrait" (Numero Group). "I Am the Center" comes with mystical and sometimes detailed liner notes, including anecdotes like the one about Brian Eno's inviting Laraaji to collaborate by slipping a note into his zither case in Washington Square Park. (Light in the Attic, two CDs, $15.99.) JON CARAMANICA'I HEARD THE ANGELS SINGING: ELECTRIFYING BLACK GOSPEL FROM THE NASHBORO LABEL, 1951-1983' The gospel label Nashboro, based in Nashville, was the parent company of Excello, the more famous blues label — known for idiosyncratic, echoey sessions by Slim Harpo and Otis Spann, among others, that have traveled far and wide. But most of the Southern singers on Nashboro, including Brother Joe May and the Fairfield Four, were putting God first, working for steady local radio play and sales directly through the Nashville record store run by Nashboro's owner, Ernest Young. In the early years these are tight and quiet sessions — brushed drums under close-harmony groups — until the late '50s, when gospel's relationship with hotter R&B grows closer: You hear where early James Brown comes from in the lead vocalist of the Kindly Shepherds' "Take the Lord With You," from 1958, and Sister Lucille Barbee's "Let the Church Roll On," from 1960, could have been conceived by Bo Diddley. By the late '60s to the '80s, Nashboro made gospel as modest but excellent soul music: no more, no less. (Tompkins Square Records, four CDs, $39.95.) BEN RATLIFF'IT'S A SCREAM HOW LEVINE DOES THE RHUMBA: THE LATIN-JEWISH MUSICAL STORY, 1940S-1980S' The link started out plainly enough — one New York subculture encountering another in the postwar boom — but it became a developed subcurrent, as Latin bands became mainstays at Jewish resorts, as Jewish musicians (including the pianist Larry Harlow and the trombonist Barry Rogers) became central to the evolution of salsa, and as Jewish pop composers directly or indirectly interpolated Afro-Latin rhythm in very popular songs. It's a complicated narrative, but the producers at the Idelsohn Society for Musical Preservation — which has, in the past, brought you provocative CD anthologies centering on the histories of Jewish minstrelsy and Tikva, the long-running Jewish independent label — break it down with style, humor, learned booklet essays and two discs' worth of many Jewish-Latino crossovers, including Xavier Cugat's "Miami Beach Rhumba," Celia Cruz's version of "Hava Nagila," to Puente's "Grossinger's Cha Cha Cha," and Mickey Katz's cleverly ridiculous "My Yiddishe Mambo," which rhymes "challahs" with "Noro Morales." (Idelsohn Society, two CDs, $17.98.) BEN RATLIFF'THE COMPLETE CLIFFORD JORDAN STRATA-EAST SESSIONS' "Glass Bead Games," the 1974 album that concludes this illuminating set, has long been considered the high-water mark for Clifford Jordan, a tenor saxophonist who hailed from Chicago but made his name in New York. For many years, the album — inspired by the Herman Hesse novel, with two soulful and contemplative quartets at work — was also a rare find, like most titles on the musician-run label Strata-East. Jordan had his own imprint on Strata-East for a while: the Dolphy Series, named after the visionary multireedist Eric Dolphy. Among its output, which is all included here, are one horizon-scanning album apiece by the drummer Ed Blackwell and the saxophonists Pharoah Sanders, Cecil Payne and Charles Brackeen. (The Brackeen album, "Rhythm X," from 1968, is a superb precursor to the band Old and New Dreams — in other words, like the Ornette Coleman Quartet, but with a tenor saxophonist as his proxy.) Jordan doesn't appear on all of these sessions, but he plays beautifully on "Glass Bead Games," and on both "Clifford Jordan in the World," another vehicle for his writing, and "Super Bass," an engaging album by the bassist Wilbur Ware that was first released last year. The unmistakable impression here is of a calmly exploratory peer group with serious thoughts about self-determination. (Mosaic, six CDs, $102.) NATE CHINENJOSEPH KABASELE: 'LE GRAND KALLÉ — HIS LIFE, HIS MUSIC' The singer Joseph Kabasele, who became known as Le Grand Kallé, led the pioneering band most often called Orchestre African Jazz in music that spread across Africa: Congolese rumba, later known as soukous. In these recordings, from 1951 to 1970, Afro-Cuban music is reclaimed from an African perspective, with sweet lead vocals and twining electric-guitar lines. "Baila," from 1957, brought the electric guitar into Congolese music, a pivotal moment. Members of Mr. Kabasele's band, like Tabu Ley Rochereau and Manu Dibango, went on to start their own renowned groups. The music's development was shaped by the turbulent politics of what was once the Belgian Congo and is now the Democratic Republic of Congo, and this collection's exemplary liner notes elucidate the political changes and band turnover behind the lilting, swaying, major-key grooves of songs like "Indépendance Cha Cha." (Sterns Africa, two CDs and a 104-page hardcover book, $32.) JON PARELESSTEVE EARLE: 'THE WARNER BROS. YEARS' In 1994, Steve Earle got out of jail, spent time in an outpatient rehab center and got down to work. This box collects the furious spurt of creativity his new sobriety bought him, beginning with three albums that remain among his best: the appealingly bedraggled "Train a Comin'," the tough-skinned country-rock "I Feel Alright" and the bluegrass-and-Southern-rock-accented "El Corazon." There's also, in addition to a panegyric by David Simon, a live album and a video of a new-to-DVD prison concert. The show, which was filmed for MTV, was a condition of his probation. The performance is good, and Mr. Earle is sweating his feelings out, but the fleeting moments where the inmates jump up in excitement, only to sit back down quickly, or the antidrug testimonials they give between songs — that's the real show. (Shout! Factory, four CDs and one DVD, $41.49.) JON CARAMANICA'CALL IT ART: NEW YORK ART QUARTET 1964-1965' The New York Art Quartet — consisting of the alto saxophonist John Tchicai; the trombonist Roswell Rudd; the drummer Milford Graves; and a succession of bass players, including Reggie Workman and Lewis Worrell — made only two official recordings during its original run, amid the avant-garde fervor of the mid-1960s. Given that those albums have accrued an almost mythic stature in their field, there's reason to hail "Call It Art" five LPs of previously unissued music, with a book of archival materials and acutely informed analysis by the set's producer, Ben Young — as this year's most significant release for partisans of free jazz. (The title comes from a line in "Western Front," an Amiri Baraka poem that he's heard reading with the group early in 1965.) These performances, in studios and live settings ranging from a Greenwich Street loft to the sculpture garden at the Museum of Modern Art, capture the band's unmistakable peak, when it stood for an airier, more collectivist ideal of open improvisation than the combustible norm at the time. There's a sleek, furtive magic in the interplay between Mr. Tchicai and Mr. Rudd, and something just as bewitching in the abstract polyrhythms of Mr. Graves. Maybe it's fitting that music so far on the margins would be available only as a collector's splurge, but the level of artistry here begs for broader exposure. (Triple Point, five LPs, $340.) NATE CHINENHARRY NILSSON: 'NILSSON: THE RCA ALBUMS COLLECTION' Was Harry Nilsson the oddest popular singer-songwriter in American history? He basically didn't perform live; he made radio soft-rock gold in "Everybody's Talkin' " and "Without You"; he made a milestone of sadness in the LP "Nilsson Sings Newman," and of sweetness in the song "Perfect Day"; elsewhere, he gargled and belched on mike. He recorded all his music for RCA, and he's incoherent unless you hear the whole opus. Therefore, he's perfect for a full retrospective. This set is that: full albums, with mono versions where they're available, as well as unreleased alternate takes and radio spots. It begins in the late '60s, during the hunt to find and hype the next Brian Wilson, John Lennon or Paul McCartney. (Nilsson was something else again, closer to Tin Pan Alley classicism and a genuine self-sabotaging perversity; today, his aesthetic finds its locus more in the weirdo roster of the Chicago label Drag City than in anything that really sells. And what was up with his sense of quality control — eccentric, perverse or just intermittent?) The perspective afforded here may tell you that his mid-'70s career dive yielded way more interesting music than most career dives. It also may inform you that his last studio album, "Knnillssonn," from 1977, is severely underrated. (RCA, 17 CDs, $139.99.) BEN RATLIFF'LOS NUGGETZ: '60S GARAGE & PSYCH FROM LATIN AMERICA' Even before the Internet, great music spread at lightning speed. "Los Nuggetz" shows how rock — particularly, British rock — traveled across borders and languages in the mid-'60s with a minimum of friction. Take "Me Atrapaste," by the Mexican band Los Matemáticos, a winning translation of the Kinks' "You Really Got Me": so goes a not insignificant portion of this collection, which spans Mexico, Latin America and Spain. Start with a song by the Kinks, the Beatles, maybe the Rolling Stones; translate into Spanish; cursorily study the arrangement; then lay to tape. Repeat until trends change. Plenty of the versions are strong, but the odder numbers stand out, like Kaleidoscope's "Colours," bang-up psychedelia from a Puerto Rican and Dominican band on a Mexican label, or the dark, surf-inflected instrumentals of the Peruvian group Los Holy's. (RockBeat, four CDs, $49.98.) JON CARAMANICAOVERHANG PARTY: 'COMPLETE STUDIO RECORDINGS' The power trio Overhang Party — a loose, loud improvising rock band led by the guitarist and singer Rinji Fukuoka — was part of the Japanese psychedelic-rock scene of the 1990s, a scene that included Ghost and Acid Mothers Temple. (If you are congenitally opposed to feedback, stop reading now.) The band lasted halfway into the oughts, but wasn't very widely heard: The notes in this comprehensive boxed set, including three albums and an extra disc called "Last Recordings," imply that only 700 copies each of "Overhang Party" and "Overhang Party II" were ever issued. This band exploded powerfully in the beginning, updating the Velvet Underground's drone or recording a whirlier, more anarchic version of the Grateful Dead's early-'70s "Space" jams; then they tightened up along the lines of biker-rock and prog, and by "Overhang Party IV," they were making loud, stately processionals. (Important Records, four CDs, $24.99.) BEN RATLIFF'PURPLE SNOW: FORECASTING THE MINNEAPOLIS SOUND' This is where Prince was hatched, a Minneapolis teeming with dirty funk, sophisticated soul and electric boogie. "Purple Snow" — in a lavish and sturdy box with a vivid book full of band histories and photos — is, in effect, a prehistory for an artist so naturally syncretic that he all but erased what came before him. But that doesn't devalue these songs, though many of them are less funky than you'd expect, given what was to follow. Alexander O'Neal's synthetic come-ons are highlights, as are Steven's sly and sweaty "Quick" and the sharp "I've Got My Eyes on You," by the Girls. The biggest revelations are the forward funk songs (like "I'm Under Your Spell") by Mind & Matter, an early band of the influential producer Jimmy Jam. Wisely, Numero Group has also issued an excellent companion piece to "Purple Snow": Mind & Matter's previously unheard demos, "1514 Oliver Avenue (Basement)." (Numero Group, two CDs, $35.21.) JON CARAMANICAWOODY SHAW: 'THE COMPLETE MUSE SESSIONS' Woody Shaw, the incisive and influential post-bop trumpeter, released some of his strongest work on Muse Records in the 1970s, which amounts to two reasons that he's still more of a connoisseur's pick than a household name: small label, difficult era. This survey of that output — organized by Michael Cuscuna, his former producer, and Woody Shaw III, his son — renews the case for his peerless achievement as an improviser on his instrument, from both a technical and conceptual vantage. The earliest recordings here, originally made for Blue Note, involve the organist Larry Young and the tenor saxophonist Joe Henderson in 1965; the latest is a more buttoned-up standards session from 1987, two years before Shaw's death from kidney failure at 44. The choice meat is in the middle, with the urgent material that would yield albums like "The Moontrane," a vital sextet outing, and "The Iron Men," featuring an avant-gardish cohort that included Anthony Braxton on saxophones and Muhal Richard Abrams on piano. Shaw holds to an imposing baseline of poise throughout, making the intervallic leaps in his solos seem instinctual, but never thoughtless. (Mosaic, seven CDs, $119.) NATE CHINEN'SKYDOG: THE DUANE ALLMAN RETROSPECTIVE' This ambitious boxed set documents Duane Allman's robust productivity, from 1965 to his death, at 24, in 1971. That means his early days in the Allman Joys and Hour Glass, up through the first Allman Brothers Band albums. The playing is oily, dirty, confident, effortless — and, moreover, familiar, given that his blues- and soul-inflected style helped shape the sound of Southern rock and more. Notably, this set traces his parallel history as a session guitarist, improving tracks for a host of artists, from Wilson Pickett to John Hammond to, stunningly, Derek & the Dominos. And also plenty who didn't quite deserve it, especially given how little time Allman had. (Rounder, seven CDs, $139.98.) JON CARAMANICASLY AND THE FAMILY STONE: 'HIGHER!' When he started producing music in the 1960s, Sylvester Stewart, a.k.a. Sly Stone, started out with more ideas than a three-minute song could easily hold: soul propulsion, rock guitar, jazzy horn lines, elaborate counterpoint, oblique lyrics. By simplifying just a little, he came up with indelible, euphoric, era-defining songs like "Everyday People" and "Stand!" Then his band fell apart, and his vista narrowed to darker, murkier, more private tracks. That arc is traced on "Higher!," which is geared more to existing fans than to newcomers; the hits are mono, live or edited single versions. This collection unearths zanily inventive songs left off the band's first album, as well as oddities like the Family Stone's backing an obscure R&B shouter, Johnny Robinson. It doesn't hide Sly's decline in the 1970s, but even when he was retreading his past, he was a remarkable architect of tricky, pointillistic funk. (Epic/Legacy, four CDs, $59.99.) JON PARELES'THE SUN ROCK BOX, 1954-59' Sun Records in Memphis was a magnet for wild men and a few feisty women, too. The label recorded not only its familiar pantheon — Elvis Presley, Carl Perkins, Jerry Lee Lewis, Roy Orbison — but also plenty of other whooping, howling, wailing, yipping, rasping, twanging contenders who never became as famous. This 254-track collection, an expanded digital version of a 12-LP set that the collector-minded Bear Family Records released in 1986, includes the big names but concentrates on the others, including some that Sun recorded but never released. Some were just Elvis imitators, but the set also has considerably more unhinged voices, like Jimmy Wages and Jack Earls, as well as tangy, gutsy women, like Barbara Pittman and Patsy Holcomb, whose potential careers were fumbled at the male-oriented Sun. The backup bands — largely unheralded but perpetually jumping — treat the Sun studio like a supercollider, hurling together honky-tonk and R&B, boogie-woogie and rumba, Western swing and doo-wop until the tracks explode. The luxury price of this set reflects its hard-bound book, a trove of diligent yet unpretentious research. (Bear Family, 8 CDs, 224-page hard-bound book, $243.13.) JON PARELESDAVE VAN RONK: 'DOWN IN WASHINGTON SQUARE' Dave Van Ronk didn't have the sweet voice of the title character in "Inside Llewyn Davis," the Coen brothers movie that's very loosely based on his peregrinations through the Greenwich Village folk scene. He lived by the rasp he could deploy as a warning, a flirtation, a protest or a snarl. This collection — mostly recordings from 1959-61, as well as a handful of considerably more recent ones — is a rich document of the folk revival. It's a mixture of folk scholarship and rambunctious individuality, of guitar propulsion and proud vocal imperfection; it's an assortment of vintage blues, ragtime, work songs and, modestly, his own songs. Prizing the past and trying to make it alive in the moment: That was the folk revival at its best. (Smithsonian Folkways, download, $21.99; three CDs, $29.98.) JON PARELES
Every few years, dance music has a moment in this country — at least, that's how it can seem from afar. But the truth is that ever since disco, dance music has been a constant in American pop, even if it wasn't dominant. And around the world, it is often at pop's center, with Americans looking on in curiosity.In Europe in the early 1980s, modern post-disco dance music was still finding its organizational principles, as heard on 'Change the Beat: The Celluloid Records Story 1979-1987' (Strut, two CDs, $15.98), which anthologizes Celluloid, the French label with a New York base that released weirdo post-punk, synth-pop, early hip-hop and African music, and thought to pair Afrika Bambaataa and John Lydon for "World Destruction." Another label that was beginning to thrive at around the same time was ZTT, in London, which released important work from 808 State and Art of Noise. A kind of hits hodgepodge has been collected on 'Zang Tuum Tumb: The Organization of Pop — Music From the First Thirty Years of ZTT Records' (ZTT, two CDs, $12.99).By the mid-to-late 1980s, American dance music scenes were gaining steam, with Chicago at the vanguard, thanks to labels like Trax and DJ International. Two new compilations capture the scene just below the surface: "Jerome Derradji Presents Kill Yourself Dancing — The Story of Sunset Records Inc. Chicago 1985-89" (Still Music, two CDs, $16.87), which is full of buoyant house music; and "Jerome Derradji Presents Bang the Box! The (Lost) Story of AKA Dance Music Chicago 1987-88" (Still Music, two CDs, $24.71), on which the music takes a more aggressive turn.By the early 1990s, the dance music industry was off and running. The year 1993 saw the beginning of the Astralwerks label in New York and the opening of the Cologne, Germany, record store that would eventually birth Kompakt, the label that is the foundation of Germany's techno scene. Its first two decades are captured on '20 Jahre Kompakt/Kollektion 1 & 2' (Kompakt, two CDs each, $16.98 and $15.18), with beautiful, sometimes elegiac techno from the likes of Superpitcher, Michael Mayer and Justus Köhncke.Unlike Kompakt, the American label Astralwerks never had a signature sound, but it did have a coherent idea: Dance music is meant to be big. 'Astralwerks: Music in 20/20' (Astralwerks, 20 seven-inch records, $19.98), which was released for Record Store Day in April, collects some hits and some obscurities from Basement Jaxx, the Chemical Brothers, Swedish House Mafia and other big-tent stars. The box, all flexi-discs, is a fetish item for a label that, more than almost any other in this country, has positioned dance music as the mega-pop it's now finally threatening to become.
Full disclosure is the plan on Throwing Muses' first album since 2003: "Purgatory Paradise," a 32-song album released, in its deluxe version, with a 64-page hardcover book from HarperCollins. Kristin Hersh, the band's songwriter, singer and guitarist, impressionistically details the makings of her terse, splintered songs, many of them just over a minute each but still eventful, with titles and tunes reappearing like multiple episodes. Some of the music is unplugged but scrappy, with shifting meters and the grit in Ms. Hersh's voice; they're more scuffle than skiffle. And some songs turn electric, using enough reverb and distortion to hint at psychedelia but holding on to sinewy structure. Ms. Hersh's prose delves into the memories that occasioned the songs, mingling tour incidents, childhood trauma, philosophical musings and hardheaded life lessons. But the songs won't be pinned down by their origins. No amount of autobiography can entirely explain the distilled wisdom and primordial guitar riff behind lines like "Warmblooded coldhearted/ You can't finish what you started."Clear Plastic Masks, formed in Brooklyn and transplanted to Nashville, come on with blustery, cranked-up blues-rock on their self-titled debut EP (Serpents & Snakes Records/Dine Alone). The churning, galvanic, righteously messy surge and crash of 1960s rock is their heritage, full of loose ends and live wires; they've got firm roots without settling down in the slightest. And there's smart, elliptical storytelling behind Andrew Katz's yowls and hollers and his band's fuzz-tone crescendos: sudden breakups and pleas for forgiveness, power struggles and alien landings, "smoking guns and guillotines." The lingering question is how a band so skilled with words came up with such a head-scratcher of a name for itself.Death Grips — the rapper MC Ride (Stefan Burnett) and the drummer Zach Hill — have made it their business to be provocateurs by, among other stunts, baffling their erstwhile major label, putting a penis on an album cover and cussing constantly. But their bids for notoriety aren't nearly as startling or disruptive as their music, which sabotages expectations with brutal ingenuity. Their new album, "Government Plates" (Thirdworlds), which was released without fanfare as a free download, pushes ever further away from typical hip-hop. MC Ride's lyrics are often chants and rants, rhythmic elements that are barely intelligible — though full of bleak, deranged or drugged-out thoughts when they are — and they're usually squashed between long instrumental stretches. Those instrumentals stop and start, throb and zap, sprint and lurch, empty out or swarm with noise, and they often completely switch texture in midtrack — the more disorienting the better. To be extra twisted, Death Grips now toy with electronic dance music of various eras: dub, electro, jungle, even four-on-the-floor, usually with an out-of-phase overlay to trip things up. "I am overflow," MC Ride declares in one song. No argument here.If the instruments on Psapp's "What Makes Us Glow" (the state51 Conspiracy) sound a little mistuned, that's because most of them are toys or homemade, or perhaps kitchen implements pressed into service. They plink and thunk and ratchet with nubby organic eccentricity — sometimes providing comedy, but more often just staying odd enough to place Psapp's music in its own cozy little backwater. Some songs swing or waltz, others are subtly constructed around loops, and they generally sound pretty jaunty until the words that Galia Durant delivers with girlish nonchalance start to add up. Then it turns out she's singing mostly about relationships that have disintegrated or desperately need patching up: "Don't go letting me down, just 'cause you see me coming back for more." Then the humble, makeshift instruments start to sound as frayed as the romances.Andrew McKenna Lee, who is best known as a classical guitarist and composer, shows his ambitious, accomplished rock side on "The Knells" (New Amsterdam), which is the name of both his new song cycle and the band that performs it, which is joined on the album by a string quartet. Mr. Lee isn't an acoustic guitarist dabbling in electric; he has thoroughly considered the electric guitar's tone and sustain, and he knows his Hendrix. His lyrics ponder cosmic conditions and cycles — time, space, dissolution, regeneration — and they are sung by three women, often in cascading counterpoint that can invoke Renaissance polyphony or Minimalism. The songs aren't verse-chorus-verse; they sweep ahead, through passages of tolling solo electric guitar, of elegiac vocal melodies and harmonies, of note-bending quasi-Indian strings and guitar, of progressive-rock processionals. The classical training and female harmonies can make the Knells similar to Dirty Projectors, but this band looks toward Europe and tone poems rather than Africa and pop. Instead of hooks there are sustained dramatic arcs, meticulous and serpentine.
LOS ANGELES —  Herbie Hancock, a pianist of sparkling touch and brisk intuition, has often seemed like a figure rushing ever onward, and the direction in which he has increasingly hurled himself is globe-trotting cultural diplomacy. "I don't consider myself a spokesperson for jazz," he said recently, implying that he has bigger concerns.Seated in the living room of his casually elegant home here in West Hollywood, not far from an alcove crowded with Grammy Awards — more than a dozen of them, including one for album of the year — Mr. Hancock, 73, was in a cordial mood, quick with a disarming laugh. He was also still jet-lagged from an East Asian tour that had ended in copious meetings with government officials about International Jazz Day, his signature initiative as a good will ambassador for Unesco. Fortunately, there was a stretch of relative calm ahead before he was due in Washington, for this year's Kennedy Center Honors, where he'll be among a class of five honorees that includes Billy Joel and Shirley MacLaine. (The gala concert, which happens next Sunday, will be broadcast by CBS on Dec. 29.)Mr. Hancock's eminence in jazz goes hand in hand with his stature in the realm of pop, to a degree that nobody else has ever managed. After redefining the language of post-bop piano in the 1960s, he delved into funk, electronic music and pop-R&B, leaving his mark at nearly every turn. A handsome new boxed set, "The Complete Columbia Album Collection 1972-1988" (Legacy), gathers his sweep on 34 CDs; among the albums are "Head Hunters," a jazz-funk experiment that has sold more than a million copies, and "Future Shock," whose hit single, "Rockit," became an early hip-hop touchstone and a surrealist fixture of the frontier era of MTV. In the same spirit, Mr. Hancock's next album will probably be a collaboration with Flying Lotus, the head-trippy electronic producer, and Thundercat, an affiliated electric bass virtuoso and vocalist.Disclaimers aside, few would dispute that Mr. Hancock has become one of jazz's chief emissaries. Along with his Unesco appointment, he's creative chairman for jazz at the Los Angeles Philharmonic, and chairman of the Thelonious Monk Institute of Jazz, which runs not only a prestigious competition and postgraduate program but also educational outreach worldwide. When he accepted that Grammy for album of the year in 2008, for "River: The Joni Letters" (Verve), a gently illuminated tribute to his friend Joni Mitchell, he was the one to point out that it had been 43 years since a jazz artist won the award.That Mr. Hancock has always considered jazz his core — whatever the style he happened to be playing, and however shrill the objections of his critics — can be chalked up to his elastic understanding of the art form. "The thing that keeps jazz alive, even if it's under the radar," he said, "is that it is so free and so open to not only lend its influence to other genres, but to borrow and be influenced by other genres. That's the way it breathes."This credo seems by now like a personal truism for him. It will probably form a major thread in his memoir, due out from Viking next fall, and in "The Ethics of Jazz," a series of lectures he's scheduled to give at Harvard as the 2014 Charles Eliot Norton professor of poetry, a position previously held by T. S. Eliot and Igor Stravinsky, among others. Some of his lecture topics add up to a précis of themes from his career: "The Wisdom of Miles Davis." "Breaking the Rules." "Innovation And New Technologies." "Cultural Diplomacy and the Voice of Freedom."Mr. Hancock studied classical music as a child, but growing up in Chicago, he couldn't help hearing his share of blues. At the time, his tastes ran more toward doo-wop: "I heard the Ravens, and the Five Thrills, and the Penguins, and the Midnighters." Jazz gripped him after he heard a classmate's piano trio at a school talent show.He enrolled as an engineering major at Grinnell College, though it wasn't long before he was discovered by the trumpeter Donald Byrd. After appearing on several of Byrd's Blue Note albums, he made his own debut on the label, in 1962. And for anyone who has decried the pull of commercialism in his career, it's worth remembering that the first track on that album was "Watermelon Man," a soulful tune that fast became a hit.Mr. Hancock was hired by Miles Davis the following year, becoming the harmonic linchpin in one of the most accomplished small groups in jazz history. "He is one of those rare people in the music that really created a shift," the pianist Geri Allen said of Mr. Hancock's work in that band. "After him, everything changed in terms of what people thought the piano was capable of. His knowledge base was so inclusive and thorough, and beside that was his absolute virtuosity and humanity."During his five-year tenure with Davis, Mr. Hancock released his own influential albums, notably "Maiden Voyage," "Empyrean Isles" and "Speak Like a Child." His logical but painterly compositions also found a chamberlike setting on "The Prisoner," inspired by his work on a television cigarette commercial. "They wanted something that sounded like a Miles Davis-Gil Evans arrangement," he said. "When I did the commercial, I loved that sound so much that for my next record, which ended up being 'The Prisoner,' I wanted to have that texture. And that led to the first group that I had when I left Miles's band."
The rapper who calls himself 100s has a genuinely beautiful mane of hair not seen since the days of Suga Free, and that's not an accident: 100s is part of the proud California pimp-rap legacy, and aesthetics matter. On his self-released debut album from last year, "Ice Cold Perm," he raps with a smooth sneer over gooey tracks that recall the West Coast of the early-mid 1990s, a sound that's been undervalued historically. And his new singles "Life of a Mack" (also heard in the video game "Grand Theft Auto V") and "Keep a Bitch Broke" — in advance of a new EP, "IVRY" (Fool's Gold) — show an admirable commitment to keeping that style alive. 100s is the most exciting artist on the "Turnt & Burnt" tour — along with the headliner, ASAP Ferg — which comes to Irving Plaza this week, and also features various other members of the ASAP Mob, as well as Joey Fatts, Aston Matthews and OverDoz. (Friday at 7 p.m., 17 Irving Place, at 15th Street, Manhattan; irvingplaza.com.)
Xuefei Yang, a gifted guitarist who is said to have been the first guitar major at Beijing's Central Conservatory of Music, will perform at SubCulture on Tuesday in a show presented by the 92nd Street Y. This intimate new subterranean space on Bleecker Street has joined Le Poisson Rouge, among others, as a prominent downtown platform for classical music. Ms. Yang, who has several records on EMI Classics, will perform works by Britten (whose centennial is being celebrated this season) as well as pieces by Ginastera, Chen Yi and Mertz. (7:30 p.m. Tuesday, 45 Bleecker Street, Greenwich Village, 212-415-5500, 92y.org.)
For the last few years, Garth Brooks, ubiquitous high-energy country megastar of the 1990s, has been more or less in hiding, spending time with his family and only peeking his head out from under his shell for occasional one-man shows — focusing on the music that influenced him — at the Wynn Las Vegas casino, where he had a residency beginning in 2009.In his heyday, Mr. Brooks was a genre radical hiding in plain sight: a tremendous ham, a stage natural and an irrepressible performer. He was louder and more daring than his peers, taking country into a rarefied pop air. There was a reassuring stoicism to many mainstream country stars of his era, who are mindful of not upsetting the genre or their relationship to it, but Mr. Brooks always brought joy and cheekiness to the proceedings.Last Friday, in tandem with a new boxed set, CBS broadcast "Garth Brooks: Live From Las Vegas," a version of his revue that was a sort of swan song to the hiding period in his life. Throughout the special, Mr. Brooks leaned into his crowd, his wheat-colored work boots perched at the lip of the stage. He bent his face and voice into unusual shapes. He told self-deprecating stories that made him seem humble, and he largely sublimated himself to the songs, which he insisted were the true stars, and the foundation without which he wouldn't have become who he was.The boxed set, "Blame It All on My Roots: Five Decades of Influences" (Pearl) — available exclusively at Walmart — serves as a companion piece to his Vegas revue, with four CDs of newly recorded covers in rough genre groupings: "Country Classics," "Blue-Eyed Soul," "Classic Rock," "Melting Pot." (It also includes a reissue of Mr. Brooks's "Ultimate Hits" collection, and a DVD of his Las Vegas act.)The selections on this ostentatiously spotty collection of largely inessential covers show the range of Mr. Brooks's gifts, and also the range of his liabilities. He's never been a deeply authoritative singer, but he's enthusiastic and versatile and enthusiastic and distinctive and also enthusiastic, and that's carried him far.Who would have guessed that his scratchy, energized take on Queen's "Somebody to Love" would far outpace his neutral read on the far less complicated "Life in the Fast Lane," by the Eagles? Or that the standout of the four albums would be "Blue-Eyed Soul," not a category Mr. Brooks has shown much affinity for in the past? On that set, he's appealingly hoarse on Marvin Gaye's "I Heard It Through the Grapevine" and sings Dobie Gray's "Drift Away" with exponentially more feeling than is heard on the original. (While we're here, why is Stevie Wonder's "Superstition" on the classic rock disc?)Maybe it's a matter of reverence: Mr. Brooks is far more tepid on "Country Classics," with toothless takes on Buck Owens's "Act Naturally" and Keith Whitley's "Don't Close Your Eyes," though his version of George Strait's "Unwound" is spectacular.The most conspicuous feature of "Blame It All on My Roots" is that it's a supersized effort, the likes of which remain the purview of megastars of an earlier era, and it has many of the hallmarks of a rush job: complacent arrangements and slapdash artwork, though the booklet includes maybe the most action shots of any boxed set booklet in history. Mr. Brooks does not stand still.This is Mr. Brooks's first significant release of new music since 2001, and therefore crucial to his catalog. But it is important for another reason: In its breadth, you can see the blueprint for modern country music catholicism. Complaints that the genre has lately devolved into schlocky light-rock are de facto answered here by Mr. Brooks, who has been importing those aesthetics into his sound for years — on the CBS special, he spoke with holy reverence about James Taylor — and who looms large over the current generation of male country stars.Of the big male stars of the 1990s — including Mr. Strait, Alan Jackson, Clint Black and Travis Tritt — Mr. Brooks was always the most daring. (Not as daring as Shania Twain, but their success was similarly premised upon upending country orthodoxies.) And Mr. Brooks was Vegas long before he took up a residency there. Watch old footage of his 1997 show in Central Park: He was slickly folksy then, and has only become more so.And don't overlook Mr. Brooks's 1999 album as Chris Gaines, an album done in alt-rock drag. It was a colossally weird move at the time, but an understandable one for an artist suffocated by his success in a genre with a stern, watchful eye.On this collection, almost 15 years later, Mr. Brooks can come out from hiding. Thanks to his success, and to country's loosening borders, Mr. Brooks is free to show off all sides of himself. He's a smooth folkie and an anguished R&B crooner and a brazen rocker and a crazy showman — in other words, a 2013 country star. And given that this collection is likely to be a prelude to a long-rumored comeback for Mr. Brooks, it's a loud flag planted to show that he's been the one writing the rule book all along.
Macklemore & Ryan Lewis, an independent rap duo from Seattle that became one of the biggest hit makers of the year, opened the Grammy Awards' nominations special on CBS on Friday night with a performance of their hit "Thrift Shop," and then went on to dominate the nominations themselves.The duo are up for seven prizes at the 56th annual awards, with nods in three of the top four categories: album of the year (for "The Heist"), song of the year ("Same Love") and best new artist.Male performers — and hip-hop acts in particular — were prominent in the nominations for the next Grammy ceremony, to be held in Los Angeles on Jan. 26. The rappers Jay Z and Kendrick Lamar also earned nods in seven categories; so did Justin Timberlake. The rapper Drake is up for four awards, as is Pharrell Williams, a singer and producer ubiquitous on the charts over the last year.Also nominated for four Grammys are Taylor Swift, Daft Punk, Bruno Mars and Lorde, a 17-year-old New Zealander whose hit "Royals" is up for both record of the year (for the recording) and best song (for songwriting); in a surprise, however, she was not nominated for best new artist.The National Academy of Recording Arts and Sciences, the organization that awards the Grammys, used to announce the nominations through an ordinary news conference. But for the last six years, it has tried to stir excitement with a prime-time TV special with the rapper and actor LL Cool J as host. Other performers on Friday's show included Lorde, Robin Thicke and, by satellite, Ms. Swift from Sydney, Australia, and Katy Perry from Toronto.In addition to "The Heist," the candidates for album of the year are Daft Punk's "Random Access Memories," Mr. Lamar's "Good Kid, M.A.A.D City," Ms. Swift's "Red" and, in somewhat of a surprise, "The Blessed Unrest," a minor hit by Sara Bareilles.For record of the year, "Royals" will contend with Mr. Mars's "Locked Out of Heaven," Imagine Dragons' sleeper hit "Radioactive," and two songs featuring Mr. Williams: Daft Punk's "Get Lucky" and Robin Thicke's "Blurred Lines" (also featuring T.I.). For song of the year, "Royals" and "Same Love" are up against Mr. Mars's "Locked Out of Heaven," Ms. Perry's "Roar" and Pink's "Just Give Me a Reason."Besides Macklemore & Ryan Lewis, the nominees for best new artist are Mr. Lamar, the country singer Kacey Musgraves and two British performers, James Blake and Ed Sheeran.
In opera productions, the overall staging and individual performances tend to settle in and develop during the course of a run. This is something my colleague Zachary Woolfe explained in an exhaustive project in The New York Times that involved attending all nine performances of the Metropolitan Opera's revival of Bellini's "Norma" this fall.The most dramatic changes, of course, happen when a new singer takes over a major role, which alters everything. Two current productions at the Met, Verdi's "Rigoletto" and Tchaikovsky's "Eugene Onegin," showed just how significant cast changes can be. In "Rigoletto," the debut of a young artist lifted the level of the entire performance. In "Eugene Onegin," new singers in all the major roles brought more focus to a muddled production.The New York opera scene has been abuzz since the impressive young Bulgarian soprano Sonya Yoncheva took over the role of Gilda on Nov. 21 in Michael Mayer's production of "Rigoletto." This Rat Pack "Rigoletto" transfers the story from 16th-century Mantua to 1960s Las Vegas. How Ms. Yoncheva, who turns 32 on Christmas Day, came to appear in this production, introduced last season, is a drama in itself.The soprano Aleksandra Kurzak, originally scheduled to sing Gilda, withdrew in September because of pregnancy. The Met tapped two new artists to take her place, though each had already been scheduled for a Met debut down the road. The Russian soprano Irina Lungu sang Gilda when the "Rigoletto" run opened on Nov. 11 and gave a splendid performance. Her voice had richness and bloom; she sang tenderly and with agile coloratura technique.Ms. Yoncheva, whom I heard in the role on Nov. 27, seems an artist on the brink of a major career. She has been winning acclaim for appearances internationally and is now under contract with Sony Classical records.She brought lovely stage presence and a sumptuous, penetrating voice to her performance. In sweet, plaintive phrases, she conveyed the winsome innocence of Gilda, the daughter of Rigoletto, a fatally overprotective father who tries to keep her hidden away at home. Ms. Yoncheva has such vocal glamour that, almost without trying, she tapped all the teeming emotion and sensual yearning that swirl just below Gilda's demure outer nature, stirred up by the Duke, who, disguised as a student, has manipulatively wooed her.It is hard to know whether it was Ms. Yoncheva's performance that inspired the other cast members to boost their work a little, or whether, by this point in the run (the fifth of eight performances), everyone was just more confident. Perhaps both.Dmitri Hvorostovsky's voice may lack the Italianate colorings of a classic Verdi baritone, but he has fit the role of Rigoletto to his vocal and dramatic temperament and again gave a mesmerizing performance. The excellent tenor Matthew Polenzani, who had moments of vocal tightness when the revival opened, was at his best on this night.And Pablo Heras-Casado, one of the most impressive conductors in the under-40 generation, fulfilled all expectations. On opening night, his Met debut, the performance he led was bold and compelling, but uneven. On this later occasion, he conducted a confident and riveting account of the score, often enhancing the drama and tension by restraining tempos eerily and bringing out inner details.The most sweeping cast changes at the Met this fall came with Deborah Warner's new production of "Eugene Onegin," which opened the season and played for seven more performances through October. A month later, it returned with new singers in the lead roles and the conductor Alexander Vedernikov.I was curious to see if a fresh cast would alter my take on this dull, jumbled production, introduced at the English National Opera in London in 2011. It had a trouble-plagued path to the Met stage. In August, Ms. Warner, facing a surgical procedure, withdrew and turned the staging over to her colleague the actress and director Fiona Shaw. But Ms. Shaw, who had previous commitments in England, had limited time to work with the cast and crew in New York.Ms. Shaw came back, however, before "Eugene Onegin" returned on Nov. 23.There is not much to be done about the sets and what passes for a concept in this production: The scenes at the Larin estate are presented in a dingy anteroom of the house, right off the grove; the St. Petersburg palace of Prince Gremin is oddly dominated by rows of imposing columns that get in the way of the action, especially the dancing at the ball.But the interplay between the characters and their motivations came through with more focus, which is probably as much a result of Ms. Shaw's presence on the scene as of the insights and talents of the new cast.On opening night, the appealing baritone Mariusz Kwiecien, as Onegin, seemed to be trying hard in the early scenes to convey the bored young landowner's aloofness and inscrutability. But sometimes he came across as a little vacant, or at a loss, until the final scenes, when, realizing that he adores the woman he had earlier rejected — Tatiana, who is now married to the prince — Mr. Kwiecien gave full vent to Onegin's despair, singing with volatility and raw emotion.The tall, charismatic baritone Peter Mattei, who took over the role, made Onegin seem, from the start, someone who took for granted the impact he had on people and was cavalierly flirtatious with Tatiana. Anna Netrebko, the first Tatiana, sang with passion and sumptuous sound. Marina Poplavskaya, who took over the role, is a more unsteady and imperfect soprano. Still, her voice has distinctive colorings and shimmering intensity. There were dramatic nuances in the interplay between this Tatiana and Onegin that Ms. Shaw may have helped to bring out.The other news, as reported by Vivien Schweitzer in her review of the cast change in The Times, was the much anticipated return to the Met of the tenor Rolando Villazón, who sounded in fresh, healthy voice in the role of Lenski. That was a relief to fans of this gifted artist, who had been struggling with vocal problems that included the surgical removal of a cyst from a vocal cord in 2009. Mr. Villazón's singing was ardent, textured and expressive, though curiously lacking in carrying power. Perhaps that will come.
The superb violinist Anne-Sophie Mutter is back in town this week, and celebration is on her agenda. On Tuesday night, she will join the New York Philharmonic to herald her new Deutsche Grammophon CD, a red-blooded account of Dvorak's rich, robust Violin Concerto. Manfred Honeck, who conducts the Berlin Philharmonic on the disc, will also direct her Philharmonic rendition of the work, presented alongside Dvorak's "Carnival" Overture and "New World" Symphony. (7:30 p.m. Tuesday, Avery Fisher Hall, Lincoln Center, 212-875-5656, nyphil.org.)On Saturday night, Ms. Mutter will commemorate the 25th anniversary of her Carnegie Hall recital debut, as well as the durable bond she has forged with the pianist Lambert Orkis, her artistic partner then and now. The program includes world-premiere offerings from Krzysztof Penderecki and André Previn, among pieces by Lutoslawski, Schubert and Saint-Saëns. (8 p.m. Saturday, 212-247-7800, carnegiehall.org.)
Recently, a 25-foot-tall photograph of the jazz singer Cécile McLorin Salvant has been on view outside the main entrance to Jazz at Lincoln Center, at 60th Street and Broadway. Such a distinction happened quickly by jazz-world standards. She's 24, and her first album with any distribution, "WomanChild" (Mack Avenue), came out only six months ago. But it's not surprising that Jazz at Lincoln Center should want to go out on a limb to promote her. Though she writes her own songs, she puts original, idiosyncratic and virtuosic force on old repertory, some of it from the high era of American songbook standards, some of it older than jazz itself.
GAINESVILLE, Fla. — A hush descended on the auditorium of the University of Florida 's Phillips Center here on a recent afternoon, as wide-eyed children leaned forward in their seats, watching the Queen of Hearts lead Alice to the Gryphon. Suspended from fine threads inside a jewel box of a traveling stage, the characters moved with fluid grace, their gestures synchronized to the actors' voices and the soft strains of folk music that came off the speakers in the Salzburg Marionette Theater 's production of "Alice in Wonderland."Behind the thick black stage curtain, 10 puppeteers were performing a second choreography that was fast, complex and finely coordinated atop a two-tiered operating frame. While the Gryphon sat down to play a small organ, one puppeteer picked up the marionette of the Knave of Hearts and removed the billowy crown from his head. He bound his hands and attached an extra thread to raise them in front of his chest, then hung the puppet up ready for his next appearance. On the double catwalk above the narrow stage, puppeteers leaned over the railing manipulating the wooden crosses that controlled the marionettes with finely articulated gestures. As soon as one of the marionettes disappeared from view, a puppeteer would race down a metal ladder and hang the figure from one of the horizontal bars that, with a line of motionless suspended characters, took on the look of a gallows."It's like a second production," Pierre Droin, the stage director for "Alice in Wonderland," said after the performance. "There is the production you see onstage, and there is the one that lays down who does what, when and where — and often it's that second one that takes the most time to work out."The Salzburg Marionette Theater turned 100 this year. Its current tour of the United States celebrates a century of wit, artistry and passion for puppetry. In an age of ubiquitous digital animation, it remains one of the most elegant advocates of marionettes' ability to communicate with audiences in a number of idioms, ranging from children's comedies to spoken theater and opera.Beginning on Friday at the Metropolitan Museum of Art, this Austrian company will present its two most recent productions to New York audiences: "Alice in Wonderland" and a version of Wagner's "Ring" cycle cut to a puppet-size 75 minutes.Mr. Droin grew up in Geneva, where he attended the marionette theater as a child and later became a member, for 18 years, of its ensemble of puppeteers. In 1990, he seized the opportunity to join the Salzburg Marionette Theater, one of the foremost representatives of what may be a dying art — and one that has opera at the heart of its mission. "What attracted me the most was the idea of working more closely with music," he said.But musicality is always at the basis of his art, even in spoken-theater productions like "Alice" or Shakespeare's "Midsummer Night's Dream," which is also in the Salzburg repertory. "You have to play the music of each sentence," he said.Later that day in Gainesville, a performance of the "Ring" cycle, directed by Carl Philip von Maldeghem and produced with the Salzburg State Theater, recreated in miniature all the essential ingredients of Wagner's story, with a particular emphasis on the fairy-tale elements that are so difficult to stage in an opera house.The Rhinemaidens flutter-kicked fluidly through the air as they teased the dwarf Alberich. Brünnhilde hopped lithely onto her steed, Grane. Siegfried fought a shape-shifting green blob of a dragon. In the forest scene, the way he leaned over the edge of a pond admiring his reflection was disarmingly lifelike. In an earlier scene, he performed an exuberant handstand. A pair of threads had been attached to his ankles specially for that move.The marionette "Ring" also offers a bite-size serving of high-concept Regietheater, with its penchant for ignoring historical settings — not surprising given that Mr. von Maldeghem used to work closely with Gerard Mortier when he was the often-divisive general manager of the previously traditional Salzburg Festival. The costumes let the story evolve over the course of the 20th century: The Rhinemaidens wear 1920s swimsuits and caps, Wotan and Fricka exude 1950s Hollywood glamour. Siegmund and Sieglinde are love children of the '70s, and Siegfried's rebellious youth — he wears a T-shirt emblazoned with the word "Hero" that shows off his hard-as-wood midriff — plays out against the backdrop of aggressive graffiti.
He was the big fish in the small pond that was the Greenwich Village folk music scene circa 1960, sought out and emulated by newcomers like Bob Dylan and Tom Paxton. But by the time his memoir, "The Mayor of Macdougal Street," was published posthumously in 2005, Dave Van Ronk had been relegated almost to a footnote in the history of American popular music, better known for the many singer-songwriters whose careers he had fostered than for his own work.Now Van Ronk may finally be about to get his due. "Inside Llewyn Davis," the new Coen brothers movie opening on Friday, is based loosely, very loosely, on his memoir, which has just been reissued; in advance of the film, a three-CD Van Ronk retrospective called "Down in Washington Square," with 16 previously unheard recordings, has already been released by Smithsonian Folkways. In connection with a new book and CD about the Caffè Lena folk club in Saratoga Springs, N.Y., one of Van Ronk's 1974 shows there is being streamed, and a new documentary evoking the folk scene over which he presided, "Another Day/Another Time," will be shown on Showtime on Dec. 13."Dave Van Ronk is not an obscure figure," Ethan Coen said when asked about the origins of the film. "He's the biggest figure on an obscure scene, playing a kind of niche music that we knew and liked. We gravitated to his book," because "it is a great, and very funny, document of its time. His acid voice is part of what draws you into the book, which is the best thing I know of in giving a sense of what it was like to be a working musician at that time."As Van Ronk himself wrote in the song that gives the CD retrospective its title, his was very much the world of "beatnik poets with conga drums, uptown virgins and Bowery bums, bluegrass picking and flamenco strums." Born in Brooklyn in 1936, raised in Queens in an Irish-Dutch family, he headed for Greenwich Village in the early 1950s, and stayed there until his death in 2002, working in clubs that often proved to have less staying power than he did, and sometimes recording for labels that he also outlasted.So what gives Van Ronk, a bearded bear of a man, his enduring quality in 2013? It depends who is doing the talking."People refer to gatekeepers, and Dave Van Ronk was one of those guys," said Jeff Place, a music archivist at the Smithsonian Institution who assembled the CD package and wrote the main essay in its liner notes. "He did the research, and nurtured a lot of people onto the repertoire, people who went on to record those songs and became better known than he was."Mr. Place compared Van Ronk to progenitors of the British blues scene like Alexis Korner and Cyril Davies, who led the roots movement that gave members of the Rolling Stones and Cream their first opportunities to play. But it was Van Ronk's voice, a gruff and gravelly baritone, that could shift into a hauntingly vulnerable higher register when needed, his mastery of guitar styles associated with bluesmen like the Rev. Gary Davis and Mississippi John Hurt, and his astute choice of material that drew people to his performances and records."He was a very good singer, with a tremendous feel, and a brilliant curator of songs, drawing from the very limited resources of that time," said T Bone Burnett, the music supervisor for "Inside Llewyn Davis," whose title derives from one of Van Ronk's records ("Inside Dave Van Ronk.") His widow, Andrea Vuocolo, who lives in a Greenwich Village building that still has his name on the entrance buzzer, put it another way: "He was everybody's library," and all of his peers borrowed from him.None of the songs on the soundtrack CD accompanying "Inside Llewyn Davis," for example, were written by Van Ronk. But he sought out traditional songs, from blues to sea chanties, wrote new fingerpicking guitar arrangements and reworked the vocal lines so thoroughly that they entered the broader folk repertory bearing his stamp. Such is the case of "Hang Me, Oh Hang Me," which opens the movie and its soundtrack album; "Fare Thee Well (Dink's Song)"; and "Green, Green Rocky Road," which closes the CD in a version sung by Van Ronk."His arrangements were smart, not virtuosic, and he thought of the guitar as a frame," said Elijah Wald, who wrote "The Mayor of Macdougal Street" with Van Ronk and is one of his former guitar students. "He always considered himself a singer, and because he couldn't afford great accompanists, he turned himself into the best accompanist he could."In today's music landscape, jazz, folk, pop and country are largely compartmentalized, with lines of communication among them sometimes tenuous. But Van Ronk from the beginning saw himself as synthesizing all of those styles and others."I never really thought of myself as a 'folk singer' at all," he wrote in the liner notes to one of his early Folkways albums. "Still don't. What I did was combine traditional fingerpicking guitar with a repertory of old jazz tunes."
FARMINGTON HILLS, Mich. — For more than 20 years, the rap duo Insane Clown Posse has courted controversy by rhyming about depravity, brutality and insanity. Now it causes trouble by making fun of Miley Cyrus.A few days ago, Insane Clown Posse, a pioneering act in a rap genre called horrorcore, was approached by Fuse, the music-oriented cable channel, to record its commentary for a roundup of supposedly shocking music videos. Though the rappers have enjoyed their increasing visibility on Fuse (where a second season of their television series "Insane Clown Posse Theater," will debut on Wednesday), they were dismayed to find that those videos included nonthreatening artists like Robin Thicke and Adam Levine."How are we going to sit there and talk about how shocking Maroon 5 is?" asked Joseph Utsler, an Insane Clown Posse co-founder who goes by the stage name Shaggy 2 Dope.His musical partner, Joseph Bruce, known as Violent J, added: "We had to do it I.C.P.-style or it would have looked bad for us."The band's solution was to mock the performers that Fuse had asked them to discuss. ("Justin Bieber started off as a teeny-bop child artist," explained Violent J. "Now he's a teeny-bop child artist with tattoos. Shocking!") But even as performers who wear the face paint of grinning harlequins and burnish their outsider status, the duo understand that something looks very strange about this arrangement.The past year has been particularly trying for Insane Clown Posse, which, with an attitude that mixes silliness and over-the-top aggression, has built a worshipful cadre of fans, known as Juggalos.On one front, the band is waging a legal battle against the Federal Bureau of Investigation, whose National Gang Intelligence Center listed Juggalos as "a loosely organized hybrid gang" in a 2011 report. On another, the band is pushing back against a former publicist who is suing Insane Clown Posse for sexual harassment. Add these challenges to the group's continuing struggle to preserve its underground reputation while pursuing mainstream acceptance, and you have the makings of a full-blown existential crisis.Lately, Violent J said, he has been seeing a psychiatrist and taking medication to help him cope with the persistent feeling that he can never turn off the pressures of work."I want to come home, be with my kids, just kick back and watch TV," he said. "And I can't do it unless I take some sort of sedative to slow me down.""If you're not banging the drums, making noise in this industry, nobody's looking at you," he added. "Nobody's listening."On a chilly autumn morning, Violent J, 41, and Shaggy 2 Dope, 39, were holding court at the offices of their label, Psychopathic Records, in a modest building here, about 20 miles northwest of Detroit, that is part warehouse, part frat house. They are plain-spoken but always conscious of how their choices will affect perceptions; they seek opportunities that will portray them in the right light, but understand that, in a social-media era, they cannot afford to pass up any exposure.Indeed, 1990s-era Insane Clown Posse albums like "The Great Milenko" and "The Amazing Jeckel Brothers" both went platinum. By comparison, "The Mighty Death Pop!," a 2012 release that included songs like "Night of the Chainsaw" and "Hate Her to Death," has sold just 94,000 copies, according to Nielsen SoundScan.And though Insane Clown Posse has been satirized on "Saturday Night Live" and throughout popular culture, it knows that this recognition does not translate into artistic credibility or record sales. "None of that registered," Violent J said, when "The Mighty Death Pop!" came out.Still, other independent musicians and labels want to see Insane Clown Posse succeed, because the group represents an important bellwether of their industry.What the band faces now is "a hell of a challenge," said Travis O'Guin, the president and chief executive of Strange Music, a hip-hop label in Missouri."I hope that there's an opportunity for them to continue doing what they're doing," Mr. O'Guin said. "Their business, their merchandising, their touring — all of that stuff is very impressive. Those are things that I don't want to see go away."Nathan Rabin, a journalist who wrote about Juggalo culture in his book "You Don't Know Me But You Don't Like Me," said in a telephone interview that there was "something incredibly defanged" about the band's Fuse appearances and television series.The "outlaw element" of Insane Clown Posse was "a big part of their appeal, even now," Mr. Rabin said, "and it's hard to reconcile that with two affable, middle-aged men in clown makeup, making goofy comments about Britney Spears videos."What matters most, the band says, are the Juggalos, who paint their faces like Insane Clown Posse, consistently buy the records, merchandise and concert tickets, and probably number in the tens of thousands. ("They're not millions," Violent J said.)
The oddest and most revealing album released this year by the pianist Keith Jarrett — there have been five so far, for anyone keeping score — is "No End," a generous helping of noodly, faintly tribal rock jams recorded to cassette in a home studio in 1986. Mr. Jarrett plays every instrument himself, leaning on electric guitar and drums, and hardly touching the piano. The multitracked result often feels like a sincere but hermetic response to the Grateful Dead, which apparently isn't too far off the mark."I never took drugs of any kind, but I knew we were trying to experience truth without dogma," Mr. Jarrett writes in the CD booklet, "and I was a participant in Haight-Ashbury during the golden days of hippiedom." He recalls taking a saxophone to Golden Gate Park for daylong sessions with a hodgepodge of fellow seekers: "Some of the players were not so good, but it didn't really matter; it was the 'intent' that counted. People walked by and listened or not. It was a rare kind of freedom." The music on "No End," he implies, flowed from that same place.That Mr. Jarrett was feeling nostalgic about the Age of Aquarius in the colder era of Iran-contra is unremarkable, even a generational cliché. That he set out to recreate the euphoria of a fundamentally social experience in solitude is more telling. It's hard to think of a major jazz figure who has been as cloistered as Mr. Jarrett, while remaining a vital force. And it's hard to know the precise legacy of that isolationism, which can seem like the pilot light of a creative furnace or the match setting a house, if not a bridge, aflame.Mr. Jarrett, 68, became a kind of existential hero to many of his admirers with the 1975 solo album "The Köln Concert," a foundational text for both his career and for ECM, the German label that soon became his exclusive outlet. His concert-length piano improvisations are still a source of kaleidoscopic wonder, in new or vintage form; for a particularly fine example, consult "Concerts: Bregenz/München," recorded in 1981 and finally released in full, as a three-CD set, this week.At the same time, Mr. Jarrett has, for the past 30 years, maintained a trio with the bassist Gary Peacock and the drummer Jack DeJohnette. This group, which will appear at Carnegie Hall on Wednesday night, is rightly celebrated for the quality of its interplay, which brings a conversational feeling to the mainstream language of the jazz piano trio.That's conversational, as in not a soliloquy; Mr. Jarrett is unmistakably the leader, but, at its best, his trio dwells in a spirit of collectivity and empathy. Hear how the musicians work together through "Solar" and "I Thought About You," the jazz standards that bookend "Somewhere," an exceptional album released this spring. There's never a moment when Mr. DeJohnette or Mr. Peacock settles for stock pattern work, or fails to engage deeply with Mr. Jarrett, who responds in kind.Still, 30 years is a long time for any band, especially when you consider that Mr. Jarrett, who will be honored as a National Endowment for the Arts Jazz Master on Jan. 13, has made music with only a few other people in all those years. Jazz musicians tend to get around, as a matter of course; it would be a daunting task to compile a list of all the people that Mr. Jarrett's peers Chick Corea and Herbie Hancock have worked with over the same three decades. (Mr. Corea has shown that he can cheerfully go through dozens of collaborators in a single month, given a good excuse.)Mr. Jarrett has held to a nearly unwavering regimen of solo and trio recordings, with rare exceptions, like "Six Sonatas for Violin and Piano," another of this year's releases, featuring the violinist Michelle Makarski in a pristine Bach recital; and "Jasmine," a 2010 ballads album with the bassist Charlie Haden, a confrere from the 1970s. Mr. Jarrett tends to shrug off questions about his short list of collaborators, as he did in a recent interview with the pianist Ethan Iverson, in DownBeat magazine."At this point, anything else I would do would be an event," he told Mr. Iverson, explaining the trio's constancy. "And what if it was horrible and lasted only a very short time? I'd happily go out of my career knowing I had never made that kind of mistake."Which brings us back to "No End," which, like "Jasmine" — and the most intimate of Mr. Jarrett's solo piano albums, "The Melody at Night, With You" from 1999 — was recorded on his property in a bucolic corner of northwest New Jersey, within the small, stand-alone building he long ago christened Cavelight Studio. (That name, with its suggestion of an illuminated subconscious, isn't random; Mr. Jarrett calls his publishing company Cavelight Music.)"No End" amounts to an hour and a half of aimless but layered hippie mysticism; at times, Mr. Jarrett seems intent on embodying the memory of those not-so-good players in Golden Gate Park. The guitar work occasionally evokes Jerry Garcia, but it's not particularly fluent, not even harmonically. (The bass playing, on a Fender electric, is another story; Mr. Jarrett knows his way around a left-hand piano vamp, and he manages to translate that rubbery energy to another medium.) It might have been a fun experiment to release the album on an American indie label like Woodsist, where its shambolic properties could find a context other than Mr. Jarrett's heavily scrutinized solo career. As it stands, "No End" is easy fodder for those who would accuse Mr. Jarrett of vanity or self-absorption; it's partly dedicated "to my friends and to my enemies."That's a stronger word even than "haters," but then, Mr. Jarrett is a polarizing figure, notoriously volatile and imperious with his audiences. (Cameras and coughing are his most reliable triggers.) The paradox in Mr. Jarrett's career is that recordings made in controlled seclusion represent a small percentage of his work. He often speaks of an implicit compact with his listeners, who — in an ideal situation, anyway — become partners in a creative act that couldn't otherwise exist.He has a point there, as anyone who has sat through one of his really good nights can attest. But for someone who still idealizes the nontransactional freedom of those park jam sessions, it's a little rich to impose behavioral standards on every crowd. The unanswerable question is whether a less guarded aesthetic reality, one with more variability and sunlight and skirmish, might have made any difference.
We want to see him walking down the streetsAfter the bomb-sniffing dogs checked out the arena, after the band walked past the protesters with their placards, after the sound check and the opening numbers of the 1987 "Graceland" tour through Europe and the United States, when the audience was on its feet, dancing and singing — somewhere about midway through one of those first astonishing shows — Hugh Masekela approached the microphone and sang the opening lines of his song "Bring Him Back Home." For a moment, there was silence in the hall, as everyone understood the pain and suffering of South Africa and the longing for the return of the man imprisoned on Robben Island, Nelson Mandela.Then, when Hugh finished the opening verse, he put his trumpet to his lips and played a solo of irresistible rhythmic intensity, and the crowd burst into cheers and started to dance again to the joyous music from the sad land of South Africa.This week, as we mourn Mr. Mandela and celebrate his life, I am thinking once again of my life-altering experiences with "Graceland." There was the almost mystical affection and strange familiarity I felt when I first heard South African music. Later, there was the visceral thrill of collaborating with South African musicians onstage. Add to this potent mix the new friendships I made with my band mates, and the experience becomes one of the most vital in my life.Most, but not all, of the "Graceland" troupe were fervent supporters of the African National Congress, and many had known Mr. Mandela personally or had meaningful memories of him. Hugh, exiled from his homeland since the early 1960s, recalled growing up with the Mandela family as close friends. Hugh's former wife, Miriam Makeba, also a South African exile, was a longtime friend of Mr. Mandela and his second wife, Winnie.Bakithi Kumalo, our bassist and the man responsible for that magical and impossible-to-play bass lick on "You Can Call Me Al," recalled growing up in a house in Soweto not far from where the Mandelas lived. He remembered standing outside their home, singing freedom songs and, using Mr. Mandela's clan name, chanting, "Madiba come home!"Ray Phiri, our extraordinary guitarist, was a friend and follower of the anti-apartheid leader Steven Biko. Barney Rachabane, who played sax and pennywhistle, had to move his family from their home in Soweto to a nearby hotel every night, while his brother and cousins defended their goods from looters and anti-A.N.C. blacks. On long bus rides after gigs, passionate political debate alternated with music talk.But then there was Ladysmith Black Mambazo. Its founder and leader, Joseph Shabalala, was from the Township of Ladysmith in KwaZulu, governed by the Inkhatha Freedom Party, led by the Zulu chief Mangosuthu Buthelezi. Mr. Shabalala was a proud Zulu and essentially apolitical, but there was a long history of tribal animosity, dating back centuries, between the Zulus and the Xhosa peoples. Most of the African National Congress leadership, including Oliver Tambo and Thabo Mbeki, were Xhosa, as were both Mr. Mandela and Miriam, who wouldn't speak to the members of Black Mambazo.But the backstage tension was never revealed to the outside world. Hugh, as gifted a diplomat as he was a musician, protected the image of the "Graceland" performers as a unified troupe, and, despite centuries of old tribal wounds, made sure that we were united.In fact, the music of the "Graceland" album represented a unified black South African culture, even though it came from many different tribal heritages. "The Boy in the Bubble" is an example of the modal accordion music of the Sotho people. "I Know What I Know" is Shangaan in origin. "Homeless" is Zulu choral music, while "Diamonds on the Soles of Her Shoes," "Gumboots" and "You Can Call Me Al" were township jive songs, urban grooves that were straight from the streets of Soweto, where people of different ethnic origins coexisted under the boot of a racist South African government. "Graceland" was united by the joy of shared music and the sorrow of apartheid.On Feb. 11, 1990, Mr. Mandela was finally released from prison, and, in 1992, the "Graceland" tour went to South Africa. This was an enormously emotional event for all of us, but particularly for Hugh and Miriam, who were free at last to go home. A reception in our honor was given by the A.N.C. and hosted by Mr. Mandela, where I introduced him to Mr. Shabalala. One was a Xhosa and one a Zulu, but the men embraced, and Mr. Mandela called Ladysmith Black Mambazo "South Africa's cultural ambassadors." In 1993, they accompanied Madiba when he received the Nobel Peace Prize.
Virtuosos often impress with their ability to produce unlikely sounds from their instruments. It's such a pleasure when a pianist coaxes beautiful, singing lines from a percussive object and a singer produces trills and effects that seem impossible to have come from a human voice.When a musician's technical control is blended with almost intangible expressive gestures, a pause that perhaps a millisecond shorter would have lacked the same impact, or an unexpected and hair-raising change in dynamics, truly memorable performances occur.Chris Thile is a master of the soft-spoken mandolin, rendering it a fitting vehicle for music from Bach to bluegrass. At a solo recital in October at Zankel Hall, he demonstrated an alluring range of colors and shadings in his interpretations of excerpts from Bach's Sonatas and Partitas for solo violin.At the 92nd Street Y in February, the composer-pianist Marc-André Hamelin again proved adept at wielding a jaw-dropping technique to create inspiring results, his impeccable touch and shading resulting in wonderful performances of works by Rachmaninoff, Mozart and Debussy.The best pianists are able to produce an alluring sound from any instrument. Richard Goode, during a magisterial performance of late Beethoven sonatas in May at Carnegie Hall, produced a glowing, warm sound that encompassed a wide dynamic spectrum from muted intimacy to full-throttle power without ever sounding harsh.As Anthony Tommasini noted in his January review in The New York Times of Donizetti's "Maria Stuarda" at the Metropolitan Opera, the mezzo-soprano Joyce DiDonato's performance in the title role "will be pointed to as a model of singing in which all components of the art form — technique, sound, color, nuance, diction — come together in service to expression and eloquence."The soprano Diana Damrau, in her debut performance as Violetta in Verdi's "La Traviata" at the Met in March, also wielded her instrument to fine effect, singing with clean coloratura throughout and deeply expressive pathos in arias like "Addio del passato."Musicians, like athletes, can face myriad physical challenges. The tenor Rolando Villazón certainly deserves credit for rebuilding his instrument after surgery in 2009 to remove a congenital internal cyst on his left vocal cord. Mr. Villazón, whose burgeoning career was curtailed because of the impediment, offered an impassioned and convincing portrayal in his comeback at the Met, singing Lenski in a new production of Tchaikovsky's "Eugene Onegin."
You could call 2013 the Year of the 30-Something, as two of classical music's most prestigious bastions opened their doors to children of the 1980s. The polymathic Nico Muhly, born in 1981, became the youngest composer to have a commissioned work performed at the Metropolitan Opera when his "Two Boys" had its American premiere in October. In April, Caroline Shaw (1982) was the youngest recipient of the Pulitzer Prize in Music for her rapturous "Partita for Eight Voices."Both were works adroitly balanced between new and old. Mr. Muhly's opera united a musical language not far from Britten with a savagely poignant plot out of the Internet age. "Two Boys" remained, after years of development, a flawed piece: The central character, a female detective investigating a case of online intrigue and murder, still felt like a cipher even after the addition of a baggy back story.But while Mr. Muhly's style tends more toward the reflective than the propulsive, he embraced the depiction of our time with the same moving combination of plain beauty and adventurous sophistication as Ms. Shaw. Her "Partita," written for the vocal octet Roomful of Teeth, of which she is a founding member, brought together elements that included chanting, humming, the deadpan instructions for a Sol LeWitt mural and a 19th-century hymn. It was an assured eclecticism utterly of our time that steered savvily clear of sentimentality.They were not the only relative youngsters to climb the field's heights this year. Andris Nelsons was 34 in May, when the Boston Symphony Orchestra, one of the most storied American ensembles, announced that he would be its next music director, joining the under-40 likes of the Los Angeles Philharmonic's Gustavo Dudamel and the Philadelphia Orchestra's Yannick Nézet-Séguin.The ice-clear soprano Angela Meade, 36, and, especially, the powerhouse mezzo-soprano Jamie Barton, 32, brought joyful passion to Bellini's "Norma" when they took over the leads in the middle of the Met's run in October. In Ms. Barton's focused, radiant performance, Adalgisa's opening aria, "Deh! Proteggimi, o Dio!," finally felt like the prayer that it is.As Pamina in Los Angeles Opera's silent-film-inspired production of Mozart's "The Magic Flute" last month, the elegant, creamy-toned soprano Janai Brugger, 30, embraced the production's constraints — all movements had to be synchronized with stage-filling animations — without compromising the tender force of her personality. It was a performance, like the two in "Norma," that was the apotheosis of the 30-something, with both the freshness of youth and the depth of age.
New York a hotbed of early music? No one would have said so 20 years ago (when some of us were saying the opposite ) or even 10 years ago. But a remarkable shift has occurred over the last decade or so, thanks to a web of interlocking factors, including the formation of a curriculum in historical performance at the Juilliard School, the exponential growth of the music program at Trinity Wall Street, the enterprise of groups like Tenet and the Sebastians and the work of the service organization Gotham Early Music Scene .Even in the barren years past, there were always imported productions, so something like the superb concert performance of Handel's opera 'Radamisto' at Carnegie Hall in February — with the English Concert and star singers like David Daniels and Luca Pisaroni, conducted by Harry Bicket — came as no surprise. But a second "Radamisto" in the same year, and this one homegrown and fully staged? That was a surprise.In November, Juilliard Opera combined forces with Juilliard415, the orchestra of the historical performance program, in a spare but effective staging of "Radamisto" in the school's Peter Jay Sharp Theater, directed by James Darrah and conducted by Julian Wachner, the moving force behind that surge in Trinity Wall Street's music program. Two singers — Mary Feminear, soprano, and Virginie Verrez, mezzo-soprano — stood out in a generally fine cast of young performers.It has been a big year for Handel not only in New York, where things are still wrapping up with the usual crop of "Messiah" performances, but also in Boston, which has long been used as a club to beat New York with when it comes to nurturing a thriving early-music scene. The centerpiece of the biennial Boston Early Music Festival in June was Handel's first opera 'Almira' in a lavish and wonderful production by Gilbert Blin at the Cutler Majestic Theater.Notable Handel performances in New York included another exalted import, the dramatic cantata 'Aci, Galatea e Polifemo,' presented in October at Alice Tully Hall as part of Lincoln Center's White Light Festival. Emmanuelle Haïm conducted her splendid period-instrument ensemble, Le Concert d'Astrée, and excellent singers: Lydia Teuscher, soprano; Delphine Galou, mezzo-soprano; and best of all, Laurent Naouri, baritone, as the monstrous one-eyed giant Polyphemus.Oh, and it was also a big year for Monteverdi in New York, but I'm out of space. There will be more next year, when Tenet and its offshoot Green Mountain Project (named for Monteverdi) initiate a new Early Music Festival in New York in June.
Much of what you need to know about Geri Allen can be found in the second track of her most recent album, "Grand River Crossings" (Motéma), which bears the subtitle "Motown & Motor City Inspirations." The track is a solo piano version of Smokey Robinson's "Tears of a Clown," refurbished with modern-jazz harmony but otherwise faithful to the structure of the tune. Ms. Allen's fondness for the material shines through her erudition; she isn't dabbling, showing off, or using the song merely as a springboard. Her elaborations feel grounded in earthly realities and respect.
The contract agreement that the New York Philharmonic reached with its musicians last week will keep the music playing at Avery Fisher Hall and spare the city from the kind of bitter labor unrest that has set off damaging strikes and lockouts at other orchestras.But it leaves both the players and management facing real challenges.While the deal calls for the musicians to receive modest raises — which will increase their salaries by 6.5 percent over the next four years — those raises will not be big enough for them to reclaim the status they once held as the nation's highest-paid symphony orchestra musicians. In a blow that is both psychological and economic, base pay at the Philharmonic, which is the oldest symphony orchestra in the nation and one of the most prestigious, has in recent years fallen behind that of orchestras in Los Angeles, Chicago, San Francisco and Boston.And though the Philharmonic's management won some concessions — the players agreed to begin contributing to their health-care coverage in 2015 — the agreement will do little to significantly cut the mounting costs that have left the orchestra with growing deficits. The deficit reached $6.1 million in the 2012-13 season, on a budget of $71 million.Both sides expressed relief that an amicable resolution had been achieved during what has been a difficult time for orchestras. Labor strife has left the Minnesota Orchestra locked out of its hall for more than a year after its players rejected proposals that would substantially cut their pay. That dispute cost the ensemble its respected music director, Osmo Vanska, who resigned after the lockout forced the cancellation of the orchestra's concerts this fall at Carnegie Hall."I think, frankly, after we see what's happening in other places, like Minnesota, that if we're able to get a fair contract with moderate increases, that people are satisfied with that for the time being," said Dawn Hannay, a violist who is the chairwoman of the orchestra's negotiating committee.The Philharmonic's executive director, Matthew VanBesien, said that he was pleased with the agreement, which he said "gives us time" to enact a long-term plan that could bring the orchestra's revenues and expenses in line."We understand that we have to operate smarter, and as responsibly as we can, while still being the New York Philharmonic, with everything that's great about the Philharmonic," he said. "No one is looking to diminish what the Philharmonic does, and what it means for New York."When the agreement was announced last week, neither side disclosed the terms. But in subsequent interviews both sides said that a series of phased-in raises would increase salaries by 1 percent in March, 1.5 percent in two steps next season, 2 percent in 2015, and another 2 percent in 2016. There will be more pension negotiations before the fourth year takes effect.Those raises will lift the base salary at the Philharmonic, which is now $137,644 a year, to $146,848 in September 2016, officials said, which is still less than the current base salary for players at the Los Angeles Philharmonic and the Chicago Symphony Orchestra. (Of course, top players at all the orchestras can make more than twice their base salaries, and comparing the value of all compensation, including health and retirement benefits, is more difficult.)Mr. VanBesien said that about half of the orchestra's $6.1 million deficit last year could be attributed to the extra payments the Philharmonic must make to its pension funds, which he said faced an unfunded liability of $21.2 million in August. The rest reflected the investment losses of its endowment, which are still being phased in after the recession and downturn, and the extent to which the costs of things like health care are rising more quickly than revenues. But he also pointed out that the orchestra had managed to raise a record $31 million last year.The last round of contract negotiations at the Philharmonic, in 2012, were more contentious. That year the management tried — but failed — to end the defined-benefit pension plan and replace it with a less generous defined contribution plan, similar to a 401(k) plan. The management did not seek to do that again this time. But players were still upset that the maximum pension benefit remained capped at $70,000, and said they hoped to negotiate a higher benefit before the fourth year of the new contract takes effect.The deal ensures that the Philharmonic can go ahead with its varied future schedule: from some New Year's Eve frivolity featuring Igudesman & Joo (the musical comedians and YouTube stars Aleksey Igudesman and Hyung-ki Joo) to a two-week tour of Asia in February with Alan Gilbert, its music director, to performances of "Sweeney Todd: The Demon Barber of Fleet Street" in March with the baritone Bryn Terfel and the actress Emma Thompson.
During Christmas week, Carnegie Hall is surprisingly active, starting on Sunday afternoon at 3, when the Met Orchestra performs an all-Mahler program conducted by James Levine. The compelling baritone Peter Mattei will be the soloist in "Song of a Wayfarer." Then Mr. Levine will lead the teeming, episodic yet inexorable Seventh Symphony, an 80-minute workout for a maestro and orchestra. Then the conductor Jaime Laredo presents two programs with the New York String Orchestra, a group of select young musicians in training. On Tuesday, Christmas Eve, at 7 p.m., he leads Mozart's Overture to "Le Nozze di Figaro" and "Paris" Symphony, as well as Mendelssohn's Violin Concerto with Bella Hristova as soloist. On Saturday at 8 p.m., the esteemed pianist Leon Fleisher will be heard in Prokofiev's Concerto No. 4 for left hand and orchestra, on a program that opens with Elgar's "Introduction and Allegro" and ends with Tchaikovsky's "Pathétique" Symphony. (212-247-7800, carnegiehall.org.)
I had asked for her response to the bizarrely retrograde comments a few respected male musicians had made recently about female conductors. In August, the young Russian maestro Vasily Petrenko told an interviewer that players, presumably men, "react better when they have a man in front of them." He added, "A sweet girl on the podium can make one's thoughts drift toward something else."Not long after, controversy erupted over comments that Bruno Mantovani, a composer and the director of the Paris Conservatory of Music and Dance made on French radio. "Sometimes women are discouraged by the very physical aspect," he said. "Conducting, taking a plane, taking another plane, conducting again." Then the New Yorker critic Alex Ross provided a translation of an interview that the venerable Russian conductor Yuri Temirkanov, one of Mr. Petrenko's mentors, gave last year. "The essence of the conductor's profession is strength," he said. "The essence of a woman is weakness."The ridiculousness of this flurry, in 2013, has rightfully drawn attention to the broader situation faced by women in the field. Female conductors no longer attract open-mouthed attention among music lovers or the news media, yet they remain far from being fairly represented. According to the League of American Orchestras, of the 103 ensembles with the biggest budgets, 12 have female conductors; just one of the top-tier 22 is led by a woman.Last Monday, the British conductor Jane Glover made her Metropolitan Opera debut, in the hardly enviable assignment of the holiday abridgment — over an hour of the score is cut — of Mozart's "The Magic Flute." She is only the third female conductor in the company's 133-year history.But the Met should not take the blame alone. Women have also been barely present on the podiums of San Francisco Opera, the Lyric Opera of Chicago, Houston Grand Opera and the other major American houses. "I wish I could tell you that our record was better," the spokeswoman for Santa Fe Opera wrote me.Orchestras have perhaps predictably had better numbers — there are more of them, and the pool of experienced talent is larger — but more than half of the 20 top ones I canvassed had no female guest leaders on their main series this season or last; only five hosted women both seasons. Just two female conductors appear on the schedules of New York's major instrumental concert programs this season, according to WQXR. That's absurd.The pace is agonizing, but things are improving. Recent conversations I've had with conductors at various stages of their careers, as well as administrators, artist managers and teachers, suggest that what's preventing equity is now less overt sexism, though those comments by the Russian maestros and Mr. Mantovani have made clear it still exists, than simply time — the trickle of a younger, more heterogeneous generation as it permeates the field — and incremental societal shifts in attitudes about the face of leadership."I'm aware I don't really look like your standard conductor," said Gemma New, 26, the associate conductor of the New Jersey Symphony Orchestra. "I look very young. Many people ask what college I'm in. But once they start to talk to me and see my work, I think their ideas are changed."In 2007, Marin Alsop, probably the most prominent female conductor in the world, became the music director of the Baltimore Symphony Orchestra, the first time a woman had led a major ensemble. (Her predecessor was none other than Mr. Temirkanov.) Looking back on her career in a phone interview from Brazil, where she is also music director of the São Paulo Symphony Orchestra, she said: "When I started, I kind of naturally assumed that there would be more and more women entering the field. But it was strange because the numbers didn't really change 10 years down the line, 20 years down the line, even 30. The numbers hadn't increased in the way I assumed they would."In certain ways, we are still living in the old world. The enterprising Antonia Brico was supposed to have made her Met debut back in the 1930s. But the popular baritone John Charles Thomas declared that he would never perform under a woman's baton, and that was that. The conductor Anne Manson said, "There was one conversation my agent had with one of the opera companies in Britain and they said, 'We could never put a woman in front of this orchestra.' I believe the quote was 'She'd get eaten alive.' " Another American conductor, Laura Jackson, said that in the early 1990s, she was told by a female official of an orchestra in New England that "we don't do women conductors here."It took until 1976, decades after Brico was denied, for the barrier to be broken at the Met by the formidable stage director, impresario and conductor Sarah Caldwell, and she was tapped only at the insistence of a star singer, Beverly Sills. Simone Young followed in 1996.
Last year, Make Music Winter , the annual solstice celebration of participatory performance, took place with an emphasis on its final word. I joined in "Winterize," the baritone Christopher Dylan Herbert's peripatetic outdoor version of Schubert's "Winterreise," at the Brooklyn Botanic Garden on a raw, gray afternoon as chilly as the melancholy score.This year's iteration of the citywide festival, on Saturday, was decidedly different. Temperatures soared into the 60s, and the sky was full of sunshine and fluffy clouds. It was a springlike climate for some of the performances that have grown into traditions since 2011, when Make Music Winter was added as a companion to the original Make Music New York, which takes place in June. Saturday brought not just another "Winterize" but repeats of projects like Daniel Goode's "SoHo Gamelan Walk" (drumming on the hollow cast-iron fronts of SoHo buildings) and James Holt's "Thru-Line" (a union of the G train and Bach's cello suites).I took part in a new addition, "Blink," by the young Spanish engineer turned artist and composer Merche Blasco. The piece called for participants to bring their bicycles, and 50 or 60 of us congregated at Grand Army Plaza in Brooklyn at 4:30 in the afternoon, just as the sun was setting behind the trees of Prospect Park. Like all the Make Music events, the charm was in the crowd's range, from children to the elderly and from skilled bikers to those whose experience seemed — how shall I phrase this? — more limited.Each cyclist received a bell, the different sizes — and, therefore, pitches — marked with different-colored labels. From Ms. Blasco's helmet protruded small light bulbs in the five colors that matched those on the labels. (She looked like a 1920s vision of a 21st-century future.) The instructions were simple: When your color lit up, you gave your bell a single ring. I had yellow, which to my selfish ears made the most shimmering sound of all.The performance began with a few minutes of standing still and ringing, the tones alternating and combining with demented, dissonant sweetness. Then Ms. Blasco took off into the park and led us on a 10-minute ride. It was hard to follow in its entirety the score she had planned but fun to be in a pack of riders, united for a common purpose. At one point, I fell slightly behind, which provided the loveliest effect of all: a panoply of pixielike bells ringing faintly ahead of me in the dark.
One afternoon this fall Tyler, the Creator, and his buddies Earl Sweatshirt and Jasper Dolphin, of the rap collective Odd Future, turned up on a street corner in downtown Los Angeles. Their agenda: to shoot a cameo for the music video "Happy," by Pharrell Williams.No elaborate instructions were involved. "He hit me up and asked if I wanted to be in it, and I'm a big fan, and I said, 'Yeah,' " Tyler recounted of the texted invitation. He happened to be hanging out with Earl and Jasper when the shoot happened, so they went along. They didn't discuss what they would do or how they would move. No choreographer or costumer weighed in, and there was no set."We got out, they played the song, we walked down the block, five minutes later we're driving back to our cars, and we left," Tyler said. "It was sick."On screen, the three men, in grins and T-shirts (Tyler's features a stoned-looking cat), execute jazzy, improbably synchronized dance moves that Tyler said they improvised on the spot. It's a goofy and joyful off-the-cuff moment that belies the months of work and painstaking production that went into the song and the video, the latest of Mr. Williams's many genre-defying projects. Unexpectedly, Mr. Williams struggled with it in the studio, even as he also had a hand in two of this year's biggest songs, Daft Punk's "Get Lucky" and Robin Thicke's "Blurred Lines."Those tracks have some night life slink to them. "Happy," written for the soundtrack of the animated film "Despicable Me 2," is G rated: a four-minute composition layered over a gospel chord progression and an up-tempo organ thrum that invites listeners to clap along, "if you feel like happiness is a truth." Its infectiousness was multiplied exponentially in November, when Mr. Williams revealed what he billed as the world's first 24-hour music video, known online as "24 Hours of Happy."An ingenious interactive work, it moves through the day in real time, following a cast of hundreds of quirky people, a few celebrities and Mr. Williams, as they dance through Los Angeles. It quickly became a viral hit, with nearly 5.5 million views on its dedicated site, and a reputation as a surefire mood booster. Giddily addictive, it has already spawned imitators from Paris to Grand Rapids, Mich."I've never been connected to anything that big in my life," Mr. Williams, 40, said of the waves of emotion the video has inspired. Two decades into a career as a hit maker for the likes of Jay Z, Britney Spears, Snoop Dogg, No Doubt and many more, he was being modest. This month he was nominated for seven Grammys, including producer of the year, for "Blurred Lines," "Get Lucky," "Happy" and others. "Happy" is also on the shortlist to be nominated for an Academy Award in January, for best song.But it nearly didn't happen. "This was a hard song for him to nail," Christopher Meledandri, a producer of "Despicable Me 2," said.Trying to highlight a pivotal moment of character development in the movie, Mr. Williams wrote and rejected nine anthems. "I was just coming from a really pure place of, you know, not having any more ideas for it," he said. "I was backed in the corner. I had nothing left."The film's directors, Pierre Coffin and Chris Renaud, pushed him, and he tried to stop thinking through the problem. "Because if I use my mind, then I had all these references, and that's what the other nine songs were," he said. " 'Happy' would have had something about a little booty in there somewhere" — some vestige of a club track like Snoop's "Drop It Like It's Hot." Instead, "I was like, what does being happy feel like?" Mr. Williams said at a recent event celebrating the film and the song at the Plaza Hotel in New York.At the party, he wore a lumpy Margiela sweater and a T-shirt of his own design — fashion and art, two more worlds to conquer — and chatted casually with a couple unfamiliar with his multi-hyphenate artistic background, about growing up in Virginia."All of this is new to me," he said, of his high-profile year. "I'm used to standing beside someone in a video, not standing in front." In "24 Hours of Happy," he appears at the top of every hour, nattily dressed and effortlessly shimmying around alleyways and bowling lanes. He shot the four-minute segments over two consecutive days in September, in 24 locations, but the entire filming lasted 11 days."It was brutal," said Mimi Valdés, the creative director of Mr. Williams's production company. But, she added, the crew members knew that if they could pull it off, "this could be big."The video, conceived by the French directing duo known as We Are From L.A., starts to play at a time that corresponds to the clock on viewers' computers. From there, viewers can watch it chronologically or scroll around a clock face to see, say, a B-boy and modern dancer bouncing off the pumps at a gas station at half-past midnight, or Magic Johnson grooving in his home trophy room at 5:38 a.m. The video was shot in real time, too — there's Kelly Osbourne, strolling Hollywood Boulevard at 1 a.m. — with the cast of over 360 getting only a single take each."It was one of the most surreal five minutes of my life," said Ms. Osbourne, the TV host and fashion commentator. She had met Mr. Williams around Los Angeles, and he invited her to participate after they happened to vacation in the same spot. But she also didn't get much background on the project. "I had seven-inch Saint Laurent heels on, not expecting to be dancing down Hollywood Boulevard," she said. The sound came from a speaker on a wheelchair — "It looked like a homeless person had stolen it from a hospital" — and it was shot guerrilla style, with no streets blocked off. Spectators sometimes wander through a scene, or gawk. (Impromptu, Tyler, the Creator, grabbed a broom to dance with from a store's display, and the shopkeeper followed him to retrieve it.)The voice actors from "Despicable Me 2," like Steve Carell and Miranda Cosgrove, also appear, along with some costumed characters from the movie (Mr. Williams's idea). Ms. Cosgrove merely walks, slightly bobbing, down the street in her section. "I'm a really bad dancer," she explained. "That was, like, a lot for me. I feel like I was going all out." But the freedom to do as she pleased was appealing."With other music videos, they've been really structured, and you have to worry about the story line, and this was really about having a good time," said Ms. Cosgrove, an actress and singer. "All the people that were in the crew were dancing on the other side of the camera. It was really fun. I felt like it was like a flash mob or something."The video's directors, Clément Durou and Pierre Dupaquier, didn't expect audiences to watch the whole thing consecutively. "Even us, we didn't watch the 24 hours in a row," Mr. Durou said in a phone interview from Paris. (A few bloggers have done it, though, and Mr. Durou said his mother was making an attempt.) They did hope to disrupt the normally passive act of watching music videos."The main point is to create freedom for the viewers and to make actors, and not spectators, in front of the videos," Mr. Durou said. And they wanted to showcase a canon of movement on screen, "like a dictionary of dance," Mr. Durou said.So the marriage of Mr. Williams's toe-tapping song and their interactive 24-hour concept — which they had had for a while — was creatively fortuitous, they said. The diverse locations and casting, which Mr. Williams insisted on, also fit, Mr. Durou said, to show that whoever, "whenever and wherever you are, you can be happy."
In 2013, Miley Cyrus wagged her tongue and set tongues wagging. Thanks to a handful of steamy videos, some outrageous wardrobe choices and an erotic comedic performance at the MTV Video Music Awards, Ms. Cyrus took the warp-speed path from directionless ex-child star (as the Disney Channel's Hannah Montana) to the most directional of pop stars, sliding easily into the role of pop's enfant terrible. Her album "Bangerz" (RCA) — for which she'll begin touring in February — was notable for its risk-taking attitude in a year when her competition played it frustratingly smooth.One recent morning, she was at the Four Seasons in New York after a bumpy weekend in which she missed a show in Boston because of weather, then had problems with her voice. But even at the early hour, she was focused and businesslike and hyper self-aware, joking about getting a little Bailey's for her coffee. These are excerpts from the conversation.Q. I was struck in your MTV documentary "Miley: The Movement" by how aware of the V.M.A.s' importance you were.A. But I didn't know that I was going to be the only one that was really going to push it like that. It's actually really funny how many people could watch my performance, and they think it was, like, sexist and degrading to women, and somehow people found that it was racist, which I couldn't even wrap my mind around. Because I'm like: "How do I win? If I have white dancers, then I'm racist. If I have black girl dancers, then I'm racist." We know we're not racist, and I know I'm not putting down women. People got a rise out of me saying that I was a feminist, but I am. I'm telling women be whoever you want to be.As people have brought these things up to you over the last year, has it changed your personal thinking about race?No, I never let that change me. My grandma, who is alive, was living in a time where there was no way in hell that she would've ever thought there would've been a black president. I mean, never. And my grandma's like, not even 80, so this is in a short period of time that things have changed so much. I really thought about it a lot when Nelson Mandela passed away, because I couldn't even imagine living this life and seeing how much it's changed. So, you know, I look forward to when I'm older, my kids being like, "What do you mean people ever even talked about what color your dancers were?"You obviously know that the primary visual imprint of you from the last six months is either the V.M.A.s or your videos.I went from people just thinking I was, like, a baby to people thinking I'm this, like, sex freak that really just pops molly and does lines all day. It's like, "Has anyone ever heard of rock 'n' roll?" There's a sex scene in pretty much every single movie, and they go, "Well, that's a character." Well, that's a character. I don't really dress as a teddy bear and, like, twerk on Robin Thicke, you know?Last night, I was talking about some Madonna performances, and I said, "At some point, everything becomes irrelevant." Like, no one even thinks about when she did "Like a Virgin" at the V.M.A.s. That just becomes a standard, where it's just like, "Oh, that's her thing." So, I feel like now that I did the V.M.A.s, that just kind of became a standard for me, and then anytime I do anything else, they're like, "Miley kept it tame tonight."How closely do you watch what other pop stars are doing?I watch everyone's music videos, to the point where I'm O.C.D., looking at every single thing they're wearing and what they're doing. Before, because I didn't have my own personal self yet, it was hard for me to watch that kind of stuff. I was so jealous of what everyone else got to do, because I didn't get to truly be myself yet. But now I realize how much they're not being themselves either. You don't have to be signed to Disney Channel to be put in a box, or to be rated PG. I'm with artists sometimes, and I'll take a picture of them or whatever. They make me delete it.Yeah, it's insane. I'll get someone to, like, flash me, and they'll be, like, "You have to delete it!" I had to do that when I was 14 or 15, but even then I didn't care. Like, if someone was videoing me ripping a bong, I didn't care, so it's just funny to me. I'm like: "Dude, you're 30. Like, why can't someone see a picture of your [breasts]?"I don't have a bunch of celeb friends, because I feel like some of them are a little scared of the association. This is terrible. I was backstage with [the rising pop star] Ariana Grande. I'm like, "Walk out with me right now and get this picture, and this will be the best thing that happens to you, because just you associating with me makes you a little less sweet."
One of the baritones was asked to work on his pitch: "Enter as a tenor!" A soprano was coached on her volume: "Make that the top of your crescendo!" And the ensembles were urged to work on their diction, and the rhythm of their back and forth: "Like table tennis!"None of which would have been unusual at an opera rehearsal but for one thing: Not a note of music was being played or sung.As the Metropolitan Opera prepares to mount an opulent, Klimt-inspired new production of "Die Fledermaus" on New Year's Eve, the director, Jeremy Sams, was in a subterranean rehearsal room working with the cast on the special challenge this operetta has posed for more than a century: how to keep its Champagne effervescence from going flat whenever Johann Strauss's intoxicating waltzes stop, and the spoken dialogue begins."Comedy gold," Mr. Sams would say encouragingly when a scene came together. "Comedy gold."The mission to bring the funny back to "Fledermaus" was proceeding on several fronts. The production, and a new English translation, was entrusted to Mr. Sams, a director experienced in both opera and farce. New dialogue was written by the playwright Douglas Carter Beane, who recently wrote a new book for the musical "Rodgers & Hammerstein's Cinderella" on Broadway. And the cast includes an assortment of opera stars, stage actors and, in the case of Paulo Szot, the baritone playing Dr. Falke, someone with a foot in both worlds: He sings regularly at the Met but also won a Tony Award in 2008 for his role in "South Pacific."The goal for this new "Fledermaus" was not to squeeze as many thigh slappers and modern allusions as possible between the waltzes and polkas, but rather to let its comedy flow naturally from the oft-rewritten operetta, and the French comedy it was based on."It's brilliantly put together, and that's what I'm trying to highlight," said Mr. Sams, who wrote and devised the Baroque pastiche "The Enchanted Island" at the Met two years ago and who directed Michael Frayn's farce "Noises Off" on Broadway.Comedy can be a tricky proposition in opera. While audiences can generally agree that it is sad when Mimi dies in "La Bohème" or Violetta expires in "La Traviata," they can be divided as to whether a gag or silly piece of stage business is inspired or insipid.To say something is "funny for opera" can sound like faint praise. It suggests grading on a curve, like describing a politician as "handsome for Washington." When Woody Allen directed Puccini's comedy "Gianni Schicchi" at the Los Angeles Opera a few years ago, he described the piece as "funny compared to 'Tosca,' not funny compared to 'Duck Soup.' " The classic cartoon "What's Opera, Doc?" laughs at opera more than with it, and after Elmer Fudd appears to succeed in his Wagnerian quest to "kill the wabbit," Bugs Bunny revives to ask: "Well, what did you expect in an opera? A happy ending?"Of course, there has been plenty of laughter heard in New York opera houses this season, from the guffaws at the ribald choruses in Mark-Anthony Turnage's "Anna Nicole" at New York City Opera to the laughter that greeted the Met's new production of Verdi's "Falstaff."Mr. Sams said his strategy for this "Fledermaus" was simple: "Rigorously tell the story," without a lot of distractions that slow down its tightly wound plot."Die Fledermaus" — in part based on a French play by Henri Meilhac and Ludovic Halévy, who wrote librettos for Offenbach and Bizet — is a precursor of screwball comedy, with its characters lured to a Viennese ball while pretending to be other people. High jinks ensue. One of the lead characters, Eisenstein, who is supposed to be starting a short jail sentence that night, winds up hobnobbing with his jailer, whom he takes for a French nobleman, and trying to seduce a masked woman who claims to be a Hungarian countess but who is actually his wife."If it is funny, it will only be funny because there are people in situations which are farcical or ludicrous, people pretending to be what they're not," Mr. Sams said. "And if along the way, people chuckle a bit, that's just a bonus. But that's not what we're trying to do. It's not stand-up."The inherent difficulties of staging operettas in big opera houses is one reason that "Fledermaus" has long been immune to the authenticity movement that grips the rest of the opera world. It is regularly translated, updated, rewritten and reimagined.That was already the case in 1950, when Garson Kanin, the stage and film writer and director, wrote an English version for the Met. "The greatness of this music," he wrote at the time, "is proved by the amount of tinkering which it has survived."That tinkering continued: In 1998 Betty Comden and Adolph Green, who wrote the book for "On the Town" and the screenplay for "Singin' in the Rain," wrote a new "Fledermaus" for the Met that added vaudeville-like routines and turned one of its characters into Sigmund Freud.Since Peter Gelb became the general manager of the Met, the company has updated some classics — it now has had a Rat Pack-era "Rigoletto" set in Las Vegas, and its new "Falstaff" is set in 1950s England. There was originally talk of setting this new "Fledermaus" in present-day New York. But Mr. Sams concluded that many of the things that make the plot work would simply not make sense — especially Dr. Falke's desire for revenge for the humiliation he felt years earlier when he was forced to wander the streets dressed as a bat, the "Fledermaus" of the title, after a drunken costume party."In New York, these things come as standard," Mr. Sams said.So he and Mr. Beane set the piece in Vienna on New Year's Eve, 1899 — 25 years after its premiere — and decided to draw more implicit resonances with modern New York.
WANTAGH, N.Y. — "Here's to Billy Joel — that's why we've got a gig," Mike DelGuidice called out from his piano at Mulcahy's, a pub and concert hall here on Long Island. As he and his band, Big Shot , performed covers of songs like "My Life" and "Scenes From an Italian Restaurant" on a recent Friday night, a regular crowd of revelers occasionally stopped taking selfies long enough to applaud, or at least clink their beer bottles in appreciation.Running a tribute band, as Mr. DelGuidice has done for nearly 15 years, can be occasionally unglamorous work, but it has provided invaluable training for his other vocation: playing Billy Joel's music, alongside Mr. Joel himself, as the newest member of his band.Just a week earlier, Mr. DelGuidice was one of a few musicians onstage in the otherwise empty Nassau Coliseum in Hempstead, N.Y., practicing with Mr. Joel as that best-selling singer-songwriter prepared for his New Year's Eve concert at Barclays Center in Brooklyn. At 42, Mr. DelGuidice (pronounced del-JU-das) has a rugged, tattooed exterior and a shaved head that belie a gentle demeanor.While the mischievous Mr. Joel, running the rehearsal from his own piano, raced through impromptu renditions of Cream's "Tales of Brave Ulysses" and "The Godfather" theme, Mr. DelGuidice matched him chord for chord on a guitar, never losing the tempo or the grateful smile on his face.Later, after the rehearsal, Mr. DelGuidice said: "I'm not nervous, I'm just overwhelmed with every emotion you could possibly imagine. I've waited my whole life to do something like this."The phenomenon of long-lived rock acts replenishing their ranks with performers who cover their music is no longer unusual — groups like Judas Priest and Boston have done it — and it is becoming increasingly acceptable to artists and listeners alike."That's what the audience wants," said the filmmaker Ramona S. Diaz, whose documentary "Don't Stop Believin': Everyman's Journey" chronicles the classic-rock group Journey as it hires a cover singer from the Philippines to become its new lead vocalist."From the point of view of the fans, it's like you're one step up," Ms. Diaz said. "It's not even a step up — it's the ultimate. You've gotten the gold."For Mr. DelGuidice, who continues to alternate shows with his tribute band and with the genuine article, his recent hiring as a guitarist, vocalist and rehearsal pianist in Mr. Joel's band is the ultimate validation of a career spent paying homage to Billy Joel music.It also allows Mr. Joel, a fellow Long Islander, to reconnect with his working-class roots and honor his hometown fans while providing an opportunity for a diligent performer who sometimes reminds him of himself."In a way, it's a form of gratitude," Mr. Joel, 64, said in an interview. "Thank you for doing my stuff and for working really hard — now, come along with us."From a narrow dressing room above Mulcahy's, surrounded by autographed photos of bands like Warrant and Blue Oyster Cult, Mr. DelGuidice recalled his musical upbringing as one that had paralleled Mr. Joel's trajectory for years but never intersected with it.Mr. DelGuidice grew up in Miller Place, on the North Shore of Long Island, obsessing over the music of Mr. Joel (as well as of Rush and the Bee Gees). He taught himself piano, guitar and drums by watching and listening to Mr. Joel's live performances, and, by 17, he was already playing covers in piano bars, where patrons often compared him to his musical hero.That dead-on similarity made it difficult for Mr. DelGuidice to be signed by record labels when he tried to attract them with his original compositions."Your influences — they are who you are," he said. "But what they were hearing was probably accurate, and they were probably right, and I was just young and stubborn."So, when he decided to form Big Shot around 2000, he said it suited his preference to be "an in-the-background guy.""It's easy to play a song that you know people like," Mr. DelGuidice said. "Now, all you've got to do is pull it off decently."As the reputations of Mr. DelGuidice and Big Shot grew, they attracted the attention of longtime members of Mr. Joel's band, like the guitarist Tommy Byrnes and Dave Rosenthal, his keyboardist and musical director.
